UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGT ON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
Annual report pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
For the fiscal year ended Commission file
December 31, 2020 number1-5805
JPMorgan Chase & Co.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware 13-2624428
(State or other jurisdiction of
 incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. employer
 identification no.)
383 Madison Avenue,
New York,New York 10179
(Address of principal executive
offices) (Zip Code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (212) 270-6000
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s)Name of each exchange on which
registered
Common stock JPM The New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a one-four hundredth interest in a share of 6.10% Non-
Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series AAJPM PR G The New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a one-four hundredth interest in a share of 6.15% Non-
Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series BBJPM PR H The New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a one-four hundredth interest in a share of 5.75% Non-
Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series DDJPM PR D The New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a one-four hundredth interest in a share of 6.00% Non-
Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series EEJPM PR C The New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a one-four hundredth interest in a share of
 4.75% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series GGJPM PR J The New York Stock Exchange
Alerian MLP Index ETNs due May 24, 2024 AMJ NYSE Arca, Inc.
Guarantee of Callable Step-Up Fixed Rate Notes due April 26, 2028 of JPMorgan Chase
Financial Company LLCJPM/28 The New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. ☐ Yes ☒ No
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. ☐ Yes ☒ No
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during
the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements
for the past 90 days. ☒ Yes ☐ No
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of
Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files). ☒
Yes ☐ No
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an
emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company”
in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
☒Large accelerated filer ☐Accelerated filer ☐Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting
company☐Emerging growth
company
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or
revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control
over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its
audit report. ☒ Yes ☐ No
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). ☐ Yes ☒ No
The aggregate market value of JPMorgan Chase & Co. common stock held by non-affiliates as of June 30, 2020: $383,953,778,298
Number of shares of common stock outstanding as of January 31, 2021: 3,051,506,436
Documents incorporated by reference: Portions of the registrant’s Proxy Statement for the annual meeting of stockholders to be held on May 18, 2021, are
incorporated by reference in this Form 10-K in response to Items 10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 of Part III.
Form 10-K Index
Part I Page
Item 1. Business . 1
Overview 1
Business segments 1
Competition 1
Human capital 2-3
Supervision and regulation 3-7
Distribution of assets, liabilities and stockholders’ equity; interest rates and interest dif ferentials 300-304
Return on equity and assets 44, 299, 300
Investment securities portfolio 312
Loan portfolio 110-131, 232-247,
313-318
Summary of loan and lending-related commitments loss experience 132-133, 248-252,
319-320
Deposits 265, 321
Short-term and other borrowed funds 322
Item 1A. Risk Factors. 8-32
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments. 33
Item 2. Properties. 33
Item 3. Legal Proceedings. 33
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures. 33
Part II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities. 34
Item 6. Selected Financial Data. 34
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. 34
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk. 34
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data. 34-35
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure. 35
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures. 35
Item 9B. Other Information. 35
Part III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance. 36
Item 11. Executive Compensation. 37
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder
Matters.37
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related T ransactions, and Director Independence. 37
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services. 37
Part IV
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules. 38-41
Part I
Item 1. Business.
Overview
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (“JPMorgan Chase” or the
“Firm”, NYSE: JPM), a financial holding company
incorporated under Delaware law in 1968, is a leading
financial services firm based in the United States of
America (“U.S.”), and has operations worldwide;
JPMorgan Chase had $3.4 trillion in assets and $279.4
billion in stockholders’ equity as of December 31, 2020.
The Firm is a leader in investment banking, financial
services for consumers and small businesses,
commercial banking, financial transaction processing
and asset management. Under the J.P. Morgan and
Chase brands, the Firm serves millions of customers in
the U.S. and many of the world’s most prominent
corporate, institutional and government clients.
JPMorgan Chase’s principal bank subsidiary is
JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association
(“JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.”), a national banking
association with U.S. branches in 38 states and
Washington, D.C. as of December 31, 2020. JPMorgan
Chase’s principal non-bank subsidiary is J.P. Morgan
Securities LLC (“J.P. Morgan Securities”), a U.S. broker-
dealer. The bank and non-bank subsidiaries of
JPMorgan Chase operate nationally as well as through
overseas branches and subsidiaries, representative
offices and subsidiary foreign banks. The Firm’s
principal operating subsidiary outside the U.S. is J.P.
Morgan Securities plc, a U.K.-based subsidiary of
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
The Firm’s website is www.jpmorganchase.com.
JPMorgan Chase makes available on its website, free of
charge, annual reports on Form 10-K, quarterly reports
on Form 10-Q and current reports on Form 8-K pursuant
to Section 13(a) or Section 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as soon as reasonably
practicable after it electronically files or furnishes such
material to the U.S. Securities and Exchange
Commission (the “SEC”) at www.sec.gov. JPMorgan
Chase also makes additional information about the Firm
available on the Investor Relations section of its website
at https://www.jpmorganchase.com/corporate/investor-
relations/investor-relations.htm. The Firm has adopted,
and posted on its website, a Code of Conduct for all
employees of the Firm and a Code of Ethics for its
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial
Officer, Principal Accounting Officer and all other
professionals of the Firm worldwide serving in a finance,
accounting, treasury, tax or investor relations role.Business segments
For management reporting purposes, JPMorgan
Chase’s activities are organized into four major
reportable business segments, as well as a Corporate
segment. The Firm’s consumer business is the
Consumer & Community Banking (“CCB”) segment. The
Firm’s wholesale business segments are the Corporate
& Investment Bank (“CIB”), Commercial Banking (“CB”),
and Asset & Wealth Management (“AWM”).
A description of the Firm’s business segments and the
products and services they provide to their respective
client bases is provided in the “Business segment
results” section of Management’s discussion and
analysis of financial condition and results of operations
(“Management’s discussion and analysis” or “MD&A”),
beginning on page 46 and in Note 32.
Competition
JPMorgan Chase and its subsidiaries and affiliates
operate in highly competitive environments. Competitors
include other banks, brokerage firms, investment
banking companies, merchant banks, hedge funds,
commodity trading companies, private equity firms,
insurance companies, mutual fund companies,
investment managers, credit card companies, mortgage
banking companies, trust companies, securities
processing companies, automobile financing
companies, leasing companies, e-commerce and other
internet-based companies, financial technology
companies, and other companies engaged in providing
similar products and services. The Firm’s businesses
generally compete on the basis of the quality and variety
of the Firm’s products and services, transaction
execution, innovation, reputation and price. Competition
also varies based on the types of clients, customers,
industries and geographies served. With respect to
some of its geographies and products, JPMorgan Chase
competes globally; with respect to others, the Firm
competes on a national or regional basis. New
competitors in the financial services industry continue to
emerge, including firms that offer products and services
solely through the internet and non-financial companies
that offer payment or loan products.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1
Part I
Human capital
JPMorgan Chase believes that its long-term growth and success depend on its ability to attract, develop and retain a
high-performing and diverse workforce, with inclusion and accessibility as key components of the way the Firm does
business. The information provided below relates to JPMorgan Chase’s full-time and part-time employees and does not
include the Firm’s contractors.
Global workforce
JPMorgan Chase had 255,351 employees in 62 countries as of December 31, 2020, with over 60% of those employees
located in the U.S. As of December 31, 2020, of the Firm’s global employees that self-identified, 49% self-identified as
women and of the Firm’s U.S.-based employees that self-identified, 52% self-identified as ethnically diverse (defined as
all Equal Employment Opportunity Commission classifications other than white). In addition, of the Firm’s U.S.-based
employees, 3% self-identified as LGBT+, 3% as military veterans and 4% as people with disabilities. The following
table presents the distribution of the Firm’s global workforce by region and by LOB as of December 31, 2020:
Employee Breakdown by Region Employee Breakdown by LOB
Region Employees LOB Employees
North America 162,670 CCB 122,894
Europe/Middle East/Africa 22,346 CIB 61,733
Latin America/Caribbean 3,691 CB 11,675
Asia-Pacific 66,644 AWM 20,683
Total Firm 255,351 Corporate 38,366
Total Firm 255,351
Firm culture
The foundations of JPMorgan Chase’s culture are its
core values and How We Do Business Principles, which
are fundamental to the Firm’s success and are
represented by four central corporate tenets:
exceptional client service; operational excellence; a
commitment to integrity, fairness and responsibility; and
cultivation of a great team and winning culture. The Firm
maintains its focus on its culture of inclusion and
respect, which is reinforced by increasing employee
awareness and education through engagement,
communication and training. An important part of these
efforts includes the Firm’s Business Resource Groups,
which are groups of employees who support JPMorgan
Chase’s diversity and inclusion strategies by leveraging
the unique perspectives of their members.
Attracting and retaining employees
The goal of JPMorgan Chase’s recruitment efforts is to
attract and hire talented individuals in all roles and at all
career levels. The Firm strives to provide both external
candidates and internal employees who are seeking a
different role with challenging and stimulating career
opportunities. These opportunities range from internship
training programs for students to entry-level,
management and executive careers. During 2020,
approximately two thirds of the Firm’s employment
opportunities were filled by external candidates, with the
remainder filled by existing employees.
Diversity is a critical area of focus throughout the Firm’s
hiring process. JPMorgan Chase engages in efforts
aimed at hiring diverse talent, including initiatives
focused on gender, underrepresented ethnic groups,
LGBT+ individuals, people with disabilities, veterans and
others. The Firm’s Advancing Black Pathways program,
which seeks to leverage JPMorgan Chase’s business
and philanthropicresources to accelerate economic opportunity for Black
Americans by strengthening education and job training,
growing careers, investing in entrepreneurship, and
building wealth, includes initiatives to increase
representation of talented Black individuals across the
Firm.
JPMorgan Chase offers a competitive fellowship
program that seeks to attract accomplished individuals
who have taken a career break and wish to return to the
workforce. In addition, where appropriate, the Firm’s
hiring practices focus on the skills of a job candidate
rather than degrees held.
Developing employees
JPMorgan Chase is committed to supporting the
professional development and career growth of its
employees. The Firm offers comprehensive training
programs to employees, with over seven million hours of
training delivered globally in 2020. Leadership Edge, the
Firm’s global leadership development program that is
offered to managers, is focused on creating one Firm
leadership culture.
Compensation and benefits
The Firm provides comprehensive and market-
competitive compensation and benefits programs.
JPMorgan Chase’s compensation philosophy provides
the guiding principles that drive compensation-related
decisions across the Firm, including pay-for-
performance, responsiveness and alignment with
shareholder interests, reinforcement of the Firm’s
culture and How We Do Business Principles, and
integration of risk, controls and conduct considerations.
The Firm’s commitment to diversity and inclusion for all
employees includes compensation review processes
that seek to ensure that the Firm’s employees are paid
equitably for the work they do.
 
2
2
The Firm is also committed to supporting employees’
well-being. JPMorgan Chase offers a comprehensive
benefits and wellness package to employees and their
families, including healthcare coverage, retirement
benefits, life and disability insurance, on-site health and
wellness centers, employee assistance programs,
competitive vacation and leave policies, backup child
care arrangements, tuition reimbursement programs,
mental health counseling and support, and financial
coaching. The Firm has taken action to protect and
support its employees during the COVID-19 pandemic,
including by implementing health and safety protocols
and providing additional benefits.
Supervision and regulation
The Firm is subject to extensive and comprehensive
regulation under U.S. federal and state laws, as well as
the applicable laws of the jurisdictions outside the U.S.
in which the Firm does business.
Financial holding company:
Consolidated supervision. JPMorgan Chase & Co. is a
bank holding company (“BHC”) and a financial holding
company (“FHC”) under U.S. federal law, and is subject
to comprehensive consolidated supervision, regulation
and examination by the Board of Governors of the
Federal Reserve System (the “Federal Reserve”). The
Federal Reserve acts as the supervisor of the
consolidated operations of BHCs, and certain of
JPMorgan Chase’s subsidiaries are also regulated
directly by additional authorities based on the activities
or licenses of those subsidiaries.
JPMorgan Chase’s national bank subsidiary, JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A., is supervised and regulated by the
Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (“OCC”) and,
with respect to certain matters, by the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation (the “FDIC”).
JPMorgan Chase’s U.S. broker-dealers are supervised
and regulated by the Securities and Exchange
Commission (“SEC”) and the Financial Industry
Regulatory Authority (“FINRA”), and subsidiaries of the
Firm that engage in certain futures-related and swaps-
related activities are supervised and regulated by the
Commodity Futures Trading Commission (“CFTC”). J.P.
Morgan Securities plc is a U.K.-based bank regulated by
the U.K. Prudential Regulation Authority (the “PRA”) and
the U.K. Financial Conduct Authority (“FCA”).
The Firm’s other non-U.S. subsidiaries are regulated by
the banking, securities, prudential and conduct
regulatory authorities in the countries in which they
operate.
Permissible business activities. The Bank Holding
Company Act restricts BHCs from engaging in business
activities other than the business of banking and certain
closely-related activities. FHCs can engage in a broader
range of financial activities. The Federal Reserve has
the authority to limit an FHC’s ability to conduct
otherwise permissible activities if the FHC or any of its
depository institution subsidiaries ceases to meet
applicable eligibility requirements. TheFederal Reserve may also impose corrective capital
and/or managerial requirements on the FHC, and if
deficiencies are persistent, may require divestiture of the
FHC’s depository institutions. If any depository
institution controlled by an FHC fails to maintain a
satisfactory rating under the Community Reinvestment
Act, the Federal Reserve must prohibit the FHC and its
subsidiaries from engaging in any activities other than
those permissible for BHCs.
Capital and liquidity requirements. The Federal Reserve
establishes capital, liquidity and leverage requirements
for JPMorgan Chase that are generally consistent with
the international Basel III capital and liquidity framework
and evaluates the Firm’s compliance with those
requirements. The OCC establishes similar
requirements for JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
Banking supervisors globally continue to refine and
enhance the Basel III capital framework for financial
institutions. In January 2019, the Basel Committee
issued “Minimum capital requirements for market risk.”
The Basel Committee expects national regulators to
implement these revised market risk requirements for
banking organizations in their jurisdictions by January
2023, in line with the other elements of the Basel III
Reforms. U.S. banking regulators have announced their
support for the issuance of the Basel III Reforms and
are considering how to appropriately apply such reforms
in the U.S. In November 2019, the U.S. banking
regulators adopted a rule implementing “Standardized
Approach for Counterparty Credit Risk” (“SA-CCR”),
which became effective in April 2020 and which has a
mandatory compliance date of January 1, 2022.
On October 20, 2020, the federal banking agencies
issued a final rule for the net stable funding ratio
(“NSFR”) under which large banking organizations such
as the Firm will be required to maintain an NSFR of at
least 100% on an ongoing basis. The final NSFR rule
will become effective on July 1, 2021.   
Refer to Capital Risk Management on pages 91-101 and
Liquidity Risk Management on pages 102–108 .
Stress tests. As a large BHC, JPMorgan Chase is
subject to supervisory stress testing administered by the
Federal Reserve as part of the Federal Reserve’s
annual Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review
(“CCAR”) framework. The Firm must conduct annual
company-run stress tests and must also submit an
annual capital plan to the Federal Reserve, taking into
account the results of separate stress tests designed by
the Firm and the Federal Reserve. The Federal Reserve
uses the results under the severely adverse scenario
from its supervisory stress test to determine the Firm’s
“stress capital buffer” (“SCB”) requirement for the
coming year, which forms part of the Firm’s applicable
capital buffers. The Firm is required to file its annual
CCAR submission on April 5, 2021. The Federal
Reserve will notify the Firm of its indicative SCB
requirement by June 30, 2021 and final SCB
requirement by August 31, 2021. The Firm’s final SCB
requirement will become effective on October 1, 2021.
The OCC requires
3
Part I
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. to perform separate,
similar stress tests annually. The Firm publishes each
year the results of the annual stress tests for the Firm
and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. under the supervisory
“severely adverse” scenarios provided by the Federal
Reserve and the OCC.
Refer to Capital Risk Management on pages 91-101 for
more information concerning the Firm’s CCAR.
Enhanced prudential standards. As part of its mandate
to identify and monitor risks to the financial stability of
the U.S. posed by large banking organizations, the
Financial Stability Oversight Council (“FSOC”)
recommends prudential standards and reporting
requirements to the Federal Reserve for systemically
important financial institutions (“SIFIs”), such as
JPMorgan Chase. The Federal Reserve has adopted
several rules to implement those heightened prudential
standards, including rules relating to risk management
and corporate governance of subject BHCs. JPMorgan
Chase is required under these rules to comply with
enhanced liquidity and overall risk management
standards, including oversight by the board of directors
of risk management activities.
Resolution and recovery. The Firm is required to submit
periodically to the Federal Reserve and the FDIC a plan
for resolution under Title I of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street
Reform and Consumer Protection Act (“Dodd-Frank
Act”) in the event of material distress or failure (a
“resolution plan”). In 2019, the FDIC and Federal
Reserve revised the regulations governing resolution
plan requirements, and on the basis of those revisions,
the Firm’s resolution plan submissions will alternate
between “targeted” and “full” plans. The Firm’s next
“targeted” resolution plan is due to be filed on or before
July 1, 2021. The Firm also has a comprehensive
recovery plan, updated annually, summarizing the
actions it would take to avoid failure by remaining well-
capitalized and well-funded in the case of an adverse
event.
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. is also required to provide
a resolution plan to the FDIC. The FDIC has proposed
changes
to its rules relating to the resolution plans of insured
depository institutions (“IDIs”) in a 2019 advanced notice
of proposed rulemaking. In January 2021, the FDIC
announced that the moratorium on the preparation of
resolution plans for the IDIs has ended. Banks will be
given notice of at least 12 months prior to the required
submission date for their IDI resolution plans. The OCC
has published guidelines establishing standards for
recovery planning by insured national banks, and
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. has submitted its recovery
plan to the OCC.
Certain of the Firm’s non-U.S. subsidiaries are also
subject to local resolution and recovery planning
requirements.
Orderly liquidation authority. Certain financial
companies, including JPMorgan Chase and certain of its
subsidiaries, can also be subjected to resolution under
an “orderly liquidation authority.” The U.S. Treasury
Secretary, in consultation with the President of the
United States, must first make certain determinations
concerning extraordinaryfinancial distress and systemic risk, and action must be
recommended by the FDIC and the Federal Reserve.
Absent such actions, the Firm, as a BHC, would remain
subject to resolution under the Bankruptcy Code. The
FDIC has issued a draft policy statement describing its
“single point of entry” strategy for resolution of SIFIs
under the orderly liquidation authority, which seeks to
keep operating subsidiaries of a BHC open and impose
losses on shareholders and creditors of the BHC in
receivership according to their statutory order of priority.
Holding company as a source of strength. JPMorgan
Chase & Co. is required to serve as a source of financial
strength for its depository institution subsidiaries and to
commit resources to support those subsidiaries,
including when directed to do so by the Federal
Reserve.
Regulation of acquisitions. Acquisitions by BHCs and
their banks are subject to multiple requirements
established by the Federal Reserve and the OCC. For
example, FHCs and BHCs are required to obtain the
approval of the Federal Reserve before they may
acquire more than 5% of the voting shares of an
unaffiliated bank. In addition, acquisitions by financial
companies are prohibited if, as a result of the
acquisition, the total liabilities of the financial company
would exceed 10% of the total liabilities of all financial
companies. Furthermore, for certain acquisitions, the
Firm must provide written notice to the Federal Reserve
prior to acquiring direct or indirect ownership or control
of any voting shares of any company with over $10
billion in assets that is engaged in activities that are
“financial in nature.”
Volcker Rule. The Volcker Rule prohibits banking
entities, including the Firm, from engaging in certain
“proprietary trading” activities, subject to exceptions for
underwriting, market-making, risk-mitigating hedging
and certain other activities. The Volcker Rule also limits
the sponsorship of, and investment in, “covered funds,”
and imposes limits on certain transactions between the
Firm and covered funds for which a JPMorgan Chase
entity serves as the investment manager, investment
advisor, commodity trading advisor or sponsor, as well
as certain covered funds controlled by such funds.
Ongoing obligations. The Firm remains subject to a
consent order entered into with the Federal Reserve
concerning foreign exchange trading. The Firm is also
subject to obligations under the terms of a Deferred
Prosecution Agreement entered into with the
Department of Justice on September 29, 2020 relating
to precious metals and U.S. Treasuries markets
investigations as well as under a related order issued by
the CFTC.
Subsidiary banks:
The activities of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., the Firm’s
principal subsidiary bank, are limited to those
specifically authorized under the National Bank Act and
related interpretations of the OCC. The OCC has
authority to bring an enforcement action against
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. for unsafe or unsound
banking practices, which could
4
include limiting JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.’s ability to
conduct otherwise permissible activities, or imposing
corrective capital or managerial requirements on the
bank.
FDIC deposit insurance. The FDIC deposit insurance
fund provides insurance coverage for certain deposits
and is funded through assessments on banks, such as
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
FDIC powers upon a bank insolvency. Upon the
insolvency of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., the FDIC
could be appointed as conservator or receiver under the
Federal Deposit Insurance Act. The FDIC has broad
powers to transfer assets and liabilities without the
approval of the institution’s creditors.
Prompt corrective action. The Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation Improvement Act of 1991
requires the relevant federal banking regulator to take
“prompt corrective action” with respect to a depository
institution if that institution does not meet certain capital
adequacy standards. The Federal Reserve is also
authorized to take appropriate action against the parent
BHC, such as JPMorgan Chase & Co., based on the
undercapitalized status of any bank subsidiary. In
certain instances, the BHC would be required to
guarantee the performance of the capital restoration
plan for its undercapitalized subsidiary.
OCC Heightened Standards. The OCC has established
guidelines setting forth heightened standards for large
banks, including minimum standards for the design and
implementation of a risk governance framework for
banks. Under these standards, a bank’s risk governance
framework must ensure that the bank’s risk profile is
easily distinguished and separate from that of its parent
BHC for risk management purposes. The bank’s board
or risk committee is responsible for approving the bank’s
risk governance framework, providing active oversight of
the bank’s risk-taking activities, and holding
management accountable for adhering to the risk
governance framework.
Restrictions on transactions with affiliates. JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A. and its subsidiaries are subject to
restrictions imposed by federal law on extensions of
credit to, investments in stock or securities of, and
derivatives, securities lending and certain other
transactions with, JPMorgan Chase & Co. and certain
other affiliates. These restrictions prevent JPMorgan
Chase & Co. and other affiliates from borrowing from
such subsidiaries unless the loans are secured in
specified amounts and comply with certain other
requirements.
Dividend restrictions. Federal law imposes limitations on
the payment of dividends by national banks, such as
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. Refer to Note 26 for the
amount of dividends that JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
could pay, at January 1, 2021, to JPMorgan Chase
without the approval of the banking regulators. The OCC
and the Federal Reserve also have authority to prohibit
or limit the payment of dividends of a bank subsidiary
that they supervise if, in the banking regulator’s opinion,
payment of a dividend wouldconstitute an unsafe or unsound practice in light of the
financial condition of the bank.
Depositor preference. Under federal law, the claims of a
receiver of an IDI for administrative expense and the
claims of holders of U.S. deposit liabilities (including the
FDIC and deposits in non-U.S. branches that are dually
payable in the U.S. and in a non-U.S. branch) have
priority over the claims of other unsecured creditors of
the institution, including depositors in non-U.S. branches
and public noteholders.
Consumer supervision and regulation. JPMorgan Chase
and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. are subject to
supervision and regulation by the Consumer Financial
Protection Bureau (“CFPB”) with respect to federal
consumer protection laws, including laws relating to fair
lending and the prohibition of unfair, deceptive or
abusive acts or practices in connection with the offer,
sale or provision of consumer financial products and
services. The CFPB also has jurisdiction over small
business lending activities with respect to fair lending
and the Equal Credit Opportunity Act. As part of its
regulatory oversight, the CFPB has authority to take
enforcement actions against firms that offer certain
products and services to consumers using practices that
are deemed to be unfair, deceptive or abusive. The
Firm’s consumer activities are also subject to regulation
under state statutes which are enforced by the Attorney
General or empowered agency of each state.
Securities and broker-dealer regulation:
The Firm conducts securities underwriting, dealing and
brokerage activities in the U.S. through J.P. Morgan
Securities LLC and other non-bank broker-dealer
subsidiaries, all of which are subject to regulations of the
SEC, FINRA and the New York Stock Exchange, among
others. The Firm conducts similar securities activities
outside the U.S. subject to local regulatory
requirements. In the U.K., those activities are conducted
by J.P. Morgan Securities plc. Broker-dealers are
subject to laws and regulations covering all aspects of
the securities business, including sales and trading
practices, securities offerings, publication of research
reports, use of customer funds, the financing of client
purchases, capital structure, record-keeping and
retention, and the conduct of their directors, officers and
employees. Refer to Broker-dealer regulatory capital on
page 101 for information concerning the capital of J.P.
Morgan Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Securities plc.
Investment management regulation:
The Firm’s asset and wealth management businesses
are subject to significant regulation in jurisdictions
around the world relating to, among other things, the
safeguarding and management of client assets,
offerings of funds and marketing activities. Certain of the
Firm’s subsidiaries are registered with, and subject to
oversight by, the SEC as investment advisers and
broker-dealers. The Firm’s registered investment
advisers are subject to the fiduciary and other
obligations imposed under the Investment Advisers Act
of 1940, as well as various state securities laws. The
Firm’s bank fiduciary activities are subject to supervision
by the OCC.
5
Part I
Derivatives regulation:
The Firm is subject to comprehensive regulation of its
derivatives businesses, including regulations that
impose capital and margin requirements, require central
clearing of standardized over-the-counter (“OTC”)
derivatives, mandate that certain standardized OTC
swaps be traded on regulated trading venues, and
provide for reporting of certain mandated information.
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., J.P. Morgan Securities
LLC and J.P. Morgan Securities plc are registered with
the CFTC as “swap dealers” and may be required to
register with the SEC as “security-based swap dealers.”
As a result, these entities are or will be subject to a
comprehensive regulatory framework applicable to their
swap or security-based swap activities, including capital
requirements, rules requiring the collateralization of
uncleared swaps and security-based swaps, rules
regarding segregation of counterparty collateral,
business conduct and documentation standards, record-
keeping and reporting obligations, and anti-fraud and
anti-manipulation requirements. Similar requirements
have also been implemented in the EU under the
European Market Infrastructure Regulation (“EMIR”) and
MiFID II.
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC is also registered with the
CFTC as a futures commission merchant and is a
member of the National Futures Association.
Data, privacy and security regulation:
The Firm and its subsidiaries are subject to numerous
U.S. federal, state and local as well as international laws
and regulations concerning data that are central to the
Firm’ s businesses, functions and operations. These
include laws and regulations relating to data protection,
privacy , data use, confidentiality , secrecy , cybersecurity ,
technology , artificial intelligence, data localization and
storage, data retention and destruction, disclosure,
transfer , availability , integrity and other similar matters.
The application, interpretation and enforcement of these
laws and regulations are often uncertain, particularly in
light of new and rapidly evolving data-driven technologies
and significant increase in computing power. These laws
and regulations are evolving at a rapid pace, remain a
focus of regulators globally, may be enforced by private
parties or government bodies, and will continue to have a
significant impact on all of the Firm’s businesses and
operations. For example, the EU’s General Data
Protection Regulation (“GDPR”) includes a complex
range of obligations and operational requirements for
companies that receive or process personal data of
persons in the EU and provides for significant penalties
for non-compliance. In addition, there are a number of
legislative proposals in the EU, the U.S. (at both the
federal and state level) as well as other jurisdictions that
could impose new obligations or limitations in these
areas that could affect the Firm’s businesses.
The Bank Secrecy Act and Economic Sanctions:
The Bank Secrecy Act (“BSA”) requires all financial
institutions, including banks and securities broker-
dealers, to establish a risk-based system of internal
controls reasonably designed to prevent money
laundering and the financing ofterrorism. The BSA includes a variety of record-keeping
and reporting requirements, as well as due
diligence/know-your-customer documentation
requirements. The Firm is also subject to the regulations
and economic sanctions programs administered by the
U.S. Treasury’s Office of Foreign Assets Control
(“OFAC”). In addition, the EU and the U.K. have adopted
various economic sanctions programs targeted at entities
or individuals that are, or are located in countries that
are, involved in terrorism, hostilities, embezzlement or
human rights violations.
Anti-Corruption:
The Firm is subject to laws and regulations relating to
corrupt and illegal payments to government officials and
others in the jurisdictions in which it operates, including
the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the U.K.
Bribery Act.
Compensation practices:
The Firm’s compensation practices are subject to
oversight by the Federal Reserve, as well as other
agencies. The Federal Reserve has issued guidance
jointly with the FDIC and the OCC that is designed to
ensure that incentive compensation paid by banking
organizations does not encourage imprudent risk-taking
that threatens the organizations’ safety and soundness.
The Financial Stability Board (“FSB”) has also
established standards covering compensation principles
for banks. The Firm’s compensation practices are also
subject to regulation and oversight by regulators in other
jurisdictions, notably the EU Fourth Capital Requirements
Directive (“CRD IV”), which includes compensation-
related provisions. The European Banking Authority has
instituted guidelines on compensation policies which in
certain countries, such as the U.K. and Germany, are
implemented or supplemented by local regulations or
guidelines. The Firm expects that the implementation of
regulatory guidelines regarding compensation in the U.S.
and other countries will continue to evolve, and may
affect the manner in which the Firm structures its
compensation programs and practices.
Other significant international regulatory initiatives:
The U.K.’s transition period for its departure from the EU,
which is commonly referred to as “Brexit,” formally ended
on December 31, 2020, and accordingly, from January 1,
2021, the U.K. is no longer obligated to implement EU
laws.
In preparation for the completion of Brexit, numerous EU
laws and regulations were separately adopted into U.K.
domestic legislation in order to ensure continuity.
However, the U.K. plans to evaluate the extent to which
these EU-legacy laws and regulations should change
going forward and has already indicated some areas
where it may take a different approach from the EU. For
example, the U.K. announced it will develop a U.K.
settlement discipline regime rather than adopting the
EU’s settlement discipline regime which will apply in the
EU beginning in February 2022. Additionally, the U.K. will
not incorporate into U.K. law the reporting obligation of
the EU’s Securities Financing Transactions Regulation
for non-financial counterparties, which will apply in the
EU beginning in January 2021. The
6
full impact of these differences is not yet known as
further details have not yet been published.
In the EU, policymakers continue to implement an
extensive and complex program of regulatory
enhancement relating to financial services, several key
elements of which are discussed below.
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, in July 2020, the
European Commission (“EC”) published a legislative
proposal amending the Markets in Financial Instruments
Directive (“MiFID II”). MiFID II requires the trading of
shares and certain OTC derivatives to take place on
trading venues, and also significantly enhanced
requirements for pre- and post-trade transparency,
transaction reporting and investor protection, and
introduced a position limits and reporting regime for
commodities. The EC’s proposal included targeted
changes to the MiFID II framework intended to reduce
the compliance burden on financial services firms as part
of the EC’s broader initiative to assist in the EU’s
economic recovery from the COVID-19 pandemic. The
proposed changes include amendments to the
commodity derivatives regime, investor protection rules
and rules relating to research on small and medium-sized
Enterprises. The proposal is in the final stages of
becoming EU law and is expected to go into effect in
2022.The EC has also begun a review of the broader
MiFID II framework and is expected to publish a further
legislative proposal for changes to MiFID II in 2021. The
U.K. is also re-evaluating the MiFID II framework and
how the U.K. version of MiFID II will apply going forward.
The EU capital and liquidity legislation for banks and
investment firms implemented many of the finalized
Basel III capital and liquidity standards, including in
relation to the leverage ratio, market risk capital, and a
net stable funding ratio. These requirements will begin to
take effect from June 2021. EU legislation also includes a
requirement for certain non-EU banks operating in the
EU to establish an intermediate parent undertaking
(“IPU”) located in the EU. The IPU rule will allow a
second IPU to be established if a single IPU would
conflict with “home country” bank separation rules or
impede resolvability. The Firm will be required to
establish a legal entity structure that complies with the
EU’s IPU rule. The U.K. Government has delayed the
effective date of the U.K. version of the EU’s legislation
relating to changes in Basel III requirements until
January 1, 2022. The Basel Committee recently finalized
certain changes to the Basel III framework, including
revisions to the credit risk and operational risk calculation
methods. The Firm’s banking entities in the U.K. and EU
will be required to comply with these changes when they
are implemented in those jurisdictions.
The Prudential Regulatory Authority (“PRA”) and
European Central Bank (“ECB”) have published their
supervisory expectations applicable to U.K. and EU
banks, respectively, for management of financial risks
arising from climate change. The supervisory
expectations for managing these risks address bank
strategy, risk management, scenario analysis and
disclosure. U.K. banking entities, including J.P. Morgan
Securities plc, will be expected to align theirpractices with PRA expectations by the end of 2021. J.P.
Morgan Securities plc is expanding its risk management
framework to comply with PRA expectations by the end
of 2021.
7
Part I
Item 1A. Risk Factors.
The following discussion sets forth the material risk
factors that could affect JPMorgan Chase’s financial
condition and operations. Readers should not consider
any descriptions of these factors to be a complete set of
all potential risks that could affect the Firm. Any of the
risk factors discussed below could by itself, or combined
with other factors, materially and adversely affect
JPMorgan Chase’s business, results of operations,
financial condition, capital position, liquidity, competitive
position or reputation, including by materially increasing
expenses or decreasing revenues, which could result in
material losses or a decrease in earnings.
Summary
The principal risks that could adversely affect JPMorgan
Chase’s business, results of operations, financial
condition, capital position, liquidity, competitive position
or reputation include:
•Risks related to the COVID-19 pandemic, including
the significant harm that the pandemic has caused
and is causing to the global economy and the
further negative effects that it could have on certain
of JPMorgan Chase’s businesses.
•Regulatory risks, including the impact that
applicable laws, rules and regulations in the highly-
regulated financial services industry, as well as
changes to or in the interpretation of those laws,
rules and regulations, can have on JPMorgan
Chase’s business and operations; the ways in which
differences in financial services regulation in
different jurisdictions or with respect to certain
competitors can disadvantage JPMorgan Chase’s
business; the higher compliance costs and potential
for operational restrictions due to heightened
regulatory scrutiny; risks associated with complying
with economic sanctions and anti-corruption and
anti-money laundering laws; the ways in which less
predictable legal and regulatory frameworks in
certain countries can negatively impact JPMorgan
Chase’s operations and financial results; the losses
that security holders will absorb if JPMorgan Chase
were to enter into a resolution; and risks related to
the regulatory uncertainties associated with the
U.K.’s departure from the EU.
•Political risks, including the potential negative
effects on JPMorgan Chase’s businesses due to
economic uncertainty or instability caused by
political developments.
•Market risks, including the effects that economic
and market events and conditions, governmental
policies concerning taxation, regulation and other
matters, changes in interest rates and credit
spreads, and market fluctuations can have on
JPMorgan Chase’s consumer and wholesale
businesses and its investment and market-making
positions.
•Credit risks, including potential negative effects
from adverse changes in the financial condition of
clients, customers, counterparties, custodians and
centralcounterparties; and the potential for credit losses
due to declines in the value of collateral in stressed
market conditions or from concentrations of credit
and market risk.
•Liquidity risks, including the risk that JPMorgan
Chase’s liquidity could be impaired by market-wide
illiquidity or disruption, unforeseen liquidity or capital
requirements, the inability to sell assets, default by a
significant market participant, unanticipated outflows
of cash or collateral, or lack of market or customer
confidence in JPMorgan Chase; the dependence of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. on the cash flows of its
subsidiaries; the adverse effects that any
downgrade in any of JPMorgan Chase’s credit
ratings may have on its liquidity and cost of funding;
and potential negative impacts on JPMorgan
Chase’s funding, investments and financial
products, as well as litigation risks, associated with
the transition from LIBOR and other benchmark
rates.
•Capital risks, including the risk that any failure by or
inability of JPMorgan Chase to maintain the
required level and composition of capital, or
unfavorable changes in the capital requirements
imposed by banking regulators, could limit
JPMorgan Chase’s ability to distribute capital to
shareholders or to support its business activities.
•Operational risks, including risks associated with
JPMorgan Chase’s dependence on its operational
systems and the competence, integrity, health and
safety of its employees, as well as the systems and
employees of external parties; the potential negative
effects of failing to identify and address operational
risks related to the introduction of or changes to
products, services and delivery platforms; risks from
JPMorgan Chase’s exposure to external operational
systems; legal and operational risks related to
safeguarding personal information; the harm that
could be caused by a successful cyber attack
affecting JPMorgan Chase or by catastrophes or
other events; risks associated with JPMorgan
Chase’s risk management framework, its models
and estimations and associated judgments used in
its financial statements, and controls over disclosure
and financial reporting or from changes in
accounting standards or policies; and potential
adverse effects of failing to comply with heightened
regulatory and other standards for the oversight of
vendors and other service providers.
•Strategic risks, including the damage to JPMorgan
Chase’s competitive standing and results that could
occur if management fails to develop and execute
effective business strategies; risks associated with
the significant and increasing competition that
JPMorgan Chase faces; and the potential adverse
impacts of climate change on JPMorgan Chase’s
business operations, clients and customers.
8
•Conduct risks, including the negative impact that
can result from the failure of employees to conduct
themselves in accordance with JPMorgan Chase’s
expectations, policies and practices.
•Reputation risks, including the potential adverse
effects on JPMorgan Chase’s relationships with its
clients, customers, shareholders, regulators and
other stakeholders that could arise from employee
misconduct, security breaches, inadequate risk
management, compliance or operational failures,
litigation and regulatory investigations, failure to
satisfy expectations concerning social and
environmental concerns or other factors that could
damage JPMorgan Chase’s reputation.
•Country risks, including potential impacts on
JPMorgan Chase’s businesses from an outbreak of
hostilities between countries or within a country or
region; and the potential adverse effects of local
economic, political, regulatory and social factors on
JPMorgan Chase’s business and revenues in
certain countries.
•People risks, including the criticality of attracting
and retaining qualified and diverse employees; and
the potential adverse effects of unfavorable changes
in immigration or travel policies on JPMorgan
Chase’s workforce.
•Legal risks relating to litigation and regulatory and
government investigations.
The above summary is subject in its entirety to the more
complete inventory and discussion of the risks facing
JPMorgan Chase set forth below.
COVID-19 Pandemic
The COVID-19 pandemic has caused and is causing
significant harm to the global economy and could
further negatively affect certain of JPMorgan
Chase’s businesses.
On March 11, 2020, the World Health Organization
declared the outbreak of a strain of novel coronavirus
disease, COVID-19, to be a global pandemic. The
COVID-19 pandemic and governmental responses to
the pandemic led to the institution of social distancing
and shelter-in-place requirements in certain areas of the
U.S. and other countries resulting in ongoing severe
impacts on global economic conditions, including:
•significant disruption and volatility in the financial
markets
•significant disruption of global supply chains, and
•closures of many businesses, leading to loss of
revenues and increased unemployment.
A prolongation or worsening of the pandemic, or the
emergence of other diseases that give rise to similar
effects, could deepen the adverse impact on the global
economy.The adverse economic conditions caused by the
pandemic have had a negative impact on certain of
JPMorgan Chase’s businesses and results of
operations, including:
•reduction in demand for certain products and
services from JPMorgan Chase’s clients and
customers, resulting in lower revenue, and
•increases in the allowance for credit losses.
Certain models used by JPMorgan Chase in connection
with the determination of the allowance for credit losses
have heightened performance risk in the economic
environment precipitated by the effects of the COVID-19
pandemic and government stimulus. There can be no
assurance that, even after adjustments have been made
to model outputs, JPMorgan Chase will not recognize
unexpected losses arising from the model uncertainty
that has resulted from these developments.
A prolongation or worsening of the COVID-19 pandemic
and the negative economic impacts of the pandemic
could have other significant adverse effects on
JPMorgan Chase’s businesses, results of operations
and financial condition, including:
•recognition of credit losses and further increases in
the allowance for credit losses, especially to the
extent that businesses remain closed,
unemployment continues at elevated levels, clients
and customers draw on their lines of credit or
significant numbers of people relocate from
metropolitan areas
•material impacts on the value of securities,
derivatives and other financial instruments which
JPMorgan Chase owns or in which it makes
markets
•downgrades in JPMorgan Chase’s credit ratings
•constraints on liquidity or capital due to elevated
levels of deposits, increases in risk-weighted assets
(“RWA”) related to supporting client activities,
downgrades in client credit ratings, regulatory
actions or other factors, any or all of which could
require JPMorgan Chase to take or refrain from
taking actions that it otherwise would under its
liquidity and capital management strategies, and
•the possibility that significant portions of JPMorgan
Chase’s workforce are unable to work effectively,
including because of illness, quarantines, shelter-in-
place arrangements, government actions or other
restrictions in connection with the pandemic.
The extent to which the COVID-19 pandemic negatively
affects JPMorgan Chase’s businesses, results of
operations and financial condition, as well as its
regulatory capital and liquidity ratios, will depend on
future developments that are highly uncertain and
cannot be predicted, including the ultimate scope and
duration of the pandemic, the effectiveness of
vaccination programs and actions taken by
governmental authorities and other third parties in
response to the pandemic. Those negative effects,
including the possible recognition of charge-offs, may be
delayed
9
9
Part I
because of the impact of prior and potential future
government stimulus actions or payment assistance
provided to clients and customers.
In addition, JPMorgan Chase’s participation directly or
indirectly, including on behalf of customers and clients or
by affiliated entities, in U.S. government programs
designed to support individuals, households and
businesses impacted by the economic disruptions
caused by the COVID-19 pandemic could be criticized
and subject JPMorgan Chase to:
•increased governmental and regulatory scrutiny
•negative publicity, and
•increased exposure to litigation,
any or all of which could increase JPMorgan Chase’s
operational, legal and compliance costs and damage its
reputation. To the extent that the COVID-19 pandemic
adversely affects JPMorgan Chase’s business, results
of operations and financial condition, it may also have
the effect of heightening many of the other risks
described below.
Regulatory
JPMorgan Chase’s businesses are highly regulated,
and existing, new or changed laws, rules and
regulations that apply to JPMorgan Chase have a
significant impact on its business and operations.
JPMorgan Chase is a financial services firm with
operations worldwide. JPMorgan Chase must comply
with the laws, rules and regulations that apply to its
operations in all of the jurisdictions around the world in
which it does business. Regulation of the financial
services industry is extensive.
The regulation and supervision of financial services
firms has expanded significantly over an extended
period of time. The increased regulation and supervision
of JPMorgan Chase has affected the way that it
conducts its business and structures its operations.
JPMorgan Chase could be required to make further
changes to its business and operations in response to
expanded supervision, new laws, rules and regulations,
and changes to existing laws, rules and regulations.
These changes could result in JPMorgan Chase
incurring additional costs for complying with laws, rules
and regulations and could reduce its profitability. In
response to new and existing laws, rules and
regulations and expanded supervision, JPMorgan
Chase has in the past been and could in the future be,
required to:
•limit the products and services that it offers
•reduce the liquidity that it can provide through its
market-making activities
•refrain from engaging in business opportunities that
it might otherwise pursue
•pay higher taxes, assessments, levies or other
governmental charges, including in connection with
the resolution of tax examinations•dispose of certain assets, and do so at times or
prices that are disadvantageous
•impose restrictions on certain business activities, or
•increase the prices that it charges for products and
services, which could reduce the demand for them.
In particular, JPMorgan Chase’s businesses and results
of operations could be adversely impacted by changes
in laws, rules and regulations, or changes in the
application, interpretation or enforcement of laws, rules
and regulations, that:
•proscribe or institute more stringent restrictions on
certain financial services activities, or
•introduce changes to antitrust or anti-competition
laws, rules and regulations that adversely affect the
business activities of JPMorgan Chase.
Differences in financial services regulation can be
disadvantageous for JPMorgan Chase’s business.
The content and application of laws, rules and
regulations affecting financial services firms sometimes
vary according to factors such as the size of the firm, the
jurisdiction in which it is organized or operates, and
other criteria. For example:
•larger firms such as JPMorgan Chase are often
subject to more stringent supervision and regulation
•financial technology companies and other non-
traditional competitors may not be subject to
banking regulation, or may be supervised by a
national or state regulatory agency that does not
have the same resources or regulatory priorities as
the regulatory agencies which supervise more
diversified financial services firms, or
•the financial services regulatory framework in a
particular jurisdiction may favor financial institutions
that are based in that jurisdiction.
These differences in the regulatory framework can result
in a firm such as JPMorgan Chase losing market share
to competitors that are less regulated or not subject to
regulation, especially with respect to unregulated
financial products.
There can also be significant differences in the ways
that similar regulatory initiatives affecting the financial
services industry are implemented in the U.S. and in
other countries and regions in which JPMorgan Chase
does business. For example, when adopting rules that
are intended to implement a global regulatory standard,
a national regulator may introduce additional or more
restrictive requirements, which can create competitive
disadvantages for financial services firms, such as
JPMorgan Chase, that may be subject to those
enhanced regulations.
Legislative and regulatory initiatives outside the U.S.
could require JPMorgan Chase to make significant
modifications to its operations and legal entity structure
in the relevant
10
countries or regions in order to comply with those
requirements. These include laws, rules and regulations
that have been adopted or proposed relating to:
•the establishment of locally-based intermediate
holding companies or operating subsidiaries
•requirements to maintain minimum amounts of
capital or liquidity in locally-based subsidiaries
•the separation (or “ring fencing”) of core banking
products and services from markets activities
•the resolution of financial institutions
•requirements for executing or settling transactions
on exchanges or through central counterparties
(“CCPs”)
•position limits and reporting rules for derivatives
•governance and accountability regimes
•conduct of business and control requirements, and
•restrictions on compensation.
These types of differences in financial services
regulation, or inconsistencies or conflicts between laws,
rules and regulations between different jurisdictions,
have required and could in the future require JPMorgan
Chase to:
•divest assets or restructure its operations
•absorb increased operational, capital and liquidity
costs
•change the prices that it charges for its products
and services
•curtail the products and services that it offers to its
customers and clients, or
•incur higher costs for complying with different legal
and regulatory frameworks.
Any or all of these factors could harm JPMorgan
Chase’s ability to compete against other firms that are
not subject to the same laws, rules and regulations or
supervisory oversight, or harm JPMorgan Chase’s
businesses, results of operations and profitability.
Heightened regulatory scrutiny of JPMorgan
Chase’s businesses could result in higher
compliance costs and restrictions on its operations.
JPMorgan Chase’s operations are subject to heightened
oversight and scrutiny from regulatory authorities in
many jurisdictions. JPMorgan Chase has paid significant
fines, provided other monetary relief, incurred other
penalties and experienced other repercussions in
connection with resolving investigations and
enforcement actions by governmental agencies.
JPMorgan Chase could become subject to similar
regulatory resolutions or other actions in the future, and
addressing the requirements of any such resolutions or
actions could result in JPMorgan Chase incurring higher
operational and compliance costs or needing to comply
with other restrictions.In connection with resolving specific regulatory
investigations or enforcement actions, certain regulators
have required JPMorgan Chase and other financial
institutions to admit wrongdoing with respect to the
activities that gave rise to the resolution. These types of
admissions can lead to:
•greater exposure in litigation
•damage to reputation
•disqualification from doing business with certain
clients or customers, or in specific jurisdictions, or
•other direct and indirect adverse effects.
Furthermore, U.S. government officials have
demonstrated a willingness to bring criminal actions
against financial institutions and have required that
institutions plead guilty to criminal offenses or admit
other wrongdoing in connection with resolving regulatory
investigations or enforcement actions. Resolutions of
this type can have significant collateral consequences
for the subject financial institution, including:
•loss of clients, customers and business
•restrictions on offering certain products or services,
and
•losing permission to operate certain businesses,
either temporarily or permanently.
JPMorgan Chase expects that:
•it and other financial services firms will continue to
be subject to heightened regulatory scrutiny and
governmental investigations and enforcement
actions
•regulators will continue to require that financial
institutions be penalized for actual or deemed
violations of law with formal and punitive
enforcement actions, including the imposition of
significant monetary and other sanctions, rather
than resolving these matters through informal
supervisory actions; and
•regulators will be more likely to pursue formal
enforcement actions and resolutions against
JPMorgan Chase to the extent that it has previously
been subject to other governmental investigations or
enforcement actions.
If JPMorgan Chase fails to meet the requirements of any
resolution of a governmental investigation or
enforcement action, or to maintain risk and control
processes that meet the heightened standards
established by its regulators, it could be required to:
•enter into further resolutions of investigations or
enforcement actions
•pay additional regulatory fines, penalties or
judgments, or
•accept material regulatory restrictions on, or
changes in the management of, its businesses.
11
11
Part I
In these circumstances, JPMorgan Chase could also
become subject to other sanctions, or to prosecution or
civil litigation with respect to the conduct that gave rise
to an investigation or enforcement action.
Complying with economic sanctions and anti-
corruption and anti-money laundering laws, rules
and regulations can increase JPMorgan Chase’s
operational and compliance costs and risks.
JPMorgan Chase must comply with economic sanctions
and embargo programs administered by the Office of
Foreign Assets Control (“OFAC”) and similar national
and multi-national bodies and governmental agencies
outside the U.S., as well as anti-corruption and anti-
money laundering laws, rules and regulations
throughout the world. JPMorgan Chase can incur higher
costs and face greater compliance risks in structuring
and operating its businesses to comply with these
requirements. Certain governments have enacted laws,
which are commonly referred to as “blocking laws,” that
are designed to prohibit compliance with some U.S.
sanctions and may raise significant conflict of laws
issues. A violation of a sanction or embargo program or
anti-corruption or anti-money laundering laws, rules and
regulations, or enforcement of blocking laws, could
subject JPMorgan Chase, and individual employees, to
regulatory enforcement actions as well as significant
civil and criminal penalties.
JPMorgan Chase’s operations and financial results
can be negatively impacted in countries with less
predictable legal and regulatory frameworks.
JPMorgan Chase conducts business in certain countries
in which the application of the rule of law is inconsistent
or less predictable, including with respect to:
•the absence of a statutory or regulatory basis or
guidance for engaging in specific types of business
or transactions
•conflicting or ambiguous laws, rules and regulations,
or the inconsistent application or interpretation of
existing laws, rules and regulations
•uncertainty concerning the enforceability of
contractual, intellectual property or other obligations
•difficulty in competing in economies in which the
government controls or protects all or a portion of
the local economy or specific businesses, or where
graft or corruption may be pervasive, and
•the threat of arbitrary regulatory investigations, civil
litigations or criminal prosecutions, the termination
of licenses required to operate in the local market or
the suspension of business relationships with
governmental bodies.
If the application of the laws, rules and regulations in a
particular country is susceptible to producing
inconsistent or unexpected outcomes, this can create a
more difficult environment in which JPMorgan Chase
conducts its business and could negatively affect
JPMorgan Chase’s operationsand reduce its earnings with respect to that country. For
example, conducting business could require JPMorgan
Chase to devote significant additional resources to
understanding, and monitoring changes in, local laws,
rules and regulations, as well as structuring its
operations to comply with local laws, rules and
regulations and implementing and administering related
internal policies and procedures.
There can be no assurance that JPMorgan Chase will
always be successful in its efforts to fully understand
and to conduct its business in compliance with the laws,
rules and regulations of all of the jurisdictions in which it
operates, and the risk of non-compliance can be greater
in countries that have less predictable legal and
regulatory systems.
Requirements for the orderly resolution of
JPMorgan Chase could result in JPMorgan Chase
having to restructure or reorganize its businesses
and could increase its funding or operational costs
or curtail its business.
JPMorgan Chase is required under Federal Reserve
and FDIC rules to prepare and submit periodically to
those agencies a detailed plan for rapid and orderly
resolution in bankruptcy, without extraordinary
government support, in the event of material financial
distress or failure. The agencies’ evaluation of
JPMorgan Chase’s resolution plan may change, and the
requirements for resolution plans may be modified from
time to time. Any such determinations or modifications
could result in JPMorgan Chase needing to make
changes to its legal entity structure or to certain internal
or external activities, which could increase its funding or
operational costs, or hamper its ability to serve clients
and customers.
If the Federal Reserve and the FDIC were both to
determine that a resolution plan submitted by JPMorgan
Chase has deficiencies, they could jointly impose more
stringent capital, leverage or liquidity requirements or
restrictions on JPMorgan Chase’s growth, activities or
operations. The agencies could also require that
JPMorgan Chase restructure, reorganize or divest
assets or businesses in ways that could materially and
adversely affect JPMorgan Chase’s operations and
strategy.
Holders of JPMorgan Chase & Co.’s debt and equity
securities will absorb losses if it were to enter into a
resolution.
Federal Reserve rules require that JPMorgan Chase &
Co. (the “Parent Company”) maintain minimum levels of
unsecured external long-term debt and other loss-
absorbing capacity with specific terms (“eligible LTD”)
for purposes of recapitalizing JPMorgan Chase’s
operating subsidiaries if the Parent Company were to
enter into a resolution either:
•in a bankruptcy proceeding under Chapter 11 of the
U.S. Bankruptcy Code, or
•in a receivership administered by the FDIC under
Title II of the Dodd-Frank Act (“Title II”).
12
If the Parent Company were to enter into a resolution,
holders of eligible LTD and other debt and equity
securities of the Parent Company will absorb the losses
of the Parent Company and its subsidiaries.
The preferred “single point of entry” strategy under
JPMorgan Chase’s resolution plan contemplates that
only the Parent Company would enter bankruptcy
proceedings. JPMorgan Chase’s subsidiaries would be
recapitalized, as needed, so that they could continue
normal operations or subsequently be divested or
wound down in an orderly manner. As a result, the
Parent Company’s losses and any losses incurred by its
subsidiaries would be imposed first on holders of the
Parent Company’s equity securities and thereafter on its
unsecured creditors, including holders of eligible LTD
and other debt securities. Claims of holders of those
securities would have a junior position to the claims of
creditors of JPMorgan Chase’s subsidiaries and to the
claims of priority (as determined by statute) and secured
creditors of the Parent Company.
Accordingly, in a resolution of the Parent Company in
bankruptcy, holders of eligible LTD and other debt
securities of the Parent Company would realize value
only to the extent available to the Parent Company as a
shareholder of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and its
other subsidiaries, and only after any claims of priority
and secured creditors of the Parent Company have
been fully repaid.
The FDIC has similarly indicated that a single point of
entry recapitalization model could be a desirable
strategy to resolve a systemically important financial
institution, such as the Parent Company, under Title II.
However, the FDIC has not formally adopted a single
point of entry resolution strategy.
If the Parent Company were to approach, or enter into, a
resolution, none of the Parent Company, the Federal
Reserve or the FDIC is obligated to follow JPMorgan
Chase’s preferred resolution strategy, and losses to
holders of eligible LTD and other debt and equity
securities of the Parent Company, under whatever
strategy is ultimately followed, could be greater than
they might have been under JPMorgan Chase’s
preferred strategy.
Regulatory uncertainties associated with the U.K.’s
departure from the EU could negatively affect
JPMorgan Chase’s business, results of operations
and operating model.
The U.K.’s departure from the EU, which is commonly
referred to as “Brexit,” was completed on December 31,
2020. The Trade and Cooperation Agreement entered
into between the U.K. and the EU in December 2020
included very limited provisions relating to the conduct
of financial services activities between the U.K. and the
EU. Accordingly, unless or until the U.K. and the EU
enter into further agreements relating to financial
services, the regulatory environment for financial
services in the aftermath of Brexit can be expected to:•significantly limit the ability of U.K.-based financial
services firms to conduct business in the EU, and
vice versa
•prolong uncertainty concerning the levels of market
access for trading venues, which could result in a
reduction or fragmentation of market liquidity, and
•prolong ongoing uncertainties concerning optimal
business models for firms providing financial
services, especially given that any changes in the
regulation of such services by the U.K. may not
benefit from equivalence determinations by the EU.
As a result of these limitations and uncertainties,
JPMorgan Chase:
•has made and is continuing to make appropriate
changes to its legal entity structure and operations
in the U.K. and the EU to address the regulatory
environment
•is now maintaining, and expects that it will be
required to sustain, a more fragmented operating
model across its U.K. and EU operating entities, and
•expects that, due to considerations such as
operating expenses, liquidity, leverage and capital,
this modified European operating framework will be
more complex, less efficient and more costly than
would otherwise have been the case.
In addition, the COVID-19 pandemic and EU and U.K.
government responses to the pandemic, including travel
restrictions and lock-downs, have introduced delays and
uncertainties into JPMorgan Chase’s implementation of
its plans for maintaining continuity of service for its
clients.
Any or all of the above factors could have an adverse
effect on the overall operation of the financial services
market across the U.K. and the EU as well as JPMorgan
Chase’s business, operations and earnings in the U.K.,
the EU and globally.
Political
Economic uncertainty or instability caused by
political developments can hurt JPMorgan Chase’s
businesses.
The economic environment and market conditions in
which JPMorgan Chase operates continue to be
uncertain due to political developments in the U.S. and
other countries. Certain monetary, fiscal and other policy
initiatives and proposals could cause a contraction in
U.S. and global economic growth and higher volatility in
the financial markets, including:
•monetary policies and actions taken by the Federal
Reserve and other central banks or governmental
authorities, including any sustained large-scale
asset purchases or any suspension or reversal of
those actions
•fiscal policies, including with respect to taxation
13
Part I
•actions that governments take or fail to take in
response to the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic,
as well as the effectiveness of any actions taken
•isolationist foreign policies
•the implementation of tariffs and other protectionist
trade policies, or
•political and social pressures with respect to
governmental policies and actions.
These types of political developments, and uncertainty
about the possible outcomes of these developments,
could:
•erode investor confidence in the U.S. economy and
financial markets, which could potentially undermine
the status of the U.S. dollar as a safe haven
currency
•provoke retaliatory countermeasures by other
countries and otherwise heighten tensions in
diplomatic relations
•lead to the withdrawal of government support for
agencies and enterprises such as the U.S. Federal
National Mortgage Association and the U.S. Federal
Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (together, the
“U.S. GSEs”)
•increase concerns about whether the U.S.
government will be funded, and its outstanding debt
serviced, at any particular time
•result in periodic shutdowns of the U.S. government
or governments in other countries, and
•increase investor reliance on actions by the Federal
Reserve or other central banks, or investor
perceptions concerning government support of
sectors of the economy or the economy as a whole.
These factors could lead to:
•slower growth rates, rising inflation or recession
•greater market volatility
•a contraction of available credit and the widening of
credit spreads
•erosion of adequate risk premium on certain
financial assets
•diminished investor and consumer confidence
•lower investment growth
•large-scale sales of government debt and other debt
and equity securities in the U.S. and other countries
•reduced commercial activity among trading partners
•the potential for a currency redenomination by a
particular country
•the possible departure of a country from, or the
dissolution of, a political or economic alliance or
treaty
•potential expropriation or nationalization of assets,
or•other market dislocations, including the spread of
unfavorable economic conditions from a particular
country or region to other countries or regions.
Any of these potential outcomes could cause JPMorgan
Chase to suffer losses on its market-making positions or
in its investment portfolio, reduce its liquidity and capital
levels, hamper its ability to deliver products and services
to its clients and customers, and weaken its results of
operations and financial condition.
 
Market
Economic and market events and conditions can
materially affect JPMorgan Chase’s businesses and
investment and market-making positions.
JPMorgan Chase’s results of operations can be
negatively affected by adverse changes in any of the
following:
•investor, consumer and business sentiment
•events that reduce confidence in the financial
markets
•inflation or deflation
•high unemployment or, conversely, a tightening
labor market
•the availability and cost of capital, liquidity and credit
•levels and volatility of interest rates, credit spreads
and market prices for currencies, equities and
commodities, and the duration of any changes in
levels or volatility
•the economic effects of outbreaks of hostilities,
terrorism or other geopolitical instabilities, cyber
attacks, climate change, natural disasters, severe
weather conditions, health emergencies, the spread
of infectious diseases or pandemics, and
•the health of the U.S. and global economies.
All of these are affected by global economic, market and
political events and conditions, as well as regulatory
restrictions.
In addition, JPMorgan Chase’s investment portfolio and
market-making businesses can suffer losses due to
unanticipated market events, including:
•severe declines in asset values
•unexpected credit events
•unforeseen events or conditions that may cause
previously uncorrelated factors to become
correlated (and vice versa)
•the inability to effectively hedge market and other
risks related to market-making and investment
portfolio positions, or
•other market risks that may not have been
appropriately taken into account in the development,
structuring or pricing of a financial instrument.
14
If JPMorgan Chase experiences significant losses in its
investment portfolio or from market-making activities,
this could reduce JPMorgan Chase’s profitability and its
liquidity and capital levels, and thereby constrain the
growth of its businesses.
JPMorgan Chase’s consumer businesses can be
negatively affected by adverse economic
conditions.
JPMorgan Chase’s consumer businesses are
particularly affected by U.S. and global economic
conditions, including:
•personal and household income distribution
•unemployment or underemployment
•prolonged periods of exceptionally low interest rates
•housing prices
•consumer and small business confidence levels
•changes in consumer spending or in the level of
consumer debt, and
•the number of personal bankruptcies.
Heightened levels of unemployment or
underemployment that result in reduced personal and
household income could negatively affect consumer
credit performance to the extent that consumers are less
able to service their debts. In addition, sustained low
growth, low or negative interest rates, inflationary
pressures or recessionary conditions could diminish
customer demand for the products and services offered
by JPMorgan Chase’s consumer businesses.
Adverse economic conditions could also lead to an
increase in delinquencies, additions to the allowance for
credit losses and higher net charge-offs, which can
reduce JPMorgan Chase’s earnings. These
consequences could be significantly worse in certain
geographies and industry segments where economic
restrictions and shutdowns have occurred related to the
COVID-19 pandemic, declining industrial or
manufacturing activity that has resulted in or could result
in higher levels of unemployment, or where high levels
of consumer debt, such as outstanding student loans,
could impair the ability of customers to pay their other
consumer loan obligations.
JPMorgan Chase’s earnings from its consumer
businesses could also be adversely affected by
governmental policies and actions that affect
consumers, including:
•policies and initiatives relating to medical insurance,
education, immigration, employment status and
housing, and
•policies aimed at the economy more broadly, such
as higher taxes and increased regulation which
could result in reductions in consumer disposable
income.
In addition, governmental proposals to permit student
loan obligations to be discharged in bankruptcy
proceedings could, if enacted into law, encourage
certain of JPMorgan Chase’s customers to declare
personal bankruptcy andthereby trigger defaults and charge-offs of credit card
and other consumer loans extended to those customers.
Unfavorable market and economic conditions can
have an adverse effect on JPMorgan Chase’s
wholesale businesses.
In JPMorgan Chase’s wholesale businesses, market
and economic factors can affect the volume of
transactions that JPMorgan Chase executes for its
clients or for which it advises clients, and, therefore, the
revenue that JPMorgan Chase receives from those
transactions. These factors can also influence the
willingness of other financial institutions and investors to
participate in capital markets transactions that
JPMorgan Chase manages, such as loan syndications
or securities underwritings. Furthermore, if a significant
and sustained deterioration in market conditions were to
occur, the profitability of JPMorgan Chase’s capital
markets businesses, including its loan syndication,
securities underwriting and leveraged lending activities,
could be reduced to the extent that those businesses:
•earn less fee revenue due to lower transaction
volumes, including when clients are unwilling or
unable to refinance their outstanding debt
obligations in unfavorable market conditions, or
•dispose of portions of credit commitments at a loss,
or hold larger residual positions in credit
commitments that cannot be sold at favorable
prices.
An adverse change in market conditions in particular
segments of the economy, such as a sudden and severe
downturn in oil and gas prices or an increase in
commodity prices, could have a material adverse effect
on clients of JPMorgan Chase whose operations or
financial condition are directly or indirectly dependent on
the health or stability of those market segments, as well
as clients that are engaged in related businesses.
JPMorgan Chase could incur losses on its loans and
other credit commitments to clients that operate in, or
are dependent on, any sector of the economy that is
under stress.
The fees that JPMorgan Chase earns from managing
client assets or holding assets under custody for clients
could be diminished by declining asset values or other
adverse macroeconomic conditions. For example,
higher interest rates or a downturn in financial markets
could affect the valuations of client assets that
JPMorgan Chase manages or holds under custody,
which, in turn, could affect JPMorgan Chase’s revenue
from fees that are based on the amount of assets under
management or custody. Similarly, adverse
macroeconomic or market conditions could prompt
outflows from JPMorgan Chase funds or accounts, or
cause clients to invest in products that generate lower
revenue. Substantial and unexpected withdrawals from
a JPMorgan Chase fund can also hamper the
investment performance of the fund, particularly if the
outflows create the need for the fund to dispose of fund
assets at disadvantageous times or prices, and could
lead to further withdrawals based on the weaker
investment performance.
15
Part I
An economic downturn that results in lower consumer
and business spending could also have a negative
impact on certain of JPMorgan Chase’s wholesale
clients, and thereby diminish JPMorgan Chase’s
earnings from its wholesale operations. For example,
the businesses of certain of JPMorgan Chase’s
wholesale clients are dependent on consistent streams
of rental income from commercial real estate properties
which are owned or being built by those clients. Severe
and sustained adverse economic conditions, including
higher unemployment caused by the COVID-19
pandemic and governmental actions taken in response
to the pandemic, could result in reductions in the rental
cash flows that owners or developers receive from their
tenants which, in turn, could depress the values of the
properties and impair the ability of borrowers to service
or refinance their commercial real estate loans. These
consequences could result in JPMorgan Chase
experiencing higher delinquencies, defaults and write-
offs within its commercial real estate loan portfolio and
incurring higher costs for servicing a larger volume of
delinquent loans in that portfolio, thereby reducing
JPMorgan Chase’s earnings from its wholesale
businesses.
Changes in interest rates and credit spreads can
adversely affect certain of JPMorgan Chase’s
revenue and income streams related to the Firm’s
traditional banking and funding activities.
In general, a low or negative interest rate environment
may cause:
•net interest margins to be compressed, which could
reduce the amounts that JPMorgan Chase earns on
its investment securities portfolio to the extent that it
is unable to reinvest contemporaneously in higher-
yielding instruments
•unanticipated or adverse changes in depositor
behavior, which could negatively affect JPMorgan
Chase’s broader asset and liability management
strategy
•JPMorgan Chase to reduce the amount of deposits
that it accepts from customers and clients, which
could result in lower revenues, and
•a reduction in the value of JPMorgan Chase’s
mortgage servicing rights (“MSRs”) asset, thereby
decreasing revenues.
When credit spreads widen, it becomes more expensive
for JPMorgan Chase to borrow. JPMorgan Chase’s
credit spreads may widen or narrow not only in
response to events and circumstances that are specific
to JPMorgan Chase but also as a result of general
economic and geopolitical events and conditions.
Changes in JPMorgan Chase’s credit spreads will affect,
positively or negatively, JPMorgan Chase’s earnings on
certain liabilities, such as derivatives, that are recorded
at fair value.
When interest rates are increasing, JPMorgan Chase
can generally be expected to earn higher net interest
income. However, higher interest rates can also lead to:•fewer originations of commercial and residential real
estate loans
•losses on underwriting exposures
•the loss of deposits, including in the event that
JPMorgan Chase makes incorrect assumptions
about depositor behavior
•lower net interest income if central banks introduce
interest rate increases more quickly than anticipated
and this results in a misalignment in the pricing of
short-term and long-term borrowings
•less liquidity in the financial markets, and
•higher funding costs.
All of these outcomes could adversely affect JPMorgan
Chase’s revenues and its liquidity and capital levels.
Higher interest rates can also negatively affect the
payment performance on loans within JPMorgan
Chase’s consumer and wholesale loan portfolios that
are linked to variable interest rates. If borrowers of
variable rate loans are unable to afford higher interest
payments, those borrowers may reduce or stop making
payments, thereby causing JPMorgan Chase to incur
losses and increased operational costs related to
servicing a higher volume of delinquent loans.
JPMorgan Chase’s results may be materially
affected by market fluctuations and significant
changes in the value of financial instruments.
The value of securities, derivatives and other financial
instruments which JPMorgan Chase owns or in which it
makes markets can be materially affected by market
fluctuations. Market volatility, illiquid market conditions
and other disruptions in the financial markets may make
it extremely difficult to value certain financial
instruments. Subsequent valuations of financial
instruments in future periods, in light of factors then
prevailing, may result in significant changes in the value
of these instruments. In addition, at the time of any
disposition of these financial instruments, the price that
JPMorgan Chase ultimately realizes will depend on the
demand and liquidity in the market at that time and may
be materially lower than their current fair value. Any of
these factors could cause a decline in the value of
JPMorgan Chase’s financial instruments which may
have an adverse effect on JPMorgan Chase’s results of
operations.
JPMorgan Chase’s risk management and monitoring
processes, including its stress testing framework, seek
to quantify and control JPMorgan Chase’s exposure to
more extreme market moves. However, JPMorgan
Chase’s hedging and other risk management strategies
may not be effective, and it could incur significant
losses, if extreme market events were to occur.
16
Credit
JPMorgan Chase can be negatively affected by
adverse changes in the financial condition of
clients, counterparties, custodians and CCPs.
JPMorgan Chase routinely executes transactions with
clients and counterparties such as corporations,
financial institutions, asset managers, hedge funds,
exchanges and government entities within and outside
the U.S. Many of these transactions expose JPMorgan
Chase to the credit risk of its clients and counterparties,
and can involve JPMorgan Chase in disputes and
litigation if a client or counterparty defaults. JPMorgan
Chase can also be subject to losses or liability where a
financial institution that it has appointed to provide
custodial services for client assets or funds becomes
insolvent as a result of fraud or the failure to abide by
existing laws and obligations, including under the EU
Alternative Investment Fund Managers Directive.
A default by, or the financial or operational failure of, a
CCP through which JPMorgan Chase executes
contracts would require JPMorgan Chase to replace
those contracts, thereby increasing its operational costs
and potentially resulting in losses. JPMorgan Chase can
also be exposed to losses if a member of a CCP in
which JPMorgan Chase is also a member defaults on its
obligations to the CCP because of requirements that
each member of the CCP absorb a portion of those
losses. As part of its clearing services activities,
JPMorgan Chase is also exposed to the risk of
nonperformance by its clients, which it seeks to mitigate
by requiring clients to provide adequate collateral.
JPMorgan Chase is also exposed to intra-day credit risk
of its clients in connection with providing cash
management, clearing, custodial and other transaction
services to those clients. If a client for which JPMorgan
Chase provides these services becomes bankrupt or
insolvent, JPMorgan Chase may incur losses, become
involved in disputes and litigation with one or more
CCPs, the client’s bankruptcy estate and other creditors,
or be subject to regulatory investigations. All of the
foregoing events can increase JPMorgan Chase’s
operational and litigation costs, and JPMorgan Chase
may suffer losses to the extent that any collateral that it
has received is insufficient to cover those losses.
JPMorgan Chase can also be subject to bearing its
share of non-default losses incurred by a CCP, including
losses from custodial, settlement or investment activities
or due to cyber or other security breaches.
Transactions with government entities, including
national, state, provincial, municipal and local
authorities, can expose JPMorgan Chase to enhanced
sovereign, credit, operational and reputation risks.
Government entities may, among other things, claim that
actions taken by government officials were beyond the
legal authority of those officials or repudiate transactions
authorized by a previous incumbent government. These
types of actions have in the past caused, and could in
the future cause, JPMorgan Chase to suffer losses or
hamper its ability to conduct business in the relevant
jurisdiction.In addition, local laws, rules and regulations could limit
JPMorgan Chase’s ability to resolve disputes and
litigation in the event of a counterparty default or
unwillingness to make previously agreed-upon
payments, which could subject JPMorgan Chase to
losses.
Disputes may arise with counterparties to derivatives
contracts with regard to the terms, the settlement
procedures or the value of underlying collateral. The
disposition of those disputes could cause JPMorgan
Chase to incur unexpected transaction, operational and
legal costs, or result in credit losses. These
consequences can also impair JPMorgan Chase’s ability
to effectively manage its credit risk exposure from its
market activities, or cause harm to JPMorgan Chase’s
reputation.
The financial or operational failure of a significant
market participant, such as a major financial institution
or a CCP, or concerns about the creditworthiness of
such a market participant, can have a cascading effect
within the financial markets. JPMorgan Chase’s
businesses could be significantly disrupted by such an
event, particularly if it leads to other market participants
incurring significant losses, experiencing liquidity issues
or defaulting, and JPMorgan Chase is likely to have
significant interrelationships with, and credit exposure
to, such a significant market participant.
JPMorgan Chase may suffer losses if the value of
collateral declines in stressed market conditions.
During periods of market stress or illiquidity, JPMorgan
Chase’s credit risk may be further increased when:
•JPMorgan Chase cannot realize the fair value of the
collateral it holds
•collateral is liquidated at prices that are not sufficient
to recover the full amount owed to it, or
•counterparties are unable to post collateral, whether
for operational or other reasons.
Furthermore, disputes with counterparties concerning
the valuation of collateral may increase in times of
significant market stress, volatility or illiquidity, and
JPMorgan Chase could suffer losses during these
periods if it is unable to realize the fair value of collateral
or to manage declines in the value of collateral.
JPMorgan Chase could incur significant losses
arising from concentrations of credit and market
risk.
JPMorgan Chase is exposed to greater credit and
market risk to the extent that groupings of its clients or
counterparties:
•engage in similar or related businesses, or in
businesses in related industries
•do business in the same geographic region, or
•have business profiles, models or strategies that
could cause their ability to meet their obligations to
be similarly affected by changes in economic
conditions.
17
Part I
For example, a significant deterioration in the credit
quality of one of JPMorgan Chase’s borrowers or
counterparties could lead to concerns about the
creditworthiness of other borrowers or counterparties in
similar, related or dependent industries. This type of
interrelationship could exacerbate JPMorgan Chase’s
credit, liquidity and market risk exposure and potentially
cause it to incur losses, including fair value losses in its
market-making businesses and investment portfolios. In
addition, JPMorgan Chase may be required to recognize
higher allowances for credit losses with respect to
certain clients or industries in order to align with
directives or expectations of its banking regulators.
Similarly, challenging economic conditions that affect a
particular industry or geographic area could lead to
concerns about the credit quality of JPMorgan Chase’s
borrowers or counterparties not only in that particular
industry or geography but in related or dependent
industries, wherever located. These conditions could
also heighten concerns about the ability of customers of
JPMorgan Chase’s consumer businesses who live in
those areas or work in those affected industries or
related or dependent industries to meet their obligations
to JPMorgan Chase. JPMorgan Chase regularly
monitors various segments of its credit and market risk
exposures to assess the potential risks of concentration
or contagion, but its efforts to diversify or hedge its
exposures against those risks may not be successful.
JPMorgan Chase’s consumer businesses can also be
harmed by an excessive expansion of consumer credit
by bank or non-bank competitors. Heightened
competition for certain types of consumer loans could
prompt industry-wide reactions such as significant
reductions in the pricing or margins of those loans or the
making of loans to less-creditworthy borrowers. If large
numbers of consumers subsequently default on their
loans, whether due to weak credit profiles, an economic
downturn or other factors, this could impair their ability
to repay obligations owed to JPMorgan Chase and
result in higher charge-offs and other credit-related
losses. More broadly, widespread defaults on consumer
debt could lead to recessionary conditions in the U.S.
economy, and JPMorgan Chase’s consumer businesses
may earn lower revenues in such an environment.
If JPMorgan Chase is unable to reduce positions
effectively during a market dislocation, this can increase
both the market and credit risks associated with those
positions and the level of RWA that JPMorgan Chase
holds on its balance sheet. These factors could
adversely affect JPMorgan Chase’s capital position,
funding costs and the profitability of its businesses.
Liquidity
JPMorgan Chase’s ability to operate its businesses
could be impaired if its liquidity is constrained.
JPMorgan Chase’s liquidity could be impaired at any
given time by factors such as:
•market-wide illiquidity or disruption•unforeseen liquidity or capital requirements,
including as a result of changes in laws, rules and
regulations
•inability to sell assets, or to sell assets at favorable
times or prices
•default by a CCP or other significant market
participant
•unanticipated outflows of cash or collateral
•unexpected loss of consumer deposits, and
•lack of market or customer confidence in JPMorgan
Chase or financial institutions in general.
A reduction in JPMorgan Chase’s liquidity may be
caused by events over which it has little or no control.
For example, during periods of market stress, low
investor confidence and significant market illiquidity
could result in higher funding costs for JPMorgan Chase
and could limit its access to some of its traditional
sources of liquidity.
JPMorgan Chase may need to raise funding from
alternative sources if its access to stable and lower-cost
sources of funding, such as deposits and borrowings
from Federal Home Loan Banks, is reduced. Alternative
sources of funding could be more expensive or limited in
availability. JPMorgan Chase’s funding costs could also
be negatively affected by actions that JPMorgan Chase
may take in order to:
•satisfy applicable liquidity coverage ratio and net
stable funding ratio requirements
•address obligations under its resolution plan, or
•satisfy regulatory requirements in jurisdictions
outside the U.S. relating to the pre-positioning of
liquidity in subsidiaries that are material legal
entities.
More generally, if JPMorgan Chase fails to effectively
manage its liquidity, this could constrain its ability to fund
or invest in its businesses and subsidiaries (including, in
particular, its broker-dealer subsidiaries), and thereby
adversely affect its results of operations.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. is a holding company and
depends on the cash flows of its subsidiaries to
make payments on its outstanding securities.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. is a holding company that holds
the stock of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and an
intermediate holding company, JPMorgan Chase
Holdings LLC (the “IHC”). The IHC in turn holds the
stock of substantially all of JPMorgan Chase’s
subsidiaries other than JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
and its subsidiaries. The IHC also owns other assets
and owes intercompany indebtedness to the holding
company.
The holding company is obligated to contribute to the
IHC substantially all the net proceeds received from
securities issuances (including issuances of senior and
subordinated debt securities and of preferred and
common stock).
The ability of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and the IHC
to make payments to the holding company is also
limited. JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. is subject to
restrictions
18
on its dividend distributions, as well as capital adequacy
requirements, such as the Supplementary Leverage
Ratio (“SLR”), and liquidity requirements and other
regulatory restrictions on its ability to make payments to
the holding company. The IHC is prohibited from paying
dividends or extending credit to the holding company if
certain capital or liquidity thresholds are breached or if
limits are otherwise imposed by JPMorgan Chase’s
management or Board of Directors.
As a result of these arrangements, the ability of the
holding company to make various payments is
dependent on its receiving dividends from JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A. and dividends and extensions of
credit from the IHC. These limitations could affect the
holding company’s ability to:
•pay interest on its debt securities
•pay dividends on its equity securities
•redeem or repurchase outstanding securities, and
•fulfill its other payment obligations.
These regulatory restrictions and limitations could also
result in the holding company seeking protection under
bankruptcy laws at a time earlier than would have been
the case absent the existence of the capital and liquidity
thresholds to which the IHC is subject.
Reductions in JPMorgan Chase’s credit ratings may
adversely affect its liquidity and cost of funding.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. and certain of its principal
subsidiaries are rated by credit rating agencies. Rating
agencies evaluate both general and firm-specific and
industry-specific factors when determining credit ratings
for a particular financial institution, including:
•expected future profitability
•risk management practices
•legal expenses
•ratings differentials between bank holding
companies and their bank and non-bank
subsidiaries
•regulatory developments
•assumptions about government support, and
•economic and geopolitical trends.
JPMorgan Chase closely monitors and manages, to the
extent that it is able, factors that could influence its
credit ratings. However, there is no assurance that
JPMorgan Chase’s credit ratings will not be lowered in
the future. Furthermore, any such downgrade could
occur at times of broader market instability when
JPMorgan Chase’s options for responding to events
may be more limited and general investor confidence is
low.
A reduction in JPMorgan Chase’s credit ratings could
curtail JPMorgan Chase’s business activities and reduce
its profitability in a number of ways, including:
•reducing its access to capital markets•materially increasing its cost of issuing and servicing
securities
•triggering additional collateral or funding
requirements, and
•decreasing the number of investors and
counterparties that are willing or permitted to do
business with or lend to JPMorgan Chase.
Any rating reduction could also increase the credit
spreads charged by the market for taking credit risk on
JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its subsidiaries. This could,
in turn, adversely affect the value of debt and other
obligations of JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its
subsidiaries.
The reform and replacement of benchmark rates
could adversely affect JPMorgan Chase’s funding,
investments and financial products, and expose it to
litigation and other disputes.
Interest rate, equity, foreign exchange rate and other
types of indices which are deemed to be “benchmarks,”
including those in widespread and longstanding use,
have been the subject of ongoing international, national
and other regulatory scrutiny and initiatives and
proposals for reform. Some of these reforms are already
effective while others are still to be implemented or are
under consideration. These reforms may cause certain
benchmarks to perform differently than in the past, or to
disappear entirely, or have other consequences which
cannot be fully anticipated.
Any of the benchmark reforms which have been
proposed or implemented, or the general increased
regulatory scrutiny of benchmarks, could also increase
the costs and risks of administering or otherwise
participating in the setting of benchmarks and complying
with regulations or requirements relating to benchmarks.
Such factors may have the effect of discouraging market
participants from continuing to administer or contribute
to certain benchmarks, trigger changes in the rules or
methodologies used in certain benchmarks or lead to
the disappearance of certain benchmarks.
Any of these developments, and any future initiatives to
regulate, reform or change the administration of
benchmarks, could result in adverse consequences to
the return on, value of and market for loans, mortgages,
securities, derivatives and other financial instruments
whose returns are linked to any such benchmark,
including those issued, funded, serviced or held by
JPMorgan Chase.
Various regulators, industry bodies and other market
participants in the U.S. and other countries are engaged
in initiatives to develop, introduce and encourage the
use of alternative rates to replace certain benchmarks.
There is no assurance that these new rates will be
accepted or widely used by market participants, or that
the characteristics of any of these new rates will be
similar to, or produce the economic equivalent of, the
benchmarks that they seek to replace. If a particular
benchmark were to be discontinued and an alternative
rate has not been successfully introduced to replace that
benchmark, this could result in widespread
19
Part I
dislocation in the financial markets, engender volatility in
the pricing of securities, derivatives and other
instruments, and suppress capital markets activities, all
of which could have adverse effects on JPMorgan
Chase’s results of operations.
To the extent that any guidance provided by accounting
standard setters concerning the transition from
benchmark rates is not comprehensive, fails to provide
the expected relief or the ability to elect or implement
that guidance is constrained in any significant respect,
the transition could:
•affect hedge accounting relationships between
financial instruments linked to a particular
benchmark and any related derivatives, which could
adversely affect JPMorgan Chase’s results of
operations, or
•increase JPMorgan Chase’s operational costs with
respect to the determination of whether the
transition has resulted in the modification or
extinguishment of specific contracts for accounting
purposes.
ICE Benchmark Administration, the administrator of
LIBOR, has announced that it will consult on its intention
to:
•cease publication of (i) all tenors of the euro,
sterling, Swiss franc and yen LIBORs and (ii) the
one week and two month tenors of U.S. dollar
LIBOR, in each case, after December 31, 2021, and
•cease publication of all remaining tenors of U.S.
dollar LIBOR after June 30, 2023.
These announcements indicate that it is highly likely that
various tenors of the LIBOR benchmark will be
discontinued on or about the timeframes mentioned
above. Vast amounts of loans, mortgages, securities,
derivatives and other financial instruments are linked to
the LIBOR benchmark, and any inability of market
participants and regulators to successfully introduce
benchmark rates to replace LIBOR and implement
effective transitional arrangements to address the
discontinuation of LIBOR could result in disruption in the
financial markets and suppress capital markets
activities, all of which could have a negative impact on
JPMorgan Chase’s results of operations and on LIBOR-
linked securities, credit or other instruments which are
issued, funded, serviced or held by JPMorgan Chase.
JPMorgan Chase could also become involved in
litigation and other types of disputes with clients,
customers, counterparties and investors as a
consequence of the transition from LIBOR and other
benchmark rates to replacement rates, including claims
that JPMorgan Chase has:
•treated clients, customers, counterparties or
investors unfairly, or caused them to experience
losses, higher financing costs or lower returns on
investments
•failed to appropriately communicate the effects of
the transition from benchmark rates on the products
that JPMorgan Chase has sold to its clients and
customers, or failed to disclose purported conflicts
of interest•made inappropriate product recommendations to or
investments on behalf of its clients, or sold products
that did not serve their intended purpose, in
connection with the transition from benchmark rates
•engaged in anti-competitive behavior, or in the
manipulation of markets or specific benchmarks, in
connection with the discontinuation of or transition
from benchmark rates, or
•disadvantaged clients, customers, counterparties or
investors when interpreting or making
determinations under the terms of agreements or
financial instruments.
These types of claims could subject JPMorgan Chase to
higher legal expenses and operational costs, require it
to pay significant amounts in connection with resolving
litigation and other disputes, and harm its reputation.
Capital
Maintaining the required level and composition of
capital may impact JPMorgan Chase’s ability to
support business activities, meet evolving
regulatory requirements and distribute capital to
shareholders.
JPMorgan Chase is subject to various regulatory capital
requirements, including leverage- and risk-based capital
requirements, that can change due to actions by
banking regulators. JPMorgan Chase’s adherence to
these requirements can also evolve dynamically in
response to changes in the composition of its balance
sheet or other factors. It is possible that these changing
requirements, including meeting or exceeding various
capital ratio thresholds, could limit JPMorgan Chase’s
ability to support its businesses and make capital
distributions to its shareholders.
Actions by the Federal Reserve and the U.S.
government in response to the economic effects of the
COVID-19 pandemic have led to an expansion of the
Federal Reserve's balance sheet, growth in deposit
balances held by JPMorgan Chase and other U.S.
financial institutions and, consequently, an increase in
JPMorgan Chase's leverage exposure. If these trends
were to continue, JPMorgan Chase may be required to
hold more capital or take other actions in order to satisfy
the leverage-based capital requirements applicable to it.
JPMorgan Chase is required to submit, at least annually,
a capital plan describing proposed dividend payments to
shareholders, redemptions and repurchases of its
outstanding securities and other capital actions that it
intends to take. JPMorgan Chase considers various
factors in managing capital, including the impact of
stress on its capital levels, as determined by both
internal modeling and the Federal Reserve’s modeling
of JPMorgan Chase’s capital position in supervisory
stress tests. Because the Federal Reserve and
JPMorgan Chase use different forecasting models and
methodologies when determining stress test results,
there can be significant differences between the
estimates of stress loss as determined by the Federal
Reserve and JPMorgan Chase, respectively. The
Federal
20
Reserve may require modifications to JPMorgan
Chase’s capital plan, and may change the Stress
Capital Buffer (“SCB”) applicable to JPMorgan Chase,
from time to time.
Any failure by or inability of JPMorgan Chase to
maintain the required level and composition of capital, or
unfavorable changes in the capital requirements
imposed by banking regulators, could have an adverse
impact on JPMorgan Chase’s shareholders, such as:
•reducing the amount of common stock that
JPMorgan Chase is permitted to repurchase
•requiring the issuance of, or prohibiting the
redemption of, capital instruments in a manner
inconsistent with JPMorgan Chase’s capital
management strategy
•constraining the amount of dividends that may be
paid on common stock, or
•curtailing JPMorgan Chase’s business activities or
operations.
Operational
JPMorgan Chase’s businesses are dependent on
the effectiveness of its operational systems and
those of other market participants.
JPMorgan Chase’s businesses rely on the ability of
JPMorgan Chase’s financial, accounting, transaction
execution, data processing and other operational
systems to process, record, monitor and report a large
number of transactions on a continuous basis, and to do
so accurately, quickly and securely. In addition to proper
design, installation, maintenance and training, the
effective functioning of JPMorgan Chase’s operational
systems depends on:
•the quality of the information contained in those
systems, as inaccurate, outdated or corrupted data
can significantly compromise the functionality or
reliability of a particular system and other systems
to which it transmits or from which it receives
information, and
•JPMorgan Chase’s ability to appropriately maintain
and upgrade its systems on a regular basis, and to
ensure that any changes introduced to its systems
are managed carefully to ensure security and
operational continuity and adhere to all applicable
legal and regulatory requirements.
JPMorgan Chase also depends on its ability to access
and use the operational systems of its vendors,
custodians and other market participants, including
clearing and payment systems, CCPs, securities
exchanges and data processing, security and
technology companies.
The ineffectiveness, failure or other disruption of
operational systems upon which JPMorgan Chase
depends, including due to a systems malfunction,
cyberbreach or other systems failure, could result in
unfavorable ripple effects in the financial markets and
for JPMorgan Chase and its clients and customers,
including:•delays or other disruptions in providing information,
services and liquidity to clients and customers
•the inability to settle transactions or obtain access to
funds and other assets, including those for which
physical settlement and delivery is required
•failure to timely settle or confirm transactions
•the possibility that funds transfers, capital markets
trades or other transactions are executed
erroneously, as a result of illegal conduct or with
unintended consequences
•financial losses, including due to loss-sharing
requirements of CCPs, payment systems or other
market infrastructures, or as possible restitution to
clients and customers
•higher operational costs associated with replacing
services provided by a system that is unavailable
•client or customer dissatisfaction with JPMorgan
Chase’s products and services
•regulatory fines, penalties, or other sanctions
against JPMorgan Chase
•loss of confidence in the ability of JPMorgan Chase,
or financial institutions generally, to protect against
and withstand operational disruptions, or
•harm to JPMorgan Chase’s reputation.
As the speed, frequency, volume, interconnectivity and
complexity of transactions continue to increase, it can
become more challenging to effectively maintain and
upgrade JPMorgan Chase’s operational systems and
infrastructure, especially due to the heightened risks
that:
•attempts by third parties to defraud JPMorgan
Chase or its clients and customers may increase,
evolve or become more complex, particularly during
periods of market disruption or economic
uncertainty
•errors made by JPMorgan Chase or another market
participant, whether inadvertent or malicious, cause
widespread system disruption
•isolated or seemingly insignificant errors in
operational systems compound, or migrate to other
systems over time, to become larger issues
•failures in synchronization or encryption software, or
degraded performance of microprocessors due to
design flaws, could cause disruptions in operational
systems, or the inability of systems to communicate
with each other, and
•third parties may attempt to block the use of key
technology solutions by claiming that the use
infringes on their intellectual property rights.
If JPMorgan Chase’s operational systems, or those of
external parties on which JPMorgan Chase’s
businesses depend, are unable to meet the
requirements of JPMorgan Chase’s businesses and
operations or bank regulatory
21
Part I
standards, or if they fail or have other significant
shortcomings, JPMorgan Chase could be materially and
adversely affected.
A successful cyber attack affecting JPMorgan
Chase could cause significant harm to JPMorgan
Chase and its clients and customers.
JPMorgan Chase experiences numerous attempted
cyber attacks on its computer systems, software,
networks and other technology assets on a daily basis
from various actors, including groups acting on behalf of
hostile countries, cyber-criminals, “hacktivists” (i.e.,
individuals or groups that use technology to promote a
political agenda or social change) and others. These
cyber attacks can take many forms, including attempts
to introduce computer viruses or malicious code, which
is commonly referred to as “malware,” into JPMorgan
Chase’s systems. These attacks are typically designed
to:
•obtain unauthorized access to confidential
information belonging to JPMorgan Chase or its
clients, customers, counterparties or employees
•manipulate data
•destroy data or systems with the aim of rendering
services unavailable
•disrupt, sabotage or degrade service on JPMorgan
Chase’s systems
•steal money, or
•extort money through the use of so-called
“ransomware.”
JPMorgan Chase has also experienced significant
distributed denial-of-service attacks which are intended
to disrupt online banking services.
JPMorgan Chase has experienced security breaches
due to cyber attacks in the past, and it is inevitable that
additional breaches will occur in the future. Any such
breach could result in serious and harmful
consequences for JPMorgan Chase or its clients and
customers.
A principal reason that JPMorgan Chase cannot provide
absolute security against cyber attacks is that it may not
always be possible to anticipate, detect or recognize
threats to JPMorgan Chase’s systems, or to implement
effective preventive measures against all breaches. This
is because:
•the techniques used in cyber attacks change
frequently and are increasingly sophisticated, and
therefore may not be recognized until launched
•cyber attacks can originate from a wide variety of
sources, including JPMorgan Chase’s own
employees, cyber-criminals, hacktivists, groups
linked to terrorist organizations or hostile countries,
or third parties whose objective is to disrupt the
operations of financial institutions more generally
•JPMorgan Chase does not have control over the
cybersecurity of the systems of the large number ofclients, customers, counterparties and third-party
service providers with which it does business, and
•it is possible that a third party, after establishing a
foothold on an internal network without being
detected, might obtain access to other networks and
systems.
The risk of a security breach due to a cyber attack could
increase in the future as JPMorgan Chase continues to
expand its mobile banking and other internet-based
product offerings and its internal use of internet-based
products and applications. Furthermore, increased use
of remote access and third party video conferencing
solutions during the COVID-19 pandemic, to facilitate
work-from-home arrangements for employees, could
increase JPMorgan Chase’s exposure to cyber attacks.
In addition, a third party could misappropriate
confidential information obtained by intercepting signals
or communications from mobile devices used by
JPMorgan Chase’s employees.
A successful penetration or circumvention of the security
of JPMorgan Chase’s systems or the systems of a
vendor, governmental body or another market
participant could cause serious negative consequences,
including:
•significant disruption of JPMorgan Chase’s
operations and those of its clients, customers and
counterparties, including losing access to
operational systems
•misappropriation of confidential information of
JPMorgan Chase or that of its clients, customers,
counterparties, employees or regulators
•disruption of or damage to JPMorgan Chase’s
systems and those of its clients, customers and
counterparties
•the inability, or extended delays in the ability, to fully
recover and restore data that has been stolen,
manipulated or destroyed, or the inability to prevent
systems from processing fraudulent transactions
•violations by JPMorgan Chase of applicable privacy
and other laws
•financial loss to JPMorgan Chase or to its clients,
customers, counterparties or employees
•loss of confidence in JPMorgan Chase’s
cybersecurity and business resiliency measures
•dissatisfaction among JPMorgan Chase’s clients,
customers or counterparties
•significant exposure to litigation and regulatory
fines, penalties or other sanctions, and
•harm to JPMorgan Chase’s reputation.
The extent of a particular cyber attack and the steps that
JPMorgan Chase may need to take to investigate the
attack may not be immediately clear, and it may take a
significant amount of time before such an investigation
can be completed. While such an investigation is
ongoing, JPMorgan Chase may not necessarily know
the full extent of the harm caused by the cyber attack,
and that damage may
22
22
continue to spread. These factors may inhibit JPMorgan
Chase’s ability to provide rapid, full and reliable
information about the cyber attack to its clients,
customers, counterparties and regulators, as well as the
public. Furthermore, it may not be clear how best to
contain and remediate the harm caused by the cyber
attack, and certain errors or actions could be repeated
or compounded before they are discovered and
remediated. Any or all of these factors could further
increase the costs and consequences of a cyber attack.
JPMorgan Chase can be negatively affected if it fails
to identify and address operational risks associated
with the introduction of or changes to products,
services and delivery platforms.
When JPMorgan Chase launches a new product or
service, introduces a new platform for the delivery or
distribution of products or services (including mobile
connectivity, electronic trading and cloud computing), or
makes changes to an existing product, service or
delivery platform, it may not fully appreciate or identify
new operational risks that may arise from those
changes, or may fail to implement adequate controls to
mitigate the risks associated with those changes. Any
significant failure in this regard could diminish JPMorgan
Chase’s ability to operate one or more of its businesses
or result in:
•potential liability to clients, counterparties and
customers
•increased operating expenses
•higher litigation costs, including regulatory fines,
penalties and other sanctions
•damage to JPMorgan Chase’s reputation
•impairment of JPMorgan Chase’s liquidity
•regulatory intervention, or
•weaker competitive standing.
Any of the foregoing consequences could materially and
adversely affect JPMorgan Chase’s businesses and
results of operations.
JPMorgan Chase’s operational costs and customer
satisfaction could be adversely affected by the
failure of an external operational system.
External operational systems with which JPMorgan is
connected, whether directly or indirectly, can be sources
of operational risk to JPMorgan Chase. JPMorgan
Chase may be exposed not only to a systems failure or
cyber attack that may be experienced by a vendor or
market infrastructure with which JPMorgan Chase is
directly connected, but also to a systems breakdown or
cyber attack involving another party to which such a
vendor or infrastructure is connected. Similarly, retailers,
data aggregators and other external parties with which
JPMorgan Chase’s customers do business can increase
JPMorgan Chase’s operational risk. This is particularly
the case where activities of customers or those parties
arebeyond JPMorgan Chase’s security and control
systems, including through the use of the internet, cloud
computing services and personal smart phones and
other mobile devices or services.
If an external party obtains access to customer account
data on JPMorgan Chase’s systems, and that party
experiences a cyberbreach of its own systems or
misappropriates that data, this could result in a variety of
negative outcomes for JPMorgan Chase and its clients
and customers, including:
•heightened risk that external parties will be able to
execute fraudulent transactions using JPMorgan
Chase’s systems
•losses from fraudulent transactions, as well as
potential liability for losses that exceed thresholds
established in consumer protection laws, rules and
regulations
•increased operational costs to remediate the
consequences of the external party’s security
breach, and
•harm to reputation arising from the perception that
JPMorgan Chase’s systems may not be secure.
As JPMorgan Chase’s interconnectivity with clients,
customers and other external parties continues to
expand, JPMorgan Chase increasingly faces the risk of
operational failure or cyber attacks with respect to the
systems of those parties. Security breaches affecting
JPMorgan Chase’s clients or customers, or systems
breakdowns or failures, security breaches or human
error or misconduct affecting other external parties, may
require JPMorgan Chase to take steps to protect the
integrity of its own operational systems or to safeguard
confidential information, including restricting the access
of customers to their accounts. These actions can
increase JPMorgan Chase’s operational costs and
potentially diminish customer satisfaction and
confidence in JPMorgan Chase.
Furthermore, the widespread and expanding
interconnectivity among financial institutions, central
agents, CCPs, payment processors, securities
exchanges, clearing houses and other financial market
infrastructures increases the risk that an operational
failure or cyber attack involving one institution or entity
may cause industry-wide operational disruptions that
could materially affect JPMorgan Chase’s ability to
conduct business.
JPMorgan Chase’s operations could be impaired if
its employees, or those of external parties, are not
competent and trustworthy, or if measures to
protect their health and safety are ineffective.
JPMorgan Chase’s ability to operate its businesses
efficiently and profitably, to offer products and services
that meet the expectations of its clients and customers,
and to maintain an effective risk management
framework is highly dependent on the competence and
integrity of its employees, as well as employees of other
parties on which JPMorgan Chase’s operations rely,
including vendors, custodians and financial markets
infrastructures. JPMorgan
23
Part I
Chase’s businesses could be materially and adversely
affected by:
•the ineffective implementation of business decisions
•any failure to institute controls that appropriately
address risks associated with business activities, or
to appropriately train employees with respect to
those risks and controls
•a significant operational breakdown or failure, theft,
fraud or other unlawful conduct, or
•other negative outcomes caused by human error or
misconduct by an employee of JPMorgan Chase or
of another party on which JPMorgan Chase’s
operations depend.
JPMorgan Chase’s operations could also be impaired if
the measures taken by it or by governmental authorities
to help ensure the health and safety of its employees
are ineffective, or if any external party on which
JPMorgan Chase relies fails to take appropriate and
effective actions to protect the health and safety of its
employees.
JPMorgan Chase faces substantial legal and
operational risks in safeguarding personal
information.
JPMorgan Chase’s businesses are subject to complex
and evolving laws, rules and regulations, both within and
outside the U.S., governing the privacy and protection of
personal information of individuals. The protected
parties can include:
•JPMorgan Chase’s clients and customers, and
prospective clients and customers
•clients and customers of JPMorgan Chase’s clients
and customers
•employees and prospective employees, and
•employees of JPMorgan Chase’s vendors,
counterparties and other external parties.
Ensuring that JPMorgan Chase’s collection, use,
transfer and storage of personal information comply with
all applicable laws, rules and regulations in all relevant
jurisdictions, including where the laws of different
jurisdictions are in conflict, can:
•increase JPMorgan Chase’s compliance and
operating costs
•hinder the development of new products or services,
curtail the offering of existing products or services,
or affect how products and services are offered to
clients and customers
•demand significant oversight by JPMorgan Chase’s
management, and
•require JPMorgan Chase to structure its
businesses, operations and systems in less efficient
ways.
Not all of JPMorgan Chase’s clients, customers,
vendors, counterparties and other external parties may
have appropriate controls in place to protect the
confidentialityof the information exchanged between them and
JPMorgan Chase, particularly where information is
transmitted by electronic means. JPMorgan Chase
could be exposed to litigation or regulatory fines,
penalties or other sanctions if personal, confidential or
proprietary information of clients, customers, employees
or others were to be mishandled or misused, such as
situations where such information is:
•erroneously provided to parties who are not
permitted to have the information, or
•intercepted or otherwise compromised by third
parties.
Concerns regarding the effectiveness of JPMorgan
Chase’s measures to safeguard personal information, or
even the perception that those measures are
inadequate, could cause JPMorgan Chase to lose
existing or potential clients and customers, and thereby
reduce JPMorgan Chase’s revenues. Furthermore, any
failure or perceived failure by JPMorgan Chase to
comply with applicable privacy or data protection laws,
rules and regulations may subject it to inquiries,
examinations and investigations that could result in
requirements to modify or cease certain operations or
practices, significant liabilities or regulatory fines,
penalties or other sanctions. Any of these could damage
JPMorgan Chase’s reputation and otherwise adversely
affect its businesses.
In recent years, well-publicized allegations involving the
misuse or inappropriate sharing of personal information
have led to expanded governmental scrutiny of practices
relating to the safeguarding of personal information and
the use or sharing of personal data by companies in the
U.S. and other countries. That scrutiny has in some
cases resulted in, and could in the future lead to, the
adoption of stricter laws, rules and regulations relating to
the use and sharing of personal information. These
types of laws and regulations could prohibit or
significantly restrict financial services firms such as
JPMorgan Chase from sharing information among
affiliates or with third parties such as vendors, and
thereby increase compliance costs, or could restrict
JPMorgan Chase’s use of personal data when
developing or offering products or services to
customers. These restrictions could also inhibit
JPMorgan Chase’s development or marketing of certain
products or services, or increase the costs of offering
them to customers.
JPMorgan Chase’s operations, results and
reputation could be harmed by catastrophes or
other events.
JPMorgan Chase’s business and operational systems
could be seriously disrupted, and its reputation could be
harmed, by events or contributing factors that are wholly
or partially beyond its control, including:
•cyberbreaches or breaches of physical premises,
including data centers
•power, telecommunications or internet outages
•failures of, or loss of access to, operational systems,
including computer systems, servers, networks and
other technology assets
24
•damage to or loss of property or assets of
JPMorgan Chase or third parties, and any
consequent injuries, including in connection with
any construction projects undertaken by JPMorgan
Chase
•effects of climate change
•natural disasters or severe weather conditions
•accidents such as explosions or structural failures
•health emergencies, the spread of infectious
diseases or pandemics, or
•events arising from local or larger-scale political
events, including outbreaks of hostilities or terrorist
acts.
JPMorgan Chase maintains a Firmwide resiliency
program that is intended to enable it to recover critical
business functions and supporting assets, including
staff, technology and facilities, in the event of a business
interruption. There can be no assurance that JPMorgan
Chase’s resiliency plans will fully mitigate all potential
business continuity risks to JPMorgan Chase or its
clients and customers or that its resiliency plans will be
adequate to address the effects of simultaneous
occurrences of multiple catastrophes or other business
interruption events. In addition, JPMorgan Chase’s
ability to respond effectively to a business interruption
could be hampered to the extent that the members of its
workforce, physical assets or systems and other support
infrastructure needed to address the event are
geographically dispersed, or conversely, if a
catastrophic event occurs in an area in which a critical
segment of JPMorgan Chase’s workforce, physical
assets or systems and other support infrastructure is
concentrated. Further, should emergency or
catastrophic events such as severe or abnormal
weather conditions or health emergencies, the spread of
infectious diseases or pandemics become more chronic,
the disruptive effects of those events on JPMorgan
Chase’s business and operations, and on its clients,
customers, counterparties and employees, could
become more significant and long-lasting.
Any significant failure or disruption of JPMorgan
Chase’s operations or operational systems, or any
catastrophic event, could:
•hinder JPMorgan Chase’s ability to provide services
to its clients and customers or to transact with its
counterparties
•require it to expend significant resources to correct
the failure or disruption
•cause it to incur losses or liabilities, including from
loss of revenue, damage to or loss of property, or
injuries
•expose it to litigation or regulatory fines, penalties or
other sanctions, and
•harm its reputation.
Furthermore, JPMorgan Chase may incur costs in
connection with disposing of certain excess properties,premises and facilities, and those costs may be material
to its results of operations in a given period.
Enhanced regulatory and other standards for the
oversight of vendors and other service providers
can result in higher costs and other potential
exposures.
JPMorgan Chase must comply with enhanced
regulatory and other standards associated with doing
business with vendors and other service providers,
including standards relating to the outsourcing of
functions as well as the performance of significant
banking and other functions by subsidiaries. JPMorgan
Chase incurs significant costs and expenses in
connection with its initiatives to address the risks
associated with oversight of its internal and external
service providers. JPMorgan Chase’s failure to
appropriately assess and manage these relationships,
especially those involving significant banking functions,
shared services or other critical activities, could
materially adversely affect JPMorgan Chase.
Specifically, any such failure could result in:
•potential liability to clients and customers
•regulatory fines, penalties or other sanctions
•lower revenues, and the opportunity cost from lost
revenues
•increased operational costs, or
•harm to JPMorgan Chase’s reputation.
JPMorgan Chase’s risk management framework
may not be effective in identifying and mitigating
every risk to JPMorgan Chase.
Any inadequacy or lapse in JPMorgan Chase’s risk
management framework, governance structure,
practices, models or reporting systems could expose it
to unexpected losses, and its financial condition or
results of operations could be materially and adversely
affected. Any such inadequacy or lapse could:
•hinder the timely escalation of material risk issues to
JPMorgan Chase’s senior management and the
Board of Directors
•lead to business decisions that have negative
outcomes for JPMorgan Chase
•require significant resources and time to remediate
•lead to non-compliance with laws, rules and
regulations
•attract heightened regulatory scrutiny
•expose JPMorgan Chase to regulatory
investigations or legal proceedings
•subject it to litigation or regulatory fines, penalties or
other sanctions
•harm its reputation, or
•otherwise diminish confidence in JPMorgan Chase.
JPMorgan Chase relies on data to assess its various
risk exposures. Any deficiencies in the quality or
effectiveness of
25
Part I
JPMorgan Chase’s data gathering, analysis and
validation processes could result in ineffective risk
management practices. These deficiencies could also
result in inaccurate risk reporting.
Many of JPMorgan Chase’s risk management strategies
and techniques consider historical market behavior. 
These strategies and techniques are based to some
degree on management’s subjective judgment. For
example, many models used by JPMorgan Chase are
based on assumptions regarding historical correlations
among prices of various asset classes or other market
indicators. In times of market stress, including difficult or
less liquid market environments, or in the event of other
unforeseen circumstances, previously uncorrelated
indicators may become correlated. Conversely,
previously-correlated indicators may make unrelated
movements at those times. Sudden market movements
and unanticipated or unidentified market or economic
movements could, in some circumstances, limit the
effectiveness of JPMorgan Chase’s risk management
strategies, causing it to incur losses.
JPMorgan Chase could recognize unexpected
losses, its capital levels could be reduced and it
could face greater regulatory scrutiny if its models,
estimations or judgments, including those used in
its financial statements, prove to be inadequate or
incorrect.
JPMorgan Chase has developed and uses a variety of
models and other analytical and judgment-based
estimations to measure, monitor and implement controls
over its market, credit, capital, liquidity, operational and
other risks. These models and estimations are based on
a variety of assumptions and historical trends, and are
periodically reviewed and modified as necessary. The
models and estimations that JPMorgan Chase uses may
not be effective in all cases to identify, observe and
mitigate risk due to a variety of factors, such as:
•reliance on historical trends that may not accurately
predict future events, including assumptions
underlying the models and estimations which predict
correlation among certain market indicators or asset
prices
•inherent limitations associated with forecasting
uncertain economic and financial outcomes
•historical trend information may be incomplete, or
may not anticipate severely negative market
conditions such as extreme volatility, dislocation or
lack of liquidity
•technology that is introduced to run models or
estimations may not perform as expected, or may
not be well understood by the personnel using the
technology
•models and estimations may contain erroneous
data, valuations, formulas or algorithms, and
•review processes may fail to detect flaws in models
and estimations.
Some of the models and other analytical and judgment-
based estimations used by JPMorgan Chase in
managingrisks are subject to review by, and require the approval
of, JPMorgan Chase’s regulators. These reviews are
required before JPMorgan Chase may use those
models and estimations in connection with calculating
market risk RWA, credit risk RWA and operational risk
RWA under Basel III. If JPMorgan Chase’s models or
estimations are not approved by its regulators, it may be
subject to higher capital charges, which could adversely
affect its financial results or limit the ability to expand its
businesses. JPMorgan Chase also uses internal models
in connection with its stress testing. JPMorgan Chase’s
capital actions may require regulatory approval and
could be constrained if its banking regulators object to a
capital plan or require the resubmission of a capital plan
due to the perceived inadequacy of JPMorgan Chase’s
models, estimations or other factors.
Under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles
(“U.S. GAAP”), JPMorgan Chase is required to use
estimates and apply judgments in preparing its financial
statements, including in determining the allowance for
credit losses, reserves related to litigation and the credit
card rewards liability. Certain financial instruments
require a determination of their fair value in order to
prepare JPMorgan Chase’s financial statements,
including:
•trading assets and liabilities
•instruments in the investment portfolio
•certain loans
•MSRs
•structured notes, and
•certain repurchase and resale agreements.
Where quoted market prices are not available for these
types of financial instruments, JPMorgan Chase may
make fair value determinations based on internally
developed models or other means which ultimately rely
to some degree on management estimates and
judgment, and these types of estimates and judgments
may not prove to be accurate due to a variety of factors,
as noted above. In addition, sudden illiquidity in markets
or declines in prices of certain loans and securities may
make it more difficult to value certain financial
instruments, which could lead to valuations being
subsequently changed or adjusted. If estimates or
judgments underlying JPMorgan Chase’s financial
statements prove to have been incorrect, JPMorgan
Chase may experience material losses.
JPMorgan Chase establishes an allowance for expected
credit losses that are inherent in its credit exposures. It
then employs stress testing and other techniques to
determine the amounts of capital and liquidity that would
be needed in the event of adverse economic or market
events. These processes are critical to JPMorgan
Chase’s results of operations and financial
condition. They require difficult, subjective and complex
judgments, including forecasts of how economic
conditions might impair the ability of JPMorgan Chase’s
borrowers and counterparties to repay their loans or
other obligations. It is possible that
26
26
JPMorgan Chase will fail to identify the proper factors or
that it will fail to accurately estimate the impact of factors
that it identifies.
Certain models used by JPMorgan Chase in connection
with the determination of the allowance for credit losses
have heightened performance risk in the economic
environment precipitated by the effects of the COVID-19
pandemic and government stimulus. For example, at
times certain macroeconomic variables employed in
these models remained well outside the range of
historical data used to train the models for some stress
scenarios. In addition, the historical relationships
between these macroeconomic variables and consumer
and wholesale credit losses have deteriorated, in part
due to the effects of the CARES Act and government
stimulus actions. As a result, there continues to be
significant uncertainty about the reliability of the
projections produced by the models. To compensate for
this uncertainty, JPMorgan Chase has made, and may
continue to make, significant adjustments to the
quantitative results of model calculations to take into
consideration model imprecision, emerging risks, trends
and other factors that are not yet reflected in those
calculations. There can be no assurance that, even after
adjustments have been made to model outputs,
JPMorgan Chase will not recognize unexpected losses
arising from the model uncertainty that has resulted from
these developments.
Lapses in controls over disclosure or financial
reporting could materially affect JPMorgan Chase’s
profitability or reputation.
There can be no assurance that JPMorgan Chase’s
disclosure controls and procedures will be effective in
every circumstance, or that a material weakness or
significant deficiency in internal control over financial
reporting will not occur. Any such lapses or deficiencies
could:
•materially and adversely affect JPMorgan Chase’s
business and results of operations or financial
condition
•restrict its ability to access the capital markets
•require it to expend significant resources to correct
the lapses or deficiencies
•expose it to litigation or regulatory fines, penalties or
other sanctions
•harm its reputation, or
•otherwise diminish investor confidence in JPMorgan
Chase.
JPMorgan Chase could be adversely affected by
changes in accounting standards or policies.
The preparation of JPMorgan Chase’s financial
statements is based on accounting standards
established by the Financial Accounting Standards
Board and the Securities and Exchange Commission, as
well as more detailed accounting policies established by
JPMorgan Chase’s management. From time to time
these accounting standards oraccounting policies may change, and in some cases
these changes could have a significant effect on
JPMorgan Chase’s financial statements and may
adversely affect its financial results or investor
perceptions of those results.
As of January 1, 2020, JPMorgan Chase implemented a
new accounting standard, commonly referred to as the
Current Expected Credit Losses (“CECL”) framework,
which requires earlier recognition of expected credit
losses on loans and certain other instruments. The
allowance for credit losses related to certain of
JPMorgan Chase’s loans and other lending-related
commitments portfolios increased upon implementation
of CECL, which has had a negative impact on
JPMorgan Chase’s capital levels.
The ongoing impact of the adoption of CECL could
include the following, each of which could result in
diminished investor confidence:
•greater volatility in JPMorgan Chase’s earnings and
capital levels over economic cycles
•potential reductions in its capital distributions, or
•increases in the allowance for credit losses.
In addition, JPMorgan Chase could be adversely
impacted by associated changes in the competitive
environment in which it operates, including changes in
the availability or pricing of loan products, particularly
during periods of economic stress, as well as changes
related to non-U.S. financial institutions or other
competitors that are not subject to this accounting
standard.
Strategic
If JPMorgan Chase’s management fails to develop
and execute effective business strategies, and to
anticipate changes affecting those strategies,
JPMorgan Chase’s competitive standing and results
could suffer.
JPMorgan Chase’s business strategies significantly
affect its competitive standing and operations. These
strategies relate to:
•the products and services that JPMorgan Chase
offers
•the geographies in which it operates
•the types of clients and customers that it serves
•the counterparties with which it does business, and
•the methods and distribution channels by which it
offers products and services.
If management makes choices about these strategies
and goals that prove to be incorrect, do not accurately
assess the competitive landscape and industry trends,
or fail to address changing regulatory and market
environments or the expectations of clients, customers,
investors, employees and other stakeholders, then the
franchise values and growth prospects of JPMorgan
Chase’s businesses may suffer and its earnings could
decline.
JPMorgan Chase’s growth prospects also depend on
management’s ability to develop and execute effective
27
Part I
business plans to address these strategic priorities, both
in the near term and over longer time horizons.
Management’s effectiveness in this regard will affect
JPMorgan Chase’s ability to develop and enhance its
resources, control expenses and return capital to
shareholders. Each of these objectives could be
adversely affected by any failure on the part of
management to:
•devise effective business plans and strategies
•offer products and services that meet changing
expectations of clients and customers
•allocate capital in a manner that promotes long-term
stability to enable JPMorgan Chase to build and
invest in market-leading businesses, even in a
highly stressed environment
•allocate capital appropriately due to imprecise
modeling or subjective judgments made in
connection with those allocations
•appropriately address concerns of clients,
customers, investors, employees and other
stakeholders, including with respect to social and
sustainability matters
•react quickly to changes in market conditions or
market structures, or
•develop and enhance the operational, technology,
risk, financial and managerial resources necessary
to grow and manage JPMorgan Chase’s
businesses.
JPMorgan Chase faces significant and increasing
competition in the rapidly evolving financial
services industry.
JPMorgan Chase operates in a highly competitive
environment in which it must evolve and adapt to the
significant changes as a result of changes in financial
regulation, technological advances, increased public
scrutiny and changes in economic conditions. JPMorgan
Chase expects that competition in the U.S. and global
financial services industry will continue to be intense.
Competitors include:
•other banks and financial institutions
•trading, advisory and investment management firms
•finance companies
•technology companies, and
•other nonbank firms that are engaged in providing
similar products and services.
JPMorgan Chase cannot provide assurance that the
significant competition in the financial services industry
will not materially and adversely affect its future results
of operations.
New competitors in the financial services industry
continue to emerge. For example, technological
advances and the growth of e-commerce have made it
possible for non-depository institutions to offer products
and services that traditionally were banking
products. These advances havealso allowed financial institutions and other companies
to provide electronic and internet-based financial
solutions, including electronic securities trading,
payments processing and online automated algorithmic-
based investment advice. Furthermore, both financial
institutions and their non-banking competitors face the
risk that payments processing and other services could
be significantly disrupted by technologies, such as
cryptocurrencies, that require no intermediation. New
technologies have required and could require JPMorgan
Chase to spend more to modify or adapt its products to
attract and retain clients and customers or to match
products and services offered by its competitors,
including technology companies. In addition, new
technologies may be used by customers, or breached or
infiltrated by third parties, in unexpected ways, which
can increase JPMorgan Chase’s costs for complying
with laws, rules and regulations that apply to the offering
of products and services through those technologies
and reduce the income that JPMorgan Chase earns
from providing products and services through those new
technologies.
Ongoing or increased competition may put pressure on
the pricing for JPMorgan Chase’s products and services
or may cause JPMorgan Chase to lose market share,
particularly with respect to traditional banking products
such as deposits and bank accounts. This competition
may be on the basis of quality and variety of products
and services offered, transaction execution, innovation,
reputation and price. The failure of any of JPMorgan
Chase’s businesses to meet the expectations of clients
and customers, whether due to general market
conditions, under-performance, a decision not to offer a
particular product or service, changes in client and
customer expectations or other factors, could affect
JPMorgan Chase’s ability to attract or retain clients and
customers. Any such impact could, in turn, reduce
JPMorgan Chase’s revenues. Increased competition
also may require JPMorgan Chase to make additional
capital investments in its businesses, or to extend more
of its capital on behalf of its clients in order to remain
competitive.
Climate change manifesting as physical or
transition risks could have a material adverse
impact on JPMorgan Chase’s business operations,
clients and customers.
JPMorgan Chase operates in many regions, countries
and communities around the world where its
businesses, and the activities of its clients and
customers, could be impacted by climate change.
Climate change could manifest as a financial risk to
JPMorgan Chase either through changes in the physical
climate or from the process of transitioning to a low-
carbon economy, including changes in climate policy or
in the regulation of financial institutions with respect to
risks posed by climate change.
Climate-related physical risks include both acute
weather events and chronic shifts in the climate.
Potential physical risks from climate change may include
altered distribution and intensity of rainfall, prolonged
droughts or flooding, increased frequency of wildfires,
rising sea levels, or a rising heat index.
28
Transition risks arise from the process of adjusting to a
low-carbon economy. In addition to possible changes in
climate policy and financial regulation, potential
transition risks may include economic and other
changes engendered by the development of low-carbon
technological advances (e.g., electric vehicles and
renewable energy) and/or changes in consumer
preferences towards low-carbon goods and services.
Transition risks could be further accelerated by the
occurrence of changes in the physical climate.
These climate-related physical risks and transition risks
could have a financial impact on JPMorgan Chase both
directly on its business and operations and as a result of
material adverse impacts to its clients and customers,
including:
•declines in asset values
•reduced availability of insurance
•significant interruptions to business operations, and
•negative consequences to business models, and
the need to make changes in response to those
consequences.
Conduct
Conduct failure by JPMorgan Chase employees can
harm clients and customers, impact market
integrity, damage JPMorgan Chase’s reputation and
trigger litigation and regulatory action.
JPMorgan Chase’s employees interact with clients,
customers and counterparties, and with each other,
every day. All employees are expected to demonstrate
values and exhibit the behaviors that are an integral part
of JPMorgan Chase’s How We Do Business Principles,
including JPMorgan Chase’s commitment to “do first
class business in a first class way.” JPMorgan Chase
endeavors to embed conduct risk management
throughout an employee’s life cycle, including recruiting,
onboarding, training and development, and performance
management. Conduct risk management is also an
integral component of JPMorgan Chase’s promotion and
compensation processes.
Notwithstanding these expectations, policies and
practices, certain employees have in the past engaged
in improper or illegal conduct, and these instances of
misconduct have resulted in litigation as well as
resolutions of governmental investigations or
enforcement actions involving consent orders, deferred
prosecution agreements, non-prosecution agreements
and other civil or criminal sanctions. There is no
assurance that further inappropriate or unlawful actions
by employees will not occur, lead to a violation of the
terms of these resolutions (and associated
consequences), or that any such actions will always be
detected, deterred or prevented.
JPMorgan Chase’s reputation could be harmed, and
collateral consequences could result, from a failure by
one or more employees to act consistently with
JPMorgan Chase’s expectations, policies and practices,
including by acting in ways that harm clients, customers,
other marketparticipants or other employees. Some examples of this
include:
•improperly selling and marketing JPMorgan Chase’s
products or services
•engaging in insider trading, market manipulation or
unauthorized trading
•engaging in improper or fraudulent behavior in
connection with government relief programs
•facilitating a transaction where a material objective
is to achieve a particular tax, accounting or financial
disclosure treatment that may be subject to scrutiny
by governmental or regulatory authorities, or where
the proposed treatment is unclear or may not reflect
the economic substance of the transaction
•failing to fulfill fiduciary obligations or other duties
owed to clients or customers
•violating antitrust or anti-competition laws by
colluding with other market participants to
manipulate markets, prices or indices
•engaging in discriminatory behavior or harassment
with respect to clients, customers or employees, or
acting contrary to JPMorgan Chase’s goal of
fostering a diverse and inclusive workplace
•managing or reporting risks in ways that subordinate
JPMorgan Chase’s risk appetite to business
performance goals or employee compensation
objectives, and
•misappropriating property, confidential or proprietary
information, or technology assets belonging to
JPMorgan Chase, its clients and customers or third
parties.
The consequences of any failure by employees to act
consistently with JPMorgan Chase’s expectations,
policies or practices could include litigation, or regulatory
or other governmental investigations or enforcement
actions. Any of these proceedings or actions could result
in judgments, settlements, fines, penalties or other
sanctions, or lead to:
•financial losses
•increased operational and compliance costs
•greater scrutiny by regulators and other parties
•regulatory actions that require JPMorgan Chase to
restructure, curtail or cease certain of its activities
•the need for significant oversight by JPMorgan
Chase’s management
•loss of clients or customers, and
•harm to JPMorgan Chase’s reputation.
29
Part I
Reputation
Damage to JPMorgan Chase’s reputation could
harm its businesses.
Maintaining trust in JPMorgan Chase is critical to its
ability to attract and retain clients, customers, investors
and employees. Damage to JPMorgan Chase’s
reputation can therefore cause significant harm to
JPMorgan Chase’s business and prospects, and can
arise from numerous sources, including:
•employee misconduct, including discriminatory
behavior or harassment with respect to clients,
customers or employees, or actions that are
contrary to JPMorgan Chase’s goal of fostering a
diverse and inclusive workplace
•security breaches, including as a result of cyber
attacks
•failure to safeguard client, customer or employee
information
•failure to manage risk issues associated with its
business activities or those of its clients, including
failure to fully discharge publicly-announced
commitments to support social and sustainability
initiatives
•compliance or operational failures
•litigation or regulatory fines, penalties or other
sanctions
•regulatory investigations or enforcement actions, or
resolutions of these matters, and
•failure or perceived failure of clients, customers,
counterparties or other parties to comply with laws,
rules or regulations, including companies in which
JPMorgan Chase has made principal investments,
parties to joint ventures with JPMorgan Chase, and
vendors with which JPMorgan Chase does
business.
JPMorgan Chase’s reputation may be significantly
damaged by adverse publicity or negative information
regarding JPMorgan Chase, whether or not true, that
may be published or broadcast by the media or posted
on social media, non-mainstream news services or other
parts of the internet. This latter risk can be magnified by
the speed and pervasiveness with which information is
disseminated through those channels.
Social and environmental activists are increasingly
targeting financial services firms such as JPMorgan
Chase with public criticism for their relationships with
clients that are engaged in certain sensitive industries,
including businesses whose products are or are
perceived to be harmful to human health, or whose
activities negatively affect or are perceived to negatively
affect the environment, workers’ rights or communities.
Activists have also engaged in public protests at
JPMorgan Chase’s headquarters and other properties.
Activist criticism of JPMorgan Chase’s relationships with
clients in sensitive industries could potentially engender
dissatisfaction amongclients, customers, investors and employees with how
JPMorgan Chase addresses social and sustainability
concerns in its business activities. Alternatively, yielding
to activism targeted at certain sensitive industries could
damage JPMorgan Chase’s relationships with clients
and customers, and with governmental or regulatory
bodies in jurisdictions in which JPMorgan Chase does
business, whose views are not aligned with those of
social and environmental activists. In either case, the
resulting harm to JPMorgan Chase’s reputation could:
•cause certain clients and customers to cease doing
business with JPMorgan Chase
•impair JPMorgan Chase’s ability to attract new
clients and customers, or to expand its relationships
with existing clients and customers
•diminish JPMorgan Chase’s ability to hire or retain
employees
•prompt JPMorgan Chase to cease doing business
with certain clients or customers.
•cause certain investors to divest from investments in
securities of JPMorgan Chase, or
•attract scrutiny from governmental or regulatory
bodies.
Actions by the financial services industry generally or
individuals in the industry can also affect JPMorgan
Chase’s reputation. For example, the reputation of the
industry as a whole can be damaged by concerns that:
•consumers have been treated unfairly by a financial
institution,
•a financial institution has acted inappropriately with
respect to the methods used to offer products to
customers
If JPMorgan Chase is perceived to have engaged in
these types of behaviors, this could weaken its
reputation among clients or customers.
Failure to effectively manage potential conflicts of
interest can result in litigation and enforcement
actions, as well as damage JPMorgan Chase’s
reputation.
JPMorgan Chase’s ability to manage potential conflicts
of interest is highly complex due to the broad range of
its business activities which encompass a variety of
transactions, obligations and interests with and among
JPMorgan Chase’s clients and customers. JPMorgan
Chase can become subject to litigation and enforcement
actions, and its reputation can be damaged, by the
failure or perceived failure to:
•adequately address or appropriately disclose
conflicts of interest, including potential conflicts of
interest that may arise in connection with providing
multiple products and services in, or having one or
more investments related to, the same transaction
•deliver appropriate standards of service and quality
30
•treat clients and customers with the appropriate
standard of care
•use client and customer data responsibly and in a
manner that meets legal requirements and
regulatory expectations
•provide fiduciary products or services in accordance
with the applicable legal and regulatory standards,
or
•handle or use confidential information of customers
or clients appropriately or in compliance with
applicable data protection and privacy laws, rules
and regulations.
A failure or perceived failure to appropriately address
conflicts of interest or fiduciary obligations could result in
customer dissatisfaction, litigation and regulatory fines,
penalties or other sanctions, and heightened regulatory
scrutiny and enforcement actions, all of which can lead
to lost revenue and higher operating costs and cause
serious harm to JPMorgan Chase’s reputation.
Country
An outbreak of hostilities between countries or
within a country or region could have a material
adverse effect on the global economy and on
JPMorgan Chase’s businesses within the affected
region or globally.
Aggressive actions by hostile governments or groups,
including armed conflict or intensified cyber attacks,
could expand in unpredictable ways by drawing in other
countries or escalating into full-scale war with potentially
catastrophic consequences, particularly if one or more
of the combatants possess nuclear weapons.
Depending on the scope of the conflict, the hostilities
could result in:
•worldwide economic disruption
•heightened volatility in financial markets
•severe declines in asset values, accompanied by
widespread sell-offs of investments
•substantial depreciation of local currencies,
potentially leading to defaults by borrowers and
counterparties in the affected region
•disruption of global trade, and
•diminished consumer, business and investor
confidence.
Any of the above consequences could have significant
negative effects on JPMorgan Chase’s operations and
earnings, both in the countries or regions directly
affected by the hostilities or globally. Further, if the U.S.
were to become directly involved in such a conflict, this
could lead to a curtailment of any operations that
JPMorgan Chase may have in the affected countries or
region, as well as in any nation that is aligned against
the U.S. in the hostilities. JPMorgan Chase could also
experience more numerous and aggressive cyber
attacks launched by or under the sponsorship of one or
more of the adversaries in such a conflict.JPMorgan Chase’s business and operations in
certain countries can be adversely affected by local
economic, political, regulatory and social factors.
Some of the countries in which JPMorgan Chase
conducts business have economies or markets that are
less developed and more volatile or may have political,
legal and regulatory regimes that are less established or
predictable than other countries in which JPMorgan
Chase operates. In addition, in some jurisdictions in
which JPMorgan Chase conducts business, the local
economy and business activity are subject to substantial
government influence or control. Some of these
countries have in the past experienced economic
disruptions, including:
•extreme currency fluctuations
•high inflation
•low or negative growth, and
•defaults or reduced ability to service sovereign debt.
The governments in these countries have sometimes
reacted to these developments by imposing restrictive
policies that adversely affect the local and regional
business environment, including:
•price, capital or exchange controls, including
imposition of punitive transfer and convertibility
restrictions or forced currency exchange
•expropriation or nationalization of assets or
confiscation of property, including intellectual
property, and
•changes in laws, rules and regulations.
The impact of these actions could be accentuated in
trading markets that are smaller, less liquid and more
volatile than more-developed markets. These types of
government actions can negatively affect JPMorgan
Chase’s operations in the relevant country, either
directly or by suppressing the business activities of local
clients or multi-national clients that conduct business in
the jurisdiction.
In addition, emerging markets countries, as well as
certain more developed countries, have been
susceptible to unfavorable social developments arising
from poor economic conditions or governmental actions,
including:
•widespread demonstrations or civil unrest
•general strikes and demonstrations
•crime and corruption
•security and personal safety issues
•outbreaks of hostilities
•overthrow of incumbent governments
•terrorist attacks, and
•other forms of internal discord.
These economic, political, regulatory and social
developments have in the past resulted in, and in the
future
31
Part I
could lead to, conditions that can adversely affect
JPMorgan Chase’s operations in those countries and
impair the revenues, growth and profitability of those
operations. In addition, any of these events or
circumstances in one country can affect JPMorgan
Chase’s operations and investments in another country
or countries, including in the U.S.
People
JPMorgan Chase’s ability to attract and retain
qualified and diverse employees is critical to its
success.
JPMorgan Chase’s employees are its most important
resource, and in many areas of the financial services
industry, competition for qualified personnel is intense.
JPMorgan Chase endeavors to attract talented and
diverse new employees and retain, develop and
motivate its existing employees. If JPMorgan Chase
were unable to continue to attract or retain qualified and
diverse employees, including successors to the Chief
Executive Officer or members of the Operating
Committee, JPMorgan Chase’s performance, including
its competitive position, could be materially and
adversely affected.
Unfavorable changes in immigration or travel
policies could adversely affect JPMorgan Chase’s
businesses and operations.
JPMorgan Chase relies on the skills, knowledge and
expertise of employees located throughout the world.
Changes in immigration or travel policies in the U.S. and
other countries that unduly restrict or otherwise make it
more difficult for employees or their family members to
work in, or travel to or transfer between, jurisdictions in
which JPMorgan Chase has operations or conducts its
business could inhibit JPMorgan Chase’s ability to
attract and retain qualified employees, and thereby
dilute the quality of its workforce, or could prompt
JPMorgan Chase to make structural changes to its
worldwide or regional operating models that cause its
operations to be less efficient or more costly.
Legal
JPMorgan Chase faces significant legal risks from
litigation and formal and informal regulatory and
government investigations.
JPMorgan Chase is named as a defendant or is
otherwise involved in many legal proceedings, including
class actions and other litigation or disputes with third
parties. Actions currently pending against JPMorgan
Chase may result in judgments, settlements, fines,
penalties or other sanctions adverse to JPMorgan
Chase. Any of these matters could materially and
adversely affect JPMorgan Chase’s business, financial
condition or results of operations, or cause serious
reputational harm. As a participant in the financial
services industry, it is likely that JPMorgan Chase will
continue to experience a high level of litigation and
regulatory and government investigations related to its
businesses and operations.Regulators and other government agencies conduct
examinations of JPMorgan Chase and its subsidiaries
both on a routine basis and in targeted exams, and
JPMorgan Chase’s businesses and operations are
subject to heightened regulatory oversight. This
heightened regulatory scrutiny, or the results of such an
investigation or examination, may lead to additional
regulatory investigations or enforcement actions. There
is no assurance that those actions will not result in
resolutions or other enforcement actions against
JPMorgan Chase. Furthermore, a single event involving
a potential violation of law or regulation may give rise to
numerous and overlapping investigations and
proceedings, either by multiple federal, state or local
agencies and officials in the U.S. or, in some instances,
regulators and other governmental officials in non-U.S.
jurisdictions.
If another financial institution violates a law or regulation
relating to a particular business activity or practice, this
will often give rise to an investigation by regulators and
other governmental agencies of the same or similar
activity or practice by JPMorgan Chase.
These and other initiatives by U.S. and non-U.S.
governmental authorities may subject JPMorgan Chase
to judgments, settlements, fines, penalties or other
sanctions, and may require JPMorgan Chase to
restructure its operations and activities or to cease
offering certain products or services. All of these
potential outcomes could harm JPMorgan Chase’s
reputation or lead to higher operational costs, thereby
reducing JPMorgan Chase’s profitability, or result in
collateral consequences. In addition, the extent of
JPMorgan Chase’s exposure to legal and regulatory
matters can be unpredictable and could, in some cases,
exceed the amount of reserves that JPMorgan Chase
has established for those matters.
 
 
 
32
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments.
None.
Item 2. Properties.
JPMorgan Chase’s headquarters is located in New York
City at 383 Madison Avenue, a 47-story office building
that it owns. The Firm is demolishing its former
headquarters at 270 Park Avenue in New York City and
is building a new headquarters on the same site.
Demolition is targeted to be completed in 2021 and
construction of the new building has commenced.
The Firm owned or leased facilities in the following
locations at December 31, 2020.
December 31, 2020
 (in millions)Approximate
square footage
United States
New York City, New York
383 Madison Avenue, New York, New York1.1 
All other New York City locations8.0 
Total New York City, New York9.1 
Other U.S. locations
Columbus/Westerville, Ohio3.8 
Chicago, Illinois2.7 
Phoenix/Tempe, Arizona2.4 
Wilmington/Newark, Delaware2.2 
Houston, Texas1.9 
Jersey City, New Jersey1.7 
Dallas/Plano, Texas1.6 
All other U.S. locations34.8 
Total United States60.2 
Europe, the Middle East and Africa (“EMEA”)
25 Bank Street, London, U.K.1.4 
All other U.K. locations2.9 
All other EMEA locations1.4 
Total EMEA5.7 
Asia-Pacific, Latin America and Canada
India4.7 
All other locations3.8 
Total Asia-Pacific, Latin America and
Canada8.5 
Total74.4 
(a)At December 31, 2020, the Firm owned or leased 4,908 retail
branches in 38 states and Washington D.C.
The premises and facilities occupied by JPMorgan
Chase are used across all of the Firm’s business
segments and for corporate purposes. JPMorgan Chase
continues to evaluate its current and projected space
requirements and may determine from time to time that
certain of its properties (including the premises and
facilities noted above) are no longer necessary for its
operations. There is no assurance that the Firm will be
able to dispose of any such excess properties,
premises, or facilities or that it will not incur costs in
connection with such dispositions. Such disposition
costs may be material to the Firm’s results of operations
in a given period. Refer to the Consolidated Results ofOperations on pages 54-56 for information on
occupancy expense.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings.
Refer to Note 30 for a description of the Firm’s material
legal proceedings.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures.
Not applicable.
(a)
33
Part II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common
Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities.
Market for registrant’s common equity
JPMorgan Chase’s common stock is listed and traded
on the New York Stock Exchange. Refer to “Five-year
stock performance,” on page 45 for a comparison of the
cumulative total return for JPMorgan Chase common
stock with the comparable total return of the S&P 500
Index, the KBW Bank Index and the S&P Financial
Index over the five-year period ended December 31,
2020.Refer to Capital actions in the Capital Risk Management
section of Management’s discussion and analysis on
page 99 for information on the common dividend payout
ratio. Refer to Note 21 for a discussion of restrictions on
dividend payments. On January 31, 2021, there were
199,515 holders of record of JPMorgan Chase common
stock. Refer to Part III, Item 12 on page 37 for
information regarding securities authorized for issuance
under the Firm’s employee share-based incentive plans.
Repurchases under the common share repurchase
program
Refer to Capital actions in the Capital Risk Management
section of Management’s discussion and analysis on
page 99 for information regarding repurchases under
the Firm’s common share repurchase program.
On March 15, 2020, in response to the economic disruptions caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the Firm temporarily
suspended repurchases of its common stock. Subsequently, the Federal Reserve directed all large banks, including the
Firm, to discontinue net share repurchases through the end of 2020. On December 18, 2020, the Federal Reserve
announced that all large banks, including the Firm, could resume share repurchases commencing in the first quarter of
2021, subject to certain restrictions. The Firm's Board of Directors has authorized a new common share repurchase
program for up to $30 billion.
Shares repurchased pursuant to the prior common share repurchase program during 2020 were as follows.
Year ended December 31, 2020Total number
of shares of
common stock
repurchasedAverage
price paid
per share of
common
stockAggregate
purchase price
of common
stock
repurchases (in
millions)Dollar value
of remaining
authorized
repurchase
(in millions)
First quarter 50,003,062 $ 127.92 $ 6,397 $ 9,183 
Second quarter — — — 9,183 
Third quarter — — — — 
October — — — — 
November — — — — 
December — — — — 
Fourth quarter — — — — 
Year-to-date 50,003,062 $ 127.92 $ 6,397 $ — 
(a)Excludes commissions cost.
(b)The remaining $9.2 billion unused portion under the prior $29.4 billion repurchase program expired on June 30, 2020.
Item 6. Selected Financial Data.
Refer to “Five-year summary of consolidated financial
highlights (unaudited)” on page 44 for five-year selected
financial data.
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations.
Management’s discussion and analysis of financial
condition and results of operations, entitled
“Management’s discussion and analysis,” appears on
pages 46-157. Such information should be read in
conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements
and Notes thereto, which appear on pages 162-298.Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative
Disclosures About Market Risk.
Refer to the Market Risk Management section of
Management’s discussion and analysis on pages 135–
142 for a discussion of quantitative and qualitative
disclosures about market risk.
Item 8. Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data.
The Consolidated Financial Statements, together with
the Notes thereto and the report thereon dated
February 23, 2021, of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, the
Firm’s independent registered public accounting firm,
appear on pages 159-298.
Supplementary financial data for each quarter within the
two years ended December 31, 2020, are included on
page 299 in the table entitled “Selected quarterly
financial data(a) (a) (a)
(b)
(b)
34
(unaudited).” Also included is a “Glossary of Terms and
Acronyms’’ on pages 305-311.
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements With
Accountants on Accounting and Financial
Disclosure.
None.
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures.
The internal control framework promulgated by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (“COSO”), “Internal Control —
Integrated Framework” (“COSO 2013”), provides
guidance for designing, implementing and conducting
internal control and assessing its effectiveness. The
Firm used the COSO 2013 framework to assess the
effectiveness of the Firm’s internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2020. Refer to
“Management’s report on internal control over financial
reporting” on page 158.
As of the end of the period covered by this report, an
evaluation was carried out under the supervision and
with the participation of the Firm’s management,
including its Chairman and Chief Executive Officer and
its Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of its
disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule
13a-15(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934).
Based on that evaluation, the Chairman and Chief
Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer
concluded that these disclosure controls and procedures
were effective. Refer to Exhibits 31.1 and 31.2 for the
Certifications furnished by the Chairman and Chief
Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer,
respectively.
The Firm is committed to maintaining high standards of
internal control over financial reporting. Nevertheless,
because of its inherent limitations, internal control over
financial reporting may not prevent or detect all
misstatements. Deficiencies or lapses in internal
controls may occur from time to time, and there can be
no assurance that any such deficiencies will not result in
significant deficiencies or material weaknesses in
internal control in the future and collateral
consequences therefrom. Refer to “Management’s
report on internal control over financial reporting” on
page 158 for further information. There was no change
in the Firm’s internal control over financial reporting (as
defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934) that occurred during the three months
ended December 31, 2020, that has materially affected,
or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the Firm’s
internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other Information.
None.
35
Part III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance.
Executive officers of the registrant
Age
Name (at December 31, 2020)Positions and of fices
James Dimon 64 Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Of ficer; he had been President from
July 2004 until January 2018.
Ashley Bacon 51 Chief Risk Of ficer since June 2013.
Lori A. Beer 53 Chief Information Of ficer since September 2017, prior to which she had been
Chief Information Of ficer of the Corporate & Investment Bank since June 2016.
She was Global Head of Banking T echnology from January 2014 until May 2016.
Mary Callahan Erdoes 53 Chief Executive Of ficer of Asset & W ealth Management since September 2009.
Stacey Friedman 52 General Counsel since January 2016, prior to which she was Deputy General
Counsel since July 2015 and General Counsel for the Corporate & Investment
Bank since August 2012.
Marianne Lake 51 Chief Executive Of ficer of Consumer Lending and Card Services since May 2019,
prior to which she had been Chief Financial Of ficer since 2013.
Robin Leopold 56 Head of Human Resources since January 2018, prior to which she had been
Head of Human Resources for the Corporate & Investment Bank since August
2012.
Douglas B. Petno 55 Chief Executive Of ficer of Commercial Banking since January 2012.
Jennifer Piepszak 50 Chief Financial Of ficer since May 2019, prior to which she had been the Chief
Executive Of ficer for Card Services since 2017. She was Chief Executive Of ficer
of Business Banking from 2015 to 2017.
Daniel E. Pinto 58 Co-President and Co-Chief Operating Of ficer since January 2018, Chief
Executive Of ficer of the Corporate & Investment Bank since March 2014, and
Chief Executive Of ficer of Europe, the Middle East and Africa since June 2011.
Peter Scher
 59 Head of Corporate Responsibility since 2011 and Chairman of the Mid-Atlantic
Region since 2015.
 
Gordon A. Smith 62 Co-President and Co-Chief Operating Of ficer since January 2018, and Chief
Executive Of ficer of Consumer & Community Banking since December 2012.
Unless otherwise noted, during the five fiscal years ended December 31, 2020, all of JPMorgan Chase’s above-named executive officers have
continuously held senior-level positions with JPMorgan Chase. There are no family relationships among the foregoing executive officers. Information
to be provided in Items 10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 of the Form 10-K and not otherwise included herein is incorporated by reference to the Firm’s Definitive
Proxy Statement for its 2021 Annual Meeting of Stockholders to be held on May 18, 2021, which will be filed with the SEC within 120 days of the end
of the Firm’s fiscal year ended December 31, 2020.
36
Item 11. Executive Compensation.
Refer to Item 10. 
 
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters.
Refer to Item 10 for security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management.
The following table sets forth the total number of shares available for issuance under JPMorgan Chase’s employee
share-based incentive plans (including shares available for issuance to non-employee directors). The Firm is not
authorized to grant share-based incentive awards to non-employees, other than to non-employee directors.
December 31, 2020Number of shares to be
issued upon exercise of
outstanding
options/stock
appreciation rightsWeighted-average 
 exercise price of 
 outstanding 
 options/stock appreciation
rightsNumber of shares
remaining available for
future issuance under
stock incentive plans
Plan category
Employee share-based incentive plans approved by shareholders 3,124,739 $41.25 66,621,995 
Total 3,124,739 $41.25 66,621,995 
(a)Does not include restricted stock units or performance stock units granted under the shareholder-approved Long-Term Incentive Plan (“LTIP”), as
amended and restated effective May 15, 2018. Refer to Note 9 for further discussion.
(b)Represents shares available for future issuance under the shareholder-approved LTIP.
All shares available for future issuance will be issued under the shareholder-approved LTIP. Refer to Note 9 for further
discussion.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related
Transactions, and Director Independence.
Refer to Item 10.
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and
Services.
Refer to Item 10.(a) (b)
37
Part IV
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement
Schedules.
1 Financial statements
The Consolidated Financial Statements, the
Notes thereto and the report of the
Independent Registered Public Accounting
Firm thereon listed in Item 8 are set forth
commencing on page 159.
2 Financial statement schedules
3 Exhibits
3.1 Restated Certificate of Incorporation of
JPMorgan Chase & Co., effective April 5,
2006 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form 8-
K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed April 7, 2006).
3.2 Amendment to the Restated Certificate of
Incorporation of JPMorgan Chase & Co.,
effective June 7, 2013 (incorporated by
reference to Appendix F to the Proxy
Statement on Schedule 14A of JPMorgan
Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805) filed April 10,
2013).
3.3 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series I (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form 8-
K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed April 24, 2008).
3.4 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series Q (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed April 23, 2013).
3.5 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series R (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed July 29, 2013).
3.6 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series S (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed January 22, 2014).
3.7 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series U (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed on March 10, 2014).3.8 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series V (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed on June 9, 2014).
3.9 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series X (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed on September 23, 2014).
3.10 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series Z (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed April 21, 2015).
3.11 Certificate of Designations for 6.10% Non-
Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series AA
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
the Current Report on Form 8-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
filed June 4, 2015).
3.12 Certificate of Designations for 6.15% Non-
Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series BB
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
the Current Report on Form 8-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
filed July 29, 2015).
3.13 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series CC (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed October 20, 2017).
3.14 Certificate of Designations for 5.75% Non-
Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series DD
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
the Current Report on Form 8-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
filed September 21, 2018).
 
3.15 Certificate of Designations for 6.00% Non-
Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series EE
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
the Current Report on Form 8-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
filed January 24, 2019).
 
3.16 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series FF (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed July 31, 2019).
3.17 Certificate of Designations for 4.75% Non-
Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series GG
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
the Current Report on Form 8-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
filed November 7, 2019).
38
3.18 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series HH (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed January 23, 2020).
3.19 Certificate of Designations for Fixed-to-
Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred
Stock, Series II (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 to the Current Report on Form
8-K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed February 24, 2020).
3.20 By-laws of JPMorgan Chase & Co., as
amended, effective January 30, 2018
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
the Current Report on Form 8-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
filed January 30, 2018).
4.1(a) Indenture, dated as of October 21, 2010,
between JPMorgan Chase & Co. and
Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas,
as Trustee (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report on Form 8-
K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No.1-
5805) filed October 21, 2010).
4.1(b) First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 13, 2017, between JPMorgan
Chase & Co. and Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americas, as Trustee, to the
Indenture, dated as of October 21, 2010
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
the Current Report on Form 8-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
filed January 13, 2017).
4.2(a) Subordinated Indenture, dated as of March
14, 2014, between JPMorgan Chase & Co.
and U.S. Bank Trust National Association,
as Trustee (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to the Current Report on Form 8-
K of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No.1-
5805) filed March 14, 2014).
4.2(b) First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 13, 2017, between JPMorgan
Chase & Co. and U.S. Bank Trust National
Association, as Trustee, to the Subordinated
Indenture, dated as of March 14, 2014
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
the Current Report on Form 8-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
filed January 13, 2017).
4.3(a) Indenture, dated as of May 25, 2001,
between JPMorgan Chase & Co. and
Bankers Trust Company (succeeded by
Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas),
as Trustee (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(a)(1) to the Registration Statement
on Form S-3 of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File
No. 333-52826) filed June 13, 2001).4.3(b) Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 13, 2017, between JPMorgan
Chase & Co. and Bankers Trust Company
(succeeded by Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americas), as Trustee, to the
Indenture, dated as of May 25, 2001
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
the Current Report on Form 8-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
filed January 13, 2017).
4.4 Indenture, dated as of February 19, 2016,
among JPMorgan Chase Financial
Company LLC, JPMorgan Chase & Co. and
Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas,
as Trustee (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4(a)(7) to the Registration Statement
on Form S-3 of JPMorgan Chase & Co. and
JPMorgan Chase Financial Company LLC
(File No. 333-209682) filed February 24,
2016).
4.5 Form of Deposit Agreement (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the
Registration Statement on Form S-3 of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 333-
191692) filed October 11, 2013).
4.6 Description of Securities of JPMorgan
Chase & Co. registered pursuant to Section
12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Other instruments defining the rights of holders of long-
term debt securities of JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its
subsidiaries are omitted pursuant to Section (b)(4)(iii)
(A) of Item 601 of Regulation S-K. JPMorgan Chase &
Co. agrees to furnish copies of these instruments to the
SEC upon request.
10.1 Deferred Compensation Plan for Non-
Employee Directors of JPMorgan Chase &
Co., as amended and restated July 2001
and as of December 31, 2004 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K of JPMorgan Chase &
Co. (File No. 1-5805) for the year ended
December 31, 2007).
10.2 2005 Deferred Compensation Plan for Non-
Employee Directors of JPMorgan Chase &
Co., effective as of January 1, 2005
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
the Annual Report on Form 10-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
for the year ended December 31, 2007).
10.3 2005 Deferred Compensation Program of
JPMorgan Chase & Co., restated effective
as of December 31, 2008 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K of JPMorgan Chase &
Co. (File No. 1-5805) for the year ended
December 31, 2008).
10.4 JPMorgan Chase & Co. Amended and
Restated Long-Term Incentive Plan,
effective May 15, 2018 (incorporated by
reference to Appendix B of the Schedule
14A of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-
5805) filed April 5, 2018).
 (b)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
39
Part IV
10.5 Key Executive Performance Plan of
JPMorgan Chase & Co., as amended and
restated effective January 1, 2014
(incorporated by reference to Appendix G of
the Schedule 14A of JPMorgan Chase &
Co. (File No. 1-5805) filed April 10, 2013).
10.6 Excess Retirement Plan of JPMorgan
Chase & Co., restated and amended as of
December 31, 2008, as amended
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 to
the Annual Report on Form 10-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
for the year ended December 31, 2009).
10.7 Executive Retirement Plan of JPMorgan
Chase & Co., as amended and restated
December 31, 2008 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.9 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K of JPMorgan Chase &
Co. (File No. 1-5805) for the year ended
December 31, 2008).
10.8 Bank One Corporation Supplemental
Savings and Investment Plan, as amended
and restated effective December 31, 2008
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.13
to the Annual Report on Form 10-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
for the year ended December 31, 2008).
10.9 Forms of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Long-
Term Incentive Plan Terms and Conditions
for stock appreciation rights and restricted
stock units, dated as of January 18, 2012
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.25
to the Annual Report on Form 10-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
for the year ended December 31, 2011).
10.10 Forms of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Long-
Term Incentive Plan Terms and Conditions
for stock appreciation rights and restricted
stock units for Operating Committee
members, dated as of January 17, 2013
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.23
to the Annual Report on Form 10-K of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
for the year ended December 31, 2012).
10.11 Forms of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Long-
Term Incentive Plan Terms and Conditions
for performance share units and restricted
stock units for Operating Committee
members (U.S. and U.K.), dated as of
January 17, 2017 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.23 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K of JPMorgan Chase &
Co. (File No. 1-5805) for the year ended
December 31, 2016).
10.12 Forms of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Long-
Term Incentive Plan Terms and Conditions
for performance share units and restricted
stock units for Operating Committee
members (U.S. and U.K.), dated as of
January 16, 2018.10.13 Forms of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Long-
Term Incentive Plan Terms and Conditions
for restricted stock units for Operating
Committee members (U.S. and U.K.), dated
as of January 15, 2019.
10.14 Form of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Long-Term
Incentive Plan Terms and Conditions of
Performance Share Unit Award Operating
Committee (U.S.) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K of JPMorgan Chase &
Co. (File No. 1-5805) filed March 15, 2019).
10.15 Form of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Long-Term
Incentive Plan Terms and Conditions of
Performance Share Unit Award Operating
Committee (U.K.) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Current
Report on Form 8-K of JPMorgan Chase &
Co. (File No. 1-5805) filed March 15, 2019).
10.16 Forms of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Long-
Term Incentive Plan Terms and Conditions
for restricted stock units and performance
share unit awards for Operating Committee
members (U.S. and U.K.), dated as of
January 21, 2020.
10.17 Forms of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Long-
Term Incentive Plan Terms and Conditions
for restricted stock units and performance
share unit awards for Operating Committee
members (U.S. and U.K.), dated as of
January 19, 2021.
10.18 Form of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Terms and
Conditions of Fixed Allowance (UK)
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
the Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
for the quarter ended June 30, 2014).
10.19 Form of JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Performance-Based Incentive
Compensation Plan, effective as of January
1, 2006, as amended (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.27 to the Annual
Report on Form 10-K of JPMorgan Chase &
Co. (File No. 1-5805) for the year ended
December 31, 2009).
10.20 Employee Stock Purchase Plan of
JPMorgan Chase & Co., as amended and
restated effective as of January 1, 2019
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
the Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (File No. 1-5805)
for the quarter ended September 30, 2019).
21 List of subsidiaries of JPMorgan Chase &
Co.
22.1 Annual Report on Form 11-K of The
JPMorgan Chase 401(k) Savings Plan for
the year ended December 31, 2019 (to be
filed pursuant to Rule 15d-21 under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934).
22.2 Subsidiary Guarantors and Issuers of
Guaranteed Securities.(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)(b)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(b)
40
23 Consent of independent registered public
accounting firm.
31.1 Certification.
31.2 Certification.
32 Certification pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101.INSThe instance document does not appear in
the interactive data file because its XBRL
tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL
document.
101.SCHXBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema
Document.
101.CALXBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation
Linkbase Document.
101.DEFXBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition
Linkbase Document.
101.LABXBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase
Document.
101.PREXBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation
Linkbase Document.
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File
(embedded within the Inline XBRL
document and included in Exhibit 101).
 
(a)    This exhibit is a management contract or compensatory plan or
arrangement.
(b)    Filed herewith.
(c)    Furnished herewith. This exhibit shall not be deemed “filed” for
purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or
otherwise subject to the liability of that Section. Such exhibit shall
not be deemed incorporated into any filing under the Securities Act
of 1933 or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
(d)    Pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T, includes the following
financial information included in the Firm’s Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2020, formatted in XBRL (eXtensible
Business Reporting Language) interactive data files: (i) the
Consolidated statements of income for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, (ii) the Consolidated
statements of comprehensive income for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, (iii) the Consolidated balance
sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, (iv) the Consolidated
statements of changes in stockholders’ equity for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, (v) the Consolidated
statements of cash flows for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018, and (vi) the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements.(b)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
41
Part IV
page 42 not used
42
Table of contents
Financial:
44Five-Year Summary of Consolidated Financial
Highlights Audited financial statements:
45Five-Year Stock Performance 158Management’s Report on Internal Control Over
Financial Reporting
Management’s discussion and analysis:159Report of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm
46Introduction 162Consolidated Financial Statements
47Executive Overview 167Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
54Consolidated Results of Operations
57Consolidated Balance Sheets and Cash Flows
Analysis
60Off–Balance Sheet Arrangements and Contractual
Cash Obligations
62Explanation and Reconciliation of the Firm’s Use
of Non-GAAP Financial Measures Supplementary information:
65Business Segment Results 299Selected quarterly financial data (unaudited)
85Firmwide Risk Management 300Distribution of assets, liabilities and stockholders’
equity; interest rates and interest differentials
90Strategic Risk Management 305Glossary of Terms and Acronyms
91Capital Risk Management
102Liquidity Risk Management
110Credit and Investment Risk Management
135Market Risk Management
143Country Risk Management
145Operational Risk Management
152Critical Accounting Estimates Used by the Firm
156Accounting and Reporting Developments
157Forward-Looking Statements
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 43
Financial
FIVE-YEAR SUMMAR Y OF CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL HIGHLIGHTS (unaudited)
As of or for the year ended December 31,
(in millions, except per share, ratio, headcount data and where otherwise
noted) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Selected income statement data
Total net revenue $ 119,543 $ 115,399 $ 108,783 $ 100,460 $ 96,275 
Total noninterest expense 66,656 65,269 63,148 59,270 56,378 
Pre-provision profit 52,887 50,130 45,635 41,190 39,897 
Provision for credit losses 17,480 5,585 4,871 5,290 5,361 
Income before income tax expense 35,407 44,545 40,764 35,900 34,536 
Income tax expense 6,276 8,114 8,290 11,459 9,803 
Net income $ 29,131 $ 36,431 $ 32,474 $ 24,441 $ 24,733 
Earnings per share data
Net income: Basic $ 8.89 $ 10.75 $ 9.04 $ 6.35 $ 6.24 
              Diluted 8.88 10.72 9.00 6.31 6.19 
Average shares: Basic 3,082.4 3,221.5 3,396.4 3,551.6 3,658.8 
              Diluted 3,087.4 3,230.4 3,414.0 3,576.8 3,690.0 
Market and per common share data
Market capitalization $ 387,492 $ 429,913 $ 319,780 $ 366,301 $ 307,295 
Common shares at period-end 3,049.4 3,084.0 3,275.8 3,425.3 3,561.2 
Book value per share 81.75 75.98 70.35 67.04 64.06 
Tangible book value per share (“TBVPS”) 66.11 60.98 56.33 53.56 51.44 
Cash dividends declared per share 3.60 3.40 2.72 2.12 1.88 
Selected ratios and metrics
Return on common equity (“ROE”) 12 % 15 % 13 % 10 % 10 %
Return on tangible common equity (“ROTCE”) 14 19 17 12 13 
Return on assets (“ROA”) 0.91 1.33 1.24 0.96 1.00 
Overhead ratio 56 57 58 59 59 
Loans-to-deposits ratio 47 64 69 66 67 
Firm Liquidity coverage ratio (“LCR”) (average) 110 116 113 119 NA
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. LCR (average) 160 116 111 108 NA
Common equity tier 1 (“CET1”) capital ratio 13.1 12.4 12.0 12.2 12.3 
Tier 1 capital ratio 15.0 14.1 13.7 13.9 14.0 
Total capital ratio 17.3 16.0 15.5 15.9 15.5 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 7.0 7.9 8.1 8.3 8.4 
Supplementary leverage ratio (“SLR”) 6.9 % 6.3 % 6.4 % 6.5 % 6.5 %
Selected balance sheet data (period-end)
Trading assets $ 503,126 $ 369,687 $ 378,551 $ 349,053 $ 342,436 
Investment securities, net of allowance for credit losses 589,999 398,239 261,828 249,958 289,059 
Loans 1,012,853 997,620 1,015,760 959,429 922,831 
Total assets 3,386,071 2,687,379 2,622,532 2,533,600 2,490,972 
Deposits 2,144,257 1,562,431 1,470,666 1,443,982 1,375,179 
Long-term debt 281,685 291,498 282,031 284,080 295,245 
Common stockholders’ equity 249,291 234,337 230,447 229,625 228,122 
Total stockholders’ equity 279,354 261,330 256,515 255,693 254,190 
Headcount 255,351 256,981 256,105 252,539 243,355 
Credit quality metrics
Allowances for loan losses and lending-related commitments $ 30,737 $ 14,314 $ 14,500 $ 14,672 $ 14,854 
Allowance for loan losses to total retained loans 2.95 % 1.39 % 1.39 % 1.47 % 1.55 %
Nonperforming assets $ 10,906 $ 5,054 $ 5,901 $ 7,119 $ 7,754 
Net charge-offs 5,259 5,629 4,856 5,387 4,692 
Net charge-off rate 0.55 % 0.60 % 0.52 % 0.60 % 0.54 %
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the Financial Instruments – Credit Losses (“CECL”) accounting guidance. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
(a)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a reduction of card
income, with no effect on net income. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)Pre-provision profit, TBVPS and ROTCE are each non-GAAP financial measures. Tangible common equity (“TCE”) is also a non-GAAP financial
measure. Refer to Explanation and Reconciliation of the Firm’s Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures on pages 62–64 for a further discussion of these
measures.
(c)Quarterly ratios are based upon annualized amounts.
(d)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other assets.
Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(e)For the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, 2018 and 2017, the percentage represents average LCR for the three months ended December 31,
2020, 2019, 2018 and 2017. The U.S. LCR public disclosure requirements for the Firm became effective in 2017. Refer to Liquidity Risk Management on
pages 102–108 for additional information on the LCR results.
(f)As of December 31, 2020, the capital metrics reflect the relief provided by the Federal Reserve Board in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, including
the CECL capital transition provisions that became effective in the first quarter of 2020. As of December 31, 2020, the SLR reflects the temporary
exclusions of U.S. Treasury securities and deposits at Federal Reserve Banks that became effective in the second quarter of 2020. Refer to Regulatory
Developments Relating to the COVID-19 Pandemic on pages 52-53 and Capital Risk Management on pages 91-101 for additional information.
(g)The Basel III capital rules became fully phased-in effective January 1, 2019, and for the SLR became fully phased-in effective January 1, 2018. Prior to
these dates, the required capital metrics were subject to the transitional rules. As of December 31, 2018, the risk-based capital metrics were the same on
a fully phased-in and transitional basis. Refer to Capital Risk Management on pages 91-101 for additional information on these capital metrics.
(h)In December 2017, the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (“TCJA”) was signed into law. The Firm’s results for the year ended December 31, 2017 included a $2.4
billion decrease to net income as a result of the enactment of the TCJA.
(i)Excluding net charge-offs of $467 million related to the student loan portfolio sale, the net charge-off rate for the year ended December 31, 2017 would
have been 0.55%.(a)
(a)
(b)
(h)
(b)
(c)
(b)(c)
(b)
(d)
(e)
(e)
(f)(g)
(f)(g)
(f)(g)
(f)(g)
(f)(g)
(d)
(d)
(d)
(i)
44 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
FIVE-YEAR ST OCK PERFORMANCE
The following table and graph compare the five-year cumulative total return for JPMorgan Chase & Co. (“JPMorgan
Chase” or the “Firm”) common stock with the cumulative return of the S&P 500 Index, the KBW Bank Index and the
S&P Financials Index. The S&P 500 Index is a commonly referenced equity benchmark in the United States of America
(“U.S.”), consisting of leading companies from different economic sectors. The KBW Bank Index seeks to reflect the
performance of banks and thrifts that are publicly traded in the U.S. and is composed of leading national money center
and regional banks and thrifts. The S&P Financials Index is an index of financial companies, all of which are
components of the S&P 500. The Firm is a component of all three industry indices.
The following table and graph assume simultaneous investments of $100 on December 31, 2015, in JPMorgan Chase
common stock and in each of the above indices. The comparison assumes that all dividends were reinvested.
December 31,
 (in dollars) 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020
JPMorgan Chase $100.00 $134.57 $170.54 $159.20 $234.46 $221.52 
KBW Bank Index 100.00 128.51 152.41 125.42 170.72 153.12 
S&P Financials Index 100.00 122.75 149.92 130.37 172.21 169.19 
S&P 500 Index 100.00 111.95 136.38 130.39 171.44 202.96 
December 31,
(in dollars)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 45
Management’ s discussion and analysis
The following is Management’s discussion and analysis of the financial condition and results of operations (“MD&A”) of
JPMorgan Chase for the year ended December 31, 2020. The MD&A is included in both JPMorgan Chase’s Annual
Report for the year ended December 31, 2020 (“Annual Report”) and its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2020 (“2020 Form 10-K”) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”). Refer to
the Glossary of terms and acronyms on pages 305-311 for definitions of terms and acronyms used throughout the
Annual Report and the 2020 Form 10-K.
The MD&A contains statements that are forward-looking within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform
Act of 1995. These statements are based on the current beliefs and expectations of JPMorgan Chase’s management
and are subject to significant risks and uncertainties. Refer to Forward-looking Statements on page 157) and Part 1,
Item 1A: Risk factors in the 2020 Form 10-K on pages 8-32 for a discussion of certain of those risks and uncertainties
and the factors that could cause JPMorgan Chase’s actual results to differ materially because of those risks and
uncertainties.
INTRODUCTION
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (NYSE: JPM), a financial
holding company incorporated under Delaware law in
1968, is a leading financial services firm based in the
United States of America (“U.S.”), and has operations
worldwide; JPMorgan Chase had $3.4 trillion in assets
and $279.4 billion in stockholders’ equity as of
December 31, 2020. The Firm is a leader in investment
banking, financial services for consumers and small
businesses, commercial banking, financial transaction
processing and asset management. Under the J.P.
Morgan and Chase brands, the Firm serves millions of
customers in the U.S. and globally many of the world’s
most prominent corporate, institutional and government
clients.
JPMorgan Chase’s principal bank subsidiary is
JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association
(“JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.”), a national banking
association with U.S. branches in 38 states and
Washington, D.C. as of December 31, 2020. JPMorgan
Chase’s principal nonbank subsidiary is J.P. Morgan
Securities LLC (“J.P. Morgan Securities”), a U.S. broker-
dealer. The bank and non-bank subsidiaries of
JPMorgan Chase operate nationally as well as through
overseas branches and subsidiaries, representative
offices and subsidiary foreign banks. The Firm’s
principal operating subsidiary outside the U.S. is J.P.
Morgan Securities plc, a U.K.-based subsidiary of
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.For management reporting purposes, the Firm’s
activities are organized into four major reportable
business segments, as well as a Corporate segment.
The Firm’s consumer business is the Consumer &
Community Banking (“CCB”) segment. The Firm’s
wholesale business segments are the Corporate &
Investment Bank (“CIB”), Commercial Banking (“CB”),
and Asset & Wealth Management (“AWM”). Refer to
Business Segment Results on pages 65–84, and Note
32 for a description of the Firm’s business segments,
and the products and services they provide to their
respective client bases.
 
46 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
EXECUTIVE OVER VIEW
This executive overview of the MD&A highlights
selected information and does not contain all of the
information that is important to readers of this 2020
Form 10-K. For a complete description of the trends and
uncertainties, as well as the risks and critical accounting
estimates, affecting the Firm and its various LOBs, this
2020 Form 10-K should be read in its entirety.
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL
accounting guidance. Refer to Note 1 for further
information.
Financial performance of JPMorgan
Chase
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions, except per
share data and ratios) 2020 2019 Change
Selected income
statement data
Total net revenue $119,543 $115,399 4 %
Total noninterest
expense 66,656 65,269 2 
Pre-provision profit 52,887 50,130 5 
Provision for credit losses 17,480 5,585 213 
Net income 29,131 36,431 (20)
Diluted earnings per
share 8.88 10.72 (17)
Selected ratios and
metrics
Return on common equity 12 % 15 %
Return on tangible
common equity 14 19 
Book value per share $ 81.75 $ 75.98 8 
Tangible book value per
share 66.11 60.98 8 
Capital ratios
CET1 13.1 % 12.4 %
Tier 1 capital 15.0 14.1 
Total capital 17.3 16.0 
(a)    In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain
spend-based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to
be a reduction of card income, with no effect on net income. Prior-
period amounts have been revised to conform with the current
presentation.
(b)    As of December 31, 2020, the capital metrics reflect the relief
provided by the Federal Reserve Board in response to the COVID-
19 pandemic, including the CECL capital transition provisions that
became effective in the first quarter of 2020. Refer to Regulatory
Developments relating to the COVID-19 Pandemic on pages 52-53
and Capital Risk Management on pages 91-101 for additional
information.
Comparisons noted in the sections below are for the full
year of 2020 versus the full year of 2019, unless
otherwise specified.
Firmwide overview
JPMorgan Chase reported net income of $29.1 billion
for 2020, or $8.88 per share, on net revenue of $119.5
billion. The Firm reported ROE of 12% and ROTCE of
14%. The Firm's results for 2020 included net additions
to the allowance for credit losses of $12.2 billion and
Firmwide legal expense of $1.1 billion.
•The Firm had net income of $29.1 billion, down 20%.
•Total net revenue was up 4%. Noninterest revenue
was $65.0 billion, up 12%, driven by higher CIB
Markets revenue, Investment Banking fees and net
production revenue in Home Lending. Net interest
income was $54.6 billion, down 5%, driven by the
impact of lower rates,predominantly offset by higher net interest income in
CIB Markets as well as balance sheet growth.
•Noninterest expense was $66.7 billion, up 2%, driven
by higher volume- and revenue-related expense, legal
expense and continued investments in the
businesses, partially offset by lower structural
expense.
•The provision for credit losses was $17.5 billion, up
$11.9 billion from the prior year, driven by net
additions to the allowance for credit losses of $12.2
billion due to the deterioration and increased
uncertainty in the macroeconomic environment as a
result of the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic.
•The total allowance for credit losses was $30.8 billion
at December 31, 2020. The Firm had an allowance for
loan losses to retained loans coverage ratio of 2.95%,
compared with 1.39% in the prior year; the increase
from the prior year was driven by the additions to the
allowance for credit losses and the adoption of CECL.
•The Firm’s nonperforming assets totaled $10.9 billion
at December 31, 2020, an increase of $5.9 billion from
the prior year, primarily reflecting client credit
deterioration across multiple industries in the
wholesale portfolio; and in the consumer portfolio,
loans placed on nonaccrual status related to the
impact of the COVID-19 pandemic, as well as the
adoption of CECL, as the purchased credit
deteriorated loans in the mortgage portfolio became
subject to nonaccrual loan treatment. In the fourth
quarter of 2020, nonperforming assets decreased
$556 million from the prior quarter, reflecting some
credit improvement in the wholesale portfolio. The
consumer portfolio remained relatively flat, as the
increase in loans placed on nonaccrual status in
Home Lending related to the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic was predominantly offset by lower loans at
fair value in CIB, largely due to sales.
•Firmwide average loans of $1.0 trillion were up 1%,
driven by higher loan balances in AWM and CIB, as
well as loans originated under the Small Business
Administration’s (“SBA”) Paycheck Protection
Program (“PPP”), predominantly offset by lower loan
balances in Home Lending and Card.
•Firmwide average deposits of $1.9 trillion were up
25%, reflecting significant inflows across the Firm,
primarily driven by the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic and the related effect of certain government
actions.
•As of December 31, 2020, the Firm had average
eligible High Quality Liquid Assets (“HQLA”) of
approximately $697 billion and unencumbered
marketable securities with a fair value of
approximately $740 billion, resulting in approximately
$1.4 trillion of liquidity sources. Refer to Liquidity Risk
Management on pages 102–108 for additional
information.
 (a)
(a)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 47
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Selected capital-related metrics
•The Firm’s CET1 capital was $205 billion, and the
Standardized and Advanced CET1 ratios were 13.1%
and 13.8%, respectively.
•The Firm’s SLR was 6.9%. The SLR reflects the
temporary exclusions of U.S. Treasury securities and
deposits at Federal Reserve Banks, as required by
the Federal Reserve’s interim final rule issued on April
1, 2020. The Firm’s SLR excluding the temporary
relief was 5.8%.
•The Firm grew TBVPS, ending 2020 at $66.11, up 8%
versus the prior year.
Pre-provision profit, ROTCE and TBVPS are non-GAAP
financial measures. Refer to Explanation and
Reconciliation of the Firm’s Use of Non-GAAP Financial
Measures on pages 62–64, and Capital Risk
Management on pages 91-101 for a further discussion
of each of these measures.
Business segment highlights
Selected business metrics for each of the Firm’s four
LOBs are presented below for the full year of 2020.
CCB
 ROE
 15%•Average deposits up 22%; client
investment assets up 17%
•Average loans down 6%; debit and credit
card sales volume down 3%
•Active mobile customers up 10%
CIB
ROE
 20%•$9.5 billion of Global Investment Banking
fees, up 25%
•#1 ranking for Global Investment Banking
fees with 9.2% wallet share for the year
•Total Markets revenue of $29.5 billion, up
41%, with Fixed Income Markets up 45%
and Equity Markets up 33%
CB
 ROE
 11%•Gross Investment Banking revenue of $3.3
billion, up 22%
•Average deposits up 38%; average loans
up 5%
AWM
 ROE
 28%•Assets under management (AUM) of $2.7
trillion, up 17%
•Average deposits up 20%; average loans
up 13%
Refer to the Business Segment Results on pages 65–66
for a detailed discussion of results by business segment.Credit provided and capital raised
JPMorgan Chase continues to support consumers,
businesses and communities around the globe. The
Firm provided new and renewed credit and raised
capital for wholesale and consumer clients during 2020,
consisting of:
$2.3 trillionTotal credit provided and capital
raised (including loans and
commitments)
$226
billionCredit for consumers
$18
billionCredit for U.S. small businesses
$865
billionCredit for corporations
$1.1 trillionCapital raised for corporate clients
and non-U.S. government entities
$103
billionCredit and capital raised for nonprofit
and U.S. government entities
$28 billionLoans under the Small Business
Administration’s Paycheck Protection
Program
(a)Excludes loans under the SBA’s PPP.
(b)Includes states, municipalities, hospitals and universities.(a)
(b)
48 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Recent events
•On January 27, 2021, JPMorgan Chase announced
that it will launch a digital retail bank in the U.K. this
year, and on February 23, 2021, JPMorgan Chase
announced that it will appoint Sanoke Viswanathan,
head of International Consumer, to the Operating
Committee.
•On December 31, 2020, JPMorgan Chase acquired
the Global Loyalty business (“cxLoyalty”) of cxLoyalty
Group Holdings, Inc. This includes cxLoyalty’s
technology platforms, full-service travel agency, and
gift card and merchandise services.
•On December 31, 2020, JPMorgan Chase acquired
55ip, a financial technology company and leading
provider of automated tax-smart investment
strategies.
•On December 18, 2020, JPMorgan Chase received
the results of the 2020 Comprehensive Capital
Analysis and Review (“CCAR”) Round 2 stress test
from the Federal Reserve. The Firm’s Stress Capital
Buffer (“SCB”) requirement remained at 3.3%. The
Federal Reserve also announced that all large banks,
including the Firm, could resume share repurchases
commencing in the first quarter of 2021, subject to
certain restrictions. The Firm's Board of Directors has
authorized a new common share repurchase program
for up to $30 billion. The Firm expects to repurchase
up to $4.5 billion of common stock in the first quarter
of 2021 and, subject to approval by the Board of
Directors, maintain the quarterly common stock
dividend of $0.90 per share.
•On December 18, 2020, JPMorgan Chase announced
the retirement of Lee Raymond, the Firm’s Lead
Independent Director. Stephen B. Burke has
succeeded Mr. Raymond as Lead Independent
Director effective January 1, 2021.
•On December 7, 2020, Phebe N. Novakovic became
a member of the Firm's Board of Directors. Ms.
Novakovic is Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of
General Dynamics Corporation.2021 outlook
These current expectations are forward-looking
statements within the meaning of the Private Securities
Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward-looking
statements are based on the current beliefs and
expectations of JPMorgan Chase’s management and
are subject to significant risks and uncertainties. Refer
to Forward-Looking Statements on page 157, and the
Risk Factors section on pages 8-32 of the Firm’s 2020
Form 10-K, for a further discussion of certain of those
risks and uncertainties and the other factors that could
cause JPMorgan Chase’s actual results to differ
materially because of those risks and uncertainties.
There is no assurance that actual results in 2021 will be
in line with the outlook set forth below, and the Firm
does not undertake to update any forward-looking
statements.
JPMorgan Chase’s current outlook for 2021 should be
viewed against the backdrop of the global and U.S.
economies, the COVID-19 pandemic, financial markets
activity, the geopolitical environment, the competitive
environment, client and customer activity levels, and
regulatory and legislative developments in the U.S. and
other countries where the Firm does business. Each of
these factors will affect the performance of the Firm and
its LOBs. The Firm will continue to make appropriate
adjustments to its businesses and operations in
response to ongoing developments in the business,
economic, regulatory and legal environments in which it
operates. The outlook information contained in this Form
10-K supersedes all outlook information included in the
Firm’s periodic reports furnished or filed with the SEC
prior to the date of this Form 10-K.
Full-year 2021
•Management expects net interest income, on a
managed basis, to be approximately $55 billion,
market dependent.
•Management expects adjusted expense to be
approximately $69 billion, which includes accelerated
contributions to the Firm’s Foundation in the form of
equity investments, as well as higher revenue-related
expense.
First-quarter 2021
•Management expects net interest income, on a
managed basis, to be approximately $13 billion,
market dependent.
•Investment banking fees are expected to be flat when
compared with the fourth quarter of 2020, depending
on market conditions.
Fourth-quarter 2021
•Management expects net interest income, on a
managed basis, to be in excess of $14 billion, market
dependent.
Net interest income, on a managed basis, and adjusted
expense are non-GAAP financial measures. Refer to
Explanation and Reconciliation of the Firm’s Use of
Non-GAAP Financial Measures on pages 62-64.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 49
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Business Developments
COVID-19 Pandemic
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic the Firm
invoked resiliency plans to allow its businesses to
remain operational, utilizing disaster recovery sites and
implementing alternative work arrangements globally.
Additionally, the Firm implemented strategies and
procedures designed to help it respond to increased
market volatility, client demand for credit and liquidity,
distress in certain industries and the ongoing impacts to
consumers and businesses.
Throughout 2020, the Firm remained focused on serving
its clients, customers and communities, as well as the
well-being of its employees, during the pandemic. The
Firm continues to actively monitor the health and safety
situations at local and regional levels, and will continue
to adapt as these situations evolve.
Supporting clients and customers
The Firm has supported its clients and customers during
the challenging conditions caused by the COVID-19
pandemic by providing assistance, primarily in the form
of payment deferrals on loans and extending credit,
including through its participation in the Small Business
Association’s (“SBA”) PPP.
Refer to Credit Portfolio on page 112 for information on
assistance granted to customers and clients. Refer to
Consumer Credit portfolio on page 116 and Wholesale
Credit Portfolio on page 122 for information on retained
loans under payment deferral.
The Firm has gradually re-opened its branches since
April 2020, with nearly 90% of its branches returning to
full service as of December 31, 2020. Additionally, the
Firm continues to provide a wide range of banking
services that are accessible to clients and customers
through mobile and other digital channels.
Protecting and supporting employees
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the Firm
implemented alternative work arrangements, with the
vast majority of its global workforce working from home
since the onset of the pandemic and continuing into the
first quarter of 2021. The Firm also provided additional
benefits to employees during the COVID-19 pandemic.
Supporting communities
Since March, the Firm has committed $250 million to
help address humanitarian needs and long-term
economic challenges posed by the COVID-19 pandemic
on the communities in which the Firm operates. As of
December 31, 2020, over 75% of this commitment has
been funded.Departure of the U.K. from the EU
The U.K.’s departure from the EU, which is commonly
referred to as “Brexit,” was completed on December 31,
2020. The U.K. and the EU have entered into a Trade
and Cooperation Agreement which delineates many
significant aspects of the future relationship between the
U.K. and the EU. However, the agreement contained
very limited provisions relating to cross-border financial
services, and the U.K. and the EU are expected to
engage in further negotiations concerning financial
services.
The Firm has executed and continues to execute on its
Firmwide Brexit Implementation program, which
encompasses a strategic implementation plan across all
impacted businesses and functions, including an
ongoing assessment of political, legal and regulatory
and other implementation risks. A key focus of the
program has been to ensure continuity of service to the
Firm’s EU clients in the following areas: regulatory and
legal entities; clients; and business and operations.
Regulatory and legal entities
The Firm’s legal entities in Germany, Luxembourg and
Ireland are now licensed to provide and are providing
services to the Firm’s EU clients, including through a
branch network covering locations such as Paris, Madrid
and Milan. Subject to limited exceptions, the Firm’s
U.K.-based legal entities are no longer permitted to
transact business from the U.K. with EU clients.
Clients
Agreements covering substantially all of the Firm’s EU
client activity have been re-documented to EU legal
entities to facilitate continuation of service. The Firm
continues to actively engage with those clients that have
not completed re-documentation or required operational
changes.
Business and operations
The COVID-19 pandemic introduced additional risk to
the Firm’s Brexit Implementation program, particularly in
relation to staff relocations. As a result, the Firm has
worked closely with regulators and employees to ensure
that critical staff are relocated in a safe and timely
manner so that the Firm can meet its regulatory
commitments and continue serving its clients. Further
relocations are planned for 2021, and the Firm’s longer-
term EU staffing strategy will be developed over time in
cooperation with its regulators and as the post-Brexit
market landscape evolves in order to ensure that the
Firm maintains operational resilience and effective client
coverage.
 
50 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Interbank Offered Rate (“IBOR”) transition
JPMorgan Chase and other market participants continue
to make progress in preparing for the discontinuation of
the London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”) and other
IBORs to comply with the International Organization of
Securities Commission’s standards for transaction-
based benchmark rates.
On November 30, 2020, ICE Benchmark Administration,
the administrator of LIBOR, announced a public
consultation on its proposal to cease the publication of
the principal tenors of U.S. dollar LIBOR (i.e., overnight,
one-month, three-month, six-month and 12-month
LIBOR) immediately following a final publication on June
30, 2023. The Federal Reserve, the OCC and the FDIC
also released guidance encouraging market participants
to cease dealing in new U.S. dollar LIBOR contracts
from the end of 2021. There has been no change in the
scheduled cessation of U.K. sterling, Japanese yen,
Swiss franc and Euro LIBOR, or the remaining tenors of
U.S. dollar LIBOR, from December 31, 2021.
The Firm continues to work towards reducing its
exposure to IBOR-referencing contracts, including
derivatives, bilateral and syndicated loans, securities,
and debt and preferred stock issuances, to meet the
industry milestones and recommendations published by
National Working Groups (“NWG”), including the
Alternative Reference Rates Committee (the “ARRC”) in
the U.S.
On October 23, 2020, the International Swaps and
Derivatives Association, Inc. (“ISDA”) published a new
supplement to the ISDA 2006 definitions and the related
2020 IBOR Fallbacks Protocol (the “Protocol”). These
publications are intended to facilitate the incorporation of
robust rate fallback provisions into both legacy and new
derivative contracts with effect from January 25, 2021.
The Firm’s client-facing legal entities have agreed to
adhere to the Protocol, in accordance with
recommendations from multiple industry working
groups, including the ARRC. ISDA further announced
that bilateral templates have been made available for
use with counterparties who choose not to adhere to the
Protocol.
As a key objective of the ARRC’s transition plan to
encourage adoption of the Secured Overnight Financing
Rate (“SOFR”), counterparty clearing houses, clearing
house members and other impacted market participants
successfully executed the discounting and price
alignment interest (“PAI”) switch from federal funds to
SOFR on October 16, 2020. The industry completed a
similar switch from EONIA to €STR on July 27, 2020.
On March 12, 2020 and January 7, 2021, the Financial
Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) issued
accounting standards updates providing optional
expedients and exceptions for applying generally
accepted accounting principles to contracts and hedge
accounting relationships affected by reference rate
reform. These optional expedients are intended to
simplify the operational impact of applying U.S. GAAP to
transactions impacted by reference rate reform. The
Firm elected to apply certain of these expedients
beginning in the third quarter of 2020. OnAugust 27, 2020, the International Accounting
Standards Board (“IASB”) issued guidance that provides
similar relief for entities reporting under International
Financial Reporting Standards ("IFRS"). Refer to
Accounting and Reporting Developments on page 156
for additional information. The Firm continues to monitor
the transition relief being considered by the U.S.
Treasury Department regarding the tax implications of
reference rate reform.
The Firm’s initiatives in connection with LIBOR transition
include:
•continuing to reduce its overall exposure to LIBOR
•implementing rate fallback provisions developed by
NWGs in new LIBOR contracts, where appropriate
•continuing to educate and inform clients on LIBOR
transition and the necessity to prepare for the
cessation of LIBOR
•assisting clients with discontinuing their issuance or
use of LIBOR-linked products within the timelines
specified by NWGs
•supporting clients in their efforts to remediate
contracts linked to LIBOR, including contracts to
which the Firm is a party, which it manages or for
which it acts as agent
•offering products linked to alternative reference rates
(“ARRs”) across its businesses, and
•planning for the implementation of rate fallback
mechanisms across products based on the
conventions recommended by NWGs to prepare for
transition to ARRs upon the cessation of various
IBORs.
The Firm is on schedule to implement necessary
changes to operational and risk management systems in
order to transition away from IBORs, including by aiming
to meet proposed deadlines set by NWGs for the
cessation of new contracts referencing these
benchmarks. The Firm continues to engage with and
remains committed to NWGs in devising solutions to
unresolved issues relating to IBOR transition.
The Firm continues to engage with market participants,
NWGs and regulators to address market-wide
challenges associated with LIBOR transition, including
efforts to:
•improve liquidity in ARRs
•develop and introduce forward-looking term rates
linked to ARRs, and
•support legislative proposals in the U.S., the U.K. and
the EU that aim to resolve concerns involving “tough
legacy” contracts (i.e. contracts that do not provide for
automatic conversion to another rate or that are
difficult to amend in order to add rate fallback
provisions).
Resolution of these challenges should provide more
certainty and help to provide a framework for market
participants in transitioning away from IBORs.
 
 
 
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 51
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Regulatory Developments Relating to the
COVID-19 Pandemic
Since March 2020, the U.S. government as well as
central banks and banking authorities around the world
have taken and continue to take actions to help
individuals, households and businesses that have been
adversely affected by the economic disruption caused
by the COVID-19 pandemic. The CARES Act and the
Consolidated Appropriations Act, which were signed into
law on March 27, 2020 and December 27, 2020,
respectively, provide, among other things, funding to
support loan facilities to assist consumers and
businesses. Set forth below is a summary as of the date
of this Form 10-K of U.S. government actions currently
impacting the Firm and U.S. government programs in
which the Firm is participating. The Firm will continue to
assess ongoing developments in government actions in
response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
U.S. government actions
Eligible retained income definition. On March 17, 2020,
the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (“OCC”),
the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System
(“Federal Reserve”), and the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation (“FDIC”), collectively the “federal banking
agencies,” issued an interim final rule (issued as final on
August 26, 2020) that revised the definition of “eligible
retained income” in the regulatory capital rules that
apply to all U.S. banking organizations. On March 23,
2020, the Federal Reserve issued an interim final rule
(issued as final on August 26, 2020) that revised the
definition of “eligible retained income” for purposes of
the total loss-absorbing capacity (“TLAC”) buffer
requirements that apply to global systemically important
banking organizations. The revised definition of eligible
retained income makes any automatic limitations on
payout distributions that could apply under the agencies’
capital rules or TLAC rule take effect on a more
graduated basis in the event that a banking
organization’s capital, leverage and TLAC ratios were to
decline below regulatory requirements (including
buffers). The March 17, 2020 interim final rule was
issued, in conjunction with an interagency statement
encouraging banking organizations to use their capital
and liquidity buffers, to further support banking
organizations’ abilities to lend to households and
businesses affected by the COVID-19 pandemic.
Reserve requirements. On March 24, 2020, the Federal
Reserve issued an interim final rule (issued as final on
December 22, 2020) reducing reserve requirement
ratios for all depository institutions to zero percent,
effective March 26, 2020, an action intended to free up
liquidity in the banking system to support lending to
households and businesses.
Refer to Note 26 for additional information on the
reduction to the reserve requirement.Regulatory Capital - Current Expected Credit Losses
(“CECL”) transition delay. On March 31, 2020, the
federal banking agencies issued an interim final rule
(issued as final on August 26, 2020) that provided
banking organizations with the option to delay the
effects of CECL on regulatory capital for two years,
followed by a three-year transition period (“CECL capital
transition provisions”). The Firm elected to apply the
CECL capital transition provisions.
Supplementary leverage ratio (“SLR”) temporary
revision. On April 1, 2020, the Federal Reserve issued
an interim final rule that requires, on a temporary basis,
the calculation of total leverage exposure for purposes
of calculating the SLR for bank holding companies
(“BHC”), to exclude the on-balance sheet amounts of
U.S. Treasury securities and deposits at Federal
Reserve Banks. These exclusions became effective
April 1, 2020, and will remain in effect through March 31,
2021.
Refer to Capital Risk Management on pages 91-101 and
Note 27 for additional information on the CECL capital
transition provisions, the impact to the Firm’s capital
metrics and the Firm’s SLR.
Loan modifications. On April 7, 2020, the federal
banking agencies along with the National Credit Union
Administration, and the Consumer Financial Protection
Bureau, in consultation with the state financial
regulators, issued an interagency statement revising a
March 22, 2020 interagency statement on loan
modifications and the reporting for financial institutions
working with customers affected by the COVID-19
pandemic (the “IA Statement”). The IA Statement
reconfirmed that efforts to work with borrowers where
the loans are prudently underwritten, and not considered
past due or carried on nonaccrual status, should not
result in the loans automatically being considered
modified in a troubled debt restructuring (“TDR”) for
accounting and financial reporting purposes, or for
purposes of their respective risk-based capital rules,
which would otherwise require financial institutions
subject to the capital rules to hold more capital. The IA
Statement also clarified the interaction between its
previous guidance and Section 4013 of the CARES Act,
as extended by Section 541 of the Consolidated
Appropriations Act, which provides certain financial
institutions with the option to suspend the application of
accounting guidance for TDRs for a limited period of
time for loan modifications made to address the effects
of the COVID-19 pandemic.
The Firm has granted various forms of assistance to
customers and clients impacted by the COVID-19
pandemic, including payment deferrals and covenant
modifications. The majority of the Firm’s COVID-19
related loan modifications have not been considered
TDRs because:
•they represent short-term or other insignificant
modifications, whether under the Firm’s regular loan
modification assessments or the IA Statement
guidance, or
•the Firm has elected to apply the option to suspend the
application of accounting guidance for TDRs as
provided by
52 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
the CARES Act and extended by the Consolidated
Appropriations Act.
To the extent that certain modifications do not meet any
of the above criteria, the Firm accounts for them as
TDRs. Refer to Credit Portfolio on pages 112-113 and
Note 12 for additional information on the Firm’s loan
modification activities.
PPP. Beginning April 3, 2020, the PPP, established by
the CARES Act and administered by the SBA,
authorized eligible lenders to provide nonrecourse loans
to eligible borrowers until August 8, 2020 to provide an
incentive for these businesses to keep their workers on
their payroll. As part of the Consolidated Appropriations
Act, additional funding was provided for new PPP loans
beginning in early January 2021. This program was
designed to target smaller businesses as well as to
simplify the loan forgiveness process for loans under
$150,000. As of February 19, 2021, the Firm has funded
approximately $5 billion under this extension of the
program.
U.S. government facilities. Beginning in March 2020, the
Federal Reserve announced a suite of facilities using its
emergency lending powers under section 13(3) of the
Federal Reserve Act to support the flow of credit to
individuals, households and businesses adversely
affected by the COVID-19 pandemic and to support the
broader economy.
The Firm has participated and is participating in the PPP
and certain of the other government facilities and
programs, as needed, to assist its clients and customers
or to support the broader economy. Refer to Capital Risk
Management on pages 91-101, Liquidity Risk
Management on pages 102–108, Credit Portfolio on
pages 112-113, Note 12 and Note 27 for additional
information on the Firm’s participation in the PPP and
other government facilities and programs.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 53
Management’ s discussion and analysis
CONSOLIDA TED RESUL TS OF OPERA TIONS
This section provides a comparative discussion of
JPMorgan Chase’s Consolidated Results of Operations
on a reported basis for the two-year period ended
December 31, 2020, unless otherwise specified. Refer
to Consolidated Results of Operations on pages 48-51
of the Firm’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2019 (the “2019 Form 10-K”) for a
discussion of the 2019 versus 2018 results. Factors that
relate primarily to a single business segment are
discussed in more detail within that business segment’s
results. Refer to pages 152-155 for a discussion of the
Critical Accounting Estimates Used by the Firm that
affect the Consolidated Results of Operations.
Revenue
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Investment banking fees $ 9,486  $ 7,501 $ 7,550 
Principal transactions 18,021  14,018 12,059 
Lending- and deposit-related
fees 6,511  6,626 6,377 
Asset management,
administration and
commissions 18,177  16,908 16,793 
Investment securities
gains/(losses) 802 258 (395)
Mortgage fees and related
income 3,091  2,036 1,254 
Card income 4,435  5,076 4,743 
Other income 4,457  5,731 5,343 
Noninterest revenue 64,980  58,154 53,724 
Net interest income 54,563  57,245 55,059 
Total net revenue $119,543  $115,399 $108,783 
(a)In the first quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fees from asset
management, administration and commissions to lending- and deposit-
related fees. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with
the current presentation.
(b)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-
based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a
reduction of card income, with no ef fect on net income. Prior-period
amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(c)Included operating lease income of $5.5 billion for each of the years
ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, and $4.5 billion for the year
ended December 31, 2018.
2020 compared with 2019
Investment banking fees increased, driven by CIB,
reflecting:
•higher equity underwriting fees predominantly in
follow-on offerings and convertible securities markets
due to increased industry-wide fees
•higher debt underwriting fees in investment-grade and
high-yield bonds driven by increased industry-wide
fees and wallet share gains. The increased activity
resulted in part from clients seeking liquidity in the first
half of the year as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic.
Refer to CIB segment results on pages 71–76 and Note
6 for additional information.Principal transactions revenue increased,
predominantly in CIB, reflecting higher revenue in Fixed
Income Markets, driven by strong performance in
Currencies & Emerging Markets, Rates, and Credit.
The increase in principal transactions revenue also
reflected higher net valuations on several legacy equity
investments in Corporate, compared with net losses in
the prior year.
Principal transactions revenue in CIB may in certain
cases have offsets across other revenue lines, including
net interest income. The Firm assesses the performance
of its CIB Markets business on a total revenue basis.
Refer to CIB and Corporate segment results on pages
71–76 and pages 83–84, respectively, and Note 6 for
additional information.
Lending- and deposit-related fees decreased as a
result of lower deposit-related fees in CCB, reflecting
lower transaction activity and the impact of fee refunds
related to the COVID-19 pandemic, predominantly offset
by higher cash management fees in CIB and CB, as well
as higher lending-related fees, particularly loan
commitment fees in CIB.
Refer to CCB, CIB and CB segment results on pages
67–70, pages 71–76 and pages 77–79, respectively,
and Note 6 for additional information.
Asset management, administration and
commissions revenue increased driven by:
•higher asset management fees in AWM as a result of
net inflows into liquidity and long term products, and
higher performance fees; and in CCB related to a
higher level of investment assets
•higher brokerage commissions in CIB and AWM on
higher client-driven volume,
partially offset by
•lower volume of annuity sales in CCB.
Refer to CCB, CIB and AWM segment results on pages
67–70, pages 71–76 and pages 80–82, respectively,
and Note 6 for additional information.
Investment securities gains/(losses) increased due to
the repositioning of the investment securities portfolio,
including sales of U.S. GSE and government agency
mortgage-backed securities, particularly in the first and
third quarters of 2020. Refer to Corporate segment
results on pages 83–84 and Note 10 for additional
information.
Mortgage fees and related income increased due to
higher net mortgage production revenue reflecting
higher mortgage production volumes and margins; the
prior year included gains on sales of certain loans.
Refer to CCB segment results on pages 67–70, Note 6
and 15 for further information.
 (a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
54 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Card income decreased due to:
•lower net interchange income reflecting lower credit
card sales volumes and debit card transactions as a
result of the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic,
largely offset by lower acquisition costs and higher
annual fees in CCB, and
•lower merchant processing fees in CIB predominantly
driven by a reporting reclassification of certain
expenses to be a reduction of revenue in Merchant
Services. Refer to CCB and CIB segment results on
pages 67–70 and pages 71–76, respectively, and
Note 6 for further information.
Other income decreased reflecting:
•Increased amortization on higher levels of alternative
energy investments in CIB. The increased
amortization was more than offset by lower income tax
expense from the associated tax credits
•lower net valuation gains on certain investments in
AWM
•net losses on certain equity investments in CIB,
compared with net gains in the prior year
•higher costs associated with using forward contracts
to hedge certain non-U.S. dollar-denominated net
investment exposures, and
•higher losses related to the early termination of certain
of the Firm's long-term debt in Treasury and CIO,
partially offset by
•a net increase from a gain on an equity investment.
Net interest income decreased due to the impact of
lower rates, predominantly offset by higher net interest
income in CIB Markets, as well as balance sheet
growth.
The Firm’s average interest-earning assets were $2.8
trillion, up $434 billion, and the yield was 2.34%, down
127 basis points (“bps”), primarily due to lower rates.
The net yield on these assets, on an FTE basis, was
1.98%, a decrease of 48 bps. The net yield excluding
CIB Markets was 2.30%, down 97 bps.
Net yield excluding CIB Markets is a non-GAAP financial
measure. Refer to the Consolidated average balance
sheets, interest and rates schedule on pages 300–304
for further details; and the Explanation and
Reconciliation of the Firm’s Use of Non-GAAP Financial
Measures on pages 62–64 for a further discussion of
Net interest yield excluding CIB Markets.Provision for credit losses
Year ended December 31,
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Consumer, excluding credit
card $ 1,016 $ (378)$ (119)
Credit card 10,886 5,348 4,818 
Total consumer 11,902 4,970 4,699 
Wholesale 5,510 615 172 
Investment securities 68 NA NA
Total provision for credit
losses $17,480 $ 5,585 $ 4,871 
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL accounting
guidance. In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the Firm
reclassified risk-rated loans and lending-related commitments from the
consumer, excluding credit card portfolio segment to the wholesale
portfolio segment, to align with the methodology applied when
determining the allowance. Prior-period amounts have been revised to
conform with the current presentation. Refer to Note 1 for further
information.
 
2020 compared with 2019
The provision for credit losses increased in consumer
and wholesale primarily driven by the deterioration and
uncertainty in the macroeconomic environment, in
particular in the first half of 2020, as a result of the
impact of the COVID-19 pandemic.
The increase in consumer reflected:
•net additions of $7.4 billion to the allowance for credit
losses, consisting of $6.6 billion for Card, $520 million
for Auto, $252 million for Business Banking,
partially offset by
•lower net charge-offs largely in Card, reflecting lower
charge-offs and higher recoveries, primarily benefiting
from payment assistance and government stimulus.
The prior year included a $244 million net reduction in
the allowance for credit losses.
The increase in wholesale reflected a net addition of
$4.7 billion to the allowance for credit losses across the
LOBs, impacting multiple industries.
The investment securities provision for credit losses
relates to the HTM portfolio, which became subject to
the CECL accounting guidance beginning on January 1,
2020.
Refer to the segment discussions of CCB on pages 67–
70, CIB on pages 71–76, CB on pages 77–79, AWM on
pages 80–82, the Allowance for Credit Losses on pages
132-133, and Notes 1, 10 and 13 for further discussion
of the credit portfolio and the allowance for credit losses.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 55
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Noninterest expense
Year ended December 31,
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Compensation expense $34,988 $34,155 $33,117 
Noncompensation expense:
Occupancy 4,449 4,322 3,952 
Technology, communications
and equipment 10,338 9,821 8,802 
Professional and outside
services 8,464 8,533 8,502 
Marketing 2,476 3,351 3,044 
Other 5,941 5,087 5,731 
Total noncompensation
expense 31,668 31,114 30,031 
Total noninterest expense $66,656 $65,269 $63,148 
(a)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-
based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a
reduction of card income, with no effect on net income. Prior-
period amounts have been revised to conform with the current
presentation.
(b)Included Firmwide legal expense of $1.1 billion, $239 million and
$72 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively.
(c)Included FDIC-related expense of $717 million, $457 million and
$1.2 billion for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively.
2020 compared with 2019
Compensation expense increased driven by higher
volume-and revenue-related expense, predominantly in
CIB and CCB, as well as the impact of investments in
the businesses.
Noncompensation expense increased as a result of:
•higher legal expense predominantly in CIB and AWM
•higher volume-related expense, in particular
brokerage expense in CIB and depreciation from
growth in auto lease assets in CCB
•higher investments in the businesses, including
technology and real estate,
•an impairment on a legacy investment in Corporate,
and
•higher FDIC-related expense,
partially offset by
•lower marketing expense as a result of lower
investments in marketing campaigns and lower travel-
related benefits in CCB, and
•lower structural expense, including lower travel and
entertainment across the businesses, and payment
processing costs, partially offset by higher
contributions to the Firm’s Foundation.Income tax
expense
Year ended December
31,
 (in millions, except rate) 2020 2019 2018
Income before income
tax expense $35,407 $44,545 $40,764 
Income tax expense 6,276 8,114 8,290 
Effective tax rate 17.7 % 18.2 % 20.3 %
2020 compared with 2019
The effective tax rate decreased, with the current year
rate reflecting the impact of a lower level of pre-tax
income and changes in the mix of income and expenses
subject to U.S. federal, and state and local taxes, as
well as other tax adjustments. The prior year included
the effect of $1.1 billion of tax benefits related to the
resolution of certain tax audits. Refer to Note 25 for
further information.(a)
(b)(c)
56 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
CONSOLIDA TED BALANCE SHEETS AND CASH FLOWS ANAL YSIS
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL accounting guidance. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
Consolidated balance sheets analysis
The following is a discussion of the significant changes between December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Selected Consolidated balance sheets data
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 Change
Assets
Cash and due from banks $ 24,874 $ 21,704 15 %
Deposits with banks 502,735 241,927 108 
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under resale agreements 296,284 249,157 19 
Securities borrowed 160,635 139,758 15 
Trading assets 503,126 369,687 36 
Available-for-sale securities 388,178 350,699 11 
Held-to-maturity securities, net of allowance for credit losses 201,821 47,540 325 
Investment securities, net of allowance for credit losses 589,999 398,239 48 
Loans 1,012,853 997,620 2 
Allowance for loan losses (28,328) (13,123) 116 
Loans, net of allowance for loan losses 984,525 984,497 — 
Accrued interest and accounts receivable 90,503 72,861 24 
Premises and equipment 27,109 25,813 5 
Goodwill, MSRs and other intangible assets 53,428 53,341 — 
Other assets 152,853 130,395 17 
Total assets $ 3,386,071 $ 2,687,379 26 %
(a) In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other
assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
Cash and due from banks and deposits with banks
increased primarily as a result of significant deposit
inflows, which also funded asset growth across the Firm,
including investment securities and securities purchased
under resale agreements. Deposits with banks reflect the
Firm’s placements of its excess cash with various central
banks, including the Federal Reserve Banks.
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under
resale agreements increased as a result of higher
deployment of cash in Treasury and CIO, as well as the
impact of client activity and higher demand for securities
to cover short positions in CIB. Refer to Liquidity Risk
Management on pages 102–108 and Note 11 for
additional information.
Securities borrowed increased driven by client-driven
activities in CIB. Refer to Liquidity Risk Management on
pages 102–108 and Note 11 for additional information.
Trading assets remained elevated at the end of 2020,
due to stronger client-driven market-making activities in
debt and equity instruments and higher derivative
receivables as a result of market movements in CIB
Markets. Refer to Notes 2 and 5 for additional
information.
Investment securities increased, reflecting net
purchases of U.S. Treasuries and U.S. GSE and
government agency MBS in the available-for-sale (“AFS”)
portfolio, driven by interest rate risk management
activities and cash deployment. AFS securities of $164
billion were transferred to the held-to-maturity (“HTM”)
portfolio, resulting in a decrease in AFS and a
comparable increase in HTM securities. The transfers
were executed for capital management purposes. Refer
toCorporate segment results on pages 83–84, Investment
Portfolio Risk Management on page 134 and Notes 2 and
10 for additional information on investment securities.
Loans increased, reflecting:
•growth in wholesale loans and mortgages in AWM and
the impact of PPP loans in CBB and CB, as well as
higher wholesale loans related to client-driven activities
in CIB Markets
largely offset by
•lower loans in Home Lending primarily due to net
paydowns; and lower loans in Card due to the decline
in sales volumes that began in March as a result of the
impact of the COVID-19 pandemic.
The allowance for loan losses increased primarily
reflecting the deterioration and uncertainty in the
macroeconomic environment, in particular in the first half
of 2020, as a result of the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic, consisting of:
•a net $7.4 billion addition in consumer, predominantly
in the credit card portfolio, and
•a net $3.6 billion addition in wholesale, across the
LOBs, impacting multiple industries.
The adoption of CECL on January 1, 2020, resulted in a
$4.2 billion addition to the allowance for loan losses.
There were also additions to the allowance for lending-
related commitments, which is included in other liabilities
on the consolidated balance sheets, of $1.1 billion related
to the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic, and $98 million
related to the adoption of CECL. Total additions to the
allowance for(a)
(a)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 57
Management’ s discussion and analysis
credit losses were $12.1 billion related to COVID-19, and
$4.3 billion related to CECL, as of December 31, 2020.
Refer to Credit and Investment Risk Management on
pages 110–134, and Notes 1, 2, 3, 12 and 13 for further
discussion of loans and the allowance for loan losses.
Accrued interest and accounts receivable increased
driven by higher client receivables related to client-
driven activities in CIB prime brokerage.
Refer to Note 16 and 18 for additional information on
Premises and equipment.Goodwill, MSRs and other intangibles was flat as the
increase in goodwill related to the acquisitions of
cxLoyalty and 55ip was offset by lower MSRs as a result
of faster prepayment speeds on lower rates, and the
realization of expected cash flows, partially offset by net
additions to the MSRs. Refer to Note 15 for additional
information.
Other assets increased reflecting higher cash collateral
placed with central counterparties in CIB.
Selected Consolidated balance sheets data
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 Change
Liabilities
Deposits $ 2,144,257 $ 1,562,431 37 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under repurchase agreements 215,209 183,675 17 
Short-term borrowings 45,208 40,920 10 
Trading liabilities 170,181 119,277 43 
Accounts payable and other liabilities 232,599 210,407 11 
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated variable interest entities (“VIEs”) 17,578 17,841 (1)
Long-term debt 281,685 291,498 (3)
Total liabilities 3,106,717 2,426,049 28 
Stockholders’ equity 279,354 261,330 7 
Total liabilities and stockholders’ equity $ 3,386,071 $ 2,687,379 26 %
Deposits increased reflecting significant inflows across
the LOBs primarily driven by the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic and the related effect of certain government
actions;
•in the wholesale businesses, while the inflows
principally occurred in March as clients sought to
remain liquid as a result of market conditions, balances
continued to increase through the end of 2020, and
•in CCB, the increase was driven by lower spending and
higher cash balances across both consumer and small
business customers, as well as growth from existing
and new accounts.
Refer to the Liquidity Risk Management discussion on
pages 102–108; and Notes 2 and 17 for more
information.
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or
sold under repurchase agreements increased
reflecting:
•higher secured financing of AFS investment securities
in Treasury and CIO, as well as trading assets in CIB,
partially offset by
•a decline in client-driven market-making activities in
CIB, including the Firm's non-participation in the
Federal Reserve's open market operations. Refer to
the Liquidity Risk Management discussion on pages
102–108 and Note 11 for additional information.
Short-term borrowings increased reflecting higher
financing of CIB prime brokerage activities. Refer to
pages 102–108 for information on changes in Liquidity
Risk Management.Trading liabilities increased reflecting client-driven
market-making activities, which resulted in higher levels
of short positions in debt and equity instruments and
higher derivative payables as a result of market
movements in CIB Markets. Refer to Notes 2 and 5 for
additional information.
Accounts payable and other liabilities increased
reflecting higher client payables related to client-driven
activities in CIB Markets. Refer to Note 19 for additional
information.
Refer to Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements on pages 60-
61 and Note 14 and 28 for information on Beneficial
interests issued by consolidated VIEs.
Long-term debt decreased as a result of maturities of
FHLB advances; net maturities of senior debt, which
included the early termination of certain of the Firm's
debt; partially offset by an issuance of subordinated debt,
and higher fair value hedge accounting adjustments
related to lower interest rates. Refer to Liquidity Risk
Management on pages 102–108 and Note 20 for
additional information.
Stockholders’ equity increased reflecting the combined
impact of net income, capital actions, the adoption of
CECL and an increase in accumulated other
comprehensive income (“AOCI”). The increase in AOCI
was driven by net unrealized gains on AFS securities,
and higher valuation of interest rate cash flow hedges.
Refer to page 165 for information on changes in
stockholders’ equity, and Capital actions on page 99,
Note 24 for additional information on AOCI.
58 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Consolidated cash flows analysis
The following is a discussion of cash flow activities
during the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Refer to Consolidated cash flows analysis on page 54 of
the Firm’s 2019 Form 10-K for a discussion of the 2018
activities.
(in millions)Year ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
Net cash provided
by/(used in)
Operating activities $(79,910)$ 4,092 $ 15,614 
Investing activities (261,912) (52,059) (199,420)
Financing activities 596,645 32,987 34,158 
Effect of exchange rate
changes on cash 9,155 (182) (2,863)
Net increase/(decrease) in
cash and due from banks
and deposits with banks $263,978 $(15,162)$(152,511)
(a) In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans and other assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to
conform with the current presentation.
Operating activities
JPMorgan Chase’s operating assets and liabilities
primarily support the Firm’s lending and capital markets
activities. These assets and liabilities can vary
significantly in the normal course of business due to the
amount and timing of cash flows, which are affected by
client-driven and risk management activities and market
conditions. The Firm believes that cash flows from
operations, available cash and other liquidity sources,
and its capacity to generate cash through secured and
unsecured sources, are sufficient to meet its operating
liquidity needs.
•In 2020, cash used primarily reflected higher trading
assets, other assets, and securities borrowed, partially
offset by higher trading liabilities and net income
excluding noncash adjustments.
•In 2019, cash provided primarily reflected net income
excluding noncash adjustments, lower trading assets,
and net proceeds of sales, securitizations, and
paydowns of loans held-for-sale, partially offset by
higher securities borrowed, an increase in other
assets and a decrease in trading liabilities.Investing activities
The Firm’s investing activities predominantly include
originating held-for-investment loans and investing in the
investment securities portfolio, and other short-term
instruments.
•In 2020, cash used primarily reflected net purchases
of investment securities, higher net originations of
loans, and higher securities purchased under resale
agreements.
•In 2019, cash used reflected net purchases of
investment securities, partially offset by lower
securities purchased under resale agreements, and
net proceeds from sales and securitizations of loans
held-for-investment.
Financing activities
The Firm’s financing activities include acquiring
customer deposits and issuing long-term debt, as well
as preferred stock.
•In 2020, cash provided reflected higher deposits and
an increase in securities loaned or sold under
repurchase agreements, partially offset by net
payments of long-term borrowings.
•In 2019, cash provided reflected higher deposits,
partially offset by a decrease in short-term borrowings
and net payments of long-term borrowings.
•For both periods, cash was used for repurchases of
common stock and cash dividends on common and
preferred stock. On March 15, 2020, in response to
the economic disruptions caused by the COVID-19
pandemic, the Firm temporarily suspended
repurchases of its common stock. Subsequently, the
Federal Reserve directed all large banks, including
the Firm, to discontinue net share repurchases
through the end of 2020.
* * *
Refer to Consolidated Balance Sheets Analysis on
pages 57-58, Capital Risk Management on pages 91-
101, and Liquidity Risk Management on pages 102–108
for a further discussion of the activities affecting the
Firm’s cash flows.(a)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 59
Management’ s discussion and analysis
OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENTS AND CONTRACTUAL CASH OBLIGA TIONS
In the normal course of business, the Firm enters into
various off-balance sheet arrangements and contractual
obligations that may require future cash payments.
Certain obligations are recognized on-balance sheet,
while others are disclosed as off-balance sheet under
accounting principles generally accepted in the U.S.
(“U.S. GAAP”).
Special-purpose entities
The Firm has several types of off–balance sheet
arrangements, including through nonconsolidated
special-purpose entities (“SPEs”), which are a type of
VIE, and through lending-related financial instruments
(e.g., commitments and guarantees).The Firm holds capital, as appropriate, against all SPE-
related transactions and related exposures, such as
derivative contracts and lending-related commitments
and guarantees.
The Firm has no commitments to issue its own stock to
support any SPE transaction, and its policies require
that transactions with SPEs be conducted at arm’s
length and reflect market pricing. Consistent with this
policy, no JPMorgan Chase employee is permitted to
invest in SPEs with which the Firm is involved where
such investment would violate the Firm’s Code of
Conduct.
The table below provides an index of where in this 2020 Form 10-K discussions of the Firm’s various off-balance sheet
arrangements can be found. Refer to Note 1 for additional information about the Firm’s consolidation policies.
Type of off-balance sheet arrangement Location of disclosure Page references
Special-purpose entities: variable interests and other
obligations, including contingent obligations, arising
from variable interests in nonconsolidated VIEsRefer to Note 14 253-260
Off-balance sheet lending-related financial
instruments, guarantees, and other commitmentsRefer to Note 28 283-288
60 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Contractual cash obligations
The accompanying table summarizes, by remaining
maturity, JPMorgan Chase’s significant contractual cash
obligations at December 31, 2020. The contractual cash
obligations included in the table below reflect the
minimum contractual obligation under legally
enforceable contracts with terms that are both fixed and
determinable. Excluded from the table are certain
liabilities with variable cash flows and/or no obligation to
return a stated amount of principal at maturity.The carrying amount of on-balance sheet obligations on
the Consolidated balance sheets may differ from the
minimum contractual amount of the obligations reported
below. Refer to Note 28 for a discussion of mortgage
repurchase liabilities and other obligations.
Contractual cash obligations
By remaining maturity at December 31,
 (in millions)2020 2019
2021 2022-2023 2024-2025 After 2025 Total Total
On-balance sheet obligations
Deposits $ 2,134,256 $ 4,321 $ 2,931 $ 1,637 $ 2,143,145 $ 1,558,040 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned
or sold under repurchase agreements 214,881 118 9 189 215,197 183,675 
Short-term borrowings 28,514 — — — 28,514 35,107 
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated
VIEs 14,976 2,400 — 223 17,599 17,874 
Long-term debt 22,461 42,084 42,180 123,477 230,202 250,415 
Operating leases 1,606 2,705 2,070 3,602 9,983 10,090 
Other 8,694 2,237 2,008 2,592 15,531 15,568 
Total on-balance sheet obligations 2,425,388 53,865 49,198 131,720 2,660,171 2,070,769 
Off-balance sheet obligations
Unsettled resale and securities borrowed
agreements 95,084 1,764 — — 96,848 117,951 
Contractual interest payments 6,071 10,450 8,128 29,719 54,368 54,681 
Equity investment commitments 286 — — — 286 539 
Contractual purchases and capital
expenditures 1,968 942 225 198 3,333 2,929 
Obligations under co-brand programs 333 530 240 79 1,182 1,548 
Total off-balance sheet obligations 103,742 13,686 8,593 29,996 156,017 177,648 
Total contractual cash obligations $ 2,529,130 $ 67,551 $ 57,791 $ 161,716 $ 2,816,188 $ 2,248,417 
(a)Excludes structured notes on which the Firm is not obligated to return a stated amount of principal at the maturity of the notes, but is obligated to
return an amount based on the performance of the structured notes.
(b)Includes noncancelable operating leases for premises and equipment used primarily for business purposes. Excludes the benefit of
noncancelable sublease rentals of $593 million and $846 million at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Refer to Note 18 for further
information on operating leases.
(c)Primarily includes dividends declared on preferred and common stock, deferred annuity contracts, pension and other postretirement employee
benefit obligations, insurance liabilities and income taxes payable associated with the deemed repatriation under the TCJA.
(d)Refer to unsettled resale and securities borrowed agreements in Note 28 for further information.
(e)Includes accrued interest and future contractual interest obligations. Excludes interest related to structured notes for which the Firm’s payment
obligation is based on the performance of certain benchmarks.(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 61
Management’ s discussion and analysis
EXPLANA TION AND RECONCILIA TION OF THE FIRM’S USE OF NON-GAAP FINANCIAL
MEASURES
Non-GAAP financial measures
The Firm prepares its Consolidated Financial
Statements in accordance with U.S. GAAP; these
financial statements appear on pages 162-166. That
presentation, which is referred to as “reported” basis,
provides the reader with an understanding of the Firm’s
results that can be tracked consistently from year-to-
year and enables a comparison of the Firm’s
performance with the U.S. GAAP financial statements of
other companies.
In addition to analyzing the Firm’s results on a reported
basis, management reviews Firmwide results, including
the overhead ratio, on a “managed” basis; these
Firmwide managed basis results are non-GAAP
financial measures. The Firm also reviews the results of
the LOBs on a managed basis. The Firm’s definition of
managed basis starts, in each case, with the reported
U.S. GAAP results and includes certain reclassifications
to present total net revenue for the Firm (and each of
the reportable business segments) on an FTE basis.
Accordingly, revenue from investments that receive tax
credits and tax-exempt securities is presented in the
managed results on a basis comparable to taxable
investments and securities. These financial measures
allowmanagement to assess the comparability of revenue
from year-to-year arising from both taxable and tax-
exempt sources. The corresponding income tax impact
related to tax-exempt items is recorded within income
tax expense. These adjustments have no impact on net
income as reported by the Firm as a whole or by the
LOBs.
Management also uses certain non-GAAP financial
measures at the Firm and business-segment level,
because these other non-GAAP financial measures
provide information to investors about the underlying
operational performance and trends of the Firm or of the
particular business segment, as the case may be, and,
therefore, facilitate a comparison of the Firm or the
business segment with the performance of its relevant
competitors. Refer to Business Segment Results on
pages 65–84 for additional information on these non-
GAAP measures. Non-GAAP financial measures used
by the Firm may not be comparable to similarly named
non-GAAP financial measures used by other
companies.
 
The following summary table provides a reconciliation from the Firm’s reported U.S. GAAP results to managed basis.
2020 2019 2018
Year ended 
 December 31, 
 (in millions, except ratios)ReportedFully taxable-
equivalent
adjustmentsManaged
 basis ReportedFully taxable-
equivalent
adjustmentsManaged
 basis ReportedFully taxable-
equivalent
adjustmentsManaged
 basis
Other income $ 4,457 $ 2,968 $ 7,425 $ 5,731 $ 2,534 $ 8,265 $ 5,343 $ 1,877 $ 7,220 
Total noninterest
revenue 64,980 2,968 67,948 58,154 2,534 60,688 53,724 1,877 55,601 
Net interest income 54,563 418 54,981 57,245 531 57,776 55,059 628 55,687 
Total net revenue 119,543 3,386 122,929 115,399 3,065 118,464 108,783 2,505 111,288 
Total noninterest
expense 66,656 NA 66,656 65,269 NA 65,269 63,148 NA 63,148 
Pre-provision profit 52,887 3,386 56,273 50,130 3,065 53,195 45,635 2,505 48,140 
Provision for credit losses 17,480 NA 17,480 5,585 NA 5,585 4,871 NA 4,871 
Income before income
tax expense 35,407 3,386 38,793 44,545 3,065 47,610 40,764 2,505 43,269 
Income tax expense 6,276 3,386 9,662 8,114 3,065 11,179 8,290 2,505 10,795 
Net income $29,131 NA$29,131 $36,431 NA$36,431 $32,474 NA$32,474 
Overhead ratio 56 % NM 54 % 57 % NM 55 % 58 % NM 57 %
(a)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a reduction of
card income, with no effect on net income. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)Predominantly recognized in CIB, CB and Corporate.(b) (b) (b)
(a)
(a)
62 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Net interest income and net yield excluding CIB
Markets
In addition to reviewing net interest income and the net
yield on a managed basis, management also reviews
these metrics excluding CIB Markets, as shown below;
these metrics, which exclude CIB Markets, are non-
GAAP financial measures. Management reviews these
metrics to assess the performance of the Firm’s lending,
investing (including asset-liability management) and
deposit-raising activities. The resulting metrics that
exclude CIB Markets are referred to as non-markets-
related net interest income and net yield. CIB Markets
consists of Fixed Income Markets and Equity Markets.
Management believes that disclosure of non-markets-
related net interest income and net yield provides
investors and analysts with other measures by which to
analyze the non-markets-related business trends of the
Firm and provides a comparable measure to other
financial institutions that are primarily focused on
lending, investing and deposit-raising activities.
Year ended
December 31, 
 (in millions, except
rates) 2020 2019 2018
Net interest income
– reported $ 54,563 $ 57,245 $ 55,059 
Fully taxable-
equivalent
adjustments 418 531 628 
Net interest income
– managed basis$ 54,981 $ 57,776 $ 55,687 
Less: CIB Markets
net interest
income 8,374 3,120 3,087 
Net interest income
excluding CIB
Markets $ 46,607 $ 54,656 $ 52,600 
Average interest-
earning assets $2,779,710 $2,345,279 $2,212,657 
Less: Average CIB
Markets interest-
earning assets 751,131 672,417 593,104 
Average interest-
earning assets
excluding CIB
Markets $2,028,579 $1,672,862 $1,619,553 
Net yield on
average interest-
earning assets –
managed basis 1.98 % 2.46 % 2.52 %
Net yield on average
CIB Markets
interest-earning
assets 1.11 0.46 0.52 
Net yield on
average interest-
earning assets
excluding CIB
Markets 2.30 % 3.27 % 3.25 %
(a)Interest includes the effect of related hedges. Taxable-equivalent
amounts are used where applicable.
(b)Refer to pages 74-75 for further information on CIB Markets.
(c)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.Calculation of certain U.S. GAAP and non-GAAP financial
measures
Certain U.S. GAAP and non-GAAP financial measures are
calculated as follows:
Book value per share (“BVPS”)
Common stockholders’ equity at period-end /
Common shares at period-end
Overhead ratio
Total noninterest expense / Total net revenue
Pre-provision profit
Total net revenue – Total noninterest expense
Return on assets (“ROA”)
Reported net income / Total average assets
Return on common equity (“ROE”)
Net income* / Average common stockholders’ equity
Return on tangible common equity (“ROTCE”)
Net income* / Average tangible common equity
Tangible book value per share (“TBVPS”)
Tangible common equity at period-end / Common shares at period-
end
* Represents net income applicable to common equity
In addition, the Firm reviews other non-GAAP financial
measures which include:
•Adjusted expense, which is noninterest expense
excluding Firmwide legal expense
•Allowance for loan losses to period-end loans
retained excluding trade finance and conduits
•Pre-provision profit, which represents total net
revenue less total noninterest expense.
Management believes that these measures help
investors understand the effect of these items on
reported results and provide an alternate presentation of
the Firm’s performance.(a)
(b)
(a)
(c)
(b)(c)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 63
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Tangible common equity, ROTCE and TBVPS
Tangible common equity (“TCE”), ROTCE and TBVPS are each non-GAAP financial measures. TCE represents the
Firm’s common stockholders’ equity (i.e., total stockholders’ equity less preferred stock) less goodwill and identifiable
intangible assets (other than MSRs), net of related deferred tax liabilities. ROTCE measures the Firm’s net income
applicable to common equity as a percentage of average TCE. TBVPS represents the Firm’s TCE at period-end divided
by common shares at period-end. TCE, ROTCE and TBVPS are utilized by the Firm, as well as investors and analysts,
in assessing the Firm’s use of equity.
The following summary table provides a reconciliation from the Firm’s common stockholders’ equity to TCE.
Period-end Average
Dec 31,
2020Dec 31,
2019Year ended December 31,
(in millions, except per share and ratio data) 2020 2019 2018
Common stockholders’ equity $ 249,291 $ 234,337 $ 236,865 $ 232,907 $ 229,222 
Less: Goodwill 49,248 47,823 47,820 47,620 47,491 
Less: Other intangible assets 904 819 781 789 807 
Add: Certain deferred tax liabilities 2,453 2,381 2,399 2,328 2,231 
Tangible common equity $ 201,592 $ 188,076 $ 190,663 $ 186,826 $ 183,155 
Return on tangible common equity NA NA 14 % 19 % 17 %
Tangible book value per share $ 66.11 $ 60.98 NA NA NA
(a)Represents deferred tax liabilities related to tax-deductible goodwill and to identifiable intangibles created in nontaxable transactions, which are
netted against goodwill and other intangibles when calculating TCE.(a)
64 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
BUSINESS SEGMENT RESUL TS
The Firm is managed on an LOB basis. There are four
major reportable business segments – Consumer &
Community Banking, Corporate & Investment Bank,
Commercial Banking and Asset & Wealth Management.
In addition, there is a Corporate segment.The business segments are determined based on the
products and services provided, or the type of customer
served, and they reflect the manner in which financial
information is currently evaluated by the Firm’s
Operating Committee. Segment results are presented
on a managed basis. Refer to Explanation and
Reconciliation of the Firm’s use of Non-GAAP Financial
Measures, on pages 62–64 for a definition of managed
basis.
JPMorgan Chase
Consumer Businesses Wholesale Businesses
Consumer & Community Banking Corporate & Investment BankCommercial
BankingAsset & W ealth
Management
Consumer & 
 Business BankingHome Lending Card & Auto BankingMarkets & 
 Securities Services • Middle Market
Banking • Asset
Management
 • Consumer
Banking
 • J.P. Morgan
Wealth
Management
 • Business
Banking
  • Home
Lending
Production
 • Home
Lending
Servicing
 • Real Estate
Portfolios• Credit Card
• Auto
 
  • Investment
Banking
 • Wholesale
Payments
 • Lending • Fixed
Income
Markets • Corporate
Client
Banking • Wealth
Management
 
 • Equity
Markets
 • Securities
Services
 • Credit
Adjustments
& Other • Commercial
Real Estate
Banking
Business segment changes
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm transferred certain
assets, liabilities, revenue, expense and headcount
associated with certain wealth management clients from
AWM to the J.P. Morgan Wealth Management business
unit within CCB. Prior-period amounts have been revised
to conform with the current presentation, including the
transfer of approximately 1,650 technology and support
staff during the second and third quarters of 2020. Ultra-
high-net-worth and certain high-net-worth client
relationships remained in AWM.
In the first quarter of 2020, the Firm began reporting a
Wholesale Payments business unit within CIB following a
realignment of the Firm’s wholesale payments
businesses. The Wholesale Payments business
comprises:
•Merchant Services, which was realigned from CCB to
CIB
•Treasury Services and Trade Finance in CIB. Trade
Finance was previously reported in Lending in CIB.
In connection with the alignment of Wholesale Payments,
the assets, liabilities and headcount associated with the
Merchant Services business were realigned to CIB from
CCB, and the revenue and expenses of the Merchant
Services business are reported across CCB, CIB and CB
based primarily on client relationships. In the fourth
quarter of 2020, payment processing-only clients along
with the associated revenue and expenses were realigned
to CIB’s Wholesale Payments business from CCB and
CB. Payment processing-only clients are those that only
use payment services offered by Merchant Services, and
in general do not currently utilize other services offered by
the Firm. Prior-period amounts have been revisedto reflect this realignment and revised allocation
methodology.
Description of business segment reporting
methodology
Results of the business segments are intended to present
each segment as if it were a stand-alone business. The
management reporting process that derives business
segment results includes the allocation of certain income
and expense items. The Firm also assesses the level of
capital required for each LOB on at least an annual basis.
The Firm periodically assesses the assumptions,
methodologies and reporting classifications used for
segment reporting, and further refinements may be
implemented in future periods.
Revenue sharing
When business segments join efforts to sell products and
services to the Firm’s clients, the participating business
segments may agree to share revenue from those
transactions. Revenue is generally recognized in the
segment responsible for the related product or service,
with allocations to the other segment(s) involved in the
transaction. The segment results reflect these revenue-
sharing agreements.
Expense Allocation
Where business segments use services provided by
corporate support units, or another business segment, the
costs of those services are allocated to the respective
business segments. The expense is generally
allocated based on the actual cost and use of services
provided. In contrast, certain costs and investments
related to corporate support units, technology and
operations not currently utilized by any LOB, are not
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 65
Management’ s discussion and analysis
allocated to the business segments and are retained in
Corporate. Expense retained in Corporate generally
includes parent company costs that would not be incurred
if the segments were stand-alone businesses; and other
items not aligned with a particular business segment.
Funds transfer pricing
Funds transfer pricing is the process by which the Firm
allocates interest income and expense to each business
segment and transfers the primary interest rate risk and
liquidity risk exposures to Treasury and CIO within
Corporate. The funds transfer pricing process considers
the interest rate risk, liquidity risk and regulatory
requirements on a product-by-product basis within each
business segment.
Debt expense and preferred stock dividend allocation
As part of the funds transfer pricing process, almost all of
the cost of the credit spread component of outstanding
unsecured long-term debt and preferred stock dividends is
allocated to the reportable business segments, while the
balance of the cost is retained in Corporate. The
methodology to allocate thecost of unsecured long-term debt and preferred stock
dividends to the business segments is aligned with the
Firm’s process to allocate capital. The allocated cost of
unsecured long-term debt is included in a business
segment’s net interest income, and net income is reduced
by preferred stock dividends to arrive at a business
segment’s net income applicable to common equity.
Business segment capital allocation
The amount of capital assigned to each business is
referred to as equity. As of January 1, 2021, the Firm has
changed its line of business capital allocations primarily
as a result of changes in exposures for each LOB and an
increase in the relative risk weighting toward Standardized
RWA. The assumptions and methodologies used to
allocate capital are periodically assessed and as a
result, the capital allocated to the LOBs may change
from time to time. 
Refer to Line of business equity on page 98 for additional
information on business segment capital allocation.
 
Segment Results – Managed Basis
The following tables summarize the Firm’s results by segment for the periods indicated.
Year ended December 31,Consumer & Community Banking Corporate & Investment Bank Commercial Banking
(in millions, except ratios) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Total net revenue $51,268$55,133$51,271 $49,284 $39,265$37,382 $ 9,313 $ 9,264$ 9,336
Total noninterest expense 27,990 28,276 27,168 23,538 22,444 21,876 3,798 3,735 3,627
Pre-provision profit/(loss) 23,278 26,857 24,103 25,746 16,821 15,506 5,515 5,529 5,709
Provision for credit losses 12,312 4,954 4,754 2,726 277 (60) 2,113 296 129
Net income/(loss) 8,217 16,541 14,707 17,094 11,954 11,799 2,578 3,958 4,264
Return on equity (“ROE”) 15% 31% 28% 20 % 14% 16% 11 % 17% 20%
Year ended December 31, Asset & Wealth Management Corporate Total
(in millions, except ratios) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Total net revenue $14,240 $13,591$13,427 $(1,176)$1,211$(128)$122,929$118,464$111,288
Total noninterest expense 9,957 9,747 9,575 1,373 1,067 902 66,656 65,269 63,148
Pre-provision profit/(loss) 4,283 3,844 3,852 (2,549) 144 (1,030) 56,273 53,195 48,140
Provision for credit losses 263 59 52 66 (1) (4) 17,480 5,585 4,871
Net income/(loss) 2,992 2,867 2,945 (1,750) 1,111 (1,241) 29,131 36,431 32,474
Return on equity (“ROE”) 28 % 26% 32%  NM  NM NM 12% 15% 13%
(a)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a reduction of
card income, with no effect on net income. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
The following sections provide a comparative discussion of the Firm’s results by segment as of or for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019.(a)
(a)
66 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
CONSUMER & COMMUNITY BANKING
Consumer & Community Banking offers services
to consumers and businesses through bank
branches, ATMs, digital (including mobile and
online) and telephone banking. CCB is organized
into Consumer & Business Banking (including
Consumer Banking, J.P. Morgan Wealth
Management and Business Banking), Home
Lending (including Home Lending Production,
Home Lending Servicing and Real Estate
Portfolios) and Card & Auto. Consumer &
Business Banking offers deposit and investment
products, payments and services to consumers,
and lending, deposit, and cash management and
payment solutions to small businesses. Home
Lending includes mortgage origination and
servicing activities, as well as portfolios
consisting of residential mortgages and home
equity loans. Card & Auto issues credit cards to
consumers and small businesses and originates
and services auto loans and leases.Selected income statement data
Year ended December
31,
(in millions, except
ratios) 2020 2019 2018
Revenue
Lending- and deposit-
related fees $3,166 $3,938 $3,787 
Asset management,
administration and
commissions 2,780 2,808 2,592 
Mortgage fees and
related income 3,079 2,035 1,252 
Card income 3,068 3,412 3,108 
All other income 5,647 5,603 4,599 
Noninterest revenue 17,740 17,796 15,338 
Net interest income 33,528 37,337 35,933 
Total net revenue 51,268 55,133 51,271 
Provision for credit
losses 12,312 4,954 4,754 
Noninterest expense
Compensation
expense 11,014 10,815 10,580 
Noncompensation
expense 16,976 17,461 16,588 
Total noninterest
expense 27,990 28,276 27,168 
Income before
income tax
expense 10,966 21,903 19,349 
Income tax expense 2,749 5,362 4,642 
Net income $8,217 $16,541 $14,707 
Revenue by line of
business
Consumer & Business
Banking $22,955 $27,376 $25,607 
Home Lending 6,018 5,179 5,484 
Card & Auto 22,295 22,578 20,180 
Mortgage fees and
related income
details:
Net production
revenue 2,629 1,618 268 
Net mortgage
servicing
  revenue 450 417 984 
Mortgage fees and
related income $3,079 $2,035 $1,252 
Financial ratios
Return on equity 15 % 31 % 28 %
Overhead ratio 55 51 53 
In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was realigned
from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’ s Wholesale Payments business. In
the fourth quarter of 2020, payment processing-only clients along with the
associated revenue and expenses were realigned to CIB’ s Wholesale
Payments business from CCB and CB. Prior-period amounts have been
revised to conform with the current presentation.
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm realigned certain wealth
management clients from A WM to CCB. Prior-period amounts have been
revised to conform with the current presentation, including an increase to
net revenue of $725 million and $649 million for the years ended
December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively . Ultra-high-net-worth and
certain high-net-worth client relationships remained in A WM.
(a)In the first quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fees from asset
management, administration and commissions to lending- and deposit-
related fees. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with
the current presentation.
(b)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-
based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a
reduction of card income, with no ef fect on net income. Prior-period
amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(c)Included depreciation expense on leased assets of $4.2 billion, $4.0
billion and $3.4 billion for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019
and 2018, respectively .
(d)Included MSR risk management results of $(18) million, $(165) million
and $(111) million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively .(a)
(a)
(b)
(b)(c)
(b)
(d)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 67
Management’ s discussion and analysis
2020 compared with 2019
Net income was $8.2 billion, a decrease of 50%, largely
driven by an increase in the provision for credit losses.
Net revenue was $51.3 billion, a decrease of 7%.
Net interest income was $33.5 billion, down 10%, driven
by:
•the impact of deposit margin compression in CBB,
spread compression and lower loans in Home
Lending, predominantly due to paydowns and prior
year loan sales, and lower loans in Card due to the
decline in sales volume as a result of the COVID-19
pandemic,
partially offset by
•growth in deposits in CBB, and loan margin expansion
in Card, the prior year included charges for the unwind
of the internal funding from Treasury and CIO
associated with the sales of certain mortgage loans.
Noninterest revenue was $17.7 billion, flat, reflecting:
•lower deposit-related fees due to lower transaction
activity and the impact of fee refunds related to the
COVID-19 pandemic,
•lower card income due to lower net interchange
income reflecting lower credit card sales volumes and
debit card transactions as a result of the impact of the
COVID-19 pandemic, largely offset by lower
acquisition costs and higher annual fees, and
•lower asset management, administration and
commissions due to a lower volume of annuity sales
offset by a higher level of investment assets,
offset by
•higher net mortgage production revenue reflecting
higher mortgage production volumes and margins; the
prior year included gains on the sales of certain
mortgage loans.
Refer to Note 15 for further information regarding
changes in the value of the MSR asset and related
hedges, and mortgage fees and related income.Noninterest expense was $28.0 billion, relatively flat,
reflecting:
•lower marketing expense as a result of lower
investments in marketing campaigns and lower travel-
related benefits, and
•lower structural expenses,
offset by
•investments in the business, higher volume-related
compensation, and higher depreciation on auto lease
assets.
The provision for credit losses was $12.3 billion, an
increase of $7.4 billion from the prior year, driven by:
•additions to the allowance for credit losses as a result
of the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic, consisting
of: $6.6 billion for Card, $649 million for CBB, and
$560 million for Auto,
partially offset by
•lower net charge-offs largely in Card, reflecting lower
charge-offs and higher recoveries primarily benefiting
from payment assistance and government stimulus.
The prior year included a $300 million net reduction in
the
allowance for credit losses.
Refer to Credit and Investment Risk Management on
pages 110–134 and Allowance for Credit Losses on
pages 132-133 for further discussions of the credit
portfolios and the allowance for credit losses.
 
68 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Selected metrics
As of or for the year
ended 
 December 31,
(in millions, except
headcount) 2020 2019 2018
Selected balance sheet
data (period-end)
Total assets $496,705 $541,367 $560,177 
Loans:
Consumer & Business
Banking 48,810 29,585 28,450 
Home Lending 182,121 213,445 247,721 
Card 144,216 168,924 156,632 
Auto 66,432 61,522 63,573 
Total loans 441,579 473,476 496,376 
Deposits 958,706 723,418 684,124 
Equity 52,000 52,000 51,000 
Selected balance sheet
data (average)
Total assets $501,584 $543,127 $548,637 
Loans:
Consumer & Business
Banking 43,064 28,859 27,890 
Home Lending 197,148 230,662 250,373 
Card 146,633 156,325 145,652 
Auto 61,476 61,862 64,675 
Total loans 448,321 477,708 488,590 
Deposits 851,390 698,378 675,537 
Equity 52,000 52,000 51,000 
Headcount 122,894 125,756 127,826 
In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was
realigned from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’s Wholesale Payments
business. In the fourth quarter of 2020, payment processing-only
clients along with the associated revenue and expenses were
realigned to CIB’s Wholesale Payments business from CCB and CB.
Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current
presentation, including a decrease to period-end assets of $6.6 billion
and $6.2 billion and headcount of 4,022 and 4,092, as of December
31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm realigned certain wealth
management clients from AWM to CCB. Prior-period amounts have
been revised to conform with the current presentation, including an
increase to headcount of 2,641 and 2,400 as of December 31, 2019
and 2018, respectively.
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
(b)At December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, Home Lending loans held-
for-sale and loans at fair value were $9.7 billion, $16.6 billion and
$7.9 billion, respectively.
(c)Average Home Lending loans held-for sale and loans at fair value
were $11.1 billion, $14.1 billion and $9.0 billion, respectively, for
the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
(d)At December 31, 2020 included $19.2 billion of loans in Business
Banking under the PPP. Refer to Credit Portfolio on pages 112-
113 for a further discussion of the PPP.Selected metrics
As of or for the year ended 
December 31,
(in millions, except ratio
data) 2020 2019 2018
Credit data and quality
statistics
Nonaccrual loans $5,675 $3,027 $3,349 
Net charge-offs/(recoveries)
Consumer & Business
Banking 263 298 246 
Home Lending (169) (98) (294)
Card 4,286 4,848 4,518 
Auto 123 206 243 
Total net charge-
offs/(recoveries) $4,503 $5,254 $4,713 
Net charge-off/(recovery)
rate
Consumer & Business
Banking 0.61 % 1.03 % 0.88 %
Home Lending (0.09) (0.05) (0.12)
Card 2.93 3.10 3.10 
Auto 0.20 0.33 0.38 
Total net charge-
off/(recovery) rate 1.03 % 1.13 % 0.98 %
30+ day delinquency rate
Home Lending 1.15 % 1.58 % 1.63 %
Card 1.68 1.87 1.83 
Auto 0.69 0.94 0.93 
90+ day delinquency rate -
Card 0.92 % 0.95 % 0.92 %
Allowance for loan losses
Consumer & Business
Banking $1,372 $ 750 $ 796 
Home Lending 1,813 1,890 2,791 
Card 17,800 5,683 5,184 
Auto 1,042 465 464 
Total allowance for
loan losses $22,027 $8,788 $9,235 
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL accounting
guidance. The adoption resulted in a change in the accounting for PCI
loans, which are considered purchased credit deteriorated (“PCD”)
loans under CECL. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm realigned certain wealth
management clients from AWM to CCB. Prior-period amounts have
been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(a)At December 31, 2020, nonaccrual loans included $1.6 billion of
PCD loans. Prior to the adoption of CECL, nonaccrual loans
excluded PCI loans as the Firm recognized interest income on
each pool of PCI loans as each of the pools was performing.
(b)At December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, nonaccrual loans
excluded mortgage loans 90 or more days past due and insured
by U.S. government agencies of $558 million, $963 million and
$2.6 billion, respectively. These amounts have been excluded
based upon the government guarantee. Prior-period amounts of
mortgage loans 90 or more days past due and insured by U.S.
government agencies excluded from nonaccrual loans have been
revised to conform with the current presentation; refer to footnote
(c) for additional information.
(c)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
(d)At December 31, 2020, the 30+ day delinquency rates included
PCD loans. The rates prior to January 1, 2020 were revised to
include the impact of PCI loans.
(e)At December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, excluded mortgage loans
insured by U.S. government agencies of $744 million, $1.7 billion
and $4.1 billion, respectively, that are 30 or more days past due.
These amounts have been excluded based upon the government
guarantee. Prior-period amounts of mortgage loans 30 or more
days past due and insured by U.S. government agencies excluded
from 30+ day delinquency rate have been revised to conform with
the current presentation; refer to footnote (c) for additional
information.(d)
(a)(b)
(a)(c)(a)(b)(c) (f)
(g)
(d)(e) (h)
(h)
(h)
(h)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 69
Management’ s discussion and analysis
(f)Generally excludes loans under payment deferral programs offered
in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Refer to Consumer Credit
Portfolio on pages 114-116 for further information on consumer
payment assistance activity. Includes loans to customers that have
exited COVID-19 payment deferral programs and are 90 or more
days past due, predominantly all of which were also at least 150
days past due and therefore considered collateral-dependent.
Collateral-dependent loans are charged down to the lower of
amortized cost or fair value of the underlying collateral less costs
to sell.
(g)At December 31, 2020, included $19.2 billion of loans in Business
Banking under the PPP. Given that PPP loans are guaranteed by
the SBA, the Firm does not expect to realize material credit losses
on these loans. Refer to Credit Portfolio on pages 112-113 for a
further discussion of the PPP.
(h)At December 31, 2020, the principal balance of loans in Home
Lending, Card and Auto under payment deferral programs offered
in response to the COVID-19 pandemic were $9.1 billion, $264
million and $376 million, respectively. Loans that are performing
according to their modified terms are generally not considered
delinquent. Refer to Consumer Credit Portfolio on pages 114-116
for further information on consumer payment assistance activity.Selected metrics
As of or for the year
ended December 31,
(in billions, except
ratios and where
otherwise noted) 2020 2019 2018
Business Metrics
CCB households (in
millions) 63.4 62.6 61.7 
Number of branches 4,908 4,976 5,036 
Active digital
customers
  (in thousands) 55,274 52,453 49,254 
Active mobile
customers
(in thousands) 40,899 37,315 33,260 
Debit and credit card 
 sales volume $1,081.2 $1,114.4 $1,016.9 
Consumer & Business Banking
Average deposits $ 832.5 $ 683.7 $ 661.7 
Deposit margin 1.58 % 2.48 % 2.38 %
Business banking 
 origination volume $ 26.6 $ 6.6 $ 6.7 
Client investment
assets 590.2 501.4 399.7 
Number of client
advisors 4,417 4,196 3,929 
Home Lending
Mortgage origination
volume 
 by channel
Retail $ 72.9 $ 51.0 $ 38.3 
Correspondent 40.9 54.2 41.1 
Total mortgage
origination volume $ 113.8 $ 105.2 $ 79.4 
Total loans serviced
(period-end) $ 626.3 $ 761.4 $ 789.8 
Third-party mortgage
loans serviced
(period-end) 447.3 520.8 519.6 
MSR carrying value
 (period-end) 3.3 4.7 6.1 
Ratio of MSR carrying
value (period-end) to
third-party mortgage
loans serviced
(period-end) 0.74 % 0.90 % 1.17 %
MSR revenue
multiple 2.55 x 2.65 x 3.34x
Credit Card
Credit card sales
volume, excluding
commercial card $ 702.7 $ 762.8 $ 692.4 
New accounts opened
(in millions) 5.4 $ 7.8 7.8 
Net revenue rate 10.92 % 10.48 % 10.17 %
Auto
Loan and lease 
 origination volume $ 38.4 $ 34.0 $ 31.8 
Average auto
 operating lease
assets 22.0 21.6 18.8 
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm realigned certain wealth
management clients from A WM to CCB. Prior-period amounts have been
revised to conform with the current presentation, including an increase to
client investment assets of $143.3 billion and $117.3 billion as of
December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
(a)Users of all web and/or mobile platforms who have logged in within the
past 90 days.
(b)Users of all mobile platforms who have logged in within the past 90
days.
(c)Firmwide mortgage origination volume was $133.4 billion, $115.9
billion and $86.9 billion for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019
and 2018, respectively .
(d)Represents the ratio of MSR carrying value (period-end) to third-party
mortgage loans serviced (period-end) divided by the ratio of loan
servicing-related revenue to third-party mortgage loans serviced(a)
(b)
(f)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(average).
(e)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-
based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a
reduction of card income, with no ef fect on net income. Prior-period
amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(f)Included $21.9 billion of origination volume under the PPP for the year
ended December 31, 2020. Refer to Credit Portfolio on pages 112-113
for a further discussion of the PPP .
70 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
CORPORA TE & INVESTMENT BANK
The Corporate & Investment Bank, which consists
of Banking and Markets & Securities Services,
offers a broad suite of investment banking,
market-making, prime brokerage, and treasury and
securities products and services to a global client
base of corporations, investors, financial
institutions, merchants, government and municipal
entities. Banking offers a full range of investment
banking products and services in all major capital
markets, including advising on corporate strategy
and structure, capital-raising in equity and debt
markets, as well as loan origination and
syndication. Banking also includes Wholesale
Payments, which provides payments services
enabling clients to manage payments and receipts
globally, and cross-border financing. Markets &
Securities Services includes Markets, a global
market-maker across products, including cash and
derivative instruments, which also offers
sophisticated risk management solutions, prime
brokerage, and research. Markets & Securities
Services also includes Securities Services, a
leading global custodian which provides custody,
fund accounting and administration, and securities
lending products principally for asset managers,
insurance companies and public and private
investment funds.
Selected income statement data
Year ended December 31,
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Revenue
Investment banking fees $ 9,477 $ 7,575 $ 7,473 
Principal transactions 17,560 14,399 12,262 
Lending- and deposit-related
fees 2,070 1,668 1,633 
Asset management,
administration and
commissions 4,721 4,400 4,361 
All other income 1,292 2,018 2,125 
Noninterest revenue 35,120 30,060 27,854 
Net interest income 14,164 9,205 9,528 
Total net revenue 49,284 39,265 37,382 
Provision for credit losses 2,726 277 (60)
Noninterest expense
Compensation expense 11,612 11,180 10,776 
Noncompensation expense 11,926 11,264 11,100 
Total noninterest expense 23,538 22,444 21,876 
Income before income tax
expense 23,020 16,544 15,566 
Income tax expense 5,926 4,590 3,767 
Net income $17,094 $11,954 $11,799 
In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was
realigned from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’s Wholesale Payments
business. In the fourth quarter of 2020, payment processing-only
clients along with the associated revenue and expenses were
realigned to CIB’s Wholesale Payments business from CCB and CB.
Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current
presentation.
(a) In the first quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fees from
asset management, administration and commissions to lending-
and deposit-related fees. Prior-period amounts have been revised
to conform with the current presentation.(b) Includes tax-equivalent adjustments, predominantly due to income
tax credits related to alternative energy investments; income tax
credits and amortization of the cost of investments in affordable
housing projects; and tax-exempt income from municipal bonds of
$2.8 billion, $2.3 billion and $1.7 billion for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Selected income statement data
Year ended December
31,
(in millions, except ratios) 2020 2019 2018
Financial ratios
Return on equity 20 % 14 % 16 %
Overhead ratio 48 57 59 
Compensation expense
as
percentage of total net
revenue 24 28 29 
Revenue by business
Investment Banking $8,871 $7,215 $6,987 
Wholesale Payments 5,560 5,842 5,930 
Lending 1,146 1,021 999 
Total Banking 15,577 14,078 13,916 
Fixed Income Markets 20,878 14,418 12,706 
Equity Markets 8,605 6,494 6,888 
Securities Services 4,253 4,154 4,245 
Credit Adjustments &
Other (29) 121 (373)
Total Markets &
Securities
Services 33,707 25,187 23,466 
Total net revenue $49,284 $39,265 $37,382 
In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was
realigned from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’s Wholesale Payments
business. In the fourth quarter of 2020, payment processing-only
clients along with the associated revenue and expenses were
realigned to CIB’s Wholesale Payments business from CCB and CB.
Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current
presentation.
(a)Includes credit valuation adjustments (“CVA”) managed centrally
within CIB and funding valuation adjustments (“FVA”) on
derivatives and certain components of fair value option elected
liabilities, which are primarily reported in principal transactions
revenue. Results are presented net of associated hedging
activities and net of CVA and FVA amounts allocated to Fixed
Income Markets and Equity Markets. Refer to Notes 2, 3 and 24
for additional information.
 (a)
(a)
(b)(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 71
Management’ s discussion and analysis
2020 compared with 2019
Net income was $17.1 billion, up 43%.
Net revenue was $49.3 billion, up 26%.
Banking revenue was $15.6 billion, up 11%.
•Investment Banking revenue was $8.9 billion, up 23%,
driven by higher Investment Banking fees, up 25%,
reflecting higher equity and debt underwriting fees.
The Firm maintained its #1 ranking for Global
Investment Banking fees with overall share gains,
according to Dealogic.
–Equity underwriting fees were $2.8 billion, up 66%,
predominantly in follow-on offerings and convertible
securities markets due to increased industry-wide
fees.
–Debt underwriting fees were $4.4 billion, up 23%,
driven by increased industry-wide fees and wallet
share gains in investment grade and high yield
bonds. The increased activity resulted in part from
clients seeking liquidity in the first half of the year as
a result of the COVID-19 pandemic.
–Advisory fees of $2.4 billion were flat, reflecting an
increase in wallet share, despite a decrease in
industry-wide fees.
•Wholesale Payments revenue was $5.6 billion, down
5%, driven by deposit margin compression and a
reporting reclassification for certain expenses which
are now reported as a reduction of revenue in
Merchant Services, largely offset by higher deposit
balances.
•Lending revenue was $1.1 billion, up 12%,
predominantly driven by higher net interest income
reflecting higher yields on new loans and higher loan
balances, as well as higher loan commitment fees,
largely offset by fair value losses on hedges of accrual
loans.Markets & Securities Services revenue was $33.7
billion, up 34%. Markets revenue was $29.5 billion, up
41%.
•Fixed Income Markets revenue was $20.9 billion, up
45%, driven by strong client activity across products
primarily in Rates, Credit, Currencies & Emerging
Markets, and Securitized Products.
•Equity Markets revenue was $8.6 billion, up 33%,
driven by strong client activity across products.
•Securities Services revenue was $4.3 billion, up 2%,
driven by deposit balance and fee growth largely
offset by deposit margin compression.
The provision for credit losses was $2.7 billion,
compared with $277 million in the prior year. The
increase was driven by net additions to the allowance
for credit losses as a result of the impact of the COVID-
19 pandemic across multiple industries.
Noninterest expense was $23.5 billion, up 5%, driven by
higher volume- and revenue-related expense and legal
expense.
72 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Selected metrics
As of or for the year
ended 
 December 31,
 (in millions, except
headcount) 2020 2019 2018
Selected balance sheet
data (period-end)
Assets $1,097,219 $914,705 $909,292 
Loans:
Loans retained 133,296 121,733 129,389 
Loans held-for-sale and
loans at fair value 39,588 34,317 36,407 
Total loans 172,884 156,050 165,796 
Equity 80,000 80,000 70,000 
Selected balance sheet
data (average)
Assets $1,122,939 $993,508 $930,126 
Trading assets-debt and
equity instruments 422,237 376,182 321,280 
Trading assets-derivative
receivables 72,065 48,196 60,552 
Loans:
Loans retained 135,676 122,371 114,417 
Loans held-for-sale and
loans at fair value 33,792 32,884 30,317 
Total loans 169,468 155,255 144,734 
Equity 80,000 80,000 70,000 
Headcount 61,733 60,013 58,572 
In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was
realigned from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’s Wholesale Payments
business. In the fourth quarter of 2020, payment processing-only
clients along with the associated revenue and expenses were
realigned to CIB’s Wholesale Payments business from CCB and CB.
Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current
presentation, including an increase to period-end assets of $6.6 billion
and $6.2 billion and headcount of 4,022 and 4,092, as of December
31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
(a)Loans retained includes credit portfolio loans, loans held by
consolidated Firm-administered multi-seller conduits, trade finance
loans, mortgage-related secured lending, other held-for-investment
loans and overdrafts
(b)Loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value primarily reflect lending-
related positions originated and purchased in CIB Markets,
including loans held for securitization.
(c)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans and other assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to
conform with the current presentation.Selected metrics
As of or for the year
ended 
 December 31, 
 (in millions, except
ratios) 2020 2019 2018
Credit data and
quality statistics
Net charge-
offs/(recoveries) $ 370 $ 183 $ 93 
Nonperforming assets:
Nonaccrual loans:
Nonaccrual loans
retained 1,008 308 443 
Nonaccrual loans
held-for-sale and
loans at fair
value 1,662 644 921 
Total nonaccrual
loans 2,670 952 1,364 
Derivative
receivables 56 30 60 
Assets acquired in
loan satisfactions 85 70 57 
Total nonperforming
assets 2,811 1,052 1,481 
Allowance for credit
losses:
Allowance for loan
losses 2,366 1,202 1,199 
Allowance for
lending-related
commitments 1,534 848 754 
Total allowance for
credit losses 3,900 2,050 1,953 
Net charge-
off/(recovery) rate 0.27 % 0.15 % 0.08 %
Allowance for loan
losses to period-end
loans
retained 1.77 0.99 0.93 
Allowance for loan
losses to period-end
loans retained,
excluding trade
finance and conduits 2.54 1.31 1.24 
Allowance for loan
losses to nonaccrual
loans
retained 235 390 271 
Nonaccrual loans to
total period-end
loans 1.54 0.61 0.82 
(a)Allowance for loan losses of $278 million, $110 million and $174
million were held against these nonaccrual loans at December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
(b)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
(c)At December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, nonaccrual loans
excluded mortgage loans 90 or more days past due and insured
by U.S. government agencies of $316 million, $127 million and
$155 million, respectively. These amounts have been excluded
based upon the government guarantee.
(d)Loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value were excluded when
calculating the net charge-off/(recovery) rate.
(e)Management uses allowance for loan losses to period-end loans
retained, excluding trade finance and conduits, a non-GAAP
financial measure, to provide a more meaningful assessment of
CIB’s allowance coverage ratio.(a)
(b)(c)
(c)
(a)
(b)(c)(a)
(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
(a)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 73
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Investment banking fees
Year ended December 31,
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Advisory $ 2,368 $ 2,377 $ 2,509 
Equity underwriting 2,758 1,666 1,684 
Debt underwriting 4,351 3,532 3,280 
Total investment banking fees $ 9,477 $ 7,575 $ 7,473 
(a)Represents long-term debt and loan syndications.
League table results – wallet share
2020 2019 2018
Year ended December 31, Rank Share Rank Share Rank Share
Based on fees
M&A
Global # 2 9.3 %# 2 8.9 %# 2 8.6 %
U.S. 2 9.7 2 9.2 2 8.8 
Equity and equity-related
Global 2 8.6 1 9.3 1 9.0 
U.S. 2 11.1 2 13.2 1 12.3 
Long-term debt
Global 1 8.9 1 7.8 1 7.2 
U.S. 1 12.8 1 12.0 1 11.4 
Loan syndications
Global 1 11.1 1 10.1 1 10.1 
U.S. 1 11.5 1 12.5 1 12.3 
Global investment banking fees # 1 9.2 %# 1 8.9 %# 1 8.6 %
(a)Source: Dealogic as of January 4, 2021. Reflects the ranking of revenue wallet and market share.
(b)Global M&A excludes any withdrawn transactions. U.S. M&A revenue wallet represents wallet from client parents based in the U.S.
(c)Global equity and equity-related ranking includes rights offerings and Chinese A-Shares.
(d)Long-term debt rankings include investment-grade, high-yield, supranationals, sovereigns, agencies, covered bonds, asset-backed securities
(“ABS”) and mortgage-backed securities (“MBS”); and exclude money market, short-term debt, and U.S. municipal securities.
(e)Global investment banking fees exclude money market, short-term debt and shelf securities.
Markets revenue
The following table summarizes select income
statement data for the Markets businesses. Markets
consists of Fixed Income Markets and Equity Markets.
Markets revenue comprises principal transactions, fees,
commissions and other income, as well as net interest
income. The Firm assesses its Markets business
performance on a total revenue basis, as offsets may
occur across revenue line items. For example, securities
that generate net interest income may be risk-managed
by derivatives that are recorded in principal transactions
revenue. Refer to Notes 6 and 7 for a description of the
composition of these income statement line items.
Principal transactions reflects revenue on financial
instruments and commodities transactions that arise
from client-driven market-making activity. Principal
transactions revenue includes amounts recognized upon
executing new transactions with market participants, as
well as “inventory-related revenue”, which is revenue
recognized from gains and losses on derivatives and
other instruments that the Firm has been holding in
anticipation of, or in response to, client demand, and
changes in the fair value of instruments used by the
Firm to actively manage the risk exposure arising from
such inventory. Principal transactions revenue
recognized upon executing new transactions with
market participants is driven by many factors including
the level of client activity, the bid-offer spread (which is
the differencebetween the price at which a market participant is willing
and able to sell an instrument to the Firm and the price
at which another market participant is willing and able to
buy it from the Firm, and vice versa), market liquidity
and volatility. These factors are interrelated
and sensitive to the same factors that drive inventory-
related revenue, which include general market
conditions, such as interest rates, foreign exchange
rates, credit spreads, and equity and commodity
prices, as well as other macroeconomic conditions. 
 (a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
74 JPM Ch &C/2020F 10K
74 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
For the periods presented below, the predominant source of principal transactions revenue was the amount recognized
upon executing new transactions.
2020 2019 2018
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions, except where
otherwise noted)Fixed
Income
MarketsEquity
MarketsTotal
MarketsFixed
Income
MarketsEquity
MarketsTotal
MarketsFixed
Income
MarketsEquity
MarketsTotal
Markets
Principal transactions $11,857 $ 6,087 $17,944 $ 8,786 $ 5,739 $14,525 $ 7,560 $ 5,566 $13,126 
Lending- and deposit-related
fees 226 10 236 198 7 205 197 6 203 
Asset management,
administration and
commissions 411 2,087 2,498 407 1,775 2,182 410 1,794 2,204 
All other income 493 (62) 431 872 8 880 952 22 974 
Noninterest revenue 12,987 8,122 21,109 10,263 7,529 17,792 9,119 7,388 16,507 
Net interest income 7,891 483 8,374 4,155 (1,035) 3,120 3,587 (500) 3,087 
Total net revenue $20,878 $ 8,605 $29,483 $14,418 $ 6,494 $20,912 $12,706 $ 6,888 $19,594 
Loss days 4 1 5
(a)Loss days represent the number of days for which CIB Markets, which consists of Fixed Income Markets and Equity Markets, posted losses to
total net revenue. The loss days determined under this measure differ from the measure used to determine backtesting gains and losses. Daily
backtesting gains and losses include positions in the Firm’s Risk Management value-at-risk (“VaR”) measure and exclude select components of
total net revenue, which may more than offset backtesting gains or losses on a particular day. For more information on daily backtesting gains
and losses, refer to the VaR discussion on pages 137–139.
Selected metrics
As of or for the year ended 
 December 31, 
 (in millions, except where otherwise noted) 2020 2019 2018
Assets under custody (“AUC”) by asset class (period-end) (in billions):
Fixed Income $ 15,840 $ 13,498 $ 12,440 
Equity 11,489 10,100 8,078 
Other 3,651 3,233 2,699 
Total AUC $ 30,980 $ 26,831 $ 23,217 
Merchant processing volume (in billions) $ 1,597.3 $ 1,511.5 $ 1,366.1 
Client deposits and other third party liabilities (average) $ 610,555 $ 464,795 $ 434,422 
In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was realigned from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’s Wholesale Payments business.
Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(a)Consists of mutual funds, unit investment trusts, currencies, annuities, insurance contracts, options and other contracts.
(b)Represents total merchant processing volume across CIB, CCB and CB.
(c)Client deposits and other third-party liabilities pertain to the Wholesale Payments and Securities Services businesses.(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 75
Management’ s discussion and analysis
International metrics
As of or for the year ended 
 December 31, 
 (in millions, except where otherwise noted) 2020 2019 2018
Total net revenue
Europe/Middle East/Africa $ 13,872 $ 11,905 $ 12,422 
Asia-Pacific 7,524 5,319 5,077 
Latin America/Caribbean 1,931 1,543 1,473 
Total international net revenue 23,327 18,767 18,972 
North America 25,957 20,498 18,410 
Total net revenue $ 49,284 $ 39,265 $ 37,382 
Loans retained (period-end)
Europe/Middle East/Africa $ 27,659 $ 26,067 $ 23,648 
Asia-Pacific 12,802 14,759 17,101 
Latin America/Caribbean 5,425 6,173 6,515 
Total international loans 45,886 46,999 47,264 
North America 87,410 74,734 82,125 
Total loans retained $ 133,296 $ 121,733 $ 129,389 
Client deposits and other third-party liabilities (average)
Europe/Middle East/Africa $ 211,592 $ 174,477 $ 162,846 
Asia-Pacific 124,145 90,364 82,867 
Latin America/Caribbean 37,664 29,024 26,668 
Total international $ 373,401 $ 293,865 $ 272,381 
North America 237,154 170,930 162,041 
Total client deposits and other third-party liabilities $ 610,555 $ 464,795 $ 434,422 
AUC (period-end)
(in billions)
North America $ 20,028 $ 16,855 $ 14,359 
All other regions 10,952 9,976 8,858 
Total AUC $ 30,980 $ 26,831 $ 23,217 
In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was realigned from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’s Wholesale Payments business. In
the fourth quarter of 2020, payment processing-only clients along with the associated revenue and expenses were realigned to CIB’s Wholesale
Payments business from CCB and CB. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(a)Total net revenue and loans retained (excluding loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value) are based on the location of the trading desk, booking
location, or domicile of the client, as applicable.
(b)Client deposits and other third-party liabilities pertaining to the Wholesale Payments and Securities Services businesses, and AUC, are based on
the domicile of the client.
(c)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.(c) (c)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(b)
 
76 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
COMMERCIAL BANKING
Commercial Banking provides comprehensive
financial solutions, including lending, wholesale
payments, investment banking and asset
management products across three primary client
segments: Middle Market Banking, Corporate
Client Banking and Commercial Real Estate
Banking. Other includes amounts not aligned with
a primary client segment.
Middle Market Banking covers small and midsized
companies, local governments and nonprofit
clients.
Corporate Client Banking covers large
corporations.
Commercial Real Estate Banking covers investors,
developers, and owners of multifamily, office,
retail, industrial and affordable housing properties.
Selected income statement data
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Revenue
Lending- and deposit-related
fees $1,187 $ 941 $ 896 
All other income 1,880 1,769 1,724 
Noninterest revenue 3,067 2,710 2,620 
Net interest income 6,246 6,554 6,716 
Total net revenue 9,313 9,264 9,336 
Provision for credit losses 2,113 296 129 
Noninterest expense
Compensation expense 1,854 1,785 1,694 
Noncompensation expense 1,944 1,950 1,933 
Total noninterest expense 3,798 3,735 3,627 
Income before income tax
expense 3,402 5,233 5,580 
Income tax expense 824 1,275 1,316 
Net income $2,578 $3,958 $4,264 
In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was
realigned from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’s Wholesale Payments
business. In conjunction with this realignment, treasury services
product revenue has been renamed wholesale payments. In the fourth
quarter of 2020, payment processing-only clients along with the
associated revenue and expenses were realigned to CIB’s Wholesale
Payments business from CCB and CB. Prior-period revenue and
expense amounts have been revised to conform with the current
presentation.
(a)In the first quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fees from
asset management, administration and commissions (which are
included in all other income) to lending and deposit-related fees.
Prior period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current period presentation.
(b)Total net revenue included tax-equivalent adjustments from
income tax credits related to equity investments in designated
community development entities and in entities established for
rehabilitation of historic properties, as well as tax-exempt income
related to municipal financing activities of $351 million, $460
million and $444 million for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018, respectively.2020 compared with 2019
Net income was $2.6 billion, a decrease of 35%, driven
by an increase in the provision for credit losses.
Net revenue was $9.3 billion, flat compared to the prior
year. Net interest income was $6.2 billion, a decrease of
5%, driven by deposit margin compression,
predominantly offset by higher deposit balances and
lending revenue. Noninterest revenue was $3.1 billion,
an increase of 13%, driven by higher deposit-related
fees, particularly cash management fees, higher
investment banking revenue, and a gain on a strategic
investment. The increase was partially offset by a $56
million markdown of a held-for-sale position and lower
card income, primarily due to lower volumes as a result
of the COVID-19 pandemic.
Noninterest expense was $3.8 billion, an increase of
2%, driven by higher compensation expense.
The provision for credit losses was $2.1 billion,
compared to $296 million in the prior year. The increase
was driven by net additions to the allowance for credit
losses as a result of the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic across multiple industries.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 (a)
(a)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 77
Management’ s discussion and analysis
CB product revenue consists of the following:
Lending includes a variety of financing alternatives,
which are primarily provided on a secured basis;
collateral includes receivables, inventory, equipment, real
estate or other assets. Products include term loans,
revolving lines of credit, bridge financing, asset-based
structures, leases, and standby letters of credit.
Wholesale payments includes revenue from a broad
range of products and services that enable CB clients to
manage payments and receipts, as well as invest and
manage funds.
Investment banking includes revenue from a range of
products providing CB clients with sophisticated capital-
raising alternatives, as well as balance sheet and risk
management tools through advisory, equity underwriting,
and loan syndications. Revenue from Fixed Income and
Equity Markets products used by CB clients is also
included.
Other product revenue primarily includes tax-equivalent
adjustments generated from Community Development
Banking activities and certain income derived from
principal transactions.
Selected income statement data
(continued)
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions, except ratios) 2020 2019 2018
Revenue by product
Lending $4,396 $4,057 $4,049 
Wholesale payments 3,715 4,200 4,351 
Investment banking 1,069 919 852 
Other 133 88 84 
Total Commercial Banking
net revenue $9,313 $9,264 $9,336 
Investment banking
revenue, gross $3,348 $2,744 $2,491 
Revenue by client
segment
Middle Market Banking $3,640 $3,805 $3,797 
Corporate Client Banking 3,203 3,119 3,119 
Commercial Real Estate
Banking 2,313 2,169 2,251 
Other 157 171 169 
Total Commercial
Banking net revenue $9,313 $9,264 $9,336 
Financial ratios
Return on equity 11 % 17 % 20 %
Overhead ratio 41 40 39 
In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was
realigned from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’s Wholesale Payments
business. In conjunction with this realignment, treasury services
product revenue has been renamed wholesale payments. In the fourth
quarter of 2020, payment processing-only clients along with the
associated revenue and expenses were realigned to CIB’s Wholesale
Payments business from CCB and CB. Prior-period revenue and
expense amounts have been revised to conform with the current
presentation.
(a)Includes CB’s share of revenue from investment banking products
sold to CB clients through the CIB.
(b)Refer to Business Segment Results page 65 for a discussion of
revenue sharing.Selected metrics
As of or for the year
ended December 31, (in
millions, except
headcount) 2020 2019 2018
Selected balance sheet
data (period-end)
Total assets $228,932 $220,514 $220,229 
Loans:
Loans retained 207,880 207,287 204,219 
Loans held-for-sale
and loans at fair value 2,245 1,009 1,978 
Total loans $210,125 $208,296 $206,197 
Equity 22,000 22,000 20,000 
Period-end loans by
client segment
Middle Market Banking$61,115 $54,188 $56,656 
Corporate Client Banking 47,420 51,165 48,343 
Commercial Real Estate
Banking 101,146 101,951 100,088 
Other 444 992 1,110 
Total Commercial
Banking loans $210,125 $208,296 $206,197 
Selected balance sheet
data (average)
Total assets $233,158 $218,896 $218,259 
Loans:
Loans retained 217,767 206,837 204,243 
Loans held-for-sale
and loans at fair value 1,129 1,082 1,258 
Total loans $218,896 $207,919 $205,501 
Client deposits and other
third-party liabilities 237,825 172,734 170,901 
Equity 22,000 22,000 20,000 
Average loans by client
segment
Middle Market Banking$61,558 $55,690 $57,092 
Corporate Client Banking 54,172 50,360 47,780 
Commercial Real Estate
Banking 102,479 100,884 99,243 
Other 687 985 1,386 
Total Commercial
Banking loans $218,896 $207,919 $205,501 
Headcount 11,675 11,629 11,042 
(a)At December 31, 2020, total loans included $6.6 billion of loans
under the PPP, of which $6.4 billion were in Middle Market
Banking. Refer to Credit Portfolio on pages 112-113 for a further
discussion of the PPP.(a)
(b)(a)
(a)
78 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Selected metrics
As of or for the year ended
December 31, (in millions,
except ratios) 2020 2019 2018
Credit data and quality
statistics
Net charge-
offs/(recoveries) $ 401 $ 160 $ 53 
Nonperforming assets
Nonaccrual loans:
Nonaccrual loans
retained 1,286 498 511 
Nonaccrual loans held-
for-sale and loans at fair
value 120 — — 
Total nonaccrual loans 1,406 498 511 
Assets acquired in loan
satisfactions 24 25 2 
Total nonperforming
assets 1,430 523 513 
Allowance for credit losses:
Allowance for loan losses 3,335 2,780 2,682 
Allowance for lending-
related commitments 651 293 254 
Total allowance for credit
losses 3,986 3,073 2,936 
Net charge-off/(recovery)
rate 0.18 % 0.08 % 0.03 %
Allowance for loan losses
to period-end loans
retained 1.60 1.34 1.31 
Allowance for loan losses
to nonaccrual loans
retained 259 558 525 
Nonaccrual loans to period-
end total loans 0.67 0.24 0.25 
(a)Allowance for loan losses of $273 million, $114 million and $92
million was held against nonaccrual loans retained at
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
(b)Loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value were excluded when
calculating the net charge-off/(recovery) rate.(a)
(b)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 79
Management’ s discussion and analysis
ASSET & WEAL TH MANAGEMENT
Asset & Wealth Management, with client assets of
$3.7 trillion, is a global leader in investment and
wealth management.
 
Asset Management
Offers multi-asset investment management
solutions across equities, fixed income, alternatives
and money market funds to institutional and retail
investors providing for a broad range of clients’
investment needs.
 
Wealth Management
Provides retirement products and services,
brokerage, custody, trusts and estates, loans,
mortgages, deposits and investment management
to high net worth clients.
 
The majority of AWM’s client assets are in actively
managed portfolios.
Selected income statement
data
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions, except ratios 
 and headcount) 2020 2019 2018
Revenue
Asset management,
administration and
commissions $10,610 $9,818 $9,808 
All other income 212 418 244 
Noninterest revenue 10,822 10,236 10,052 
Net interest income 3,418 3,355 3,375 
Total net revenue 14,240 13,591 13,427 
Provision for credit losses 263 59 52 
Noninterest expense
Compensation expense 4,959 5,028 4,888 
Noncompensation expense 4,998 4,719 4,687 
Total noninterest expense 9,957 9,747 9,575 
Income before income tax
expense 4,020 3,785 3,800 
Income tax expense 1,028 918 855 
Net income $2,992 $2,867 $2,945 
Revenue by line of
business
Asset Management $7,654 $7,254 $7,163 
Wealth Management 6,586 6,337 6,264 
Total net revenue $14,240 $13,591 $13,427 
Financial ratios
Return on common equity 28 % 26 % 32 %
Overhead ratio 70 72 71 
Pre-tax margin ratio:
Asset Management 29 26 26 
Wealth Management 27 30 30 
Asset & Wealth
Management 28 28 28 
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm realigned certain wealth
management clients from AWM to CCB. Prior-period amounts have
been revised to conform with the current presentation, including a
decrease to net revenue of $725 million and $649 million for the years
ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. Effective in the first
quarter of 2021, the Wealth Management business was renamed
Global Private Bank.2020 compared with 2019
Net income was $3.0 billion, an increase of 4%.
Net revenue was $14.2 billion, an increase of 5%. Net
interest income was $3.4 billion, up 2%, driven by higher
deposit and loan balances as well as loan margin
expansion, offset by deposit margin compression.
Noninterest revenue was $10.8 billion, up 6%,
predominantly driven by higher asset management fees
as a result of net inflows into liquidity and long term
products, higher performance fees and increased
brokerage commissions on higher client-driven volume,
partially offset by lower net investment valuation gains.
Revenue from Asset Management was $7.7 billion, up
6%, predominantly driven by higher asset management
fees as a result of net inflows into liquidity products as
well as higher performance fees, partially offset by lower
net investment valuation gains.
Revenue from Wealth Management was $6.6 billion, up
4%, predominantly driven by higher deposit and loan
balances, increased brokerage commissions and asset
management fees, largely offset by deposit margin
compression.
The provision for credit losses was $263 million, driven
by additions to the allowance for credit losses,
predominantly as a result of the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic.
Noninterest expense was $10.0 billion, an increase of
2%, driven by legal expense, volume- and revenue-
related expense as well as investments in the business,
partially offset by lower structural expense.
80 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
AWM’s client segments consist of the following:
Private Banking clients include high- and ultra-high-net-worth
individuals, families, money managers and business owners.
Institutional clients include both corporate and public institutions,
endowments, foundations, nonprofit organizations and governments
worldwide.
Retail clients include financial intermediaries and individual
investors.
Asset Management has two high-level measures
of its overall fund performance.
• Percentage of mutual fund assets under management in
funds rated 4- or 5-star: Mutual fund rating services rank funds
based on their risk-adjusted performance over various periods. A
5-star rating is the best rating and represents the top 10% of
industry-wide ranked funds. A 4-star rating represents the next
22.5% of industry-wide ranked funds. A 3-star rating represents the
next 35% of industry-wide ranked funds. A 2-star rating represents
the next 22.5% of industry-wide ranked funds. A 1-star rating is the
worst rating and represents the bottom 10% of industry-wide
ranked funds. The “overall Morningstar rating” is derived from a
weighted average of the performance associated with a fund’s
three-, five- and ten-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics.
For U.S. domiciled funds, separate star ratings are given at the
individual share class level. The Nomura “star rating” is based on
three-year risk-adjusted performance only. Funds with fewer than
three years of history are not rated and hence excluded from this
analysis. All ratings, the assigned peer categories and the asset
values used to derive this analysis are sourced from these fund
rating providers mentioned in footnote (a). The data providers re-
denominate the asset values into U.S. dollars. This % of AUM is
based on star ratings at the share class level for U.S. domiciled
funds, and at a “primary share class” level to represent the star
rating of all other funds except for Japan where Nomura provides
ratings at the fund level. The “primary share class”, as defined by
Morningstar, denotes the share class recommended as being the
best proxy for the portfolio and in most cases will be the most retail
version (based upon annual management charge, minimum
investment, currency and other factors). The performance data
could have been different if all funds/accounts would have been
included. Past performance is not indicative of future results.
• Percentage of mutual fund assets under management in
funds ranked in the 1st or 2nd quartile (one, three and five
years): All quartile rankings, the assigned peer categories and the
asset values used to derive this analysis are sourced from the fund
ranking providers mentioned in footnote (b). Quartile rankings are
done on the net-of-fee absolute return of each fund. The data
providers re-denominate the asset values into U.S. dollars. This %
of AUM is based on fund performance and associated peer
rankings at the share class level for U.S. domiciled funds and at
the “primary share class” level or fund level for all other funds. The
“primary share class”, as defined by Morningstar, denotes the
share class recommended as being the best proxy for the portfolio
and in most cases will be the most retail version (based upon
annual management charge, minimum investment, currency and
other factors). Where peer group rankings given for a fund are in
more than one “primary share class” territory both rankings are
included to reflect local market competitiveness. The performance
data could have been different if all funds/accounts would have
been included. Past performance is not indicative of future results.Selected metrics
As of or for the year
ended December 31,
(in millions, except
ranking data and
ratios) 2020 2019 2018
% of JPM mutual fund
assets rated as 4- or
5-star 55 % 61 % 58 %
% of JPM mutual fund
assets ranked in 1 or
2
quartile:
1 year 55 59 68 
3 years 69 77 73 
5 years 68 75 85 
Selected balance
sheet data (period-
end)
Total assets $203,384 $173,175 $161,047 
Loans 186,608 158,149 145,794 
Deposits 198,755 142,740 133,276 
Equity 10,500 10,500 9,000 
Selected balance
sheet data (average)
Total assets $181,432 $161,863 $151,632 
Loans 166,311 147,404 136,929 
Deposits 161,955 135,265 132,123 
Equity 10,500 10,500 9,000 
Headcount 20,683 21,550 21,520
Number of Wealth
Management client
advisors 2,462 2,419 2,385
Credit data and
quality statistics
Net charge-
offs/(recoveries) $ (14)$ 29 $ — 
Nonaccrual loans 785 115 263 
Allowance for credit
losses:
Allowance for loan
losses 598 350 326 
Allowance for lending-
related commitments 38 19 16 
Total allowance for
credit losses 636 369 342 
Net charge-
off/(recovery) rate (0.01)% 0.02 % — %
Allowance for loan
losses to period-end
loans 0.32 0.22 0.22 
Allowance for loan
losses to nonaccrual
loans 76 304 124 
Nonaccrual loans to
period-end loans 0.42 0.07 0.18 
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm realigned certain wealth
management clients from AWM to CCB. Prior-period amounts have
been revised to conform with the current presentation, including a
decrease to headcount of 2,641 and 2,400 as of December 31, 2019
and 2018, respectively.
(a)Represents the Nomura “star rating” for Japan domiciled funds
and Morningstar for all other domiciled funds. Includes only Asset
Management retail open-ended mutual funds that have a rating.
Excludes money market funds, Undiscovered Managers Fund, and
Brazil domiciled funds.
(b)Quartile ranking sourced from Lipper, Morningstar and Nomura
based on country of domicile. Includes only Asset Management
retail open-ended mutual funds that are ranked by the
aforementioned sources. Excludes money market funds,
Undiscovered Managers Fund, and Brazil domiciled funds.
(c)Loans, deposits and related credit data and quality statistics relate
to the Wealth Management business.(a)
st
nd
(b)
(c)
(c)
(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 81
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Client assets
2020 compared with 2019
Client assets were $3.7 trillion, an increase of 18%.
Assets under management were $2.7 trillion, an
increase of 17% driven by the impact of higher market
levels and net inflows into both long-term and liquidity
products.
Client assets
December 31, 
 (in billions) 2020 2019 2018
Assets by asset class
Liquidity $ 641 $ 539 $ 477 
Fixed income 671 591 455 
Equity 595 463 376 
Multi-asset 656 596 515 
Alternatives 153 139 135 
Total assets under
management 2,716 2,328 1,958 
Custody/brokerage/
administration/deposits 936 761 661 
Total client assets $ 3,652 $ 3,089 $ 2,619 
Assets by client segment
Private Banking $ 689 $ 628 $ 518 
Institutional 1,273 1,081 930 
Retail 754 619 510 
Total assets under
management $ 2,716 $ 2,328 $ 1,958 
Private Banking $ 1,581 $ 1,359 $ 1,155 
Institutional 1,311 1,106 950 
Retail 760 624 514 
Total client assets $ 3,652 $ 3,089 $ 2,619 
Client assets
(continued)
Year ended December 31,
 (in billions) 2020 2019 2018
Assets under management
rollforward
Beginning balance $ 2,328 $ 1,958 $ 2,010 
Net asset flows:
Liquidity 104 61 30 
Fixed income 48 104 (4)
Equity 33 (11) — 
Multi-asset 5 2 17 
Alternatives 6 2 5 
Market/performance/other
impacts 192 212 (100)
Ending balance, December 31$ 2,716 $ 2,328 $ 1,958 
Client assets rollforward
Beginning balance $ 3,089 $ 2,619 $ 2,685 
Net asset flows 276 176 74 
Market/performance/other
impacts 287 294 (140)
Ending balance, December 31$ 3,652 $ 3,089 $ 2,619 
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm realigned certain wealth
management clients from AWM to CCB. Prior-period amounts have
been revised to conform with the current presentation, including a
decrease to client assets of $137 billion and $114 billion as of
December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.International metrics
Year ended December 31,
 (in billions, except where
otherwise noted) 2020 2019 2018
Total net revenue (in millions)
Europe/Middle East/Africa $ 2,956 $ 2,869 $ 2,850 
Asia-Pacific 1,665 1,509 1,538 
Latin America/Caribbean 782 724 755 
Total international net revenue 5,403 5,102 5,143 
North America 8,837 8,489 8,284 
Total net revenue $14,240 $13,591 $13,427 
Assets under management
Europe/Middle East/Africa $ 517 $ 428 $ 366 
Asia-Pacific 224 192 163 
Latin America/Caribbean 70 62 51 
Total international assets
under management 811 682 580 
North America 1,905 1,646 1,378 
Total assets under
management $ 2,716 $ 2,328 $ 1,958 
Client assets
Europe/Middle East/Africa $ 622 $ 520 $ 440 
Asia-Pacific 330 272 226 
Latin America/Caribbean 166 147 125 
Total international client
assets 1,118 939 791 
North America 2,534 2,150 1,828 
Total client assets $ 3,652 $ 3,089 $ 2,619 
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm realigned certain wealth
management clients from AWM to CCB. Prior-period amounts have
been revised to conform with the current presentation, including a
decrease to net revenue of $725 million and $649 million for the years
ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, and client assets of
$137 billion and $114 billion as of December 31, 2019 and 2018,
respectively.
(a)Regional revenue is based on the domicile of the client.
(b)The prior period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current period presentation.(a)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
82 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
CORPORA TE
The Corporate segment consists of Treasury and
Chief Investment Office and Other Corporate,
which includes corporate staff functions and
expense that is centrally managed. Treasury and
CIO is predominantly responsible for measuring,
monitoring, reporting and managing the Firm’s
liquidity, funding, capital, structural interest rate
and foreign exchange risks. The major Other
Corporate functions include Real Estate,
Technology, Legal, Corporate Finance, Human
Resources, Internal Audit, Risk Management,
Compliance, Control Management, Corporate
Responsibility and various Other Corporate
groups.
Selected income statement and balance sheet data
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions, except
headcount) 2020 2019 2018
Revenue
Principal transactions $ 245 $ (461)$ (426)
Investment securities
gains/(losses) 795 258 (395)
All other income 159 89 558 
Noninterest revenue 1,199 (114) (263)
Net interest income (2,375) 1,325 135 
Total net revenue (1,176) 1,211 (128)
Provision for credit losses 66 (1) (4)
Noninterest expense 1,373 1,067 902 
Income/(loss) before
income tax
expense/(benefit) (2,615) 145 (1,026)
Income tax
expense/(benefit) (865) (966) 215 
Net income/(loss) $ (1,750)$ 1,111 $ (1,241)
Total net revenue
Treasury and CIO (1,368) 2,032 510 
Other Corporate 192 (821) (638)
Total net revenue $ (1,176)$ 1,211 $ (128)
Net income/(loss)
Treasury and CIO (1,403) 1,394 (69)
Other Corporate (347) (283) (1,172)
Total net income/(loss) $ (1,750)$ 1,111 $ (1,241)
Total assets (period-end)$1,359,831 $837,618 $771,787 
Loans (period-end) 1,657 1,649 1,597 
Headcount 38,366 38,033 37,145 
(a)Included tax-equivalent adjustments, driven by tax-exempt income
from municipal bonds, of $241 million, $314 million and $382
million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively.2020 compared with 2019
Net income was a loss of $1.8 billion compared with
income of $1.1 billion in the prior year.
Net revenue was a loss of $1.2 billion, compared with
revenue of $1.2 billion in the prior year, driven by lower
net interest income partially offset by higher noninterest
revenue. The decrease in net interest income was
predominantly driven by lower rates, including the
impact of faster prepayments on mortgage-backed
securities, as well as limited opportunities to deploy
funds in response to significant deposit growth across
the LOBs.
Noninterest revenue increased reflecting higher net
valuations on certain legacy equity investments and
higher net investment securities gains due to the
repositioning of the investment securities portfolio.
Noninterest expense of $1.4 billion was up $305 million
driven by an impairment on a legacy investment.
The provision for credit losses relates to the HTM
portfolio, which became subject to the CECL accounting
guidance beginning on January 1, 2020.
Refer to Note 10 and Note 13 for additional information
on the investment securities portfolio and the allowance
for credit losses.
The current period income tax benefit was
predominantly driven by a lower level of pre-tax income
and changes in the level and mix of income and
expenses subject to U.S. federal, and state and local
taxes. The prior period included $1.1 billion of tax
benefits related to the resolution of certain tax audits.
 
 (a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 83
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Treasury and  CIO overview
Treasury and CIO is predominantly responsible for
measuring, monitoring, reporting and managing the
Firm’s liquidity, funding, capital, structural interest rate
and foreign exchange risks. The risks managed by
Treasury and CIO arise from the activities undertaken
by the Firm’s four major reportable business segments
to serve their respective client bases, which generate
both on- and off-balance sheet assets and liabilities.
Treasury and CIO seek to achieve the Firm’s asset-
liability management objectives generally by investing in
high-quality securities that are managed for the longer-
term as part of the Firm’s investment securities portfolio.
Treasury and CIO also use derivatives to meet the
Firm’s asset-liability management objectives. Refer to
Note 5 for further information on derivatives. In addition,
Treasury and CIO manage the Firm’s cash position
primarily through deposits at central banks and
investments in short-term instruments. Refer to Liquidity
Risk Management on pages 102–108 for further
information on liquidity and funding risk. Refer to Market
Risk Management on pages 135–142 for information on
interest rate, foreign exchange and other risks.
The investment securities portfolio primarily consists of
U.S. GSE and government agency and nonagency
mortgage-backed securities, U.S. and non-U.S.
government securities, obligations of U.S. states and
municipalities, other ABS and corporate debt securities.
At December 31, 2020, the investment securities
portfolio was $587.9 billion, and the average credit
rating of the securities comprising the portfolio was AA+
(based upon external ratings where available and,
where not available, based primarily upon internal risk
ratings). Refer to Note 10 for further information on the
Firm’s investment securities portfolio and internal risk
ratings.Selected income statement and balance sheet data
As of or for the year ended
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Investment securities
gains/(losses) $ 795 $ 258 $ (395)
Available-for-sale securities
(average) $413,367 $283,205 $203,449 
Held-to-maturity securities
(average) 94,569 34,939 31,747 
Investment securities
portfolio (average) $507,936 $318,144 $235,196 
Available-for-sale securities
(period-end) $386,065 $348,876 $228,681 
Held-to-maturity securities,
net of allowance for credit
losses (period–end) 201,821 47,540 31,434 
Investment securities
portfolio, net of allowance
for credit losses (period–
end) $587,886 $396,416 $260,115 
(a)At December 31, 2020, the allowance for credit losses on HTM
securities was $78 million.
(b)During 2020, the Firm transferred $164.2 billion of investment
securities from AFS to HTM for capital management purposes.
Refer to Note 10 for further information.
 (a)(b)
(a)
84 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
FIRMWIDE RISK MANAGEMENT
Risk is an inherent part of JPMorgan Chase’s business
activities. When the Firm extends a consumer or
wholesale loan, advises customers and clients on their
investment decisions, makes markets in securities, or
offers other products or services, the Firm takes on
some degree of risk. The Firm’s overall objective is to
manage its businesses, and the associated risks, in a
manner that balances serving the interests of its clients,
customers and investors and protects the safety and
soundness of the Firm.
The Firm believes that effective risk management
requires, among other things:
•Acceptance of responsibility, including identification
and escalation of risks by all individuals within the
Firm;
•Ownership of risk identification, assessment, data
and management within each of the LOBs and
Corporate; and
•Firmwide structures for risk governance.
The Firm follows a disciplined and balanced
compensation framework with strong internal
governance and independent oversight by the Board of
Directors (the “Board”). The impact of risk and control
issues is carefully considered in the Firm’s performance
evaluation and incentive compensation processes.
Risk governance and oversight framework
The Firm’s risk management governance and oversight
framework involves understanding drivers of risks, types
of risks, and impacts of risks. 
Drivers of Risks are factors that cause a risk to exist.
Drivers of risks include the economic environment,
regulatory and government policy, competitor and
market evolution, business decisions, process and
judgment error, deliberate wrongdoing, dysfunctional
markets, and natural disasters.
Types of Risks are categories by which risks manifest
themselves. Risks are generally categorized in the
following four risk types:
•Strategic risk is the risk to earnings, capital, liquidity
or reputation associated with poorly designed or
failed business plans or inadequate response to
changes in the operating environment.
•Credit and investment risk is the risk associated with
the default or change in credit profile of a client,
counterparty or customer; or loss of principal or a
reduction in expected returns on investments,
includingconsumer credit risk, wholesale credit risk, and
investment portfolio risk.
•Market risk is the risk associated with the effect of
changes in market factors, such as interest and
foreign exchange rates, equity and commodity
prices, credit spreads or implied volatilities, on the
value of assets and liabilities held for both the short
and long term.
•Operational risk is the risk associated with an
adverse outcome resulting from inadequate or failed
internal processes or systems; human factors; or
external events impacting the Firm’s processes or
systems. It includes compliance, conduct, legal, and
estimations and model risk.
Impacts of Risks are consequences of risks, both
quantitative and qualitative. There may be many
consequences of risks manifesting, including
quantitative impacts such as a reduction in earnings and
capital, liquidity outflows, and fines or penalties, or
qualitative impacts such as reputation damage, loss of
clients and customers, and regulatory and enforcement
actions.
The Firm’s risk governance and oversight framework is
managed on a Firmwide basis. The Firm has an
Independent Risk Management (“IRM”) function, which
consists of the Risk Management and Compliance
organizations. The Chief Executive Officer (“CEO”)
appoints, subject to approval by the Risk Committee of
the Board (“Board Risk Committee”), the Firm’s Chief
Risk Officer (“CRO”) to lead the IRM organization and
manage the risk governance structure of the Firm. The
framework is subject to approval by the Board Risk
Committee in the form of the Risk Governance and
Oversight Policy. The Firm’s CRO oversees and
delegates authorities to LOB CROs, Firmwide Risk
Executives (“FREs”), and the Firm’s Chief Compliance
Officer (“CCO”), who each establish Risk Management
and Compliance organizations, set the Firm’s risk
governance policies and standards, and define and
oversee the implementation of the Firm’s risk
governance. The LOB CROs are responsible for risks
that arise in their LOBs, while FREs oversee risk areas
that span across the individual LOBs, functions and
regions.
Three lines of defense
The Firm relies upon each of its LOBs and Corporate
areas giving rise to risk to operate within the parameters
identified by the IRM function, and within its own
management-identified risk and control standards. Each
LOB and Treasury & CIO, including their aligned
Operations, Technology and Control Management, are
the Firm’s “first line of defense” and own the
identification of risks, as well as the design and
execution of controls to manage those risks. The first
line of defense is responsible for adherence to
applicable laws, rules and regulations and for the
implementation of the risk management structure (which
may include policy, standards, limits, thresholds and
controls) established by IRM.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 85
Management’ s discussion and analysis
The IRM function is independent of the businesses and
is the Firm’s “second line of defense.” The IRM function
independently assesses and challenges the first line of
defense risk management practices. IRM is also
responsible for its own adherence to applicable laws,
rules and regulations and for the implementation of
policies and standards established by IRM with respect
to its own processes.
Internal Audit is an independent function that provides
objective assessment on the adequacy and
effectiveness of Firmwide processes, controls,
governance and risk management as the “third line of
defense.” The Internal Audit Function is headed by the
General Auditor, who reports to the Audit Committee
and administratively to the CEO.
In addition, there are other functions that contribute to
the Firmwide control environment but are not considered
part of a particular line of defense, including Finance,
Human Resources and Legal.
Risk identification and ownership
Each LOB and Corporate area owns the ongoing
identification of risks, as well as the design and
execution of controls, inclusive of IRM-specified
controls, to manage those risks. To support this activity,
the Firm has a formal Risk Identification framework
designed to facilitate their responsibility to identify
material risks inherent to the Firm, catalog them in a
central repository and review the most material risks on
a regular basis. The IRM function reviews and
challenges the LOB and Corporate’s identified risks,
maintains the central repository and provides the
consolidated Firmwide results to the Firmwide Risk
Committee (“FRC”) and Board Risk Committee.
Risk appetite
The Firm’s overall appetite for risk is governed by a
“Risk Appetite” framework. The framework and the
Firm’s risk appetite are set and approved by the Firm’s
CEO, Chief Financial Officer (“CFO”) and CRO.
Quantitative parameters and qualitative factors are used
to monitor and measure the Firm’s capacity to take risk
consistent with its stated risk appetite. Qualitative
factors have been established to assess select
operational risks, and impact to the Firm’s reputation.
Risk Appetite results are reported to the Board Risk
Committee.
86 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Risk governance and oversight structure
The independent status of the IRM function is supported by a governance structure that provides for escalation of risk
issues to senior management, the FRC, and the Board of Directors, as appropriate.
The chart below illustrates the committees of the Board of Directors and key senior management-level committees in
the Firm’s risk governance structure. In addition, there are other committees, forums and paths of escalation that
support the oversight of risk which are not shown in the chart below or described in this Form 10-K.
The Firm’s Operating Committee, which consists of the
Firm’s CEO, CRO, CFO, General Counsel, CEOs of the
LOBs and other senior executives, is accountable to and
may refer matters to the Firm’s Board of Directors. The
Operating Committee is responsible for escalating to the
Board the information necessary to facilitate the Board’s
exercise of its duties.
Board oversight
The Firm’s Board of Directors provides oversight of risk.
The Board Risk Committee is the principal committee
that oversees risk matters. The Audit Committee
oversees the control environment, and the
Compensation & Management Development Committee
oversees compensation and other management-related
matters. Each committee of the Board oversees
reputational risks and conduct risks within its scope of
responsibility.
The JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. Board of Directors is
responsible for the oversight of management of the
bank. The JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. Board
accomplishes this function acting directly and through
the principal standing committees of the Firm’s Board of
Directors. Risk and control oversight on behalf of
JPMorgan Chase Bank N.A. is primarily the
responsibility of the Risk Committee and the Audit
Committee, respectively, and, with respect tocompensation and other management-related matters,
the Compensation & Management Development
Committee.
The Board Risk Committee assists the Board in its
oversight of management’s responsibility to implement a
global risk management framework reasonably
designed to identify, assess and manage the Firm’s
risks. The Board Risk Committee’s responsibilities
include approval of applicable primary risk policies and
review of certain associated frameworks, analysis and
reporting established by management. Breaches in risk
appetite and parameters, issues that may have a
material adverse impact on the Firm, including capital
and liquidity issues, and other significant risk-related
matters are escalated to the Board Risk Committee, as
appropriate.
The Audit Committee assists the Board in its oversight
of management’s responsibility to ensure that there is
an effective system of controls reasonably designed to
safeguard the Firm’s assets and income, ensure the
integrity of the Firm’s financial statements, and maintain
compliance with the Firm’s ethical standards, policies,
plans and procedures, and with laws and regulations. It
also assists the Board in its oversight of the Firm’s
independent registered public accounting firm’s
qualifications, independence and performance, and of
the performance of the Firm’s Internal Audit function.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 87
Management’ s discussion and analysis
The Compensation & Management Development
Committee (“CMDC”) assists the Board in its oversight
of the Firm’s compensation principles and practices. The
CMDC reviews and approves the Firm’s compensation
and qualified benefits programs. The Committee reviews
the performance of Operating Committee members
against their goals, and approves their compensation
awards. In addition, the CEO’s award is subject to
ratification by the independent directors of the Board.
The CMDC also reviews the development of and
succession for key executives, and provides oversight of
the Firm’s culture, including reviewing updates from
management regarding significant conduct issues and
any related employee actions, including compensation
actions.
The Public Responsibility Committee assists the Board
in its oversight of the Firm's positions and practices on
public responsibility matters such as community
investment, fair lending, sustainability, consumer
practices and other public policy issues that reflect the
Firm's values and character and could impact the Firm's
reputation among its stakeholders. The Committee also
provides guidance on these matters to management and
the Board, as appropriate.
The Corporate Governance & Nominating Committee
exercises general oversight with respect to the
governance of the Board of Directors. It reviews the
qualifications of and recommends to the Board of
Directors proposed nominees for election to the Board.
The Committee evaluates and recommends to the
Board corporate governance practices applicable to the
Firm. It also appraises the framework for assessing the
Board’s performance and self-evaluation.Management oversight
The Firm’s senior management-level committees that
are primarily responsible for key risk-related functions
include:
The Firmwide Risk Committee (“FRC”) is the Firm’s
highest management-level risk committee. It provides
oversight of the risks inherent in the Firm’s businesses
and serves as an escalation point for risk topics and
issues raised by underlying committees and/or FRC
members.
The Firmwide Control Committee (“FCC”) is an
escalation committee for senior management to review
and discuss the Firmwide operational risk environment
including identified issues, operational risk metrics and
significant events that have been escalated.
Line of Business and Regional Risk Committees are
responsible for providing oversight of the governance,
limits, and controls that are in place through the scope
of their activities. These committees review the ways in
which the particular LOB or the business operating in a
particular region could be exposed to adverse outcomes
with a focus on identifying, accepting, escalating and/or
requiring remediation of matters brought to these
committees.
Line of Business and Corporate Function Control
Committees oversee the operational risk and control
environment of their respective business or function,
inclusive of Operational Risk, Compliance and Conduct
Risks. As part of that mandate, they are responsible for
reviewing indicators of elevated or emerging risks and
other data that may impact the level of operating risk in
a business or function, addressing key operational risk
issues, focusing on processes with control concerns and
overseeing control remediation.
The Asset and Liability Committee (“ALCO”) is
responsible for overseeing the Firm’s asset and liability
management (“ALM”) activities and the management of
liquidity risk, balance sheet, interest rate risk, and capital
risk.
The Firmwide Valuation Governance Forum (“VGF”) is
composed of senior finance and risk executives and is
responsible for overseeing the management of risks
arising from valuation activities conducted across the
Firm.
 
88 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Risk governance and oversight functions
The Firm manages its risk through risk governance and
oversight functions. The scope of a particular function
may include one or more drivers, types and/or impacts
of risk. For example, Country Risk Management
oversees country risk which may be a driver of risk or an
aggregation of exposures that could give rise to multiple
risk types such as credit or market risk.
The following sections discuss the risk governance and
oversight functions in place to manage the risks inherent
in the Firms business activities.
Risk governance and oversight functions Page
Strategic Risk 90
Capital risk 91-101
Liquidity risk 102-108
Reputation risk 109
Consumer Credit Risk 114-120
Wholesale credit risk 121-131
Investment portfolio risk 134
Market risk 135-142
Country risk 143-144
Operational risk 145-151
Compliance Risk 148
Conduct risk 149
Legal risk 150
Estimations and Model risk 151
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 89
Management’ s discussion and analysis
STRA TEGIC RISK MANAGEMENT
Strategic risk is the risk to earnings, capital, liquidity or
reputation associated with poorly designed or failed
business plans or inadequate response to changes in
the operating environment.
Management and oversight
The Operating Committee and the senior leadership of
each LOB and Corporate are responsible for managing
the Firm’s most significant strategic risks. Strategic risks
are overseen by IRM through participation in relevant
business reviews, LOB and Corporate senior
management meetings, risk and control committees and
other relevant governance forums and ongoing
discussions. The Board of Directors oversees
management’s strategic decisions, and the Board Risk
Committee oversees IRM and the Firm’s risk
management framework.
In the process of developing business plans and
strategic initiatives, LOB and Corporate senior
management identify the associated risks that are
incorporated into the Firmwide Risk Identification
process and monitored and assessed as part of the
Firmwide Risk Appetite framework.
In addition, IRM conducts a qualitative assessment of
the LOB and Corporate strategic initiatives to assess
their impact on the risk profile of the Firm.The Firm’s strategic planning process, which includes
the development and execution of strategic initiatives, is
one component of managing the Firm’s strategic risk.
Guided by the Firm’s How We Do Business Principles
(the “Principles”), the Operating Committee and senior
management teams in each LOB and Corporate review
and update the strategic plan periodically. The process
includes evaluating the high-level strategic framework
and performance against prior-year initiatives, assessing
the operating environment, refining existing strategies
and developing new strategies.
These strategic initiatives, along with IRM’s assessment,
are incorporated in the Firm’s budget and provided to
the Board for review. 
The Firm’s balance sheet strategy, which focuses on
risk-adjusted returns, strong capital and robust liquidity,
is also a component in the management of strategic risk.
Refer to Capital Risk Management on pages 91-101 for
further information on capital risk. Refer to Liquidity Risk
Management on pages 102–108 for further information
on liquidity risk. Refer to Reputation Risk Management
on page 109 for further information on reputation risk.
90 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
CAPIT AL RISK MANAGEMENT
Capital risk is the risk the Firm has an insufficient level
or composition of capital to support the Firm’s business
activities and associated risks during normal economic
environments and under stressed conditions.
A strong capital position is essential to the Firm’s
business strategy and competitive position. Maintaining
a strong balance sheet to manage through economic
volatility is considered a strategic imperative of the
Firm’s Board of Directors, CEO and Operating
Committee. The Firm’s fortress balance sheet
philosophy focuses on risk-adjusted returns, strong
capital and robust liquidity. The Firm’s capital risk
management strategy focuses on maintaining long-term
stability to enable the Firm to build and invest in market-
leading businesses, including in highly stressed
environments. Senior management considers the
implications on the Firm’s capital prior to making any
significant decisions that could impact future business
activities. In addition to considering the Firm’s earnings
outlook, senior management evaluates all sources and
uses of capital with a view to ensuring the Firm’s capital
strength.
Capital management oversight
The Firm has a Capital Management Oversight function
whose primary objective is to provide independent
oversight of capital risk across the Firm.
Capital Management Oversight’s responsibilities
include:
•Defining, monitoring and reporting capital risk
metrics;
•Establishing, calibrating and monitoring capital risk
limits and indicators, including capital risk appetite;
•Developing a process to classify, monitor and report
capital limit breaches; and
•Performing an independent assessment of the Firm’s
capital management activities, including changes
made to the Contingency Capital Plan described
below.
In addition, the Basel Independent Review function
(“BIR”), which is a part of the IRM function, conducts
independent assessments of the Firm’s regulatory
capital framework. These assessments are intended to
ensure compliance with the applicable regulatory capital
rules in support of senior management’s responsibility
for managing capital and for the Board Risk
Committee’s oversight of management in executing that
responsibility.
Capital management
Treasury & CIO is responsible for capital management.
The primary objectives of the Firm’s capital
management are to:
•Maintain sufficient capital in order to continue to build
and invest in the Firm’s businesses through the cycle
and in stressed environments;
•Retain flexibility to take advantage of future
investment opportunities;•Promote the Firm’s ability to serve as a source of
strength to its subsidiaries;
•Ensure the Firm operates above the minimum
regulatory capital ratios as well as maintain “well-
capitalized” status for the Firm and its insured
depository institution (“IDI”) subsidiaries at all times
under applicable regulatory capital requirements;
•Meet capital distribution objectives; and
•Maintain sufficient capital resources to operate
throughout a resolution period in accordance with the
Firm’s preferred resolution strategy.
The Firm addresses these objectives through
establishing internal minimum capital requirements and
a strong capital governance framework. The internal
minimum capital levels consider the Firm’s regulatory
capital requirements as well as an internal assessment
of capital adequacy, in normal economic cycles and in
stress events, when setting its minimum capital levels.
Capital management is intended to be flexible in order to
react to a range of potential events.
The current capital governance framework requires
regular monitoring of the Firm’s capital position and
follows prescribed escalation protocols, both at the Firm
and material legal entity levels.
Governance
Committees responsible for overseeing the Firm’s
capital management include the Capital Governance
Committee, the Treasurer Committee and the Firmwide
ALCO. Oversight of capital management is governed
through the CIO, Treasury and Corporate (“CTC”) Risk
Committee. In addition, the Board Risk Committee
periodically reviews the Firm’s capital risk tolerance.
Refer to Firmwide Risk Management on pages 85-89 for
additional discussion on the Board Risk Committee and
the ALCO.
Capital planning and stress testing
Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review
The Federal Reserve requires large BHCs, including the
Firm, to submit at least annually a capital plan that has
been reviewed and approved by the Board of Directors.
The Federal Reserve uses CCAR and other stress
testing processes to ensure that large BHCs have
sufficient capital during periods of economic and
financial stress, and have robust, forward-looking capital
assessment and planning processes in place that
address each BHC’s unique risks to enable it to absorb
losses under certain stress scenarios. Through CCAR,
the Federal Reserve evaluates each BHC’s capital
adequacy and internal capital adequacy assessment
processes (“ICAAP”), as well as its plans to make
capital distributions, such as dividend payments or stock
repurchases. The Federal Reserve uses results under
the severely adverse scenario from its supervisory
stress test to determine each firm’s SCB requirement for
the coming
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 91
Management’ s discussion and analysis
year. Refer to Key Regulatory Developments on pages
93–94 for additional information.
On June 29, 2020, the Firm announced that it had
completed the 2020 CCAR stress test process. On
August 10, 2020, the Federal Reserve affirmed the
Firm's SCB requirement of 3.3% and the Firm's
minimum Standardized CET1 capital ratio of 11.3% (up
from 10.5%). The SCB requirement became effective on
October 1, 2020.
In June 2020, the Federal Reserve determined that
changes in financial markets or the macroeconomic
outlook due to the COVID-19 pandemic could have a
material effect on a firm’s risk profile and financial
condition and therefore required all large bank holding
companies, including the Firm, to update and resubmit
their capital plans by November 2, 2020. On December
18, 2020, the Federal Reserve released its results from
the 2020 CCAR Round 2 stress test, which showed that
large banks had strong levels of capital and announced
that it would allow all large banks, including the Firm, to
resume share repurchases commencing in the first
quarter of 2021, subject to certain restrictions for at least
the first quarter of 2021 given considerable economic
uncertainty remained. The Federal Reserve has stated
that due to uncertainty about future economic conditions
and the ultimate path of the current recovery, the SCB
will not be reset at this time. The Federal Reserve will
notify firms by March 31, 2021 whether a revised SCB
requirement based on the 2020 CCAR Round 2 stress
test will be recalculated ahead of the 2021 annual
CCAR assessment.
Refer to Capital actions on page 99 for information on
actions taken by the Firm’s Board of Directors following
the 2020 CCAR results.
Internal Capital Adequacy Assessment Process
Annually, the Firm prepares the ICAAP, which informs
the Board of Directors of the ongoing assessment of the
Firm’s processes for managing the sources and uses of
capital as well as compliance with supervisory
expectations for capital planning and capital adequacy.
The Firm’s ICAAP integrates stress testing protocols
with capital planning.
The CCAR and other stress testing processes assess
the potential impact of alternative economic and
business scenarios on the Firm’s earnings and capital.
Economic scenarios, and the parameters underlying
those scenarios, are defined centrally and applied
uniformly across the businesses. These scenarios are
articulated in terms of macroeconomic factors, which are
key drivers of business results; global market shocks,
which generate short-term but severe trading losses;
and idiosyncratic operational risk events. The scenarios
are intended to capture and stress key vulnerabilities
and idiosyncratic risks facing the Firm. However, when
defining a broad range of scenarios, actual events can
be worse. Accordingly, management considers
additional stresses outside these scenarios, as
necessary. These results are reviewed by management
and the Board of Directors.Contingency capital plan
The Firm’s contingency capital plan establishes the
capital management framework for the Firm and
specifies the principles underlying the Firm’s approach
towards capital management in normal economic
conditions and during stress. The contingency capital
plan defines how the Firm calibrates its targeted capital
levels and meets minimum capital requirements,
monitors the ongoing appropriateness of planned capital
distributions, and sets out the capital contingency
actions that are expected to be taken or considered at
various levels of capital depletion during a period of
stress.
Regulatory capital
The Federal Reserve establishes capital requirements,
including well-capitalized standards, for the consolidated
financial holding company. The OCC establishes similar
minimum capital requirements and standards for the
Firm’s IDI subsidiaries, including JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. The U.S. capital requirements generally
follow the Capital Accord of the Basel Committee, as
amended from time to time.
Basel III Overview
The capital rules under Basel III establish minimum
capital ratios and overall capital adequacy standards for
large and internationally active U.S. BHCs and banks,
including the Firm and its IDI subsidiaries, including
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. The minimum amount of
regulatory capital that must be held by BHCs and banks
is determined by calculating risk-weighted assets
(“RWA”), which are on-balance sheet assets and off-
balance sheet exposures, weighted according to risk.
Two comprehensive approaches are prescribed for
calculating RWA: a standardized approach (“Basel III
Standardized”), and an advanced approach (“Basel III
Advanced”). For each of the risk-based capital ratios,
the capital adequacy of the Firm is evaluated against the
lower of the Standardized or Advanced approaches
compared to their respective minimum capital ratios.
Basel III establishes capital requirements for calculating
credit risk RWA and market risk RWA, and in the case of
Basel III Advanced, operational risk RWA. Key
differences in the calculation of credit risk RWA between
the Standardized and Advanced approaches are that for
Basel III Advanced, credit risk RWA is based on risk-
sensitive approaches which largely rely on the use of
internal credit models and parameters, whereas for
Basel III Standardized, credit risk RWA is generally
based on supervisory risk-weightings which vary
primarily by counterparty type and asset class. Market
risk RWA is calculated on a generally consistent basis
between Basel III Standardized and Basel III Advanced.
In addition to the RWA calculated under these
approaches, the Firm may supplement such amounts to
incorporate management judgment and feedback from
its regulators.
Basel III also includes a requirement for Advanced
Approach banking organizations, including the Firm, to
92 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
calculate the SLR. Refer to SLR on page 98 for
additional information.
COVID-19 Pandemic
The Firm has been impacted by market events as a
result of the COVID-19 pandemic, but remains well-
capitalized. However, the continuation or further
deterioration of the current macroeconomic environment
could result in impacts to the Firm’s capital and
leverage.
Key Regulatory Developments
Current Expected Credit Losses. Effective January 1,
2020, the Firm adopted the Financial Instruments –
Credit Losses guidance under U.S. GAAP. As permitted
under the U.S. capital rules issued by the federal
banking agencies in 2019, the Firm initially elected to
phase-in the January 1, 2020 (“day 1”) CECL adoption
impact to retained earnings of $2.7 billion to CET1
capital, at 25% per year in each of 2020 to 2023. As part
of their response to the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic, on March 31, 2020, the federal banking
agencies issued an interim final rule (issued as final on
August 26, 2020) that provided the option to delay the
effects of CECL on regulatory capital for two years,
followed by a three-year transition period (“CECL capital
transition provisions”).
The final rule provides a uniform approach for estimating
the effects of CECL compared to the legacy incurred
loss model during the first two years of the transition
period (the “day 2” transition amount), whereby the Firm
may exclude from CET1 capital 25% of the change in
the allowance for credit losses (excluding allowances on
PCD loans). The cumulative day 2 transition amount as
at December 31, 2021 that is not recognized in CET1
capital, as well as the $2.7 billion day 1 impact, will be
phased into CET1 capital at 25% per year beginning
January 1, 2022. The Firm has elected to apply the
CECL capital transition provisions, and accordingly, for
the year ended December 31, 2020, the capital metrics
of the Firm exclude $5.7 billion, which is the $2.7 billion
day 1 impact to retained earnings and 25% of the
$12.2 billion increase in the allowance for credit losses
(excluding allowances on PCD loans).
The impacts of the CECL capital transition provisions
have also been incorporated into Tier 2 capital, adjusted
average assets, and total leverage exposure. Refer to
Note 1 for further information on the CECL accounting
guidance.
Money Market Mutual Fund Liquidity Facility ("MMLF").
The Federal Reserve established the MMLF facility on
March 18, 2020, authorized through at least March 31,
2021, to enhance the liquidity and functioning of money
markets. Under the MMLF, the Federal Reserve Bank of
Boston (“FRBB”) makes nonrecourse advances to
participating financial institutions to purchase certain
types of assets from eligible money market mutual fund
clients. These assets, which are reflected in other
assets on the Firm’s Consolidated balance sheets, are
pledged to the FRBB as collateral. On March 23, 2020,
the federal banking agencies issued an interim final rule
(issued as final onSeptember 29, 2020) to neutralize the effects of
purchasing assets through the program on risk-based
and leverage-based capital ratios. As of December 31,
2020, the Firm excluded assets purchased from money
market mutual fund clients pursuant to nonrecourse
advances provided under the MMLF in the amount of
$187 million from its RWA and $358 million from
adjusted three month average assets and total leverage
exposure.
Supplementary leverage ratio temporary revision. On
April 1, 2020, the Federal Reserve issued an interim
final rule that requires, on a temporary basis, the
calculation of total leverage exposure for purposes of
calculating the SLR for bank holding companies, to
exclude the on-balance sheet amounts of U.S. Treasury
securities and deposits at Federal Reserve Banks.
These exclusions became effective April 1, 2020, and
will remain in effect through March 31, 2021.
On June 1, 2020, the Federal Reserve, OCC and FDIC
issued an interim final rule that provides IDI subsidiaries
with an option to apply this temporary exclusion subject
to certain restrictions. As of December 31, 2020,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. has not elected to apply
this exclusion.
Paycheck Protection Program. On April 13, 2020, the
federal banking agencies issued an interim final rule
(issued as final on September 29, 2020) to neutralize
the regulatory capital effects of participating in the PPP
on risk-based capital ratios by applying a zero percent
risk weight to loans originated under the program. Given
that PPP loans are guaranteed by the SBA, the Firm
does not expect to realize material credit losses on
these loans. As of December 31, 2020, the Firm had
approximately $27 billion of loans under the program.
The rule also provides that if a PPP loan is pledged as
collateral for a non-recourse loan under the Federal
Reserve’s Paycheck Protection Program Lending
(“PPPL”) Facility, the PPP loan can be excluded from
leverage-based capital ratios. As of December 31, 2020,
the Firm had not participated in the PPPL Facility.
Refer to Regulatory Developments Relating to the
COVID-19 Pandemic on pages 52-53 for additional
information on regulatory actions and significant
financing programs that the U.S. government and
regulators have introduced to address the effects of the
COVID-19 pandemic.
Stress Capital Buffer. On March 4, 2020, the Federal
Reserve issued the final rule introducing the SCB
framework for the Basel III Standardized approach that
is designed to more closely integrate the results of the
quantitative assessment in the annual CCAR with the
ongoing minimum capital requirements for BHCs under
the U.S. Basel III rules. The final rule replaces the fixed
2.5% CET1 capital conservation buffer in the
Standardized approach with a dynamic institution-
specific SCB. The final rule does not apply to the U.S.
Basel III Advanced approach capital requirements. The
SCB requirement for BHCs will be effective on October
1 of each year and is expected to remain in effect until
September 30 of the following year.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 93
Management’ s discussion and analysis
TLAC Holdings rule. On October 20, 2020, the federal
banking agencies issued a final rule prescribing the
regulatory capital treatment for holdings of TLAC debt
instruments by certain large banking organizations, such
as the Firm and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. This rule
expands the scope of the existing capital deductions
rule around theholdings of capital instruments of financial institutions to
also include TLAC debt instruments issued by
systemically important banking organizations. The final
rule will become effective on April 1, 2021 and is not
expected to have a material impact on the Firm’s risk-
based capital metrics.
Risk-based Capital Regulatory Minimums
The following chart presents the Firm’s Basel III minimum CET1 capital ratio under the Basel III rules currently in effect.
The Firm’s Basel III Standardized risk-based ratios are
currently more binding than the Basel III Advanced risk-
based ratios.
All banking institutions are currently required to have a
minimum CET1 capital ratio of 4.5% of risk-weighted
assets.
Certain banking organizations, including the Firm, are
required to hold additional levels of capital to serve as a
“capital conservation buffer”. The capital conservation
buffer incorporates a global systemically important bank
(“GSIB”) surcharge, a discretionary countercyclical
capital buffer and a fixed capital conservation buffer of
2.5% for Advanced regulatory capital requirements and
a variable SCB requirement, floored at 2.5%, for
Standardized regulatory capital requirements.Under the Federal Reserve’s GSIB rule, the Firm is
required to assess its GSIB surcharge on an annual
basis under two separately prescribed methods based
on data for the previous fiscal year-end, and is subject
to the higher of the two. The first (“Method 1”), reflects
the GSIB surcharge as prescribed by the Basel
Committee’s assessment methodology, and is
calculated across five criteria: size, cross-jurisdictional
activity, interconnectedness, complexity and
substitutability. The second (“Method 2”), modifies the
Method 1 requirements to include a measure of short-
term wholesale funding in place of substitutability, and
introduces a GSIB score “multiplication factor”.
 
94 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The following table presents the Firm’s effective GSIB
surcharge for the years ended December 31, 2020 and
2019.
2020 2019
Fully Phased-In:
Method 1 2.50 % 2.50 %
Method 2 3.50 % 3.50 %
The Firm’s effective regulatory minimum GSIB
surcharge calculated under Method 2 remains
unchanged at 3.5% for 2021. On November 11, 2020,
the Financial Stability Board (“FSB”) released its annual
GSIB list, which published the Firm’s Method 1 GSIB
surcharge of 2.0% (down from 2.5%) effective January
1, 2021, based upon data as of December 31, 2019.
The Firm’s estimated Method 2 surcharge calculated
using data as of December 31, 2020 is 4.0%.
Accordingly, based on the GSIB rule currently in effect,
the Firm’s effective regulatory minimum GSIB surcharge
is expected to increase to 4.0% on January 1, 2023
unless the Firm’s Method 2 GSIB surcharge calculation
based upon data as of December 31, 2021 is lower.
The U.S. federal regulatory capital standards include a
framework for setting a discretionary countercyclical
capital buffer taking into account the macro financial
environment in which large, internationally active banks
function. As of December 31, 2020, the U.S.
countercyclical capital buffer remained at 0%. The
Federal Reserve will continue to review the buffer at
least annually. The buffer can be increased if the
Federal Reserve, FDIC and OCC determine that
systemic risks are meaningfully above normal and can
be calibrated up to an additional 2.5% of RWA subject to
a 12-month implementation period.
Failure to maintain regulatory capital equal to or in
excess of the risk-based regulatory capital minimum
plus the capital conservation buffer (inclusive of the
GSIB surcharge) and any countercyclical buffer will
result in limitations to the amount of capital that the Firm
may distribute, such as through dividends and common
share repurchases, as well as certain executive
discretionary bonus payments.
The Firm has a target Basel III CET1 capital ratio of
12%. However, the Firm may remain above that level in
order to satisfy leverage-based capital requirements if
deposits continue to grow due to actions taken by the
Federal Reserve and the U.S. government in response
to the COVID-19 pandemic.
Total Loss-Absorbing Capacity
The Federal Reserve’s TLAC rule requires the U.S.
GSIB top-tier holding companies, including the Firm, to
maintain minimum levels of external TLAC and eligible
long-term debt (“eligible LTD”). Refer to TLAC on page
100 for additional information.
Leverage-based Capital Regulatory Minimums
Supplementary leverage ratio
Banking organizations subject to the Basel III Advanced
approach are currently required to have a minimum SLR
of3.0%. Certain banking organizations, including the Firm,
are also required to hold an additional 2.0% leverage
buffer.
The SLR is defined as Tier 1 capital under Basel III
divided by the Firm’s total leverage exposure. Total
leverage exposure is calculated by taking the Firm’s
total average on-balance sheet assets, less amounts
permitted to be deducted for Tier 1 capital, and adding
certain off-balance sheet exposures, such as undrawn
commitments and derivatives potential future exposure.
Failure to maintain an SLR equal to or greater than the
regulatory minimum will result in limitations on the
amount of capital that the Firm may distribute such as
through dividends and common share repurchases.
Other regulatory capital
In addition to meeting the capital ratio requirements of
Basel III, the Firm and its IDI subsidiaries also must
maintain minimum capital and leverage ratios in order to
be “well-capitalized” under the regulations issued by the
Federal Reserve and the Prompt Corrective Action
(“PCA”) requirements of the FDIC Improvement Act
(“FDICIA”), respectively. Refer to Note 27 for additional
information.
Additional information regarding the Firm’s capital ratios,
as well as the U.S. federal regulatory capital standards
to which the Firm is subject, is presented in Note 27.
Refer to the Firm’s Pillar 3 Regulatory Capital
Disclosures reports, which are available on the Firm’s
website, for further information on the Firm’s Basel III
measures.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 95
Management’ s discussion and analysis
The following table presents the Firm’s risk-based and leverage-based capital metrics under both the Basel III
Standardized and Advanced approaches.
Standardized Advanced
(in millions, except ratios)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019Minimum capital
ratiosDecember 31,
2020December 31,
2019Minimum capital
ratios
Risk-based capital metrics:
CET1 capital $ 205,078  $ 187,753 $ 205,078  $ 187,753 
Tier 1 capital 234,844  214,432 234,844  214,432 
Total capital 269,923  242,589 257,228  232,112 
Risk-weighted assets 1,560,609  1,515,869 1,484,431  1,397,878 
CET1 capital ratio 13.1 % 12.4 % 11.3 % 13.8 % 13.4 % 10.5 %
Tier 1 capital ratio 15.0 14.1 12.8 15.8 15.3 12.0 
Total capital ratio 17.3 16.0 14.8 17.3 16.6 14.0 
Leverage-based capital metrics:
Adjusted average assets $3,353,319  $2,730,239 $3,353,319  $2,730,239 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 7.0 % 7.9 % 4.0 % 7.0 % 7.9 % 4.0 %
Total leverage exposure NA NA $3,401,542  $3,423,431 
SLR NA NA NA 6.9 % 6.3 % 5.0 % 
(a)Adjusted average assets, for purposes of calculating the leverage ratios, includes total quarterly average assets adjusted for on-balance sheet
assets that are subject to deduction from Tier 1 capital, predominantly goodwill and other intangible assets.
(b)As of December 31, 2020, total leverage exposure for purposes of calculating the SLR excludes U.S. Treasury securities and deposits at Federal
Reserve Banks, as provided by the interim final rule issued by the Federal Reserve on April 1, 2020.
(c)As of December 31, 2020, the capital metrics reflect the CECL capital transition provisions.
(d)As of December 31, 2020, the capital metrics reflect the exclusion of assets purchased from money market mutual fund clients pursuant to
nonrecourse advances provided under the MMLF. Additionally, loans originated under the PPP receive a zero percent risk weight.
(e)Represents minimum requirements and regulatory buffers applicable to the Firm. For the period ended December 31, 2019, the CET1, Tier 1,
Total, Tier 1 leverage and SLR minimum capital ratios applicable to the Firm were 10.5%, 12.0%, 14.0%, 4.0% and 5.0%, respectively. Refer to
Note 27 for additional information.(c)(d) (e) (c)(d) (e)
(a)
(b)
(b)
96 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Capital components
The following table presents reconciliations of total
stockholders’ equity to Basel III CET1 capital, Tier 1
capital and Total capital as of December 31, 2020 and
2019.
(in millions)December 31,
 2020December 31,
 2019
Total stockholders’ equity $ 279,354 $ 261,330 
Less: Preferred stock 30,063 26,993 
Common stockholders’ equity 249,291 234,337 
Add:
Certain deferred tax liabilities 2,453 2,381 
Less:
Goodwill 49,248 47,823 
Other intangible assets 904 819 
Other CET1 capital
adjustments (3,486) 323 
Standardized/Advanced CET1
capital 205,078 187,753 
Preferred stock 30,063 26,993 
Less: Other Tier 1 adjustments 297 314 
Standardized/Advanced Tier 1
capital $ 234,844 $ 214,432 
Long-term debt and other
instruments qualifying as Tier 2
capital $ 16,645 $ 13,733 
Qualifying allowance for credit
losses 18,372 14,314 
Other 62 110 
Standardized Tier 2 capital $ 35,079 $ 28,157 
Standardized Total capital $ 269,923 $ 242,589 
Adjustment in qualifying allowance
for credit losses for Advanced Tier 2
capital (12,695) (10,477)
Advanced Tier 2 capital $ 22,384 $ 17,680 
Advanced Total capital $ 257,228 $ 232,112 
(a)Represents deferred tax liabilities related to tax-deductible
goodwill and to identifiable intangibles created in nontaxable
transactions, which are netted against goodwill and other
intangibles when calculating CET1 capital.
(b)As of December 31, 2020, the impact of the CECL capital
transition provision was an increase in CET1 capital of $5.7 billion.
(c)Represents the allowance for credit losses eligible for inclusion in
Tier 2 capital up to 1.25% of credit risk RWA, including the impact
of the CECL capital transition provision with any excess deducted
from RWA.
(d)Represents an adjustment to qualifying allowance for credit losses
for the excess of eligible credit reserves over expected credit
losses up to 0.6% of credit risk RWA, including the impact of the
CECL capital transition provision with any excess deducted from
RWA.Capital rollforward
The following table presents the changes in Basel III
CET1 capital, Tier 1 capital and Tier 2 capital for the
year ended December 31, 2020.
Year Ended December 31, (in millions) 2020
Standardized/Advanced CET1 capital at December 31,
2019 $187,753 
Net income applicable to common equity 27,548 
Dividends declared on common stock (11,119)
Net purchase of treasury stock (5,135)
Changes in additional paid-in capital (128)
Changes related to AOCI 6,417 
Adjustment related to AOCI (1,829)
Changes related to other CET1 capital adjustments 1,571 
Change in Standardized/Advanced CET1 capital 17,325 
Standardized/Advanced CET1 capital at
December 31, 2020 $205,078 
Standardized/Advanced Tier 1 capital at
December 31, 2019 $214,432 
Change in CET1 capital 17,325 
Net issuance of noncumulative perpetual preferred stock 3,070 
Other 17 
Change in Standardized/Advanced Tier 1 capital 20,412 
Standardized/Advanced Tier 1 capital at
December 31, 2020 $234,844 
Standardized Tier 2 capital at December 31, 2019 $ 28,157 
Change in long-term debt and other instruments
qualifying as Tier 2 2,912 
Change in qualifying allowance for credit losses 4,058 
Other (48)
Change in Standardized Tier 2 capital 6,922 
Standardized Tier 2 capital at December 31, 2020 $ 35,079 
Standardized Total capital at December 31, 2020 $269,923 
Advanced Tier 2 capital at December 31, 2019 $ 17,680 
Change in long-term debt and other instruments
qualifying as Tier 2 2,912 
Change in qualifying allowance for credit losses 1,840 
Other (48)
Change in Advanced Tier 2 capital 4,704 
Advanced Tier 2 capital at December 31, 2020 $ 22,384 
Advanced Total capital at December 31, 2020 $257,228 
(a)Includes cash flow hedges and DVA related to structured notes
recorded in AOCI.
(b)Includes the impact of the CECL capital transition provisions.
 
 
 (a)
(b)
(c)
(d)(a)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 97
Management’ s discussion and analysis
RWA rollforward
The following table presents changes in the components of RWA under Basel III Standardized and Advanced
approaches for the year ended December 31, 2020. The amounts in the rollforward categories are estimates, based on
the predominant driver of the change.
Standardized Advanced
Year ended December 31,
2020
 (in millions)Credit risk
RWAMarket risk
RWA Total RWACredit risk
RWAMarket risk
RWAOperational risk 
 RWA Total RWA
December 31, 2019 $1,440,220 $ 75,649 $ 1,515,869 $ 932,948 $ 75,652 $ 389,278 $ 1,397,878 
Model & data changes (800) (16,320) (17,120) (6,100) (16,320) — (22,420)
Portfolio runoff (4,450) — (4,450) (4,000) — — (4,000)
Movement in portfolio levels 29,249 37,061 66,310 79,482 37,578 (4,087) 112,973 
Changes in RWA 23,999 20,741 44,740 69,382 21,258 (4,087) 86,553 
December 31, 2020 $1,464,219 $ 96,390 $ 1,560,609 $ 1,002,330 $ 96,910 $ 385,191 $ 1,484,431 
(a)Model & data changes refer to material movements in levels of RWA as a result of revised methodologies and/or treatment per regulatory
guidance (exclusive of rule changes).
(b)Portfolio runoff for credit risk RWA primarily reflects reduced risk from position rolloffs in legacy portfolios in Home Lending.
(c)Movement in portfolio levels (inclusive of rule changes) refers to: changes in book size, composition, credit quality, and market movements for
credit risk RWA; changes in position and market movements for market risk RWA; updates to cumulative losses for operational risk RWA; and
deductions to credit risk RWA for excess eligible credit reserves not eligible for inclusion in Tier 2 capital.(a)
(b)
(c)
Supplementary leverage ratio
The following table presents the components of the
Firm’s SLR.
Three months ended
(in millions, except ratio)December 31,
 2020December 31,
 2019
Tier 1 capital $ 234,844 214,432 
Total average assets 3,399,818 2,777,270 
Less: Regulatory capital
adjustments 46,499 47,031 
Total adjusted average
assets 3,353,319 2,730,239 
Add: Off-balance sheet
exposures 729,978 693,192 
Less: Exclusion for U.S.
Treasuries and Federal
Reserve Bank deposits 681,755 — 
Total leverage exposure $ 3,401,542 $ 3,423,431 
SLR 6.9 % 6.3 %
(a)For purposes of calculating the SLR, includes total quarterly
average assets adjusted for on-balance sheet assets that are
subject to deduction from Tier 1 capital, predominantly goodwill
and other intangible assets. As of December 31, 2020, includes
adjustments for the CECL capital transition provisions and the
exclusion of average assets purchased from money market mutual
fund clients pursuant to nonrecourse advances provided under the
MMLF.
(b)Adjusted average assets used for the calculation of Tier 1 leverage
ratio.
(c)Off-balance sheet exposures are calculated as the average of the
three month-end spot balances during the reporting quarter.
Refer to Note 27 for JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.’s
SLR.Line of business equity
Each business segment is allocated capital by taking
into consideration a variety of factors including capital
levels of similarly rated peers and applicable regulatory
capital requirements. ROE is measured and internal
targets for expected returns are established as key
measures of a business segment’s performance.
The Firm’s allocation methodology incorporates Basel III
Standardized RWA, Basel III Advanced RWA, the GSIB
surcharge, and a simulation of capital in a severe stress
environment. As of January 1, 2021, the Firm has
changed its line of business capital allocations primarily
as a result of changes in exposures for each LOB and
an increase in the relative risk weighting toward
Standardized RWA. The assumptions and
methodologies used to allocate capital are periodically
assessed and as a result, the capital allocated to the
LOBs may change from time to time. 
The following table presents the capital allocated to
each business segment.
Line of business equity (Allocated capital)
December 31,
(in billions)January 1,
 2021 2020 2019
Consumer & Community
Banking $ 50.0 $ 52.0 $ 52.0 
Corporate & Investment Bank 83.0 80.0 80.0 
Commercial Banking 24.0 22.0 22.0 
Asset & Wealth Management 14.0 10.5 10.5 
Corporate 78.3 84.8 69.8 
Total common stockholders’
equity $ 249.3 $249.3 $234.3 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 (a)
(b)
(c)
98 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Capital actions
Common stock dividends
The Firm’s common stock dividends are planned as part
of the Capital Management governance framework in
line with the Firm’s capital management objectives.
The Firm’s quarterly common stock dividend is currently
$0.90 per share. The Firm’s dividends are subject to the
Board of Directors’ approval on a quarterly basis.
Refer to Note 21 and Note 26 for information regarding
dividend restrictions.
The following table shows the common dividend payout
ratio based on net income applicable to common equity.
Year ended December 31, 2020 2019 2018
Common dividend payout ratio 40 % 31 % 30 %
Common stock
On March 15, 2020, in response to the economic
disruptions caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the
Firm temporarily suspended repurchases of its common
stock. Subsequently, the Federal Reserve directed all
large banks, including the Firm, to discontinue net share
repurchases through the end of 2020. On December 18,
2020, the Federal Reserve announced that all large
banks, including the Firm, could resume share
repurchases commencing in the first quarter of 2021. As
directed by the Federal Reserve, total net repurchases
and common stock dividends in the first quarter of 2021
are restricted and cannot exceed the average of the
Firm’s net income for the four preceding calendar
quarters. The Firm's Board of Directors has authorized a
new common share repurchase program for up to $30
billion.
The following table sets forth the Firm’s repurchases of
common stock for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018.
Year ended December 31, (in
millions) 2020 2019 2018
Total number of shares of
common stock repurchased 50.0 213.0 181.5 
Aggregate purchase price of
common stock repurchases $6,397  $24,121 $19,983 The authorization to repurchase common shares is
utilized at management’s discretion, and the timing of
purchases and the exact amount of common shares that
may be repurchased is subject to various factors,
including market conditions; legal and regulatory
considerations affecting the amount and timing of
repurchase activity; the Firm’s capital position (taking
into account goodwill and intangibles); internal capital
generation; and alternative investment opportunities.
The repurchase program does not include specific price
targets or timetables; may be suspended by
management at any time; and may be executed through
open market purchases or privately negotiated
transactions, or utilizing Rule 10b5-1 plans, which are
written trading plans that the Firm may enter into from
time to time under Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 and which allow the Firm to
repurchase its common shares during periods when it
may otherwise not be repurchasing common shares —
for example, during internal trading blackout periods.
Refer to Part II, Item 5: Market for Registrant’s Common
Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities on page 34 of the 2020
Form 10-K for additional information regarding
repurchases of the Firm’s equity securities.
Preferred stock
Preferred stock dividends declared were $1.6 billion for
the year ended December 31, 2020.
The Firm has not issued or redeemed any preferred
stock since the first quarter of 2020. Refer to Note 21 for
additional information on the Firm’s preferred stock,
including the issuance and redemption of preferred
stock.
Subordinated Debt
On May 13, 2020, the Firm issued $3.0 billion of fixed-
to-floating rate subordinated notes due 2031. Refer to
Long-term funding and issuance on page 107 and Note
20 for additional information.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 99
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Other capital requirements
Total Loss-Absorbing Capacity
The Federal Reserve’s TLAC rule requires the U.S.
GSIB top-tier holding companies, including the Firm, to
maintain minimum levels of external TLAC and eligible
long-term debt.
The minimum external TLAC and the minimum level of
eligible long-term debt requirements are shown below:
(a) RWA is the greater of Standardized and Advanced compared to their
respective minimum capital ratios.
Failure to maintain TLAC equal to or in excess of the
regulatory minimum plus applicable buffers will result in
limitations to the amount of capital that the Firm may
distribute, such as through dividends and common
share repurchases.
The following table presents the TLAC and external
long-term debt minimum requirements including
applicable regulatory buffers, as of December 31, 2020
and 2019.
Minimum
Requirements
TLAC to RWA 23.0 %
TLAC to leverage exposure 9.5 
External long-term debt to RWA 9.5 
External long-term debt to leverage 4.5 
Effective January 1, 2021, Method 1 GSIB surcharge is
2.0% (down from 2.5%). As a result, the Firm’s TLAC to
RWA requirement will become 22.5%. Refer to Risk-
based Capital Regulatory Minimums on pages 94-95 for
further information on the GSIB surcharge.The following table presents the eligible external TLAC
and eligible LTD amounts, as well as a representation of
the amounts as a percentage of the Firm’s total RWA
and total leverage exposure applying the impact of the
CECL capital transition provisions as of December 31,
2020 and 2019.
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
(in billions,
except ratio)External
TLAC LTDExternal
TLAC LTD
Total eligible
amount $421.0 $181.4 $386.4 $161.8 
% of RWA 27.0 % 11.6 % 25.5 % 10.7 %
Surplus/(shortfall)$ 62.1 $ 33.1 $ 37.7 $ 17.8 
% of total
leverage
exposure 12.4 % 5.3 % 11.3 % 4.7 %
Surplus/(shortfall)$ 97.9 $ 28.3 $ 61.2 $ 7.8 
Refer to Part I, Item 1A: Risk Factors on pages 8-32 of
the 2020 Form 10-K for information on the financial
consequences to holders of the Firm’s debt and equity
securities in a resolution scenario.
 
100 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Broker-dealer regulatory capital
J.P. Morgan Securities
JPMorgan Chase’s principal U.S. broker-dealer
subsidiary is J.P. Morgan Securities. J.P. Morgan
Securities is subject to Rule 15c3-1 under the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 (the “Net Capital Rule”). J.P.
Morgan Securities is also registered as a futures
commission merchant and is subject to regulatory
capital requirements, including those imposed by the
SEC, Commodity Futures Trading Commission
(“CFTC”), Financial Industry Regulatory Authority
(“FINRA”) and the National Futures Association (“NFA”).
J.P. Morgan Securities has elected to compute its
minimum net capital requirements in accordance with
the “Alternative Net Capital Requirements” of the Net
Capital Rule.
The following table presents J.P. Morgan Securities’ net
capital:
December 31, 2020
(in millions) Actual Minimum
Net Capital $ 27,651 $ 5,024 
(a)Net capital reflects the exclusion of assets purchased from money
market mutual fund clients pursuant to nonrecourse advances
provided under the MMLF.
In addition to its alternative minimum net capital
requirements, J.P. Morgan Securities is required to hold
“tentative net capital” in excess of $1.0 billion and is also
required to notify the SEC in the event that its tentative
net capital is less than $5.0 billion. Tentative net capital
is net capital before deducting market and credit risk
charges as defined by the Net Capital Rule. As of
December 31, 2020, J.P. Morgan Securities maintained
tentative net capital in excess of the minimum and
notification requirements.J.P. Morgan Securities plc
J.P. Morgan Securities plc is a wholly-owned subsidiary
of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and has authority to
engage in banking, investment banking and broker-
dealer activities. J.P. Morgan Securities plc is jointly
regulated by the U.K. Prudential Regulation Authority
(“PRA”) and the Financial Conduct Authority (“FCA”).
J.P. Morgan Securities plc is subject to the European
Union Capital Requirements Regulation and the PRA
capital rules, each of which implement Basel III and
thereby subject J.P. Morgan Securities plc to its
requirements. Effective January 1, 2021, J.P. Morgan
Securities plc is subject to the amended EU Capital
Requirement Regulation, as adopted in the U.K.
The Bank of England requires, on a transitional basis,
that U.K. banks, including U.K. regulated subsidiaries of
overseas groups, maintain a minimum requirement for
own funds and eligible liabilities (“MREL”). As of
December 31, 2020, J.P. Morgan Securities plc was
compliant with the requirements of the MREL rule.
The following table presents J.P. Morgan Securities plc’s
capital metrics:
December 31, 2020
(in millions, except ratios) Estimated Minimum ratios
Total capital $ 55,156 
CET1 ratio 17.9 % 4.5 %
Total capital ratio 22.8 % 8.0 %
 
 
 
 (a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 101
Management’ s discussion and analysis
LIQUIDITY RISK MANAGEMENT
Liquidity risk is the risk that the Firm will be unable to
meet its contractual and contingent financial obligations
as they arise or that it does not have the appropriate
amount, composition and tenor of funding and liquidity
to support its assets and liabilities.
Liquidity risk oversight
The Firm has a Liquidity Risk Oversight function whose
primary objective is to provide oversight of liquidity risk
across the Firm. Liquidity Risk Oversight’s
responsibilities include:
•Defining, monitoring and reporting liquidity risk
metrics;
•Establishing and monitoring limits and indicators,
including liquidity risk appetite;
•Developing a process to classify, monitor and report
limit breaches;
•Performing an independent review of liquidity risk
management processes;
•Monitoring and reporting internal Firmwide and legal
entity liquidity stress tests as well as regulatory
defined liquidity stress tests;
•Approving or escalating for review new or updated
liquidity stress assumptions; and
•Monitoring liquidity positions, balance sheet
variances and funding activities;
Liquidity management
The primary objectives of the Firm’s liquidity
management are to:
•Ensure that the Firm’s core businesses and material
legal entities are able to operate in support of client
needs and meet contractual and contingent financial
obligations through normal economic cycles as well
as during stress events, and
•Manage an optimal funding mix and availability of
liquidity sources.
As part of the Firm’s overall liquidity management
strategy, the Firm manages liquidity and funding using a
centralized, global approach in order to:
•Optimize liquidity sources and uses;
•Monitor exposures;
•Identify constraints on the transfer of liquidity
between the Firm’s legal entities; and
•Maintain the appropriate amount of surplus liquidity
at a Firmwide and legal entity level, where relevant.
In the context of the Firm’s liquidity management,
Treasury and CIO is responsible for:
•Analyzing and understanding the liquidity
characteristics of the assets and liabilities of the
Firm, LOBs and legal entities, taking into account
legal, regulatory, and operational restrictions;
•Developing internal liquidity stress testing
assumptions;•Defining and monitoring Firmwide and legal entity-
specific liquidity strategies, policies, reporting and
contingency funding plans;
•Managing liquidity within the Firm’s approved liquidity
risk appetite tolerances and limits;
•Managing compliance with regulatory requirements
related to funding and liquidity risk; and
•Setting transfer pricing in accordance with underlying
liquidity characteristics of balance sheet assets and
liabilities as well as certain off-balance sheet items.
Governance
Committees responsible for liquidity governance include
the Firmwide ALCO as well as LOB and regional
ALCOs, the Treasurer Committee, and the CTC Risk
Committee. In addition, the Board Risk Committee
reviews and recommends to the Board of Directors, for
formal approval, the Firm’s liquidity risk tolerances,
liquidity strategy, and liquidity policy. Refer to Firmwide
Risk Management on pages 85-89 for further discussion
of ALCO and other risk-related committees.
Internal stress testing
Liquidity stress tests are intended to ensure that the
Firm has sufficient liquidity under a variety of adverse
scenarios, including scenarios analyzed as part of the
Firm’s resolution and recovery planning. Stress
scenarios are produced for JPMorgan Chase & Co.
(“Parent Company”) and the Firm’s material legal
entities on a regular basis, and other stress tests are
performed in response to specific market events or
concerns. Liquidity stress tests assume all of the Firm’s
contractual financial obligations are met and take into
consideration:
•Varying levels of access to unsecured and secured
funding markets,
•Estimated non-contractual and contingent cash
outflows, and
•Potential impediments to the availability and
transferability of liquidity between jurisdictions and
material legal entities such as regulatory, legal or
other restrictions.
Liquidity outflow assumptions are modeled across a
range of time horizons and currency dimensions and
contemplate both market and idiosyncratic stresses.
Results of stress tests are considered in the formulation
of the Firm’s funding plan and assessment of its liquidity
position. The Parent Company acts as a source of
funding for the Firm through equity and long-term debt
issuances, and its intermediate holding company,
JPMorgan Chase Holdings LLC (the “IHC”) provides
funding support to the ongoing operations of the Parent
Company and its subsidiaries. The Firm maintains
liquidity at the Parent Company, IHC, and operating
subsidiaries at levels sufficient to comply with liquidity
risk tolerances and minimum liquidity requirements, and
to manage through periods of
102 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
stress when access to normal funding sources may be
disrupted.
Contingency funding plan
The Firm’s Contingency Funding Plan (“CFP”) sets out
the strategies for addressing and managing liquidity
resource needs during a liquidity stress event and
incorporates liquidity risk limits, indicators and risk
appetite tolerances that make up Liquidity Escalation
Points. The CFP also identifies the alternative
contingent funding and liquidity resources available to
the Firm and its legal entities in a period of stress.
Liquidity Coverage Ratio
The LCR rule requires that the Firm and JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A. maintain an amount of eligible HQLA
that is sufficient to meet its estimated total net cash
outflows over a prospective 30 calendar-day period of
significant stress. Eligible HQLA, for purposes of
calculating the LCR, is the amount of unencumbered
HQLA that satisfy certain operational considerations as
defined in the LCR rule. HQLA primarily consist of cash
and certain high-quality liquid securities as defined in
the LCR rule.
Under the LCR rule, the amount of eligible HQLA held
by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. that is in excess of its
stand-alone 100% minimum LCR requirement, and that
is not transferable to non-bank affiliates, must be
excluded from the Firm’s reported eligible HQLA.
Estimated net cash outflows are based on standardized
stress outflow and inflow rates prescribed in the LCR
rule, which are applied to the balances of the Firm’s
assets, sources of funds, and obligations. The LCR for
both the Firm and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. is
required to be a minimum of 100%.The following table summarizes the Firm and JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A.’s average LCR for the three months
ended December 31, 2020, September 30, 2020 and
December 31, 2019 based on the Firm’s interpretation
of the LCR framework.
Three months ended
Average amount
 (in millions)December 31,
2020September 30,
2020December 31,
 2019
JPMorgan Chase
& Co.:
Eligible HQLA
Eligible cash $ 455,612 $ 458,336 $ 203,296 
Eligible
securities 241,447 211,841 341,990 
Total eligible
HQLA $ 697,059 $ 670,177 $ 545,286 
Net cash outflows$ 634,037 $ 587,811 $ 469,402 
LCR 110 % 114 % 116 %
Net excess
eligible HQLA $ 63,022 $ 82,366 $ 75,884 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.:
LCR 160 % 157 % 116 %
Net excess
eligible HQLA $ 401,903 $ 366,096 $ 79,483 
(a)Represents cash on deposit at central banks, primarily the Federal
Reserve Banks.
(b)Predominantly U.S. Treasuries, U.S. GSE and government agency
MBS, and sovereign bonds net of applicable haircuts under the
LCR rule.
(c)Eligible HQLA securities may be reported in securities borrowed or
purchased under resale agreements, trading assets, or investment
securities on the Firm’s Consolidated balance sheets.
(d)Excludes average excess eligible HQLA at JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. that are not transferable to non-bank affiliates.
The Firm’s average LCR decreased during the three
months ended December 31, 2020, compared with the
three-month period ended September 30, 2020,
predominantly driven by a decrease in cash from long-
term debt maturities, including the early termination of
certain of the Firm's debt at the end of the third quarter
2020.
The Firm's average LCR decreased during the three
months ended December 31, 2020, compared with the
prior year period primarily due to the relative impact on
net cash outflows from the significant increase in
deposits as well as elevated market activities in the CIB.
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.’s average LCR increased
during the three months ended December 31, 2020,
compared with both the three month periods ended
September 30, 2020 and December 31, 2019 primarily
due to growth in deposits. Deposits continued to
increase in the fourth quarter primarily driven by the
COVID-19 pandemic and the related effect of certain
government actions. The increase in excess liquidity in
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. is excluded from the Firm’s
reported LCR under the LCR rule.
The Firm’s average LCR fluctuates from period to
period, due to changes in its eligible HQLA and
estimated net cash outflows as a result of ongoing
business activity. Refer to the Firm’s U.S. LCR
Disclosure reports, which are available on the Firm’s
website for a further discussion of the Firm’s LCR.(a)
(b)(c)
(d)
(d)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 103
JogaCase&Co/00o 0 03
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Other liquidity sources
In addition to the assets reported in the Firm’s eligible
HQLA above, the Firm had unencumbered marketable
securities, such as equity and debt securities, that the
Firm believes would be available to raise liquidity. This
includes securities included as part of the excess
eligible HQLA at JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. that are
not transferable to non-bank affiliates. The fair value of
these securities was approximately $740 billion and
$315 billion as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively, although the amount of liquidity that could
be raised would be dependent on prevailing market
conditions. The fair value increased compared to
December 31, 2019, due to an increase in excess
eligible HQLA at JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. which
was primarily a result of increased deposits.
The Firm also had available borrowing capacity at
FHLBs and the discount window at the Federal Reserve
Bank as a result of collateral pledged by the Firm to
such banks of approximately $307 billion and $322
billion as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
This borrowing capacity excludes the benefit of cash
and securities reported in the Firm’s eligible HQLA or
other unencumbered securities that are currently
pledged at the Federal Reserve Bank discount window
and other central banks. Available borrowing capacity
decreased from December 31, 2019 primarily due to
lower pledged credit card receivable balances driven by
the COVID-19 pandemic and a decrease in pledged
mortgage collateral as a result of paydown and maturity
activity. Although available, the Firm does not view this
borrowing capacity at the Federal Reserve Bank
discount window and the other central banks as a
primary source of liquidity.
NSFR
The net stable funding ratio (“NSFR”) is a liquidity
requirement for large banking organizations that is
intended to measure the adequacy of “available” and
“required” amounts of stable funding over a one-year
horizon. On October 20, 2020, the federal banking
agencies issued a final NSFR rule under which large
banking organizations such as the Firm will be required
to maintain an NSFR of at least 100% on an ongoing
basis. The final NSFR rule will become effective on July
1, 2021, and the Firm will be required to publicly
disclose its quarterly average NSFR semi-annually
beginning in 2023.
As of December 31, 2020 the Firm estimates that it was
compliant with the 100% minimum NSFR based on its
current understanding of the final rule.
104 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Funding
Sources of funds
Management believes that the Firm’s unsecured and
secured funding capacity is sufficient to meet its on- and
off-balance sheet obligations.
The Firm funds its global balance sheet through diverse
sources of funding including stable deposits, secured
and unsecured funding in the capital markets and
stockholders’ equity. Deposits are the primary funding
source for JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. Additionally,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. may also access funding
through short- or long-term secured borrowings, through
the issuance ofunsecured long-term debt, or from borrowings from the
Parent Company or the IHC. The Firm’s non-bank
subsidiaries are primarily funded from long-term
unsecured borrowings and short-term secured
borrowings, primarily securities loaned or sold under
repurchase agreements. Excess funding is invested by
Treasury and CIO in the Firm’s investment securities
portfolio or deployed in cash or other short-term liquid
investments based on their interest rate and liquidity risk
characteristics.
Deposits
The table below summarizes, by LOB and Corporate, the period-end and average deposit balances as of and for the
years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
As of or for the year ended December 31, Average
(in millions) 2020 2019 2020 2019
Consumer & Community Banking $ 958,706 $ 723,418 $ 851,390 $ 698,378 
Corporate & Investment Bank 702,215 511,905 655,095 515,938 
Commercial Banking 284,263 184,115 237,645 172,666 
Asset & Wealth Management 198,755 142,740 161,955 135,265 
Corporate 318 253 666 820 
Total Firm $ 2,144,257 $1,562,431 $ 1,906,751 $ 1,523,067 
(a)In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm realigned certain wealth management clients from AWM to the J.P. Morgan Wealth Management business
unit within CCB. In the first quarter of 2020, the Merchant Services business was realigned from CCB to CIB as part of the Firm’s Wholesale
Payments business. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
Deposits provide a stable source of funding and reduce
the Firm’s reliance on the wholesale funding markets. A
significant portion of the Firm’s deposits are consumer
deposits and wholesale operating deposits, which are
both considered to be stable sources of liquidity.
Wholesale operating deposits are considered to be
stable sources of liquidity because they are generated
from customers that maintain operating service
relationships with the Firm.
The table below shows the loan and deposit balances,
the loans-to-deposits ratios, and deposits as a
percentage of total liabilities, as of December 31, 2020
and 2019.
As of December 31, 
 (in billions except ratios) 2020 2019
Deposits $ 2,144.3 $ 1,562.4 
Deposits as a % of total
liabilities 69 % 64 %
Loans 1,012.9 997.6 
Loans-to-deposits ratio 47 % 64 %The Firm believes that average deposit balances are
generally more representative of deposit trends than
period-end deposit balances, over time. However, during
periods of market disruption those trends could be
affected.
Average deposits increased for the year ended
December 31, 2020, reflecting significant inflows across
the LOBs primarily driven by the impact of the COVID-
19 pandemic and the related effect of certain
government actions. In the wholesale businesses, while
the inflows principally occurred in March as clients
sought to remain liquid as a result of market conditions,
balances continued to increase through the end of 2020.
In CCB, the increase was driven by lower spending and
higher cash balances across both consumer and small
business customers, as well as growth from existing and
new accounts.
Refer to the discussion of the Firm’s Business Segment
Results and the Consolidated Balance Sheets Analysis
on pages 65–84 and pages 57-58, respectively, for
further information on deposit and liability balance
trends.(a) (a)
(a) (a)
(a) (a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 105
Management’ s discussion and analysis
The following table summarizes short-term and long-term funding, excluding deposits, as of December 31, 2020 and
2019, and average balances for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019. Refer to the Consolidated Balance
Sheets Analysis on pages 57-58 and Note 20 for additional information.
Sources of funds (excluding deposits)
As of or for the year ended December 31, Average
(in millions) 2020 2019 2020 2019
Commercial paper $ 12,031 $ 14,754 $ 12,129 $ 22,977 
Other borrowed funds 8,510 7,544 9,198 10,369 
Total short-term unsecured funding $ 20,541 $ 22,298 $ 21,327 $ 33,346 
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase $ 207,877 $ 175,709 $ 246,354 $ 217,807 
Securities loaned 4,886 5,983 6,536 8,816 
Other borrowed funds 24,667 18,622 23,812 26,050 
Obligations of Firm-administered multi-seller conduits 10,523 9,223 11,430 10,929 
Total short-term secured funding $ 247,953 $ 209,537 $ 288,132 $ 263,602 
Senior notes $ 166,089 $ 166,185 $ 171,509 $ 168,546 
Subordinated debt 21,608 17,591 20,789 17,387 
Structured notes 75,325 74,724 73,056 65,487 
Total long-term unsecured funding $ 263,022 $ 258,500 $ 265,354 $ 251,420 
Credit card securitization $ 4,943 $ 6,461 $ 5,520 $ 9,707 
FHLB advances 14,123 28,635 27,076 34,143 
Other long-term secured funding 4,540 4,363 4,460 4,643 
Total long-term secured funding $ 23,606 $ 39,459 $ 37,056 $ 48,493 
Preferred stock $ 30,063 $ 26,993 $ 29,899 $ 27,511 
Common stockholders’ equity $ 249,291 $ 234,337 $ 236,865 $ 232,907 
(a)Primarily consists of short-term securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase.
(b)Effective March 2020, includes nonrecourse advances provided under the MMLF.
(c)Included in beneficial interests issued by consolidated variable interest entities on the Firm’s Consolidated balance sheets.
(d)Includes certain TLAC-eligible long-term unsecured debt issued by the Parent Company.
(e)Includes long-term structured notes which are secured.
(f)Refer to Capital Risk Management on pages 91-101, Consolidated statements of changes in stockholders’ equity on page 165, Note 21 and Note
22 for additional information on preferred stock and common stockholders’ equity.
Short-term funding
The Firm’s sources of short-term secured funding
primarily consist of securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase. These instruments are
secured predominantly by high-quality securities
collateral, including government-issued debt and U.S.
GSE and government agency MBS. Securities sold
under agreements to repurchase increased at
December 31, 2020, compared with December 31,
2019, reflecting higher secured financing of AFS
investment securities in Treasury and CIO, as well as
trading assets in CIB, partially offset by a decline in client-
driven market-making activities in CIB, including the
Firm's non-participation in the Federal Reserve's open
market operations.
The balances associated with securities loaned or sold
under agreements to repurchase fluctuate over time due
to investment and financing activities of clients, the
Firm’s demand for financing, the ongoing management
of the mix of the Firm’s liabilities, including its secured
and unsecured financing (for both the investment
securities and market-making portfolios), and other
market and portfolio factors.As of December 31, 2020, the Firm participated in the
MMLF government facility. The secured nonrecourse
advances under the MMLF are included in other
borrowed funds. Refer to Capital Risk Management on
pages 91-101 for additional information on the MMLF.
The Primary Dealer Credit Facility ("PDCF") was
established by the Federal Reserve on March 20, 2020.
Under the PDCF, the Federal Reserve Bank of New
York (“FRBNY”) provides collateralized financing on a
term basis to primary dealers. These financing
transactions were reported as securities sold under
agreements to repurchase. The Firm participated in the
PDCF in the first quarter of 2020, and ceased its
participation in May 2020 as the secured financing
market normalized.
The Firm’s sources of short-term unsecured funding
consist of other borrowed funds and issuance of
wholesale commercial paper. The decrease in short-
term unsecured funding at December 31, 2020, from
December 31, 2019 and for the average year ended
December 31, 2020 compared to the prior year period,
was due to lower net commercial paper issuance
primarily for short-term liquidity management.
 (a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(c)
(e)
(f)
(f)
106 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Long-term funding and issuance
Long-term funding provides an additional source of stable funding and liquidity for the Firm. The Firm’s long-term
funding plan is driven primarily by expected client activity, liquidity considerations, and regulatory requirements,
including TLAC. Long-term funding objectives include maintaining diversification, maximizing market access and
optimizing funding costs. The Firm evaluates various funding markets, tenors and currencies in creating its optimal
long-term funding plan.
The significant majority of the Firm’s long-term unsecured funding is issued by the Parent Company to provide flexibility
in support of both bank and non-bank subsidiary funding needs. The Parent Company advances substantially all net
funding proceeds to its subsidiary, the IHC. The IHC does not issue debt to external counterparties. The following table
summarizes long-term unsecured issuance and maturities or redemptions for the years ended December 31, 2020 and
2019. Refer to Note 20 for additional information on long-term debt.
Long-term unsecured funding
Year ended December 31, 2020 2019 2020 2019
(Notional in millions) Parent Company Subsidiaries
Issuance
Senior notes issued in the U.S. market $ 25,500 $ 14,000 $ 60 $ 1,750 
Senior notes issued in non-U.S. markets 1,355 5,867 — — 
Total senior notes 26,855 19,867 60 1,750 
Subordinated debt 3,000 — — — 
Structured notes 7,596 5,844 24,185 33,563 
Total long-term unsecured funding – issuance $ 37,451 $ 25,711 $ 24,245 $ 35,313 
Maturities/redemptions
Senior notes $ 28,719 $ 18,098 $ 7,701 $ 5,367 
Subordinated debt 135 183 — — 
Structured notes 5,340 2,944 30,002 19,271 
Total long-term unsecured funding – maturities/redemptions $ 34,194 $ 21,225 $ 37,703 $ 24,638 
(a)Includes certain TLAC-eligible long-term unsecured debt issued by the Parent Company.
The Firm can also raise secured long-term funding through securitization of consumer credit card loans and through
FHLB advances. The following table summarizes the securitization issuance and FHLB advances and their respective
maturities or redemptions for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Long-term secured funding
Year ended December 31, Issuance Maturities/Redemptions
(in millions) 2020 2019 2020 2019
Credit card securitization $ 1,000 $ — $ 2,525 $ 6,975 
FHLB advances 15,000 — 29,509 15,817 
Other long-term secured funding 1,130 204 1,048 927 
Total long-term secured funding $ 17,130 $ 204 $ 33,082 $ 23,719 
(a)Includes long-term structured notes which are secured.
The Firm’s wholesale businesses also securitize loans for client-driven transactions; those client-driven loan
securitizations are not considered to be a source of funding for the Firm and are not included in the table above. Refer
to Note 14 for a further description of client-driven loan securitizations.(a)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 107
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Credit ratings
The cost and availability of financing are influenced by
credit ratings. Reductions in these ratings could have an
adverse effect on the Firm’s access to liquidity sources,
increase the cost of funds, trigger additional collateral or
funding requirements and decrease the number of
investors and counterparties willing to lend to the Firm.
The nature and magnitude of the impact of ratings
downgrades depends on numerous contractual and
behavioral factors,which the Firm believes are incorporated in its liquidity
risk and stress testing metrics. The Firm believes that it
maintains sufficient liquidity to withstand a potential
decrease in funding capacity due to ratings downgrades.
Additionally, the Firm’s funding requirements for VIEs
and other third-party commitments may be adversely
affected by a decline in credit ratings.
The credit ratings of the Parent Company and the Firm’s principal bank and non-bank subsidiaries as of December 31,
2020 were as follows:
JPMorgan Chase & Co. JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
 J.P. Morgan Securities plc
December 31, 2020Long-term
issuerShort-term
issuer OutlookLong-term
issuerShort-term
issuer OutlookLong-term
issuerShort-term
issuer Outlook
Moody’s Investors Service A2 P-1 Stable Aa2 P-1 Stable Aa3 P-1 Stable
Standard & Poor’s A- A-2 Stable A+ A-1 Stable A+ A-1 Stable
Fitch Ratings AA- F1+ Negative AA F1+ Negative AA F1+ Negative
(a)On April 18, 2020, Fitch affirmed the credit ratings of the Parent Company and the Firm’s principal bank and non-bank subsidiaries but revised
the outlook on the credit ratings from stable to negative given expectations that credit fundamentals will deteriorate as a result of the COVID-19
pandemic.
JPMorgan Chase’s unsecured debt does not contain
requirements that would call for an acceleration of
payments, maturities or changes in the structure of the
existing debt, provide any limitations on future
borrowings or require additional collateral, based on
unfavorable changes in the Firm’s credit ratings,
financial ratios, earnings, or stock price.Critical factors in maintaining high credit ratings include
a stable and diverse earnings stream, strong capital and
liquidity ratios, strong credit quality and risk
management controls, and diverse funding sources.
Rating agencies continue to evaluate economic and
geopolitical trends, regulatory developments, future
profitability, risk management practices, and litigation
matters, as well as their broader ratings methodologies.
Changes in any of these factors could lead to changes
in the Firm’s credit ratings.(a)
108 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
REPUT ATION RISK MANAGEMENT
Reputation risk is the risk that an action or inaction may
negatively impact perception of the Firm’s integrity and
reduce confidence in the Firm’s competence by various
constituents, including clients, counterparties,
customers, investors, regulators, employees,
communities or the broader public.
Organization and management
Reputation Risk Management establishes the
governance framework for managing reputation risk
across the Firm. As reputation risk is inherently
challenging to identify, manage, and quantify, a
reputation risk management function is critical.
The Firm’s reputation risk management function
includes the following activities:
•Maintaining a Firmwide Reputation Risk
Governance policy and standards consistent with
the reputation risk framework
•Managing the governance infrastructure and
processes that support consistent identification,
escalation, management and monitoring of
reputation risk issues Firmwide
•Providing guidance to LOB Reputation Risk Offices
(“RRO”), as appropriate
The types of events that give rise to reputation risk are
wide-ranging and could be introduced in various ways,
including by the Firm’s employees and the clients,
customers and counterparties the Firm does business
with. These events could result in financial losses,
litigation and regulatory fines, as well as other damages
to the Firm.Governance and oversight
The Reputation Risk Governance policy establishes the
principles for managing reputation risk for the Firm. It is
the responsibility of employees in each LOB and
Corporate to consider the reputation of the Firm when
deciding whether to offer a new product, engage in a
transaction or client relationship, enter a new
jurisdiction, initiate a business process or other matters.
Sustainability, social responsibility and environmental
impacts are important considerations in assessing the
Firm’s reputation risk, and are a component of the
Firm’s reputation risk governance.
Reputation risk issues deemed material are escalated
as appropriate.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 109
Management’ s discussion and analysis
CREDIT AND INVESTMENT RISK MANAGEMENT
Credit and investment risk is the risk associated with the
default or change in credit profile of a client,
counterparty or customer; or loss of principal or a
reduction in expected returns on investments, including
consumer credit risk, wholesale credit risk, and
investment portfolio risk.
Credit risk management
Credit risk is the risk associated with the default or
change in credit profile of a client, counterparty or
customer. The Firm provides credit to a variety of
customers, ranging from large corporate and institutional
clients to individual consumers and small businesses. In
its consumer businesses, the Firm is exposed to credit
risk primarily through its home lending, credit card, auto,
and business banking businesses. In its wholesale
businesses, the Firm is exposed to credit risk through its
underwriting, lending, market-making, and hedging
activities with and for clients and counterparties, as well
as through its operating services activities (such as cash
management and clearing activities), and securities
financing activities. The Firm is also exposed to credit
risk through its investment securities portfolio and cash
placed with banks.
Credit Risk Management monitors, measures and
manages credit risk throughout the Firm and defines
credit risk policies and procedures. The Firm’s credit risk
management governance includes the following
activities:
•Maintaining a credit risk policy framework
•Monitoring, measuring and managing credit risk
across all portfolio segments, including transaction
and exposure approval
•Setting industry and geographic concentration limits,
as appropriate, and establishing underwriting
guidelines
•Assigning and managing credit authorities in
connection with the approval of credit exposure
•Managing criticized exposures and delinquent loans
and
•Estimating credit losses and ensuring appropriate
credit risk-based capital managementRisk identification and measurement
The Credit Risk Management function monitors,
measures, manages and limits credit risk across the
Firm’s businesses. To measure credit risk, the Firm
employs several methodologies for estimating the
likelihood of obligor or counterparty default.
Methodologies for measuring credit risk vary depending
on several factors, including type of asset (e.g.,
consumer versus wholesale), risk measurement
parameters (e.g., delinquency status and borrower’s
credit score versus wholesale risk-rating) and risk
management and collection processes (e.g., retail
collection center versus centrally managed workout
groups). Credit risk measurement is based on the
probability of default of an obligor or counterparty, the
loss severity given a default event and the exposure at
default.
Based on these factors and the methodology and
estimates described in Note 13 and Note 10, the Firm
estimates credit losses for its exposures. The allowance
for loan losses reflects credit losses related to the
consumer and wholesale held-for-investment loan
portfolios, the allowance for lending-related
commitments reflects credit losses related to the Firm’s
lending-related commitments and the allowance for
investment securities reflects the credit losses related to
the Firm’s HTM and AFS securities. Refer to Note 13,
Note 10 and Critical Accounting Estimates used by the
Firm on pages 152-155 for further information.
In addition, potential and unexpected credit losses are
reflected in the allocation of credit risk capital and
represent the potential volatility of actual losses relative
to the established allowances for loan losses and
lending-related commitments. The analyses for these
losses include stress testing that considers alternative
economic scenarios as described in the Stress testing
section below.
Stress testing
Stress testing is important in measuring and managing
credit risk in the Firm’s credit portfolio. The stress testing
process assesses the potential impact of alternative
economic and business scenarios on estimated credit
losses for the Firm. Economic scenarios and the
underlying parameters are defined centrally, articulated
in terms of macroeconomic factors and applied across
the businesses. The stress test results may indicate
credit migration, changes in delinquency trends and
potential losses in the credit portfolio. In addition to the
periodic stress testing processes, management also
considers additional stresses outside these scenarios,
including industry and country- specific stress scenarios,
as necessary. The Firm uses stress testing to inform
decisions on setting risk appetite both at a Firm and
LOB level, as well as to assess the impact of stress on
individual counterparties.
110 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Risk monitoring and management
The Firm has developed policies and practices that are
designed to preserve the independence and integrity of
the approval and decision-making process of extending
credit to ensure credit risks are assessed accurately,
approved properly, monitored regularly and managed
actively at both the transaction and portfolio levels. The
policy framework establishes credit approval authorities,
concentration limits, risk-rating methodologies, portfolio
review parameters and guidelines for management of
distressed exposures. In addition, certain models,
assumptions and inputs used in evaluating and
monitoring credit risk are independently validated by
groups that are separate from the LOBs.
Consumer credit risk is monitored for delinquency and
other trends, including any concentrations at the
portfolio level, as certain of these trends can be modified
through changes in underwriting policies and portfolio
guidelines. Consumer Risk Management evaluates
delinquency and other trends against business
expectations, current and forecasted economic
conditions, and industry benchmarks. Historical and
forecasted economic performance and trends are
incorporated into the modeling of estimated consumer
credit losses and are part of the monitoring of the credit
risk profile of the portfolio.
Wholesale credit risk is monitored regularly at an
aggregate portfolio, industry, and individual client and
counterparty level with established concentration limits
that are reviewed and revised periodically as deemed
appropriate by management. Industry and counterparty
limits, as measured in terms of exposure and economic
risk appetite, are subject to stress-based loss
constraints. Wrong-way risk is the risk that exposure to
a counterparty is positively correlated with the impact of
a default by the same counterparty, which could cause
exposure to increase at the same time as the
counterparty’s capacity to meet its obligations is
decreasing.
Management of the Firm’s wholesale credit risk
exposure is accomplished through a number of means,
including:
•Loan underwriting and credit approval process
•Loan syndications and participations
•Loan sales and securitizations
•Credit derivatives
•Master netting agreements, and
•Collateral and other risk-reduction techniquesIn addition to Credit Risk Management, an independent
Credit Review function is responsible for:
•Independently validating or changing the risk grades
assigned to exposures in the Firm’s wholesale credit
portfolio, and assessing the timeliness of risk grade
changes initiated by responsible business units; and
•Evaluating the effectiveness of business units’ credit
management processes, including the adequacy of
credit analyses and risk grading/LGD rationales,
proper monitoring and management of credit
exposures, and compliance with applicable grading
policies and underwriting guidelines.
Refer to Note 12 for further discussion of consumer and
wholesale loans.
Risk reporting
To enable monitoring of credit risk and effective
decision-making, aggregate credit exposure, credit
quality forecasts, concentration levels and risk profile
changes are reported regularly to senior members of
Credit Risk Management. Detailed portfolio reporting of
industry, clients, counterparties and customers, product
and geography are prepared, and the appropriateness
of the allowance for credit losses is reviewed by senior
management at least on a quarterly basis. Through the
risk reporting and governance structure, credit risk
trends and limit exceptions are provided regularly to,
and discussed with, risk committees, senior
management and the Board of Directors.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 111
Management’ s discussion and analysis
CREDIT POR TFOLIO
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL
accounting guidance. The adoption resulted in a change
in the accounting for PCI loans, which are considered
PCD loans under CECL. In conjunction with the
adoption of CECL, the Firm reclassified risk-rated loans
and lending-related commitments from the consumer,
excluding credit card portfolio segment to the wholesale
portfolio segment, to align with the methodology applied
when determining the allowance. Prior-period amounts
have been revised to conform with the current
presentation. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
The Firm has provided various forms of assistance to
customers and clients impacted by the COVID-19
pandemic, including payment deferrals and covenant
modifications. The majority of the Firm’s COVID-19
related loan modifications have not been considered
troubled debt restructurings (“TDRs”) because:
•they represent short-term or other insignificant
modifications, whether under the Firm’s regular loan
modification assessments or the IA Statement
guidance, or
•the Firm has elected to apply the option to suspend
the application of accounting guidance for TDRs
provided by the CARES Act and extended by the
Consolidated Appropriations Act.
To the extent that certain modifications do not meet any
of the above criteria, the Firm accounts for them as
TDRs. The Firm considers expected losses of principal
and accrued interest associated with all COVID-19
related loan modifications in its allowance for credit
losses. Refer to Business Developments on pages 50-
51 for more information on customer and client
assistance granted. Refer to Notes 12 and 13 for further
information on the Firm’s accounting policies on loan
modifications and the allowance for credit losses.The effectiveness of the Firm’s actions in helping
borrowers recover and in mitigating the Firm’s credit
losses remains uncertain in light of the unpredictable
nature and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic.
Assistance provided in response to the COVID-19
pandemic could delay the recognition of delinquencies,
nonaccrual status, and net charge-offs for those
customers and clients who would have otherwise moved
into past due or nonaccrual status. Refer to Consumer
Credit Portfolio on pages 114-120 and Wholesale Credit
Portfolio on pages 121-131 for information on loan
modifications as of December 31, 2020.
In the following tables, reported loans include loans
retained (i.e., held-for-investment); loans held-for-sale;
and certain loans accounted for at fair value. The
following tables do not include loans which the Firm
accounts for at fair value and classifies as trading
assets; refer to Notes 2 and 3 for further information
regarding these loans. Refer to Notes 12, 28, and 5 for
additional information on the Firm’s loans, lending-
related commitments and derivative receivables,
including the Firm’s accounting policies.
Refer to Note 10 for information regarding the credit risk
inherent in the Firm’s investment securities portfolio; and
refer to Note 11 for information regarding credit risk
inherent in the securities financing portfolio. Refer to
Consumer Credit Portfolio on pages 114-120 and Note
12 for further discussions of the consumer credit
environment and consumer loans. Refer to Wholesale
Credit Portfolio on pages 121-131 and Note 12 for
further discussions of the wholesale credit environment
and wholesale loans.
112 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Total credit portfolio
December 31,
 (in millions)Credit exposure Nonperforming
2020 2019 2020 2019
Loans retained $ 960,506 $ 945,601 $ 8,782 $ 3,983 
Loans held-for-sale 7,873 7,064 284 7 
Loans at fair value 44,474 44,955 1,507 647 
Total loans –
reported 1,012,853 997,620 10,573 4,637 
Derivative receivables 79,630 49,766 56 30 
Receivables from
customers 47,710 33,706 — — 
Total credit-related
assets 1,140,193 1,081,092 10,629 4,667 
Assets acquired in
loan satisfactions
Real estate owned NA NA 256 344 
Other NA NA 21 43 
Total assets
acquired in loan
satisfactions NA NA 277 387 
Lending-related
commitments 1,165,688 1,108,399 577 474 
Total credit portfolio$2,305,881 $2,189,491 $ 11,483 $ 5,528 
Credit derivatives
used in credit
portfolio
management
activities $ (22,239)$ (18,530)$ — $ — 
 Liquid securities and
other cash collateral
held against
derivatives (14,806) (13,052) NA NA
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions, except ratios) 2020 2019
Net charge-offs $ 5,259 $ 5,629 
Average retained loans 958,303 941,919 
Net charge-off rates 0.55 % 0.60 %
(a) In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans, which resulted in a corresponding reclassification of certain
off-balance sheet commitments. Prior-period amounts have been
revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)    Receivables from customers reflect held-for-investment margin
loans to brokerage clients in CIB, CCB and AWM; these are
reported within accrued interest and accounts receivable on the
Consolidated balance sheets.
(c)    Represents the net notional amount of protection purchased and
sold through credit derivatives used to manage both performing
and nonperforming wholesale credit exposures; these derivatives
do not qualify for hedge accounting under U.S. GAAP. Refer to
Credit derivatives on page 131 and Note 5 for additional
information.
(d) Prior-period amount has been revised to conform with the current
presentation.
(e)    In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm refined its approach for
disclosing additional collateral held by the Firm that may be used
as security when the fair value of the client’s exposure is in the
Firm’s favor. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform
with the current presentation.
(f)    At December 31, 2020 and 2019, nonperforming assets excluded
mortgage loans 90 or more days past due and insured by U.S.
government agencies of $874 million and $1.1 billion, respectively,
and real estate owned (“REO”) insured by U.S. government
agencies of $9 million and $41 million, respectively. Prior-period
amount of mortgage loans 90 or more days past due and insured
by U.S. government agencies excluded from nonperforming assets
has been revised to conform with the current presentation; refer to
footnote (a) for additional information. These amounts have been
excluded based upon the government guarantee. In addition, the
Firm’s policy is generally to exempt credit card loans from being
placed on nonaccrual status as permitted by regulatory guidance.
(g) At December 31, 2020, nonperforming loans included $1.6 billion
of PCD loans on nonaccrual status. Prior to the adoption of CECL,
nonaccrual loans excluded PCI loans as the Firm recognized
interest income on each pool of PCI loans as each of the pools
was performing.Paycheck Protection Program
The PPP, established by the CARES Act and
implemented by the SBA, provided the Firm with
delegated authority to process and originate PPP loans.
When certain criteria are met, PPP loans are subject to
forgiveness and the Firm will receive payment of the
forgiveness amount from the SBA. PPP loans have a
contractual term of two or five years and provide
borrowers with an automatic payment deferral of
principal and interest. Given that PPP loans are
guaranteed by the SBA, the Firm does not expect to
realize material credit losses on these loans. PPP
processing fees are deferred and accreted into interest
income over the contractual life of the loans, but may be
accelerated upon forgiveness or prepayment. The
impact on interest income related to PPP loans was not
material for the year ended December 31, 2020.
The Firm was in the early stages of the PPP loan
forgiveness process at December 31, 2020.
At December 31, 2020, the Firm had approximately $27
billion of loans under the PPP, of which $19 billion are in
the consumer portfolio and $8 billion are in the
wholesale portfolio.(f)(g)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(c)(d)
(e)
JPM Ch &C/2020F 10K 113
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 113
Management’ s discussion and analysis
CONSUMER CREDIT POR TFOLIO
The Firm’s retained consumer portfolio consists primarily
of residential real estate loans, credit card loans, scored
auto and business banking loans, as well as associated
lending-related commitments. The Firm’s focus is on
serving primarily the prime segment of the consumer
credit market. Originated mortgage loans are retained in
the residential real estate portfolio, securitized or sold to
U.S. government agencies and U.S. government-
sponsored enterprises; other types of consumer loans
are typically retained on the balance sheet. Refer to
Note 12 for further information on the consumer loan
portfolio. Refer to Note 28 for further information on
lending-related commitments.
In 2020, the allowance for credit losses increased,
reflecting the deterioration in and uncertainty around the
future macroeconomic environment as a result of the
impact of the COVID-19 pandemic. Net charge-offs for
the year ended December 31, 2020 decreased when
compared to December 31, 2019, benefiting from
payment assistance and government stimulus. The
potential for increased infection rates and related lock
downs, as well as the duration and effectiveness of
government and other consumer relief measures
remains uncertain which could have a longer term
impact on delinquency rates and net charge-offs.
114 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The following table presents consumer credit-related information with respect to the scored credit portfolio held in CCB,
AWM, CIB and Corporate.
Consumer credit portfolio
As of or for the year ended December 31,
(in millions, except ratios)Credit exposure Nonaccrual loansNet charge-
offs/(recoveries)Net charge-off/
(recovery) rate
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
Consumer, excluding credit card
Residential real estate $ 225,302 $ 243,317 $5,313 $2,780 $ (164)$ (92) (0.07)% (0.04)%
Auto and other 76,825 51,682 151 $ 146 338 $ 456 0.51 0.88 
Total loans - retained 302,127 294,999 5,464 2,926 174 364 0.06 0.12 
Loans held-for-sale 1,305 3,002 — 2 NA NA NA NA
Loans at fair value 15,147 19,816 1,003 438 NA NA NA NA
Total consumer, excluding credit card loans 318,579 317,817 6,467 3,366 174 364 0.06 0.12 
Lending-related commitments 57,319 40,169 
Total consumer exposure, excluding credit card 375,898 357,986 
Credit Card
Loans retained 143,432 168,924 NA NA 4,286 4,848 2.93 3.10 
Loans held-for-sale 784 — NA NA NA NA NA NA
Total credit card loans 144,216 168,924 NA NA 4,286 4,848 2.93 3.10 
Lending-related commitments 658,506 650,720 
Total credit card exposure 802,722 819,644 
Total consumer credit portfolio $ 1,178,620 $ 1,177,630 $6,467 $3,366 $4,460 $5,212 0.99 % 1.11 %
(a)Includes scored mortgage and home equity loans held in CCB and AWM, and scored mortgage loans held in Corporate.
(b)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, excluded operating lease assets of $20.6 billion and $22.8 billion, respectively. These operating lease assets
are included in other assets on the Firm’s Consolidated balance sheets. Refer to Note 18 for further information.
(c)Includes scored auto and business banking loans and overdrafts.
(d)At December 31, 2020, included $19.2 billion of loans in Business Banking under the PPP. Given that PPP loans are guaranteed by the SBA, the
Firm does not expect to realize material credit losses on these loans. Refer to Credit Portfolio on pages 112-113 for a further discussion of the
PPP.
(e)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans. Prior-
period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(f)Includes scored mortgage loans held in CCB and CIB.
(g)Credit card, home equity and certain business banking lending-related commitments represent the total available lines of credit for these
products. The Firm has not experienced, and does not anticipate, that all available lines of credit would be used at the same time. For credit card
commitments, and if certain conditions are met, home equity commitments and certain business banking commitments, the Firm can reduce or
cancel these lines of credit by providing the borrower notice or, in some cases as permitted by law, without notice. Refer to Note 28 for further
information.
(h)Includes billed interest and fees.
(i)Also includes commercial card lending-related commitments primarily in CB and CIB.
(j)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, nonaccrual loans excluded mortgage loans 90 or more days past due and insured by U.S. government
agencies of $874 million and $1.1 billion, respectively. Prior-period amount of mortgage loans 90 or more days past due and insured by U.S.
government agencies excluded from nonaccrual loans has been revised to conform with the current presentation; refer to footnote (e) for
additional information. These amounts have been excluded from nonaccrual loans based upon the government guarantee. In addition, the Firm’s
policy is generally to exempt credit card loans from being placed on nonaccrual status, as permitted by regulatory guidance.
(k)At December 31, 2020, nonaccrual loans included $1.6 billion of PCD loans. Prior to the adoption of CECL, nonaccrual loans excluded PCI loans
as the Firm recognized interest income on each pool of PCI loans as each of the pools was performing.
(l)Generally excludes loans under payment deferral programs offered in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Includes loans to customers that
have exited COVID-19 payment deferral programs and are 90 or more days past due, predominantly all of which were also at least 150 days past
due and therefore considered collateral-dependent. Collateral-dependent loans are charged down to the lower of amortized cost or fair value of
the underlying collateral less costs to sell.
(m)Average consumer loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value were $18.3 billion and $20.4 billion for the years ended December 31, 2020 and
2019, respectively. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation; refer to footnote (e) for additional
information. These amounts were excluded when calculating net charge-off/(recovery) rates.(j)(k)(l) (m)
(a)
(b)(c)(d) (d)
(e)(f)
(g)
(h)
(g)(i)
(i)
(i)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 115
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Consumer assistance
In March 2020, the Firm began providing assistance to
customers in response to the COVID-19 pandemic,
predominantly in the form of payment deferrals.
As of December 31, 2020, the Firm had $10.7 billion of
retained loans under payment deferral programs, which
represented a decrease of approximately $1.5 billion
from September 30, 2020 and $17.5 billion from June
30, 2020. During the fourth quarter of 2020, there were
approximately $1.4 billion of new enrollments in
payment deferralprograms predominantly in residential real estate and
credit card. Predominantly all borrowers that exited
payment deferral programs are current. The Firm
continues to monitor the credit risk associated with loans
subject to payment deferrals throughout the deferral
period and on an ongoing basis after the borrowers are
required to resume making regularly scheduled
payments and considers expected losses of principal
and accrued interest on these loans in its allowance for
credit losses.
December 31, 2020September
30, 2020June 30,
2020
(in millions,
except ratios)Loan
balancePercent of
loan class
balancePercent of
accounts who
exited
payment
deferral and
are currentLoan
balanceLoan
balanceType of assistance
Residential
real estate$10,106 4.5 % 95 % $11,458 $20,548 Rolling three month payment deferral up to
one year; in most cases, deferred payments
will be due at the end of the loan term
Auto and
other377 0.5 94 457 3,357 •Auto: Currently offering one month
payment deferral (initially offered three
month payment deferral). Maturity date is
extended by number of months deferred
•Business Banking: Three month deferral
with automatic deferment to either maturity
(loan) or one year forward (line)
Credit card 264 0.2 90 368 4,384 Currently offering deferral of one month
minimum payment (initially offered three
month minimum payment deferral). Interest
continues to accrue during the deferral period
and is added to the principal balance
Total
consumer $10,747 2.4 % 91 % $12,283 $28,289 
(a)Excludes $13.4 billion, $17.1 billion and $34.0 billion of third-party mortgage loans serviced at December 31, 2020, September 30, 2020 and
June 30, 2020, respectively.
(b)The weighted average LTV ratio of residential real estate loans under payment deferral at December 31, 2020 was 57%.
(c)Excludes risk-rated business banking and auto dealer loans held in CCB and auto operating lease assets that were still under payment deferral
programs as of December 31, 2020, September 30, 2020 and June 30, 2020. Auto operating lease asset payment assistance is currently offering
one month payment deferral (initially offered three month payment deferral). Deferrals do not extend the term of the lease and all deferred
payments are due at the end of the lease term.
(d)Includes $3.8 billion, $3.8 billion and $5.7 billion of loans that were accounted for as TDRs prior to payment deferral as of December 31, 2020,
September 30, 2020 and June 30, 2020, respectively.
(e)Represents the unpaid principal balance of retained loans which were still under payment deferral programs, divided by the total unpaid principal
balance of the respective loan classes retained loans.
(f)85% of the balance that exited deferral were current at December 31, 2020.
Of the $10.7 billion of loans still under payment deferral
programs as of December 31, 2020, approximately $4.0
billion were accounted for as TDRs, either because they
were accounted for as TDRs prior to payment deferral,
or because they did not qualify for or the Firm did not
elect the option to suspend TDR accounting guidance
provided by the CARES Act and extended by the
Consolidated Appropriations Act. A portion of the
remaining $6.7 billion of loans could become TDRs in
future periods, depending on the nature and timing of
further modifications or payment arrangements offered
to these borrowers. If the remaining $6.7 billion of loans
were considered TDRs, the Firm estimates that it would
result in an increase in standardized RWA of as much
as $2.5 billion.Predominantly all borrowers, including those accounted
for as TDRs, were current upon enrollment in payment
deferral programs and are expected to exit payment
deferral programs in a current status, either because no
payments are contractually due during the deferral
period or because payments originally contractually due
during the deferral period will be due at maturity upon
exit. For those borrowers that are unable to resume
making payments in accordance with the original or
modified contractual terms of their agreements upon exit
from deferral programs, they will be placed on
nonaccrual status in line with the Firm’s nonaccrual
policy, except for credit cards as permitted by regulatory
guidance, and charged off or down in accordance with
the Firm’s charge-off policies. Refer to Note 12 for
additional information on the Firm’s nonaccrual and
charge-off policies.(e)
(a)(b)
(c)
(f)
(d)
116 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Consumer , excluding credit card
Portfolio analysis
Loan balances were flat from December 31, 2019 as
PPP loan originations in Business Banking were offset
by lower residential real estate loans, reflecting
paydowns.
The following discussions provide information
concerning individual loan products. Refer to Note 12 for
further information about this portfolio, including
information about delinquencies, loan modifications and
other credit quality indicators.
Residential real estate: The residential real estate
portfolio, including loans held-for-sale and loans at fair
value, predominantly consists of prime mortgage loans
and home equity lines of credit. The portfolio decreased
from December 31, 2019 driven by paydowns largely
offset by originations of prime mortgage loans that have
been retained on the balance sheet. The 30+
delinquency rate decreased to 0.98% at December 31,
2020, from 1.35% at December 31, 2019, primarily due
to payment assistance and government stimulus.
Nonaccrual loans increased from December 31, 2019
due primarily to loans placed on nonaccrual status
related to the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic as well
as the adoption of CECL, as PCD loans became subject
to nonaccrual treatment. Net recoveries for the year
ended December 31, 2020 were higher when compared
with the prior year as the current year benefited from a
recovery on a loan sale.
The carrying value of home equity lines of credit
outstanding was $23.7 billion at December 31, 2020.
This amount included $8.6 billion of HELOCs that have
recast from interest-only to fully amortizing payments or
have been modified and $7.7 billion of interest-only
balloon HELOCs, which primarily mature after 2030.
The Firm manages the risk of HELOCs during their
revolving period by closing or reducing the undrawn line
to the extent permitted by law when borrowers are
exhibiting a material deterioration in their credit risk
profile.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the carrying value of
interest-only residential mortgage loans were $25.6
billion and $22.5 billion, respectively. These loans have
an interest-only payment period generally followed by an
adjustable-rate or fixed-rate fully amortizing payment
period to maturity and are typically originated as higher-
balance loans to higher-income borrowers,
predominantly in AWM. The net charge-off rate for the
year ended December 31, 2020 was consistent with the
rate of the broader residential mortgage portfolio as the
performance of this portfolio is generally in line with the
performance of the broader residential mortgage
portfolio.The following table provides a summary of the Firm’s
residential mortgage portfolio insured and/or guaranteed
by U.S. government agencies, predominantly loans
held-for-sale and loans at fair value. The Firm monitors
its exposure to certain potential unrecoverable claim
payments related to government-insured loans and
considers this exposure in estimating the allowance for
loan losses.
(in millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Current $ 669 $ 1,432 
30-89 days past due 235 704 
90 or more days past due 874 1,090 
Total government guaranteed
loans $ 1,778 $ 3,226 
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
Geographic composition and current estimated
loan-to-value ratio of residential real estate loans
At December 31, 2020, $146.6 billion, or 65% of the
total retained residential real estate loan portfolio,
excluding mortgage loans insured by U.S. government
agencies, were concentrated in California, New York,
Florida, Texas and Illinois, compared with $157.9 billion,
or 65%, at December 31, 2019.
Average current estimated loan-to-value (“LTV”) ratios
have declined consistent with recent improvements in
home prices, customer pay-downs, and charge-offs or
liquidations of higher LTV loans.
Refer to Note 12 for information on the geographic
composition and current estimated LTVs of the Firm’s
residential real estate loans.
 (a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 117
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Modified residential real estate loans
The following table presents information relating to
modified retained residential real estate loans for which
concessions have been granted to borrowers
experiencing financial difficulty, which include both
TDRs and modified loans accounted for as PCI loans
prior to the adoption of CECL. The following table does
not include loans with short-term or other insignificant
modifications that are not considered concessions and,
therefore, are not TDRs, or loans for which the Firm has
elected to apply the option to suspend the application of
accounting guidance for TDRs as provided by the
CARES Act and extended by the Consolidated
Appropriations Act. Refer to Note 12 for further
information on modifications for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019.
(in millions)December 31,
2020December
31, 2019
Retained loans $ 15,406 5,926 
PCI loans NA 12,372 
Nonaccrual retained loans $ 3,899 2,332 
(a)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, $7 million and $14 million,
respectively, of loans modified subsequent to repurchase from
Ginnie Mae in accordance with the standards of the appropriate
government agency (i.e., Federal Housing Administration (“FHA”),
U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs (“VA”), Rural Housing Service
of the U.S. Department of Agriculture (“RHS”)) are not included in
the table above. When such loans perform subsequent to
modification in accordance with Ginnie Mae guidelines, they are
generally sold back into Ginnie Mae loan pools. Modified loans
that do not re-perform become subject to foreclosure. Refer to
Note 14 for additional information about sales of loans in
securitization transactions with Ginnie Mae.
(b)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, nonaccrual loans included $3.0
billion and $1.9 billion, respectively, of TDRs for which the
borrowers were less than 90 days past due. Refer to Note 12 for
additional information about loans modified in a TDR that are on
nonaccrual status.
(c)At December 31, 2020, nonaccrual loans included $1.3 billion of
PCD loans. Prior to the adoption of CECL, nonaccrual loans
excluded PCI loans as the Firm recognized interest income on
each pool of PCI loans as each of the pools was performing.
(d)Amount represents the unpaid principal balance of modified PCI
loans at December 31, 2019, which were moved to retained loans
upon the adoption of CECL.
Auto and other: The auto and other loan portfolio
predominantly consists of prime-quality scored auto and
business banking loans, as well as overdrafts. The
portfolio increased when compared with December 31,
2019, predominantly due to PPP loan originations of
$21.9 billion in Business Banking of which $19.2 billion
remained outstanding at December 31, 2020 as well as
from growth in the auto portfolio from loan originations,
partially offset by paydowns and charge-offs or
liquidation of delinquent loans. The 30+ delinquency
rate decreased to 0.60% at December 31, 2020, from
1.31% at December 31, 2019, primarily due to payment
assistance and government stimulus, as well as PPP
loan originations as these loans are all considered
current. The scored auto portfolio net charge-off rates
were 0.25% and 0.44% for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Auto
charge-offs for the year ended December 31, 2020benefited from payment assistance programs and high
vehicle collateral values.
Nonperforming assets
The following table presents information as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, about consumer,
excluding credit card, nonperforming assets.
Nonperforming assets
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Nonaccrual loans
Residential real estate $ 6,316 $ 3,220 
Auto and other 151 146 
Total nonaccrual loans 6,467 3,366 
Assets acquired in loan satisfactions
Real estate owned 131 229 
Other 21 24 
Total assets acquired in loan
satisfactions 152 253 
Total nonperforming assets $ 6,619 $ 3,619 
(a)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, nonperforming assets excluded
mortgage loans 90 or more days past due and insured by U.S.
government agencies of $874 million and $1.1 billion, respectively,
and REO insured by U.S. government agencies of $9 million and
$41 million, respectively. Prior-period amount of mortgage loans
90 or more days past due and insured by U.S. government
agencies excluded from nonperforming assets has been revised to
conform with the current presentation; refer to footnote (b) for
additional information. These amounts have been excluded based
upon the government guarantee.
(b)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
(c)Generally excludes loans under payment deferral programs
offered in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Includes loans to
customers that have exited COVID-19 payment deferral programs
and are 90 or more days past due, predominantly all of which were
also at least 150 days past due and therefore considered
collateral-dependent. Collateral-dependent loans are charged
down to the lower of amortized cost or fair value of the underlying
collateral less costs to sell.
(d)At December 31, 2020, nonaccrual loans included $1.6 billion of
PCD loans. Prior to the adoption of CECL, nonaccrual loans
excluded PCI loans as the Firm recognized interest income on
each pool of PCI loans as each of the pools was performing.
(e)Prior-period amount has been revised to conform with the current
presentation.(a)
(d)
(b)(c)(a)
(b)(c)(d)
(e)
118 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
g
Nonaccrual loans
The following table presents changes in consumer,
excluding credit card, nonaccrual loans for the years
ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Nonaccrual loan activity
Year ended December 31,
(in millions) 2020 2019
Beginning balance $ 3,366 $ 3,853 
Additions:
PCD loans, upon adoption of
CECL 708 NA
Other additions 5,184 2,174 
Total additions 5,892 2,174 
Reductions:
Principal payments and other 983 1,167 
Charge-offs 390 371 
Returned to performing status 1,024 751 
Foreclosures and other
liquidations 394 372 
Total reductions 2,791 2,661 
Net changes 3,101 (487)
Ending balance $ 6,467 $ 3,366 
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
(b)Other reductions includes loan sales.
(c)Includes loans to customers that have exited COVID-19 payment
deferral programs and are 90 or more days past due,
predominantly all of which were also at least 150 days past due
and therefore considered collateral-dependent. Collateral-
dependent loans are charged down to the lower of amortized cost
or fair value of the underlying collateral less costs to sell.
Active and suspended foreclosure: Refer to Note 12
for information on loans that were in the process of
active or suspended foreclosure.
Refer to Note 12 for further information about the
consumer credit portfolio, including information about
delinquencies, loan modifications and other credit
quality indicators.Purchased credit deteriorated (“PCD”) loans
The following tables provide credit-related information
for PCD loans, which were accounted for as PCI loans
prior to the adoption of CECL. PCI loans are considered
PCD loans under CECL and are subject to the Firm’s
nonaccrual and charge-off policies. PCD loans are now
reported in the consumer, excluding credit card
portfolio’s residential real estate class. Refer to Note 1
for further information.
(in millions, except ratios)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Loan delinquency
Current $ 16,036 $ 18,571 
30-149 days past due 432 970 
150 or more days past due 573 822 
Total PCD loans $ 17,041 $ 20,363 
% of 30+ days past due to total
retained PCD loans 5.90 % 8.80 %
Nonaccrual loans $ 1,609 NA
(in millions, except ratios)Twelve months ended
December 31, 2020
Net charge-offs $ 74 
Net charge-off rate 0.39 %
(a)At December 31, 2020, loans under payment deferral programs
offered in response to the COVID-19 pandemic which are still
within their deferral period and performing according to their
modified terms are generally not considered delinquent.
(b)Includes loans to customers that have exited COVID-19 payment
deferral programs and are 150 or more days past due and
therefore considered collateral-dependent. Collateral dependent
loans are charged down to the lower of amortized cost or fair value
of the underlying collateral less costs to sell.
(c)Includes loans to customers that have exited COVID-19 payment
deferral programs and are 90 or more days past due,
predominantly all of which were also at least 150 days past due
and therefore considered collateral-dependent.
 (a)
(c)
(b)(a)
(b)
(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 119
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Credit card
Total credit card loans decreased from December 31,
2019 reflecting a decline in sales volume that began in
March as a result of the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic. The December 31, 2020 30+ and 90+ day
delinquency rates of 1.68% and 0.92%, respectively,
decreased compared to the December 31, 2019 30+
and 90+ day delinquency rates of 1.87% and 0.95%,
respectively. The delinquency rates were positively
impacted by borrowers who received payment
assistance and government stimulus. Net charge-offs
decreased for the year ended December 31, 2020
compared with the prior year reflecting lower charge-offs
and higher recoveries primarily benefiting from payment
assistance and government stimulus.
Consistent with the Firm’s policy, all credit card loans
typically remain on accrual status until charged off.
However, the Firm’s allowance for loan losses includes
the estimated uncollectible portion of accrued and billed
interest and fee income. Refer to Note 12 for further
information about this portfolio, including information
about delinquencies.
Geographic and FICO composition of credit card
loans
At December 31, 2020, $65.0 billion, or 45% of the total
retained credit card loan portfolio, was concentrated in
California, Texas, New York, Florida and Illinois,
compared with $77.5 billion, or 46%, at December 31,
2019. Refer to Note 12 for additional information on the
geographic and FICO composition of the Firm’s credit
card loans.
Modifications of credit card loans
At December 31, 2020, the Firm had $1.4 billion of
credit card loans outstanding that have been modified in
TDRs, which does not include loans with short-term or
other insignificant modifications that are not considered
TDRs, compared to $1.5 billion at December 31, 2019.
Refer to Note 12 for additional information about loan
modification programs for borrowers.
120 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
WHOLESALE CREDIT POR TFOLIO
In its wholesale businesses, the Firm is exposed to
credit risk primarily through its underwriting, lending,
market-making, and hedging activities with and for
clients and counterparties, as well as through various
operating services (such as cash management and
clearing activities), securities financing activities and
cash placed with banks. A portion of the loans originated
or acquired by the Firm’s wholesale businesses is
generally retained on the balance sheet. The Firm
distributes a significant percentage of the loans that it
originates into the market as part of its syndicated loan
business and to manage portfolio concentrations and
credit risk. The wholesale portfolio is actively managed,
in part by conducting ongoing, in-depth reviews of client
credit quality and transaction structure inclusive of
collateral where applicable, and of industry, product and
client concentrations. Refer to the industry discussion on
pages 123-127 for further information.
The Firm’s wholesale credit portfolio includes exposure
held in CIB, CB, AWM and Corporate, as well as risk-
rated business banking and auto dealer exposures held
in CCB for which the wholesale methodology is applied
when determining the allowance for credit losses.
In 2020, the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic
resulted in broad-based credit deterioration and an
increase in the allowance for credit losses. As of
December 31, 2020, the investment-grade percentage
of the portfolio decreased from 74% to 71%, and
criticized exposure increased $26.5 billion from $15.1
billion to $41.6 billion. The increase in criticized
exposure was largely driven by downgrades in
Consumer & Retail, Oil & Gas and Real Estate, and to a
lesser extent, net portfolio activity in Technology, Media
& Telecommunications. The continuation or worsening
of the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic on the
macroeconomic environment could result in further
impacts to credit quality metrics, including investment-
grade percentages, as well as to criticized and
nonperforming exposures and charge-offs.
As of December 31, 2020 retained loans were up $33.3
billion predominantly driven by AWM and CIB, and
lending-related commitments were up $32.4 billion,
predominantly driven by CIB and CB.Wholesale credit portfolio
December 31,
 (in millions)Credit exposure Nonperforming
2020 2019 2020 2019
Loans retained $514,947 $481,678 $3,318 $1,057 
Loans held-for-sale 5,784 4,062 284 5 
Loans at fair value 29,327 25,139 504 209 
Loans – reported 550,058 510,879 4,106 1,271 
Derivative
receivables 79,630 49,766 56 30 
Receivables from
customers 47,710 33,706 — — 
Total wholesale
credit-related
assets 677,398 594,351 4,162 1,301 
Assets acquired in
loan satisfactions
Real estate owned NA NA 125 115 
Other NA NA — 19 
Total assets
acquired in loan
satisfactions NA NA 125 134 
Lending-related
commitments 449,863 417,510 577 474 
Total wholesale
credit portfolio $1,127,261 $1,011,861 $4,864 $1,909 
Credit derivatives
used
in credit portfolio
management
activities $(22,239)$(18,530)$ — $ — 
Liquid securities and
other cash collateral
held against
derivatives (14,806) (13,052) NA NA
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans, which resulted in a corresponding reclassification of certain
off-balance sheet commitments. Prior-period amounts have been
revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)Receivables from customers reflect held-for-investment margin
loans to brokerage clients in CIB, CCB and AWM; these are
reported within accrued interest and accounts receivable on the
Consolidated balance sheets.
(c)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
(d)Represents the net notional amount of protection purchased and
sold through credit derivatives used to manage both performing
and nonperforming wholesale credit exposures; these derivatives
do not qualify for hedge accounting under U.S. GAAP. Refer to
Credit derivatives on page 131 and Note 5 for additional
information.
(e)In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm refined its approach for
disclosing additional collateral held by the Firm that may be used
as security when the fair value of the client’s exposure is in the
Firm’s favor. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform
with the current presentation.
(f)Loans that were modified in response to the COVID-19 pandemic
continue to be risk-rated in accordance with the Firm’s overall
credit risk management framework. As of December 31, 2020,
predominantly all of these loans were considered performing.
 (f)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(c)(d)
(e)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 121
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Wholesale assistance
In March 2020, the Firm began providing assistance to
clients in response to the COVID-19 pandemic,
predominantly in the form of payment deferrals and
covenant modifications.
As of December 31, 2020, the Firm had approximately
$1.6 billion of retained loans still under payment
deferral, which has decreased approximately $4.6 billion
from the third quarter, and $15.1 billion from the second
quarter. Predominantly all clients that exited deferral are
current orhave paid down their loans, and the Firm has not
experienced significant new payment deferral requests.
The Firm continues to monitor the credit risk associated
with loans subject to deferrals throughout the deferral
period and on an ongoing basis after the borrowers are
required to resume making regularly scheduled
payments and considers expected losses of principal
and accrued interest on these loans in its allowance for
credit losses.
 
(in millions, except ratios) December 31, 2020 September 30, 2020 June 30, 2020
Industry Loan balancePercent of total industry
loan balanceIG percentage of loan
balance in payment
deferral Loan balance Loan balance
Real Estate $ 550 0.46 % 36 %$ 4,385 $ 5,211 
Individuals and Individual
Entities 402 0.37 4 691 809 
Transportation 394 5.99 92 346 294 
Consumer & Retail 82 0.21 2 413 690 
Automotive 22 0.13 — 15 8,827 
Industrials 19 0.09 — 91 335 
Healthcare 7 0.04 — 100 300 
All Other industries 147 0.08 99 233 309 
Total wholesale $ 1,623  0.32 % 45 %$ 6,274 $ 16,775 
(a)Represents the balance of the retained loans which were still under payment deferral, divided by the respective industry total retained loans
balance.
In addition, the Firm granted assistance in the form of
covenant modifications. These types of assistance, both
payment deferrals and covenant modifications, are
generally not reported as TDRs, either because the
modifications were insignificant or they qualified for the
option to suspend the application of accounting
guidance for TDRs as provided by the CARES Act and
extended by the Consolidated Appropriations Act. A
portion of the $1.6 billion of loans under payment
deferral as December 31,2020 could become TDRs in future periods, depending
on the nature and timing of further modifications or
payment arrangements offered to these borrowers. If the
$1.6 billion of loans under payment deferral were
considered TDRs, the Firm estimates that it would result
in an increase in standardized RWA of as much as $500
million. Loans under assistance continue to be risk-rated
in accordance with the Firm’s overall credit risk
management framework. As of December 31, 2020,
predominantly all of these loans were considered
performing.
Wholesale credit exposure – maturity and ratings profile
The following tables present the maturity and internal risk ratings profiles of the wholesale credit portfolio as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019. The Firm generally considers internal ratings with qualitative characteristics equivalent
to BBB-/Baa3 or higher as investment grade, and takes into consideration collateral and structural support when
determining the internal risk rating for each credit facility. Refer to Note 12 for further information on internal risk
ratings.
Maturity profile Ratings profile
1 year or
less 
1 year
through 
 5 yearsAfter 5
years Total TotalTotal % 
 of IGDecember 31, 2020
 (in millions, except ratios)Investment-
gradeNoninvestment-
grade
Loans retained $183,969 $197,905 $133,073 $514,947 $379,273 $ 135,674 $514,947 74 %
Derivative receivables 79,630 79,630 
Less: Liquid securities and other cash
collateral held against derivatives (14,806) (14,806)
Total derivative receivables, net of collateral 18,456 17,599 28,769 64,824 38,941 25,883 64,824 60 
Lending-related commitments 116,950 315,179 17,734 449,863 312,694 137,169 449,863 70 
Subtotal 319,375 530,683 179,576 1,029,634 730,908 298,726 1,029,634 71 
Loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value35,111 35,111 
Receivables from customers 47,710 47,710 
Total exposure – net of liquid securities
and other cash collateral held against
derivatives $1,112,455 $1,112,455 
Credit derivatives used in credit portfolio
management activities $ (6,190)$(13,223)$ (2,826)$ (22,239)$ (17,860) $ (4,379) $(22,239) 80 %(a)
(g)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(e)(f)
122 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Maturity profile Ratings profile
1 year or
less 
1 year
through 
 5 yearsAfter 5 years Total TotalTotal % 
 of IGDecember 31, 2019
 (in millions, except ratios)Investment-
gradeNoninvestment-
grade
Loans retained $159,006 $186,256 $136,416 $481,678 $363,444 $ 118,234 $481,678 75 %
Derivative receivables 49,766 49,766 
Less: Liquid securities and other cash
collateral held against derivatives (13,052) (13,052)
Total derivative receivables, net of collateral 7,136 7,569 22,009 36,714 29,416 7,298 36,714 80 
Lending-related commitments 87,577 312,939 16,994 417,510 296,702 120,808 417,510 71 
Subtotal 253,719 506,764 175,419 935,902 689,562 246,340 935,902 74 
Loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value 29,201 29,201 
Receivables from customers 33,706 33,706 
Total exposure – net of liquid securities and
other cash collateral held against
derivatives $998,809 $998,809 
Credit derivatives used in credit portfolio
management activities $ (5,412)$(10,031)$ (3,087)$(18,530)$ (16,724) $ (1,806) $(18,530) 90 %
(a)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm refined its approach for disclosing additional collateral held by the Firm that may be used as security when
the fair value of the client’s exposure is in the Firm’s favor. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(c)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans, which
resulted in a corresponding reclassification of certain off-balance sheet commitments. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with
the current presentation.
(d)Represents loans held-for-sale, primarily related to syndicated loans and loans transferred from the retained portfolio, and loans at fair value.
(e)These derivatives do not qualify for hedge accounting under U.S. GAAP.
(f)The notional amounts are presented on a net basis by underlying reference entity and the ratings profile shown is based on the ratings of the
reference entity on which protection has been purchased. Predominantly all of the credit derivatives entered into by the Firm where it has
purchased protection used in credit portfolio management activities are executed with investment-grade counterparties.
(g)The maturity profile of retained loans, lending-related commitments and derivative receivables is generally based on remaining contractual
maturity. Derivative contracts that are in a receivable position at December 31, 2020, may become payable prior to maturity based on their cash
flow profile or changes in market conditions.
Wholesale credit exposure – industry exposures
The Firm focuses on the management and
diversification of its industry exposures, and pays
particular attention to industries with actual or potential
credit concerns.
Exposures deemed criticized align with the U.S. banking
regulators’ definition of criticized exposures, which
consist of the special mention, substandard and doubtful
categories. Total criticized exposure excluding loans
held-for-sale and loans at fair value, was $41.6 billion at
December 31, 2020, compared with $15.1 billion at
December 31, 2019, representing approximately 4.0%
and 1.5% of total wholesale credit exposure,
respectively. The increase in total criticized exposure
was largely driven by downgrades in Consumer &
Retail, Oil & Gas and Real Estate due to impacts from
the COVID-19 pandemic, and to a lesser extent, net
portfolio activity in Technology, Media &
Telecommunications. Predominantly all of the $41.6
billion was performing and largely undrawn. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 (g)
(a)
(b)
(a)(c)
(c)(d)
(a)(e)(f)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 123
Management’ s discussion and analysis
The table below summarizes by industry the Firm’s exposures as of December 31, 2020 and 2019. The industry of risk
category is generally based on the client or counterparty’s primary business activity. Refer to Note 4 for additional
information on industry concentrations.
Wholesale credit exposure – industries
Selected metrics
30 days or
more past
due and
accruing
loansNet charge-
offs/
 (recoveries)Credit
derivative
hedgesLiquid securities
and other cash
collateral held
against
derivative
receivablesNoninvestment-grade
Credit
exposureInvestment-
grade NoncriticizedCriticized
performingCriticized 
 nonperformingAs of or for the year ended 
 December 31, 2020
 (in millions)
Real Estate $148,498 $116,124 $ 27,576 $ 4,294 $ 504 $ 374 $ 94 $ (110)$ — 
Individuals and Individual
Entities 122,870 107,266 14,688 227 689 1,570 (17) — — 
Consumer & Retail 108,437 57,580 41,624 8,852 381 203 55 (381) (5)
Technology, Media & 
 Telecommunications 72,150 36,435 27,770 7,738 207 10 73 (934) (56)
Asset Managers 66,573 57,582 8,885 85 21 19 1 — (4,685)
Industrials 66,470 37,512 26,881 1,852 225 278 70 (658) (61)
Healthcare 60,118 44,901 13,356 1,684 177 96 104 (378) (191)
Banks & Finance Cos 54,032 35,115 17,820 1,045 52 20 13 (555) (1,648)
Automotive 43,331 25,548 15,575 2,149 59 152 22 (434) — 
Oil & Gas 39,159 18,456 14,969 4,952 782 11 249 (238) (4)
State & Municipal Govt 38,286 37,705 574 2 5 41 — — (41)
Utilities 30,124 22,451 7,048 571 54 14 (7) (402) (1)
Chemicals & Plastics 17,176 10,622 5,703 822 29 6 — (83) — 
Central Govt 17,025 16,652 373 — — — — (8,364) (982)
Transportation 16,232 7,549 6,340 2,137 206 30 117 (83) (26)
Metals & Mining 15,542 5,958 8,699 704 181 8 16 (141) (13)
Insurance 13,141 10,177 2,960 3 1 7 — — (1,771)
Securities Firms 8,048 6,116 1,927 1 4 — 18 (49) (3,423)
Financial Markets Infrastructure 6,515 6,449 66 — — — — — (10)
All other 100,713 84,650 15,185 504 374 83 (9) (9,429) (1,889)
Subtotal $1,044,440 $744,848 $ 258,019 $ 37,622 $ 3,951 $ 2,922 $ 799 $(22,239)$ (14,806)
Loans held-for-sale and loans at
fair value 35,111 
Receivables from customers 47,710 
Total $1,127,261 (a)
(h) (i) (k) (f)(g) (g) (g)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
124 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Selected metrics
30 days or
more past
due and
accruing
 loansNet charge-
offs/
 (recoveries)Credit
derivative
hedgesLiquid securities
and other cash
collateral held
against
derivative
receivablesNoninvestment-grade
Credit
exposureInvestment-
grade NoncriticizedCriticized
performingCriticized 
nonperformingAs of or for the year ended 
December 31, 2019
 (in millions)
Real Estate $150,919 $121,625 $ 27,779 $ 1,457 $ 58 $ 104 $ 13 $ (100) $ — 
Individuals and Individual
Entities 105,027 93,181 11,617 192 37 388 33 — (287)
Consumer & Retail 106,986 58,704 45,806 2,261 215 118 124 (235) (5)
Technology, Media & 
Telecommunications 60,033 35,878 21,066 2,953 136 27 27 (658) (13)
Asset Managers 54,304 47,569 6,716 6 13 18 — — (4,410)
Industrials 62,483 39,434 21,673 1,157 219 172 48 (746) (1)
Healthcare 50,824 36,988 12,544 1,141 151 108 14 (405) (144)
Banks & Finance Cos 50,786 34,941 15,031 808 6 — — (834) (1,419)
Automotive 35,118 24,255 10,246 615 2 8 1 (194) — 
Oil & Gas 41,641 22,244 17,823 995 579 — 98 (429) (6)
State & Municipal Govt 30,095 29,586 509 — — 33 7 — (16)
Utilities 34,843 22,213 12,316 301 13 2 39 (414) (34)
Chemicals & Plastics 17,499 12,033 5,243 221 2 5 — (10) (13)
Central Govt 14,865 14,524 341 — — — — (9,018) (850)
Transportation 14,497 8,734 5,336 353 74 30 8 (37) (37)
Metals & Mining 15,586 7,095 7,789 661 41 2 (1) (33) (2)
Insurance 12,348 9,458 2,867 19 4 3 — (36) (1,790)
Securities Firms 7,381 6,010 1,344 27 — — — (48) (3,088)
Financial Markets Infrastructure 4,121 3,969 152 — — — — — (4)
All other 79,598 73,453 5,722 412 11 4 4 (5,333) (933)
Subtotal $948,954 $701,894 $ 231,920 $ 13,579 $ 1,561 $ 1,022 $ 415 $(18,530) $ (13,052)
Loans held-for-sale and loans at
fair value 29,201 
Receivables from customers 33,706 
Total $1,011,861 
(a)The industry rankings presented in the table as of December 31, 2019, are based on the industry rankings of the corresponding exposures at
December 31, 2020, not actual rankings of such exposures at December 31, 2019.
(b)Individuals and Individual Entities predominantly consists of Wealth Management clients within AWM and includes exposure to personal
investment companies and personal and testamentary trusts.
(c)In addition to the credit risk exposure to states and municipal governments (both U.S. and non-U.S.) at December 31, 2020 and 2019, noted
above, the Firm held: $7.2 billion and $6.5 billion, respectively, of trading assets; $20.4 billion and $29.8 billion, respectively, of AFS securities;
and $12.8 billion and $4.8 billion, respectively, of HTM securities, issued by U.S. state and municipal governments. Refer to Note 2 and Note 10
for further information.
(d)All other includes: SPEs and Private education and civic organizations, representing approximately 92% and 8%, respectively, at December 31,
2020 and 90% and 10%, respectively, at December 31, 2019 .
(e)Excludes cash placed with banks of $516.9 billion and $254.0 billion, at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, which is predominantly
placed with various central banks, primarily Federal Reserve Banks.
(f)Credit exposure is net of risk participations and excludes the benefit of credit derivatives used in credit portfolio management activities held
against derivative receivables or loans and liquid securities and other cash collateral held against derivative receivables.
(g)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans, which
resulted in a corresponding reclassification of certain off-balance sheet commitments. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with
the current presentation.
(h)Generally excludes loans under payment deferral programs offered in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
(i)Represents the net notional amounts of protection purchased and sold through credit derivatives used to manage the credit exposures; these
derivatives do not qualify for hedge accounting under U.S. GAAP. The All other category includes purchased credit protection on certain credit
indices.
(j)Prior-period amount has been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(k)In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm refined its approach for disclosing additional collateral held by the Firm that may be used as security when
the fair value of the client’s exposure is in the Firm’s favor. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.(i) (k) (f)(g) (g) (g)
(b)
(c)
(d) (j)
(e)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 125
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Presented below is additional detail on certain of the Firm’s largest industry exposures and/or certain industries which
present potential heightened credit concerns.
Real Estate
Real Estate exposure was $148.5 billion as of December 31, 2020, of which $85.6 billion was multifamily lending as
shown in the table below. During the year ended December 31, 2020, the following changes were primarily driven by
impacts from the COVID-19 pandemic:
•the investment-grade portion of the Real Estate portfolio decreased from 81% to 78%.
•the drawn percentage of this portfolio increased from 78% to 80%
•criticized exposure increased by $3.3 billion from $1.5 billion to $4.8 billion
December 31, 2020
(in millions, except ratios)Loans and
Lending-related
CommitmentsDerivative
ReceivablesCredit
exposure% Investment-
grade % Drawn
Multifamily $ 85,368 $ 183 $ 85,551 85 % 92 %
Office 16,372 475 16,847 76 70 
Other Income Producing Properties 13,435 421 13,856 76 55 
Retail 10,573 199 10,772 60 69 
Services and Non Income Producing 9,242 22 9,264 62 47 
Industrial 9,039 69 9,108 76 73 
Lodging 3,084 16 3,100 24 57 
Total Real Estate Exposure 147,113 1,385 148,498 78 80 
December 31, 2019
(in millions, except ratios)Loans and
Lending-related
CommitmentsDerivative 
ReceivablesCredit
exposure% Investment-
grade % Drawn
Multifamily $ 86,381 $ 58 $ 86,439 91 % 92 %
Office 15,734 231 15,965 80 70 
Other Income Producing Properties 14,372 181 14,553 48 45 
Retail 11,347 87 11,434 83 68 
Services and Non Income Producing 9,922 19 9,941 57 47 
Industrial 8,842 24 8,866 74 75 
Lodging 3,702 19 3,721 51 38 
Total Real Estate Exposure 150,300 619 150,919 81 78 
(a)Multifamily exposure is largely in California.
(b)Other Income Producing Properties consists of clients with diversified property types or other property types outside of multifamily, office, retail,
industrial and lodging with less material exposures.
(c)Real Estate exposure is approximately 80% secured; unsecured exposure is approximately 78% investment-grade.
(d)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans, which
resulted in a corresponding reclassification of certain off-balance sheet commitments. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with
the current presentation.
(e)Represents drawn exposure as a percentage of credit exposure.(d) (e)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d) (e)
(a)
(b)
126 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Consumer & Retail
Consumer & Retail exposure was $108.4 billion as of December 31, 2020, and predominantly included Retail, Food
and Beverage, and Business and Consumer Services as shown in the table below. During the year ended
December 31, 2020, the following changes were primarily driven by impacts from the COVID-19 pandemic:
•the investment-grade portion of the Consumer & Retail portfolio decreased from 55% to 53%
•the drawn percentage of this portfolio increased from 35% to 36%
•criticized exposure increased by $6.7 billion from $2.5 billion to $9.2 billion
December 31, 2020
(in millions, except ratios)Loans and
Lending-related
CommitmentsDerivative
ReceivablesCredit
exposure% Investment-
grade % Drawn
Retail $ 32,486 $ 887 $ 33,373 52 % 33 %
Food and Beverage 28,012 897 28,909 62 33 
Business and Consumer Services 24,760 599 25,359 52 41 
Consumer Hard Goods 12,937 178 13,115 59 36 
Leisure 7,440 241 7,681 18 43 
Total Consumer & Retail 105,635 2,802 108,437 53 36 
December 31, 2019
(in millions, except ratios)Loans and
Lending-related
CommitmentsDerivative 
ReceivablesCredit
exposure% Investment-
grade % Drawn
Retail $ 29,290 $ 294 $ 29,584 54 % 37 %
Food and Beverage 27,956 625 28,581 67 36 
Business and Consumer Services 24,242 249 24,491 51 37 
Consumer Hard Goods 13,144 109 13,253 65 35 
Leisure 10,930 147 11,077 21 19 
Total Consumer & Retail 105,562 1,424 106,986 55 35 
(a)Retail consists of Home Improvement & Specialty Retailers, Restaurants, Supermarkets, Discount & Drug Stores, Specialty Apparel and
Department Stores.
(b)Leisure consists of Gaming, Arts & Culture, Travel Services and Sports & Recreation. As of December 31, 2020 approximately 75% of the
noninvestment-grade Leisure portfolio is secured.
(c)Approximately 80% of the noninvestment-grade portfolio is secured.
(d)Represents drawn exposure as a percent of credit exposure.
Oil & Gas
Oil & Gas exposure was $39.2 billion as of December 31, 2020, including $19.3 billion of Exploration & Production and
Oil field Services as shown in the table below. During the year ended December 31, 2020, the following changes were
driven by lower oil prices and impacts from the COVID-19 pandemic:
•the investment-grade portion of the Oil & Gas portfolio decreased from 53% to 47%
•criticized exposure increased by $4.1 billion from $1.6 billion to $5.7 billion
December 31, 2020
(in millions, except ratios)Loans and
Lending-related
CommitmentsDerivative
ReceivablesCredit
exposure% Investment-
grade % Drawn
Exploration & Production ("E&P") and Oil field
Services $ 18,228 $ 1,048 $ 19,276 32 % 37 %
Other Oil & Gas 19,288 595 19,883 62 21 
Total Oil & Gas 37,516 1,643 39,159 47 29 
December 31, 2019
(in millions, except ratios)Loans and
Lending-related
CommitmentsDerivative 
 ReceivablesCredit
exposure% Investment-
 grade % Drawn
Exploration & Production ("E&P") and Oil field
Services $ 22,543 $ 646 $ 23,189 38 % 38 %
Other Oil & Gas 18,246 206 18,452 73 23 
Total Oil & Gas 40,789 852 41,641 53 31 
(a)Other Oil & Gas includes Integrated Oil & Gas companies, Midstream/Oil Pipeline companies and refineries.
(b)Secured lending was $13.2 billion and $15.7 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, approximately half of which is reserve-based
lending to the Exploration & Production sub-sector; unsecured exposure is largely investment-grade.
(c)Represents drawn exposure as a percent of credit exposure.(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 127
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Loans
In its wholesale businesses, the Firm provides loans to a
variety of clients, ranging from large corporate and
institutional clients to high-net-worth individuals. Refer to
Note 12 for a further discussion on loans, including
information about delinquencies, loan modifications and
other credit quality indicators.
The following table presents the change in the
nonaccrual loan portfolio for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019. The increase was driven
by downgrades across multiple industries on client credit
deterioration, with the largest concentration in Real
Estate, predominantly within retail and lodging.
Wholesale nonaccrual loan
activity
Year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Beginning balance $ 1,271 $ 1,587 
Additions 6,753 2,552 
Reductions:
Paydowns and other 2,290 1,585 
Gross charge-offs 922 425 
Returned to performing status 569 652 
Sales 137 206 
Total reductions 3,918 2,868 
Net changes 2,835 (316)
Ending balance $ 4,106 $ 1,271 
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.The following table presents net charge-offs/recoveries,
which are defined as gross charge-offs less recoveries,
for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019. The
amounts in the table below do not include gains or
losses from sales of nonaccrual loans.
Wholesale net charge-offs/(recoveries)
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions, except ratios) 2020 2019
Loans – reported
Average loans retained $ 509,907 $ 472,628 
Gross charge-offs 954 472 
Gross recoveries collected (155) (57)
Net charge-offs/(recoveries) 799 415 
Net charge-off/(recovery) rate 0.16 % 0.09 %
(a)
128 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Lending-related commitments
The Firm uses lending-related financial instruments, such
as commitments (including revolving credit facilities) and
guarantees, to address the financing needs of its clients.
The contractual amounts of these financial instruments
represent the maximum possible credit risk should the
clients draw down on these commitments or when the
Firm fulfills its obligations under these guarantees, and
the clients subsequently fail to perform according to the
terms of these contracts. Most of these commitments and
guarantees have historically been refinanced, extended,
cancelled, or expired without being drawn upon or a
default occurring. As a result, the Firm does not believe
that the total contractual amount of these wholesale
lending-related commitments is representative of the
Firm’s expected future credit exposure or funding
requirements. Refer to Note 28 for further information on
wholesale lending-related commitments.
Receivables from Customers
Receivables from customers reflect held-for-investment
margin loans to brokerage clients in CIB, CCB and AWM
that are collateralized by assets maintained in the clients’
brokerage accounts (e.g., cash on deposit, liquid and
readily marketable debt or equity securities). Because of
this collateralization, no allowance for credit losses is
generally held against these receivables. To manage its
credit risk the Firm establishes margin requirements and
monitors the required margin levels on an ongoing basis,
and requires clients to deposit additional cash or other
collateral, or to reduce positions, when appropriate. These
receivables are reported within accrued interest and
accounts receivable on the Firm’s Consolidated balance
sheets.
Clearing services
The Firm provides clearing services for clients entering
into certain securities and derivative contracts. Through
the provision of these services the Firm is exposed to the
risk of non-performance by its clients and may be required
to share in losses incurred by CCPs. Where possible, the
Firm seeks to mitigate its credit risk to its clients through
the collection of adequate margin at inception and
throughout the life of the transactions and can also cease
the provision of clearing services if clients do not adhere
to their obligations under the clearing agreement. Refer to
Note 28 for a further discussion of clearing services.
Derivative contracts
Derivatives enable clients and counterparties to manage
risks including credit risk and risks arising from
fluctuations in interest rates, foreign exchange, equities,
and commodities. The Firm makes markets in derivatives
in order to meet these needs and uses derivatives to
manage certain risks associated with net open risk
positions from its market-making activities, including the
counterparty credit risk arising from derivative receivables.
The Firm also uses derivative instruments to manage its
own credit risk and other market risk exposure. The
nature of the counterparty and the settlement mechanism
of the derivative affect the credit risk to which the Firm is
exposed. For OTC derivatives the Firm is exposed tothe credit risk of the derivative counterparty. For
exchange-traded derivatives (“ETD”), such as futures and
options, and cleared over-the-counter (“OTC-cleared”)
derivatives, the Firm can also be exposed to the credit risk
of the relevant CCP. Where possible, the Firm seeks to
mitigate its credit risk exposures arising from derivative
contracts through the use of legally enforceable master
netting arrangements and collateral agreements. The
percentage of the Firm’s over-the-counter derivative
transactions subject to collateral agreements — excluding
foreign exchange spot trades, which are not typically
covered by collateral agreements due to their short
maturity and centrally cleared trades that are settled daily
— was approximately 88% and 90% at December 31,
2020 and 2019, respectively. Refer to Note 5 for additional
information on the Firm’s use of collateral agreements.
Refer to Note 5 for a further discussion of derivative
contracts, counterparties and settlement types.
The fair value of derivative receivables reported on the
Consolidated balance sheets were $79.6 billion and $49.8
billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, with
increases in CIB resulting from market movements.
Derivative receivables represent the fair value of the
derivative contracts after giving effect to legally
enforceable master netting agreements and the related
cash collateral held by the Firm. In addition, the Firm held
liquid securities and other cash collateral that the Firm
believes is legally enforceable and may be used as
security when the fair value of the client’s exposure is in
the Firm’s favor. Liquid securities represents high quality
liquid assets as defined in the LCR rule. In management’s
view, the appropriate measure of current credit risk should
also take into consideration other collateral, which
generally represents securities that do not qualify as high
quality liquid assets under the LCR rule, but that the Firm
believes is legally enforceable. The collateral amounts for
each counterparty are limited to the net derivative
receivables for the counterparty. The following tables
summarize the net derivative receivables and the internal
ratings profile for the periods presented.
Derivative receivables
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Total, net of cash collateral $ 79,630 $ 49,766 
Liquid securities and other cash
collateral held against derivative
receivables (14,806) (13,052)
Total, net of liquid securities and
other cash collateral $ 64,824 $ 36,714 
Other collateral
held against derivative receivables (6,022) (1,837)
Total, net of collateral $ 58,802 $ 34,877 
(a)In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm refined its approach for
disclosing additional collateral held by the Firm that may be used
as security when the fair value of the client’s exposure is in the
Firm’s favor. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform
with the current presentation.
 
 (a)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 129
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Ratings profile of derivative
receivables
2020 2019
December 31,
(in millions, except ratios)Exposure net of
collateral% of exposure net 
of collateralExposure net of
collateral% of exposure net 
of collateral
Investment-grade $ 37,013 63 %$ 27,851 80 %
Noninvestment-grade 21,789 37 7,026 20 
Total $ 58,802 100 %$ 34,877 100 %
(a)In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm refined its approach for disclosing additional collateral held by the Firm that may be used as security when
the fair value of the client’s exposure is in the Firm’s favor. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
The Firm also holds additional collateral (primarily cash,
G7 government securities, other liquid government
agency and guaranteed securities, and corporate debt
and equity securities) delivered by clients at the initiation
of transactions, as well as collateral related to contracts
that have a non-daily call frequency and collateral that
the Firm has agreed to return but has not yet settled as
of the reporting date. Although this collateral does not
reduce the balances and is not included in the table
above, it is available as security against potential
exposure that could arise should the fair value of the
client’s derivative contracts move in the Firm’s favor.
Refer to Note 5 for additional information on the Firm’s
use of collateral agreements.
While useful as a current view of credit exposure, the
net fair value of the derivative receivables does not
capture the potential future variability of that credit
exposure. To capture the potential future variability of
credit exposure, the Firm calculates, on a client-by-client
basis, three measures of potential derivatives-related
credit loss: Peak, Derivative Risk Equivalent (“DRE”),
and Average exposure (“AVG”). These measures all
incorporate netting and collateral benefits, where
applicable.
Peak represents a conservative measure of potential
derivative exposure, including the benefit of collateral, to
a counterparty calculated in a manner that is broadly
equivalent to a 97.5% confidence level over the life of
the transaction. Peak is the primary measure used by
the Firm for setting credit limits for derivative contracts,
senior management reporting and derivatives exposure
management.
DRE exposure is a measure that expresses the risk of
derivative exposure, including the benefit of collateral,
on a basis intended to be equivalent to the risk of loan
exposures. DRE is a less extreme measure of potential
credit loss than Peak and is used as an input for
aggregating derivative credit risk exposures with loans
and other credit risk.
Finally, AVG is a measure of the expected fair value of
the Firm’s derivative exposure, including the benefit of
collateral, at future time periods. AVG over the total life
of the derivative contract is used as the primary metric
for pricing purposes and is used to calculate credit risk
capital and CVA, as further described below.The fair value of the Firm’s derivative receivables
incorporates CVA to reflect the credit quality of
counterparties. CVA is based on the Firm’s AVG to a
counterparty and the counterparty’s credit spread in the
credit derivatives market. The Firm believes that active
risk management is essential to controlling the dynamic
credit risk in the derivatives portfolio. In addition, the
Firm’s risk management process takes into
consideration the potential impact of wrong-way risk,
which is broadly defined as the risk that exposure to a
counterparty is positively correlated with the impact of a
default by the same counterparty, which could cause
exposure to increase at the same time as the
counterparty’s capacity to meet its obligations is
decreasing. Many factors may influence the nature and
magnitude of these correlations over time. To the extent
that these correlations are identified, the Firm may
adjust the CVA associated with a particular
counterparty’s AVG. The Firm risk manages exposure to
changes in CVA by entering into credit derivative
contracts, as well as interest rate, foreign exchange,
equity and commodity derivative contracts.
The below graph shows exposure profiles to the Firm’s
current derivatives portfolio over the next 10 years as
calculated by the Peak, DRE and AVG metrics. The
three measures generally show that exposure will
decline after the first year, if no new trades are added to
the portfolio.
Exposure profile of derivatives measures
December 31, 2020
(in billions)
(a) (a)
130 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Credit derivatives
The Firm uses credit derivatives for two primary
purposes: first, in its capacity as a market-maker, and
second, as an end-user, to manage the Firm’s own
credit risk associated with various exposures.
Credit portfolio management activities
Included in the Firm’s end-user activities are credit
derivatives used to mitigate the credit risk associated
with traditional lending activities (loans and lending-
related commitments) and derivatives counterparty
exposure in the Firm’s wholesale businesses
(collectively, “credit portfolio management activities”).
Information on credit portfolio management activities is
provided in the table below.
The Firm also uses credit derivatives as an end-user to
manage other exposures, including credit risk arising
from certain securities held in the Firm’s market-making
businesses. These credit derivatives are not included in
credit portfolio management activities.Credit derivatives used in credit portfolio
management activities
Notional amount of
protection
purchased and sold
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Credit derivatives used to manage:
Loans and lending-related
commitments $ 3,877 $ 2,047 
Derivative receivables 18,362 16,483 
Credit derivatives used in credit
portfolio management activities $ 22,239 $ 18,530 
(a)Prior-period amount has been revised to conform with the current
presentation.
(b)Amounts are presented net, considering the Firm’s net protection
purchased or sold with respect to each underlying reference entity
or index.
The credit derivatives used in credit portfolio
management activities do not qualify for hedge
accounting under U.S. GAAP; these derivatives are
reported at fair value, with gains and losses recognized
in principal transactions revenue. In contrast, the loans
and lending-related commitments being risk-managed
are accounted for on an accrual basis. This asymmetry
in accounting treatment, between loans and lending-
related commitments and the credit derivatives used in
credit portfolio management activities, causes earnings
volatility that is not representative, in the Firm’s view, of
the true changes in value of the Firm’s overall credit
exposure.
The effectiveness of credit default swaps (“CDS”) as a
hedge against the Firm’s exposures may vary
depending on a number of factors, including the named
reference entity (i.e., the Firm may experience losses on
specific exposures that are different than the named
reference entities in the purchased CDS); the
contractual terms of the CDS (which may have a defined
credit event that does not align with an actual loss
realized by the Firm); and the maturity of the Firm’s CDS
protection (which in some cases may be shorter than
the Firm’s exposures). However, the Firm generally
seeks to purchase credit protection with a maturity date
that is the same or similar to the maturity date of the
exposure for which the protection was purchased, and
remaining differences in maturity are actively monitored
and managed by the Firm. Refer to Credit derivatives in
Note 5 for a detailed description of credit derivatives.(b)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 131
Management’ s discussion and analysis
ALLOW ANCE FOR CREDIT LOSSES
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL
accounting guidance. The adoption of this guidance
established a single allowance framework for all
financial assets measured at amortized cost and certain
off-balance sheet credit exposures. This framework
requires that management’s estimate reflects credit
losses over the instrument’s remaining expected life and
considers expected future changes in macroeconomic
conditions. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
The Firm’s allowance for credit losses comprises:
•the allowance for loan losses, which covers the Firm’s
retained loan portfolios (scored and risk-rated) and is
presented separately on the Consolidated balance
sheets,
•the allowance for lending-related commitments, which
is presented on the Consolidated balance sheets in
accounts payable and other liabilities, and
•the allowance for credit losses on investment
securities, which covers the Firm’s HTM and AFS
securities and is recognized within Investment
Securities on the Consolidated balance sheets.
The allowance for credit losses increased compared
with December 31, 2019, primarily reflecting the
deterioration and uncertainty in the macroeconomic
environment, in particular in the first half of 2020, as a
result of the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic,
consisting of:
•a net $7.4 billion addition in consumer, predominantly
in the credit card portfolio, and
•a net $4.7 billion addition in wholesale, across the
LOBs, impacting multiple industries.
The adoption of CECL on January 1, 2020, resulted in a
$4.3 billion addition to the allowance for credit losses.
Discussion of changes in the allowance during 2020
The increase in the allowance for loan losses and
lending-related commitments was primarily driven by an
increase in the provision for credit losses, reflecting the
deterioration in and uncertainty around the future
macroeconomic environment as a result of the impact of
the COVID-19 pandemic.
As of December 31, 2020, the Firm’s central case
reflected U.S. unemployment rates of approximately 7%
through the second quarter of 2021 and remaining
above 5% until the second half of 2022. This compared
with relatively low levels of unemployment of
approximately 4% throughout 2020 and 2021 in the
Firm’s January 1, 2020 central case.
Further, while the Firm’s January 1, 2020 central case
U.S. GDP forecast reflected a 1.7% expansion in 2020,
actual U.S. GDP contracted approximately 2.5% in
2020. As of December 31, 2020, the Firm’s central case
assumptions reflect a return to pre-pandemic GDP
levels in the fourth quarter of 2021.
Due to elevated uncertainty in the near term outlook,
driven by the potential for increased infection rates and
related lock downs resulting from the pandemic, as well
as theprospect that government and other consumer relief
measures set to expire may not be extended, the Firm
has placed significant weighting on its adverse
scenarios. These scenarios incorporate more punitive
macroeconomic factors than the central case
assumptions, resulting in weighted average U.S.
unemployment rates remaining elevated throughout
2021 and 2022, ending the fourth quarter of 2022 at
approximately 6%, and in U.S. GDP ending 2022
approximately 0.9% higher than fourth quarter 2019
actual pre-pandemic levels.
The Firm’s central case assumptions reflected U.S.
unemployment rates and U.S. real GDP as follows:
Assumptions at January 1, 2020
2Q20 4Q20 2Q21
U.S. unemployment
rate 3.7 % 3.8 % 4.0 %
Cumulative change in
U.S. real GDP from
12/31/2019 0.9 % 1.7 % 2.4 %
Assumptions at December 31, 2020
2Q21 4Q21 2Q22
U.S. unemployment
rate 6.8 % 5.7 % 5.1 %
Cumulative change in
U.S. real GDP from
12/31/2019 (1.9)% 0.6 % 2.0 %
(a)Reflects quarterly average of forecasted U.S. unemployment rate.
(b)4Q20 actual U.S. unemployment rate (quarterly average) was
6.8%. 4Q20 actual cumulative change in U.S. real GDP from 4Q19
was (2.5%).
Subsequent changes to this forecast and related
estimates
will be reflected in the provision for credit losses in
future
periods. Refer to Note 13 and Note 10 for a description
of the policies, methodologies and judgments used to
determine the Firm’s allowances for credit losses on
loans, lending-related commitments, and investment
securities.
Refer to Critical Accounting Estimates Used by the Firm
on pages 152-155 for further information on the
allowance for credit losses and related management
judgments.
Refer to Consumer Credit Portfolio on pages 114-120,
Wholesale Credit Portfolio on pages 121-131 and Note
12 for additional information on the consumer and
wholesale credit portfolios.(b)
(a)
(a)
132 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The adoption of the CECL accounting guidance resulted in a change in the accounting for PCI loans, which are
considered PCD loans under CECL. In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the Firm reclassified risk-rated loans
and lending-related commitments from the consumer, excluding credit card portfolio segment to the wholesale portfolio
segment, to align with the methodology applied when determining the allowance. Prior-period amounts have been
revised to conform with the current presentation. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
Allowance for credit losses and related information
2020 2019
Year ended December 31, Consumer ,
excluding 
credit card Credit card Wholesale TotalConsumer ,
excluding 
 credit card Credit card Wholesale Total (in millions, except ratios)
Allowance for loan losses
Beginning balance at January 1, $ 2,538  $ 5,683  $ 4,902  $ 13,123  $ 3,434 $ 5,184 $ 4,827 $13,445 
Cumulative ef fect of a change in
accounting principle 297 5,517  (1,642) 4,172  NA NA NA NA
Gross charge-of fs 805 5,077  954 6,836  902 5,436 472 6,810 
Gross recoveries collected (631) (791) (155) (1,577) (536) (588) (57) (1,181)
Net charge-offs 174 4,286  799 5,259  366 4,848 415 5,629 
Write-of fs of PCI loans NA NA NA NA 151 — — 151 
Provision for loan losses 974 10,886  4,431  16,291  (378) 5,348 479 5,449 
Other 1 — — 1 (1) (1) 11 9 
Ending balance at December 31, $ 3,636  $ 17,800  $ 6,892  $ 28,328  $ 2,538 $ 5,683 $ 4,902 $13,123 
Allowance for lending-related
commitments
Beginning balance at January 1, $ 12 $ — $ 1,179  $ 1,191  $ 12 $ — $ 1,043 $ 1,055 
Cumulative ef fect of a change in
accounting principle 133 — (35) 98 NA NA NA NA
Provision for lending-related
commitments 42 — 1,079  1,121  — — 136 136 
Other — — (1) (1) — — — — 
Ending balance at December 31, $ 187 $ — $ 2,222  $ 2,409  $ 12 $ — $ 1,179 $ 1,191 
Impairment methodology
Asset-specific $ (7) $ 633 $ 682 $ 1,308  $ 75 $ 477 $ 295 $ 847 
Portfolio-based 3,643  17,167  6,210  27,020  1,476 5,206 4,607 11,289 
PCI NA NA NA NA 987 — — 987 
Total allowance for loan losses $ 3,636  $ 17,800  $ 6,892  $ 28,328  $ 2,538 $ 5,683 $ 4,902 $13,123 
Impairment methodology
Asset-specific $ — $ — $ 114 $ 114 $ — $ — $ 102 $ 102 
Portfolio-based 187 — 2,108  2,295  12 — 1,077 1,089 
Total allowance for lending-
related commitments $ 187 $ — $ 2,222  $ 2,409  $ 12 $ — $ 1,179 $ 1,191 
Total allowance for credit losses $ 3,823  $ 17,800  $ 9,114  $ 30,737  $ 2,550 $ 5,683 $ 6,081 $14,314 
Memo:
Retained loans, end of period $302,127  $143,432  $514,947  $960,506  $294,999 $168,924 $481,678 $945,601 
Retained loans, average 302,005  146,391  509,907  958,303  312,972 156,319 472,628 941,919 
Credit ratios
Allowance for loan losses to
retained loans 1.20 % 12.41  % 1.34 % 2.95 % 0.86 % 3.36 % 1.02 % 1.39 %
Allowance for loan losses to
retained nonaccrual loans 67 NM 208 323 87 NM 464 329 
Allowance for loan losses to
retained nonaccrual loans
excluding credit card 67 NM 208 120 87 NM 464 187 
Net charge-of f rates 0.06 2.93 0.16 0.55 0.12 3.10 0.09 0.60 
(a)Prior to the adoption of CECL, write-offs of PCI loans were recorded against the allowance for loan losses when actual losses for a pool
exceeded estimated losses that were recorded as purchase accounting adjustments at the time of acquisition. A write-off of a PCI loan was
recognized when the underlying loan was removed from a pool.
(b)Includes modified PCD loans and loans that have been modified or are reasonably expected to be modified in a TDR. Also includes risk-rated
loans that have been placed on nonaccrual status for the wholesale portfolio segment. The asset-specific credit card allowance for loan losses
modified or reasonably expected to be modified in a TDR is calculated based on the loans’ original contractual interest rates and does not
consider any incremental penalty rates.
(c)The Firm’s policy is generally to exempt credit card loans from being placed on nonaccrual status as permitted by regulatory guidance.
(d)Excludes HTM securities, which had an allowance for credit losses of $78 million and a provision for credit losses of $68 million as of and for the
year ended December 31, 2020.(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 133
Management’ s discussion and analysis
INVESTMENT POR TFOLIO RISK MANAGEMENT
Investment portfolio risk is the risk associated with the
loss of principal or a reduction in expected returns on
investments arising from the investment securities
portfolio or from principal investments. The investment
securities portfolio is predominantly held by Treasury
and CIO in connection with the Firm's balance sheet or
asset-liability management objectives. Principal
investments are predominantly privately-held non-traded
financial instruments and are managed in the LOBs and
Corporate. Investments are typically intended to be held
over extended periods and, accordingly, the Firm has no
expectation for short-term realized gains with respect to
these investments.
Investment securities risk
Investment securities risk includes the exposure
associated with a default in the payment of principal and
interest. This risk is mitigated given that the investment
securities portfolio held by Treasury and CIO is
predominantly invested in high-quality securities. At
December 31, 2020, the Treasury and CIO investment
securities portfolio, net of allowance for credit losses,
was $587.9 billion, and the average credit rating of the
securities comprising the portfolio was AA+ (based upon
external ratings where available and where not
available, based primarily upon internal risk ratings).
Refer to Corporate segment results on pages 83–84 and
Note 10 for further information on the investment
securities portfolio and internal risk ratings. Refer to
Market Risk Management on pages 135–142 for further
information on the market risk inherent in the portfolio.
Refer to Liquidity Risk Management on pages 102–108
for further information on related liquidity risk.
Governance and oversight
Investment securities risks are governed by the Firm’s
Risk Appetite framework, and reviewed at the CTC Risk
Committee with regular updates to the Board Risk
Committee.
The Firm’s independent control functions are
responsible for reviewing the appropriateness of the
carrying value of investment securities in accordance
with relevant policies. Approved levels for investment
securities are established for each risk category,
including capital and credit risks.Principal investment risk
Principal investments are typically privately held non-
traded financial instruments representing ownership or
other forms of junior capital and span multiple asset
classes. These investments are made by dedicated
investing businesses or as part of a broader business
strategy. In general, principal investments include tax-
oriented investments and investments made to enhance
or accelerate the Firm’s business strategies. The Firm’s
investments will continue to evolve in line with its
strategies, including the Firm’s commitment to support
underserved communities and minority-owned
businesses. The Firm’s principal investments are
managed by the LOBs and Corporate and are reflected
within their respective financial results. The aggregate
carrying values of the principal investment portfolios
have not been significantly affected by recent market
events as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. However,
the duration and severity of adverse macroeconomic
conditions could subject certain principal investments to
impairments, write-downs, or other negative impacts.
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the aggregate
carrying values of the principal investment portfolios
were $27.5 billion and $24.2 billion, respectively, which
included tax-oriented investments (e.g., alternative
energy and affordable housing investments) of $21.3
billion and $18.2 billion, respectively, and private equity,
various debt and equity instruments, and real assets of
$6.2 billion and $6.0 billion, respectively.
Governance and oversight
The Firm’s approach to managing principal risk is
consistent with the Firm’s risk governance structure. A
Firmwide risk policy framework exists for all principal
investing activities and includes approval by executives
who are independent from the investing businesses, as
appropriate.
The Firm’s independent control functions are
responsible for reviewing the appropriateness of the
carrying value of investments in accordance with
relevant policies. As part of the risk governance
structure, approved levels for investments are
established and monitored for each relevant business or
segment in order to manage the overall size of the
portfolios. The Firm also conducts stress testing on
these portfolios using specific scenarios that estimate
losses based on significant market moves and/or other
risk events.
134 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
MARKET RISK MANAGEMENT
Market risk is the risk associated with the effect of
changes in market factors, such as interest and foreign
exchange rates, equity and commodity prices, credit
spreads or implied volatilities, on the value of assets and
liabilities held for both the short and long term.
Market Risk Management
Market Risk Management monitors market risks
throughout the Firm and defines market risk policies and
procedures.
Market Risk Management seeks to manage risk,
facilitate efficient risk/return decisions, reduce volatility
in operating performance and provide transparency into
the Firm’s market risk profile for senior management,
the Board of Directors and regulators. Market Risk
Management is responsible for the following functions:
•Maintaining a market risk policy framework
•Independently measuring, monitoring and controlling
LOB, Corporate, and Firmwide market risk
•Defining, approving and monitoring of limits
•Performing stress testing and qualitative risk
assessments
Risk measurement
Measures used to capture market risk
There is no single measure to capture market risk and
therefore Market Risk Management uses various
metrics, both statistical and nonstatistical, to assess risk
including:
•Value-at-risk (VaR)
•Stress testing
•Profit and loss drawdowns
•Earnings-at-risk
•Other sensitivity-based measures
Risk monitoring and control
Market risk exposure is managed primarily through a
series of limits set in the context of the market
environment and business strategy. In setting limits,
Market Risk Management takes into consideration
factors such as market volatility, product liquidity,
accommodation of client business, and management
experience. Market Risk Management maintains
different levels of limits. Firm level limits include VaR
and stress limits. Similarly, LOB and Corporate limits
include VaR and stress limits and may be supplemented
by certain nonstatistical risk measures such as profit
and loss drawdowns. Limits may also be set within the
LOBs and Corporate, as well as at the legal entity level.Market Risk Management sets limits and regularly
reviews and updates them as appropriate. Senior
management is responsible for reviewing and approving
certain of these risk limits on an ongoing basis. Limits
that have not been reviewed within specified time
periods by Market Risk Management are reported to
senior management. The LOBs and Corporate are
responsible for adhering to established limits against
which exposures are monitored and reported.
Limit breaches are required to be reported in a timely
manner to limit approvers, which include Market Risk
Management and senior management. In the event of a
breach, Market Risk Management consults with
appropriate members of the Firm to determine the
suitable course of action required to return the
applicable positions to compliance, which may include a
reduction in risk in order to remedy the breach or
granting a temporary increase in limits to accommodate
an expected increase in client activity and/or market
volatility. Certain Firm, Corporate or LOB-level limit
breaches are escalated as appropriate.
COVID-19 Pandemic
Market Risk Management continues to actively monitor
the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on market risk
exposures by leveraging existing risk measures and
controls.
Models used to measure market risk are inherently
imprecise and are limited in their ability to measure
certain risks or to predict losses. This imprecision may
be heightened when sudden or severe shifts in market
conditions occur, such as those observed at the onset of
the COVID-19 pandemic. For additional discussion on
model uncertainty refer to Estimations and Model Risk
Management on page 151.
Market Risk Management periodically reviews the Firm’s
existing market risk measures to identify opportunities
for enhancement, and to the extent appropriate, will
calibrate those measures accordingly over time. This is
increasingly important in periods of sustained,
heightened market volatility.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 135
Management’ s discussion and analysis
The following table summarizes the predominant business activities and related market risks, as well as positions which
give rise to market risk and certain measures used to capture those risks, for each LOB and Corporate.
In addition to the predominant business activities, each LOB and Corporate may engage in principal investing activities.
To the extent principal investments are deemed market risk sensitive, they are reflected in relevant risk measures and
captured in the table below. Refer to Investment Portfolio Risk Management on page 134 for additional discussion on
principal investments.
LOBs and
CorporatePredominant business
activitiesRelated market risks Positions included in Risk
Management V aRPositions included in
earnings-at-riskPositions included in other
sensitivity-based measures
CCB•Services mortgage
loans
•Originates loans and
takes deposits•Risk from changes in the
probability of newly
originated mortgage
commitments closing
•Interest rate risk and
prepayment risk•Mortgage commitments,
classified as derivatives
•Warehouse loans that are
fair value option elected,
classified as loans – debt
instruments
•MSRs
•Hedges of mortgage
commitments, warehouse
loans and MSRs, classified
as derivatives
•Interest-only and
mortgage-backed
securities, classified as
trading assets debt
instruments, and related
hedges, classified as
derivatives
•Fair value option elected
liabilities•Retained loan portfolio
•Deposits•Fair value option elected
liabilities DV A
 
CIB
 •Makes markets and
services clients across
fixed income, foreign
exchange, equities and
commodities
•Originates loans and
takes deposits•Risk of loss from adverse
movements in market
prices and implied
volatilities across interest
rate, foreign exchange,
credit, commodity and
equity instruments
•Basis and correlation risk
from changes in the way
asset values move
relative to one another
•Interest rate risk and
prepayment risk
 •Trading assets/liabilities –
debt and marketable equity
instruments, and
derivatives, including
hedges of the retained loan
portfolio
•Certain securities
purchased, loaned or sold
under resale agreements
and securities borrowed
•Fair value option elected
liabilities
•Derivative CV A and
associated hedges
•Marketable equity
investments•Retained loan portfolio
•Deposits•Privately held equity and
other investments
measured at fair value; and
certain asset-backed fair
value option elected loans
•Derivatives FV A and fair
value option elected
liabilities DV A
 
CB •Originates loans and
takes deposits•Interest rate risk and
prepayment risk•Marketable equity
investments
 •Retained loan portfolio
•Deposits
AWM •Provides initial capital
investments in
products such as
mutual funds and
capital invested
alongside third-party
investors
•Originates loans and
takes deposits•Risk from adverse
movements in market
factors (e.g., market
prices, rates and credit
spreads)
•Interest rate risk and
prepayment risk•Debt securities held in
advance of distribution to
clients, classified as trading
assets - debt instruments•Retained loan portfolio
•Deposits•Initial seed capital
investments and related
hedges, classified as
derivatives
•Certain deferred
compensation and related
hedges, classified as
derivatives
•Capital invested alongside
third-party investors,
typically in privately
distributed collective
vehicles managed by A WM
(i.e., co-investments)
Corporate •Manages the Firm’ s
liquidity , funding,
capital, structural
interest rate and
foreign exchange risks•Structural interest rate
risk from the Firm’ s
traditional banking
activities
•Structural non-USD
foreign exchange risks•Derivative positions
measured at fair value
through noninterest
revenue in earnings
•Marketable equity
investments•Deposits with banks
•Investment securities
portfolio and related
interest rate hedges
•Long-term debt and
related interest rate
hedges•Privately held equity and
other investments
measured at fair value
•Foreign exchange
exposure related to Firm-
issued non-USD long-term
debt (“L TD”) and related
hedges
(a)Reflects structured notes in Risk Management VaR and the DVA on structured notes in other sensitivity-based measures.
(b)The AWM and CB contributions to Firmwide average VaR were not material for the year ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.(a)(a)
(a)(a)
(b)
(b)
136 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Value-at-risk
JPMorgan Chase utilizes VaR, a statistical risk measure,
to estimate the potential loss from adverse market
moves in the current market environment. The Firm has
a single VaR framework used as a basis for calculating
Risk Management VaR and Regulatory VaR.
The framework is employed across the Firm using
historical simulation based on data for the previous 12
months. The framework’s approach assumes that
historical changes in market values are representative of
the distribution of potential outcomes in the immediate
future. The Firm believes the use of Risk Management
VaR provides a daily measure of risk that is closely
aligned to risk management decisions made by the
LOBs and Corporate and, along with other market risk
measures, provides the appropriate information needed
to respond to risk events.
The Firm’s Risk Management VaR is calculated
assuming a one-day holding period and an expected
tail-loss methodology which approximates a 95%
confidence level. Risk Management VaR provides a
consistent framework to measure risk profiles and levels
of diversification across product types and is used for
aggregating risks and monitoring limits across
businesses. VaR results are reported to senior
management, the Board of Directors and regulators.
Under the Firm’s Risk Management VaR methodology,
assuming current changes in market values are
consistent with the historical changes used in the
simulation, the Firm would expect to incur VaR
“backtesting exceptions,” defined as losses greater than
that predicted by VaR estimates, an average of five
times every 100 trading days. The number of VaR
backtesting exceptions observed can differ from the
statistically expected number of backtesting exceptions
if the current level of market volatility is materially
different from the level of market volatility during the 12
months of historical data used in the VaR calculation.
Underlying the overall VaR model framework are
individual VaR models that simulate historical market
returns for individual risk factors and/or product types.
To capture material market risks as part of the Firm’s
risk management framework, comprehensive VaR
model calculations are performed daily for businesses
whose activities give rise to market risk. These VaR
models are granular and incorporate numerous risk
factors and inputs to simulate daily changes in market
values over the historical period; inputs are selected
based on the risk profile of each portfolio, as sensitivities
and historical time series used to generate daily market
values may be different across product types or risk
management systems. The VaR model results across all
portfolios are aggregated at the Firm level.As VaR is based on historical data, it is an imperfect
measure of market risk exposure and potential future
losses. In addition, based on their reliance on available
historical data, limited time horizons, and other factors,
VaR measures are inherently limited in their ability to
measure certain risks and to predict losses, particularly
those associated with market illiquidity and sudden or
severe shifts in market conditions.
For certain products, specific risk parameters are not
captured in VaR due to the lack of liquidity and
availability of appropriate historical data. The Firm uses
proxies to estimate the VaR for these and other products
when daily time series are not available. It is likely that
using an actual price-based time series for these
products, if available, would affect the VaR results
presented. The Firm therefore considers other
nonstatistical measures such as stress testing, in
addition to VaR, to capture and manage its market risk
positions.
The daily market data used in VaR models may be
different than the independent third-party data collected
for VCG price testing in its monthly valuation process.
For example, in cases where market prices are not
observable, or where proxies are used in VaR historical
time series, the data sources may differ. Refer to
Valuation process in Note 2 for further information on
the Firm’s valuation process. As VaR model calculations
require daily data and a consistent source for valuation,
it may not be practical to use the data collected in the
VCG monthly valuation process for VaR model
calculations.
The Firm’s VaR model calculations are periodically
evaluated and enhanced in response to changes in the
composition of the Firm’s portfolios, changes in market
conditions, improvements in the Firm’s modeling
techniques and measurements, and other factors. Such
changes may affect historical comparisons of VaR
results. Refer to Estimations and Model Risk
Management on page 151 for information regarding
model reviews and approvals.
The Firm calculates separately a daily aggregated VaR
in accordance with regulatory rules (“Regulatory VaR”),
which is used to derive the Firm’s regulatory VaR-based
capital requirements under Basel III. This Regulatory
VaR model framework currently assumes a ten
business-day holding period and an expected tail loss
methodology which approximates a 99% confidence
level. Regulatory VaR is applied to “covered” positions
as defined by Basel III, which may be different than the
positions included in the Firm’s Risk Management VaR.
For example, credit derivative hedges of accrual loans
are included in the Firm’s Risk Management VaR, while
Regulatory VaR excludes these credit derivative
hedges. In addition, in contrast to the Firm’s Risk
Management VaR, Regulatory VaR currently excludes
the diversification benefit for certain VaR models.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 137
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Refer to JPMorgan Chase’s Basel III Pillar 3 Regulatory Capital Disclosures reports, which are available on the Firm’s
website, for additional information on Regulatory VaR and the other components of market risk regulatory capital for the
Firm (e.g., VaR-based measure, stressed VaR-based measure and the respective backtesting).
The table below shows the results of the Firm’s Risk Management VaR measure using a 95% confidence level. VaR
can vary significantly as positions change, market volatility fluctuates, and diversification benefits change.
Total VaR
As of or for the year ended December 31, 2020 2019
(in millions)  Avg. Min Max  Avg. Min Max
CIB trading VaR by risk type
Fixed income $ 98 $ 35 $156 $ 40 $ 31 $ 50 
Foreign exchange 10 4 18 7 4 15 
Equities 24 13 41 20 13 31 
Commodities and other 28 7 47 8 6 12 
Diversification benefit to CIB trading VaR (67)  NM  NM (33) NM NM
CIB trading VaR 93 32 160 42 29 61 
Credit portfolio VaR 16 3 28 5 3 7 
Diversification benefit to CIB VaR (17)  NM  NM (5) NM NM
CIB VaR 92 31 162 42 29 63 
CCB VaR 5 1 12 5 1 11 
Corporate and other LOB VaR 19 9 82 10 9 13 
Diversification benefit to other VaR (4)  NM  NM (4) NM NM
Other VaR 20 10 82 11 8 17 
Diversification benefit to CIB and other VaR (17)  NM  NM (10) NM NM
Total VaR $ 95 $ 32 $164 $ 43 $ 30 $ 65 
(a)Diversification benefit represents the difference between the portfolio VaR and the sum of its individual components. This reflects the non-additive
nature of VaR due to imperfect correlation across LOBs, Corporate, and risk types.
(b)The maximum and minimum VaR for each portfolio may have occurred on different trading days than the components and consequently
diversification benefit is not meaningful.
(c)Maximum Corporate and other LOB VaR was higher than the prior year, due to increases in the fourth quarter of 2020 driven by a private equity
position that became publicly traded at the end of the third quarter of 2020.
Generally, average VaR and maximum VaR across risk
types and LOBs were higher due to increased volatility
that occurred at the onset of the COVID-19 pandemic,
which remains in the one-year historical look-back
period. As a result average total VaR increased by $52
million for the year-ended December 31, 2020 when
compared with the prior year driven by the fixed income
and commodities risk types.Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm refined the scope of
VaR to exclude positions related to the risk management
of interest rate exposure from changes in the Firm’s own
credit spread on fair value option elected liabilities, and
included these positions in other sensitivity-based
measures. Additionally, effective July 1, 2020, the Firm
refined the scope of VaR to exclude certain asset-
backed fair value option elected loans, and included
them in other sensitivity-based measures to more
effectively measure the risk from these loans. In the
absence of these refinements, the average Total VaR
and each of the components would have been higher by
the amounts reported in the following table:
(in millions)Amount by which reported average VaR
would have been higher for the year
ended
 December 31, 2020
CIB fixed income VaR $ 9 
CIB trading VaR 7 
CIB VaR 9 
Total VaR 8 (a) (b) (b) (a) (b) (b)
(b) (b) (b) (b)
(a) (b) (b) (a) (b) (b)
(b) (b) (b) (b)
(c)
(a) (b) (b) (a) (b) (b)
(b) (b) (b) (b)
(a) (b) (b) (a) (b) (b)
(b) (b) (b) (b)
138 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
VaR backtesting
The Firm performs daily VaR model backtesting, which compares the daily Risk Management VaR results with the daily
gains and losses that are utilized for VaR backtesting purposes. The gains and losses in the chart below do not reflect
the Firm’s revenue results as they exclude select components of total net revenue, such as those associated with the
execution of new transactions (i.e., intraday client-driven trading and intraday risk management activities), fees,
commissions, certain valuation adjustments and net interest income. These excluded components of total net revenue
may more than offset backtesting gains and losses on a particular day. The definition of backtesting gains and losses
above is consistent with the requirements for backtesting under Basel III capital rules.
The following chart compares Firmwide daily backtesting gains and losses with the Firm’s Risk Management VaR for
the year ended December 31, 2020. The results in the chart below differ from the results of backtesting disclosed in the
Market Risk section of the Firm’s Basel III Pillar 3 Regulatory Capital Disclosures reports, which are based on
Regulatory VaR applied to the Firm’s covered positions.
For the year ended December 31, 2020, the Firm posted backtesting gains on 162 of the 260 days, and observed 10
VaR backtesting exceptions, which were predominantly driven by volatility at the onset of the COVID-19 pandemic that
was materially higher than the levels realized in the historical data used for the VaR calculation. Firmwide backtesting
loss days can differ from the loss days for which Fixed Income Markets and Equity Markets posted losses, as disclosed
in CIB Markets revenue, as the population of positions which compose each metric are different and due to the
exclusion of select components of total net revenue in backtesting gains and losses as described above. For more
information on CIB Markets revenue, refer to pages 74-75.
Daily Risk Management VaR Backtesting Results
Year ended December 31, 2020
Backtesting Gains and Losses
Risk Management VaR (1-day, 95% Confidence level)
First Quarter
 2020Second Quarter
 2020Third Quarter
 2020Fourth Quarter
 2020
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 139
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Other risk measures
Stress testing
Along with VaR, stress testing is an important tool used
to assess risk. While VaR reflects the risk of loss due to
adverse changes in markets using recent historical
market behavior, stress testing reflects the risk of loss
from hypothetical changes in the value of market risk
sensitive positions applied simultaneously. Stress
testing measures the Firm’s vulnerability to losses under
a range of stressed but possible economic and market
scenarios. The results are used to understand the
exposures responsible for those potential losses and are
measured against limits.
The Firm’s stress framework covers market risk
sensitive positions in the LOBs and Corporate. The
framework is used to calculate multiple magnitudes of
potential stress for both market rallies and market sell-
offs, assuming significant changes in market factors
such as credit spreads, equity prices, interest rates,
currency rates and commodity prices, and combines
them in multiple ways to capture an array of hypothetical
economic and market scenarios.
The Firm generates a number of scenarios that focus on
tail events in specific asset classes and geographies,
including how the event may impact multiple market
factors simultaneously. Scenarios also incorporate
specific idiosyncratic risks and stress basis risk between
different products. The flexibility in the stress framework
allows the Firm to construct new scenarios that can test
the outcomes against possible future stress events.
Stress testing results are reported on a regular basis to
senior management of the Firm, as appropriate.
Stress scenarios are governed by an overall stress
framework and are subject to the standards outlined in
the Firm’s policies related to model risk management.
Significant changes to the framework are reviewed as
appropriate.
The Firm’s stress testing framework is utilized in
calculating the Firm’s CCAR and other stress test
results, which are reported to the Board of Directors. In
addition, stress testing results are incorporated into the
Firm’s Risk Appetite framework, and are reported
periodically to the Board Risk Committee.
Profit and loss drawdowns
Profit and loss drawdowns are used to highlight trading
losses above certain levels of risk tolerance. A profit and
loss drawdown is a decline in revenue from its year-to-
date peak level.
Earnings-at-risk
The effect of interest rate exposure on the Firm’s
reported net income is important as interest rate risk
represents one of the Firm’s significant market risks.
Interest rate risk arises not only from trading activities
but also from the Firm’s traditional banking activities,
which include extension of loans and credit facilities,
taking deposits and issuing debt as well as from the
investment securities portfolio. Refer to the table on
page 136 for a summary byLOB and Corporate, identifying positions included in
earnings-at-risk.
The CTC Risk Committee establishes the Firm’s
structural interest rate risk policy and related limits,
which are subject to approval by the Board Risk
Committee. Treasury and CIO, working in partnership
with the LOBs, calculates the Firm’s structural interest
rate risk profile and reviews it with senior management,
including the CTC Risk Committee. In addition,
oversight of structural interest rate risk is managed
through a dedicated risk function reporting to the CTC
CRO. This risk function is responsible for providing
independent oversight and governance around
assumptions and establishing and monitoring limits for
structural interest rate risk. The Firm manages structural
interest rate risk generally through its investment
securities portfolio and interest rate derivatives.
Structural interest rate risk can occur due to a variety of
factors, including:
•Differences in timing among the maturity or repricing
of assets, liabilities and off-balance sheet instruments
•Differences in the amounts of assets, liabilities and
off-balance sheet instruments that are maturing or
repricing at the same time
•Differences in the amounts by which short-term and
long-term market interest rates change (for example,
changes in the slope of the yield curve)
•The impact of changes in the maturity of various
assets, liabilities or off-balance sheet instruments as
interest rates change
The Firm manages interest rate exposure related to its
assets and liabilities on a consolidated, Firmwide basis.
Business units transfer their interest rate risk to
Treasury and CIO through funds transfer pricing, which
takes into account the elements of interest rate
exposure that can be risk-managed in financial markets.
These elements include asset and liability balances and
contractual rates of interest, contractual principal
payment schedules, expected prepayment experience,
interest rate reset dates and maturities, rate indices
used for repricing, and any interest rate ceilings or floors
for adjustable rate products.
One way the Firm evaluates its structural interest rate
risk is through earnings-at-risk. Earnings-at-risk
estimates the Firm’s interest rate exposure for a given
interest rate scenario. It is presented as a sensitivity to a
baseline, which includes net interest income and certain
interest rate sensitive fees. The baseline uses market
interest rates and in the case of deposits, pricing
assumptions. The Firm conducts simulations of changes
to this baseline for interest rate-sensitive assets and
liabilities denominated in U.S. dollars and other
currencies (“non-U.S. dollar” currencies). These
simulations primarily include retained loans, deposits,
deposits with banks, investment securities, long-term
debt and any related interest rate hedges, and funds
transfer pricing of positions in risk management VaR
and other sensitivity-based measures as described on
page 136.
140 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Earnings-at-risk scenarios estimate the potential change
to a net interest income baseline, over the following 12
months utilizing multiple assumptions. These scenarios
include a parallel shift involving changes to both short-
term and long-term rates by an equal amount; a steeper
yield curve involving holding short-term rates constant
and increasing long-term rates; and a flatter yield curve
involving increasing short-term rates and holding long-
term rates constant. These scenarios consider many
different factors, including:
•The impact on exposures as a result of instantaneous
changes in interest rates from baseline rates.
•Forecasted balance sheet, as well as modeled
prepayment and reinvestment behavior, but do not
include assumptions about actions that could be taken
by the Firm or its clients and customers in response to
any such instantaneous rate changes. Mortgage
prepayment assumptions are based on the interest
rates used in the scenarios compared with underlying
contractual rates, the time since origination, and other
factors which are updated periodically based on
historical experience.
•The pricing sensitivity of deposits, known as deposit
betas, represent the amount by which deposit rates
paid could change upon a given change in market
interest rates over the cycle. The deposit rates paid in
these scenarios may differ from actual deposit rates
paid, due to repricing lags and other factors.
The Firm’s earnings-at-risk scenarios are periodically
evaluated and enhanced in response to changes in the
composition of the Firm’s balance sheet, changes in
market conditions, improvements in the Firm’s
simulation and other factors. While a relevant measure
of the Firm’s interest rate exposure, the earnings at risk
analysis does not represent a forecast of the Firm’s net
interest income (Refer to Outlook on page 49 for
additional information).The Firm’s U.S. dollar sensitivities are presented in the
table below.
December 31,
(in billions) 2020 2019
Parallel shift:
+100 bps shift in rates $ 6.9 $ 0.3 
Steeper yield curve:
+100 bps shift in long-term rates 2.4 1.2 
Flatter yield curve:
+100 bps shift in short-term rates 4.5 (0.9)
The change in the Firm’s U.S. dollar sensitivities as of
December 31, 2020 compared to December 31, 2019
reflected updates to the Firm’s baseline for lower short-
term and long-term rates as well as the impact of
changes in the Firm’s balance sheet. In addition, during
the fourth quarter of 2020 as part of the Firm’s
continuous evaluation and periodic enhancement to its
earnings-at-risk calculations, the Firm updated the
deposit rates paid betas for consumer deposit products
based upon observed pricing during the most recent
economic cycle. In the absence of this update, the
Firm’s U.S. dollar sensitivities as of December 31, 2020
would have been lower by $2.0 billion to the +100bps
shift in short-term and parallel rate scenarios.
The Firm’s sensitivity to rates is primarily a result of
assets repricing at a faster pace than deposits.
Based upon current and implied market rates as of
December 31, 2020, scenarios reflecting lower rates
could result in negative interest rates. The U.S. has
never experienced an interest rate environment where
the Federal Reserve has a negative interest rate policy.
While the impact of negative interest rates on the Firm's
earnings-at-risk would vary by scenario, a parallel shift
downward of up to 100bps would negatively impact net
interest income. In a negative interest rate environment,
the modeling assumptions used for certain assets and
liabilities require additional management judgment and
therefore, the actual outcomes may differ from these
assumptions.
The Firm’s non-U.S. dollar sensitivities are presented in
the table below.
December 31,
(in billions) 2020 2019
Parallel shift:
+100 bps shift in rates $ 0.9 $ 0.5 
Flatter yield curve:
+100 bps shift in short-term rates 0.8 0.5 
The results of the non-U.S. dollar interest rate scenario
involving a steeper yield curve with long-term rates
rising by 100 basis points and short-term rates staying
at current levels were not material to the Firm’s
earnings-at-risk at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 141
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Non-U.S. dollar foreign exchange risk
Non-U.S. dollar FX risk is the risk that changes in foreign exchange rates affect the value of the Firm’s assets or
liabilities or future results. The Firm has structural non-U.S. dollar FX exposures arising from capital investments,
forecasted expense and revenue, the investment securities portfolio and non-U.S. dollar-denominated debt issuance.
Treasury and CIO, working in partnership with the LOBs, primarily manage these risks on behalf of the Firm. Treasury
and CIO may hedge certain of these risks using derivatives.
Other sensitivity-based measures
The Firm quantifies the market risk of certain debt and equity and funding activities by assessing the potential impact
on net revenue, other comprehensive income (“OCI”) and noninterest expense due to changes in relevant market
variables. Refer to the table Predominant business activities that give rise to market risk on page 136 for additional
information on the positions captured in other sensitivity-based measures.
The table below represents the potential impact to net revenue, OCI or noninterest expense for market risk sensitive
instruments that are not included in VaR or earnings-at-risk. Where appropriate, instruments used for hedging purposes
are reported net of the positions being hedged. The sensitivities disclosed in the table below may not be representative
of the actual gain or loss that would have been realized at December 31, 2020 and 2019, as the movement in market
parameters across maturities may vary and are not intended to imply management’s expectation of future changes in
these sensitivities.
Year ended December 31,
Gain/(loss) (in millions)
Activity Description Sensitivity measure 2020 2019
Debt and equity
Asset Management activities Consists of seed capital and related
hedges; fund co-investments; and
certain deferred compensation and
related hedges10% decline in market
value$ (48)$ (68)
Other debt and equity Consists of certain asset-backed fair
value option elected loans, privately held
equity and other investments held at fair
value10% decline in market
value(919) (867)
Funding activities
Non-USD LTD cross-currency basis Represents the basis risk on derivatives
used to hedge the foreign exchange risk
on the non-USD LTD1 basis point parallel
tightening of cross currency
basis(16) (17)
Non-USD LTD hedges foreign
currency (“FX”) exposurePrimarily represents the foreign
exchange revaluation on the fair value of
the derivative hedges10% depreciation of
currency13 15 
Derivatives – funding spread risk Impact of changes in the spread related
to derivatives FVA1 basis point parallel
increase in spread(4) (5)
Fair value option elected liabilities –
 funding spread riskImpact of changes in the spread related
to fair value option elected liabilities
DVA1 basis point parallel
increase in spread33 29 
Fair value option elected liabilities –
interest rate sensitivityInterest rate sensitivity on fair value
option liabilities resulting from a change
in the Firm’s own credit spread1 basis point parallel
increase in spread(3) (2)
Interest rate sensitivity related to risk
management of changes in the Firm’s
own credit spread on fair value option
liabilities1 basis point parallel
increase in spread3 2 
(a)Excludes equity securities without readily determinable fair values that are measured under the measurement alternative. Refer to Note 2 for
additional information.
(b)Impact recognized through net revenue.
(c)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm refined the approach for risk management of certain deferred compensation, which is recognized through
noninterest expense. As a result, certain deferred compensation and related hedges are now included in other sensitivity-based measures.
(d)Impact recognized through OCI.
(e)Prior-period amount has been revised to conform with the current presentation. In the absence of the scope refinement, Other debt and equity
would have been $(203) million and $(192) million for the periods ending December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Refer to Total VaR on page
138 for additional information.(a)
(b)
(c)
(b)(e)
(d)
(d)
(b)
(d)
(d)
(b)
142 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
COUNTR Y RISK MANAGEMENT
The Firm, through its LOBs and Corporate, may be
exposed to country risk resulting from financial,
economic, political or other significant developments
which adversely affect the value of the Firm’s exposures
related to a particular country or set of countries. The
Country Risk Management group actively monitors the
various portfolios which may be impacted by these
developments and measures the extent to which the
Firm’s exposures are diversified given the Firm’s
strategy and risk tolerance relative to a country.
Organization and management
Country Risk Management is an independent risk
management function that assesses, manages and
monitors country risk originated across the Firm.
The Firm’s country risk management function includes
the following activities:
•Maintaining policies, procedures and standards
consistent with a comprehensive country risk
framework
•Assigning sovereign ratings, assessing country risks
and establishing risk tolerance relative to a country
•Measuring and monitoring country risk exposure and
stress across the Firm
•Managing and approving country limits and reporting
trends and limit breaches to senior management
•Developing surveillance tools, such as signaling
models and ratings indicators, for early identification
of potential country risk concerns
•Providing country risk scenario analysis
Sources and measurement
The Firm is exposed to country risk through its lending
and deposits, investing, and market-making activities,
whether cross-border or locally funded. Country
exposure includes activity with both government and
private-sector entities in a country.
Under the Firm’s internal country risk management
approach, attribution of exposure to an individual
country is based on the country where the largest
proportion of the assets of the counterparty, issuer,
obligor or guarantor are located or where the largest
proportion of its revenue is derived, which may be
different than the domicile (i.e. legal residence) or
country of incorporation.
Individual country exposures reflect an aggregation of
the Firm’s risk to an immediate default, with zero
recovery, of the counterparties, issuers, obligors or
guarantors attributed to that country. Activities which
result in contingent or indirect exposure to a country are
not included in the country exposure measure (for
example, providing clearing services or secondary
exposure to collateral on securities financing
receivables).
Assumptions are sometimes required in determining the
measurement and allocation of country exposure,
particularly in the case of certain non-linear or index
products, or where the nature of the counterparty,
issuer,obligor or guarantor is not suitable for attribution to an
individual country. The use of different measurement
approaches or assumptions could affect the amount of
reported country exposure.
Under the Firm’s internal country risk measurement
framework:
•Lending exposures are measured at the total
committed amount (funded and unfunded), net of the
allowance for credit losses and eligible cash and
marketable securities collateral received
•Deposits are measured as the cash balances placed
with central and commercial banks
•Securities financing exposures are measured at their
receivable balance, net of eligible collateral received
•Debt and equity securities are measured at the fair
value of all positions, including both long and short
positions
•Counterparty exposure on derivative receivables is
measured at the derivative’s fair value, net of the fair
value of the eligible collateral received
•Credit derivatives protection purchased and sold is
reported based on the underlying reference entity
and is measured at the notional amount of protection
purchased or sold, net of the fair value of the
recognized derivative receivable or payable. Credit
derivatives protection purchased and sold in the
Firm’s market-making activities is measured on a net
basis, as such activities often result in selling and
purchasing protection related to the same underlying
reference entity; this reflects the manner in which the
Firm manages these exposures
The Firm’s internal country risk reporting differs from the
reporting provided under the FFIEC bank regulatory
requirements. Refer to Cross-border outstandings on
page 318 of the 2020 Form 10-K for further information
on the FFIEC’s reporting methodology.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 143
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Stress testing
Stress testing is an important component of the Firm’s
country risk management framework, which aims to
estimate and limit losses arising from a country crisis by
measuring the impact of adverse asset price
movements to a country based on market shocks
combined with counterparty specific assumptions.
Country Risk Management periodically designs and runs
tailored stress scenarios to test vulnerabilities to
individual countries or sets of countries in response to
specific or potential market events, sector performance
concerns, sovereign actions and geopolitical risks.
These tailored stress results are used to inform potential
risk reduction across the Firm, as necessary.
COVID-19 Pandemic
Country Risk Management continues to monitor the
impact of the COVID-19 pandemic, leveraging existing
stress testing, exposure reporting and controls, as well
as tailored analysis, to assess the extent to which
individual countries may be adversely impacted.
Risk reporting
Country exposure and stress are measured and
reported regularly, and used by Country Risk
Management to identify trends, and monitor high usages
and breaches against limits.
For country risk management purposes, the Firm may
report exposure to jurisdictions that are not fully
autonomous, including Special Administrative Regions
(“SAR”) and dependent territories, separately from the
independent sovereign states with which they are
associated.
The following table presents the Firm’s top 20
exposures by country (excluding the U.S.) as of
December 31, 2020, and their comparative exposures
as of December 31, 2019. The selection of countries
represents the Firm’s largest total exposures by
individual country, based on the Firm’s internal country
risk management approach, and does not represent the
Firm’s view of any actual or potentially adverse credit
conditions. Country exposures may fluctuate from period
to period due to client activity and market flows.
The overall increase in top 20 exposures was largely
driven by client activity and growth in client deposits,
relative to the period ending December 31, 2019. This
resulted in an increase in cash placements with the
central banks of Germany and the United Kingdom.Top 20 countryexposures (excluding the U.S.)
December
31, (in
billions) 2020 2019
Lending
and
depositsTrading and
investing OtherTotal
exposureTotal
exposure
Germany $120.8 $ 5.8 $ 0.6 $127.2 $ 51.6 
United
Kingdom 57.2 9.4 1.8 68.4 42.4 
Japan 36.7 8.6 0.3 45.6 43.8 
China 9.7 9.9 1.6 21.2 19.2 
France 13.4 4.6 0.8 18.8 18.1 
Switzerland 14.7 0.5 3.5 18.7 18.3 
Australia 9.9 5.7 0.3 15.9 11.7 
Canada 13.4 0.9 0.2 14.5 13.2 
Luxembourg 11.1 1.3 — 12.4 12.9 
Brazil 4.2 6.6 — 10.8 7.2 
India 3.9 5.1 1.5 10.5 11.3 
South Korea 5.4 4.3 0.4 10.1 6.4 
Italy 4.7 4.7 0.3 9.7 6.8 
Singapore 4.0 2.7 2.0 8.7 6.8 
Netherlands 5.4 0.1 2.2 7.7 5.8 
Hong Kong
SAR 3.7 1.9 0.6 6.2 5.1 
Spain 4.1 1.6 0.1 5.8 5.8 
Saudi Arabia 4.9 0.9 — 5.8 5.2 
Mexico 3.9 1.0 — 4.9 4.7 
Sweden 5.4 (1.1) — 4.3 1.1 
(a)Country exposures presented in the table reflect 90% and 87% of
total Firmwide non-U.S. exposure, where exposure is attributed to
an individual country, at December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
(b)In the fourth quarter of 2020, Country Risk Management
determined that the exposure for certain commodities contracts
corresponds to an EU-wide risk and should not be attributed to the
individual country of registration, previously the Netherlands. As
such, the exposure is no longer included and the prior-period
amount has been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(c)Lending and deposits includes loans and accrued interest
receivable, lending-related commitments (net of eligible collateral
and the allowance for credit losses), deposits with banks (including
central banks), acceptances, other monetary assets, and issued
letters of credit net of participations. Excludes intra-day and
operating exposures, such as those from settlement and clearing
activities.
(d)Includes market-making inventory, Investment securities, and
counterparty exposure on derivative and securities financings net
of eligible collateral and hedging. Includes exposure from single
reference entity (“single-name”), index and other multiple
reference entity transactions for which one or more of the
underlying reference entities is in a country listed in the above
table.
(e)Predominantly includes physical commodity inventory.
(f)The country rankings presented in the table as of December 31,
2019, are based on the country rankings of the corresponding
exposures at December 31, 2020, not actual rankings of such
exposures at December 31, 2019.
 
 
  (a)
(f)
(c) (d) (e)
(b)
144 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
OPERA TIONAL RISK MANAGEMENT
Operational risk is the risk of an adverse outcome
resulting from inadequate or failed internal processes or
systems; human factors; or external events impacting
the Firm’s processes or systems; Operational Risk
includes compliance, conduct, legal, and estimations
and model risk. Operational risk is inherent in the Firm’s
activities and can manifest itself in various ways,
including fraudulent acts, business interruptions, cyber
attacks, inappropriate employee behavior, failure to
comply with applicable laws and regulations or failure of
vendors to perform in accordance with their agreements.
Operational Risk Management attempts to manage
operational risk at appropriate levels in light of the Firm’s
financial position, the characteristics of its businesses,
and the markets and regulatory environments in which it
operates.
Operational Risk Management Framework
The Firm’s Compliance, Conduct, and Operational Risk
(“CCOR”) Management Framework is designed to
enable the Firm to govern, identify, measure, monitor
and test, manage and report on the Firm’s operational
risk.
Operational Risk Governance
The LOBs and Corporate are responsible for the
management of operational risk. The Control
Management Organization, which consists of control
managers within each LOB and Corporate, is
responsible for the day-to-day execution of the CCOR
Framework and the evaluation of the effectiveness of
their control environments to determine where targeted
remediation efforts may be required.
The Firm’s Global Chief Compliance Officer (“CCO”)
and FRE for Operational Risk is responsible for defining
the CCOR Management Framework and establishing
minimum standards for its execution. Operational Risk
Officers (“OROs”) report to both the LOB CROs and to
the FRE for Operational Risk, and are independent of
the respective businesses or functions they oversee.
The Firm’s CCOR Management policy establishes the
CCOR Management Framework for the Firm. The
CCOR Management Framework is articulated in the
Risk Governance and Oversight Policy which is
reviewed and approved by the Board Risk Committee
periodically.
Operational Risk identification
The Firm utilizes a structured risk and control self-
assessment process that is executed by the LOBs and
Corporate. As part of this process, the LOBs and
Corporate evaluate the effectiveness of their control
environment to assess where controls have failed, and
to determine where remediation efforts may be required.
The Firm’s Operational Risk and Compliance
organization (“Operational Risk and Compliance”)
provides oversight of these activities and may also
perform independent assessments of significant
operational risk events and areas of concentrated or
emerging risk.Operational Risk Measurement
Operational Risk and Compliance performs independent
risk assessments of the Firm’s operational risks, which
includes assessing the effectiveness of the control
environment and reporting the results to senior
management.
In addition, operational risk measurement includes
operational risk-based capital and operational risk loss
projections under both baseline and stressed conditions.
The primary component of the operational risk capital
estimate is the Loss Distribution Approach (“LDA”)
statistical model, which simulates the frequency and
severity of future operational risk loss projections based
on historical data. The LDA model is used to estimate
an aggregate operational risk loss over a one-year time
horizon, at a 99.9% confidence level. The LDA model
incorporates actual internal operational risk losses in the
quarter following the period in which those losses were
realized, and the calculation generally continues to
reflect such losses even after the issues or business
activities giving rise to the losses have been remediated
or reduced.
As required under the Basel III capital framework, the
Firm’s operational risk-based capital methodology,
which uses the Advanced Measurement Approach
(“AMA”), incorporates internal and external losses as
well as management’s view of tail risk captured through
operational risk scenario analysis, and evaluation of key
business environment and internal control metrics. The
Firm does not reflect the impact of insurance in its AMA
estimate of operational risk capital.
The Firm considers the impact of stressed economic
conditions on operational risk losses and develops a
forward looking view of material operational risk events
that may occur in a stressed environment. The Firm’s
operational risk stress testing framework is utilized in
calculating results for the Firm’s CCAR and other stress
testing processes.
Refer to Capital Risk Management section, on pages
91-101 for information related to operational risk RWA,
and CCAR.
Operational Risk Monitoring and testing
The results of risk assessments performed by
Operational Risk and Compliance are leveraged as one
of the key criteria in the independent monitoring and
testing of the LOBs and Corporate’s compliance with
laws and regulation. Through monitoring and testing,
Operational Risk and Compliance independently identify
areas of operational risk and tests the effectiveness of
controls within the LOBs and Corporate.
Management of Operational Risk
The operational risk areas or issues identified through
monitoring and testing are escalated to the LOBs and
Corporate to be remediated through action plans, as
needed, to mitigate operational risk. Operational Risk
and
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 145
Management’ s discussion and analysis
Compliance may advise the LOBs and Corporate in the
development and implementation of action plans.
Operational Risk Reporting
Escalation of risks is a fundamental expectation for
employees at the Firm. Risks identified by Operational
Risk and Compliance are escalated to the appropriate
LOB and Corporate Control Committees, as needed.
Operational Risk and Compliance has established
standards to ensure that consistent operational risk
reporting and operational risk reports are produced on a
Firmwide basis as well as by the LOBs and
Corporate. Reporting includes the evaluation of key risk
indicators and key performance indicators against
established thresholds as well as the assessment of
different types of operational risk against stated risk
appetite. The standards reinforce escalation protocols to
senior management and to the Board of Directors.
COVID-19 Pandemic
Under the CCOR Management Framework, Operational
Risk and Compliance monitors and assesses COVID-19
related legal and regulatory developments associated
with the Firm’s financial products and services offered to
clients and customers as part of the existing change
management process. The Firm will continue to review
and assess the impact of the pandemic on operational
risk and implement adequate measures as needed.
Subcategories and examples of operational risks
Operational risk can manifest itself in various ways.
Operational risk subcategories such as Compliance risk,
Conduct risk, Legal risk, and Estimations and Model risk
as well as other operational risks, can lead to losses
which are captured through the Firm’s operational risk
measurement processes. Refer to pages 148, 149, 150
and 151, respectively for more information on
Compliance, Conduct, Legal, and Estimations and
Model risk. Details on other select examples of
operational risks are provided below.
Cybersecurity risk
Cybersecurity risk is the risk of the Firm’s exposure to
harm or loss resulting from misuse or abuse of
technology by malicious actors. Cybersecurity risk is an
important and continuously evolving focus for the Firm.
Significant resources are devoted to protecting and
enhancing the security of computer systems, software,
networks and other technology assets. The Firm’s
security efforts are designed to protect against, among
other things, cybersecurity attacks by unauthorized
parties attempting to obtain access to confidential
information, destroy data, disrupt or degrade service,
sabotage systems or cause other damage.
Ongoing business expansions may expose the Firm to
potential new threats as well as expanded regulatory
scrutiny including the introduction of new cybersecurity
requirements. The Firm continues to make significant
investments in enhancing its cyber defense capabilities
and to strengthen its partnerships with the appropriate
government and law enforcement agencies and other
businesses in order to understand the full spectrum of
cybersecurity risks in the operating environment,
enhance defenses and improve resiliency against
cybersecuritythreats. The Firm actively participates in discussions of
cybersecurity risks with law enforcement, government
officials, peer and industry groups, and has significantly
increased efforts to educate employees and certain
clients on the topic of cybersecurity risks.
Third parties with which the Firm does business or that
facilitate the Firm’s business activities (e.g., vendors,
supply chain, exchanges, clearing houses, central
depositories, and financial intermediaries) are also
sources of cybersecurity risk to the Firm. Third party
cybersecurity incidents such as system breakdowns or
failures, misconduct by the employees of such parties,
or cyberattacks could affect their ability to deliver a
product or service to the Firm or result in lost or
compromised information of the Firm or its clients.
Clients are also sources of cybersecurity risk to the
Firm, particularly when their activities and systems are
beyond the Firm’s own security and control systems. As
a result, the Firm engages in regular and ongoing
discussions with certain vendors and clients regarding
cybersecurity risks and opportunities to improve
security. However, where cybersecurity incidents occur
as a result of client failures to maintain the security of
their own systems and processes, clients are
responsible for losses incurred.
To protect the confidentiality, integrity and availability of
the Firm’s infrastructure, resources and information, the
Firm maintains a cybersecurity program designed to
prevent, detect, and respond to cyberattacks. The Audit
Committee is updated periodically on the Firm’s
Information Security Program, recommended changes,
cybersecurity policies and practices, ongoing efforts to
improve security, as well as its efforts regarding
significant cybersecurity events. In addition, the Firm
has a cybersecurity incident response plan (“IRP”)
designed to enable the Firm to respond to attempted
cybersecurity incidents, coordinate such responses with
law enforcement and other government agencies, and
notify clients and customers, as applicable. Among other
key focus areas, the IRP is designed to mitigate the risk
of insider trading connected to a cybersecurity incident,
and includes various escalation points. Due to the
impact of COVID-19, the Firm increased the use of
remote access and also video conferencing solutions
provided by third parties to facilitate remote work. As a
result the Firm took additional precautionary measures
to mitigate cybersecurity risks.
The Cybersecurity and Technology Control functions are
responsible for governance and oversight of the Firm’s
Information Security Program. In partnership with the
Firm’s LOBs and Corporate, the Cybersecurity and
Technology Control organization identifies information
security risk issues and oversees programs for the
technological protection of the Firm’s information
resources including applications, infrastructure as well
as confidential and personal information related to the
Firm’s customers. The Cybersecurity and Technology
organization consists of business aligned information
security managers that are supported within the
organization by the following products that execute the
Information Security Program for the Firm:
•Cyber Defense & Fraud
146 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
•Data Management, Protection & Privacy
•Identity & Access Management
•Governance & Controls
•Production Management & Resiliency
•Software & Platform Enablement
The Global Cybersecurity and Technology Control
governance structure is designed to identify, escalate,
and mitigate information security risks. This structure
uses key governance forums to disseminate information
and monitor technology efforts. These forums are
established at multiple levels throughout the Firm and
include representatives from each LOB and Corporate.
Reports containing overviews of key technology risks
and efforts to enhance related controls are produced for
these forums, and are reviewed by management at
multiple levels. The forums are used to escalate
information security risks or other matters as
appropriate.
The IRM function provides oversight of the activities
designed to identify, assess, measure, and mitigate
cybersecurity risk.
The Firm’s Security Awareness Program includes
training that reinforces the Firm's Information
Technology Risk and Security Management policies,
standards and practices, as well as the expectation that
employees comply with these policies. The Security
Awareness Program engages personnel through
training on how to identify potential cybersecurity risks
and protect the Firm’s resources and information. This
training is mandatory for all employees globally on a
periodic basis, and it is supplemented by Firmwide
testing initiatives, including periodic phishing tests.
Finally, the Firm’s Global Privacy Program requires all
employees to take periodic awareness training on data
privacy. This privacy-focused training includes
information about confidentiality and security, as well as
responding to unauthorized access to or use of
information.
Business and technology resiliency risk
Business disruptions can occur due to forces beyond
the Firm’s control such as the spread of infectious
diseases or pandemics, severe weather, power or
telecommunications loss, accidents, failure of a third
party to provide expected services, cyberattack,
flooding, transit strikes, terrorism, health emergencies.
The safety of the Firm’s employees and customers is of
the highest priority. The Firmwide resiliency program is
intended to enable the Firm to recover its critical
business functions and supporting assets (i.e., staff,
technology and facilities) in the event of a business
interruption. The program includes governance,
awareness training, and testing of recovery strategies,
as well as strategic and tactical initiatives to identify,
assess, and manage business interruption and public
safety risks. The strength and proficiency of the
Firmwide resiliency program has played an integral role
in maintaining the Firm’s business operations during and
after various events.Payment fraud risk
Payment fraud risk is the risk of external and internal
parties unlawfully obtaining personal monetary benefit
through misdirected or otherwise improper payment.
The risk of payment fraud remains at a heightened level
across the industry, particularly during the current
COVID-19 pandemic due to the use of contingent forms
of payment authentication methods, scams involving the
pandemic being perpetrated including an increase in the
level of fraud attempts against consumers. The
complexities of these incidents and the strategies used
by perpetrators continue to evolve. The Firm employs
various controls for managing payment fraud risk as well
as providing employee and client education and
awareness trainings. The Firm’s monitoring of customer
behavior to detect new fraud strategies is periodically
evaluated and enhanced in an effort to mitigate these
fraud risks.
Third-party outsourcing risk
The Firm‘s Third-Party Oversight (“TPO”) and Inter-
affiliates Oversight (“IAO”) framework assist the LOBs
and Corporate in selecting, documenting, onboarding,
monitoring and managing their supplier relationships
including services provided by affiliates. The objectives
of the TPO framework are to hold suppliers to a high
level of operational performance and to mitigate key
risks including data loss and business disruption. The
Corporate Third-Party Oversight group is responsible for
Firmwide training, monitoring, reporting and standards.
Insurance
One of the ways in which operational risk may be
mitigated is through insurance maintained by the Firm.
The Firm purchases insurance from commercial insurers
and maintains a wholly-owned captive insurer, Park
Assurance Company. Insurance may also be required
by third parties with whom the Firm does business.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 147
Management’ s discussion and analysis
COMPLIANCE RISK MANAGEMENT
Compliance risk, a subcategory of operational risk, is
the risk of failing to comply with laws, rules, regulations
or codes of conduct and standards of self-regulatory
organizations.
Overview
Each LOB and Corporate hold primary ownership of and
accountability for managing compliance risk. The Firm’s
Operational Risk and Compliance Organization
(“Operational Risk and Compliance”), which is
independent of the LOBs and Corporate, provides
independent review, monitoring and oversight of
business operations with a focus on compliance with the
laws, rules, and regulations applicable to the delivery of
the Firm’s products and services to clients and
customers.
These compliance risks relate to a wide variety of laws,
rules and regulations depending on the LOB and the
jurisdiction, and include risks related to financial
products and services, relationships and interactions
with clients and customers, and employee activities. For
example, compliance risks include those associated with
anti-money laundering compliance, trading activities,
market conduct, and complying with the laws, rules, and
regulations related to the offering of products and
services across jurisdictional borders. Compliance risk is
also inherent in the Firm’s fiduciary activities, including
the failure to exercise the applicable standard of care
(such as the duties of loyalty or care), to act in the best
interest of clients and customers or to treat clients and
customers fairly.
Other functions provide oversight of significant
regulatory obligations that are specific to their respective
areas of responsibility.
Operational Risk and Compliance implements policies
and standards designed to govern, identify, measure,
monitor and test, manage, and report on compliance
risk.Governance and oversight
Operational Risk and Compliance is led by the Firm’s
Global CCO and FRE for Operational Risk.
The Firm maintains oversight and coordination of its
compliance risk through the implementation of the
CCOR Risk Management Framework. The Firm’s CCO
also provides regular updates to the Audit Committee
and the Board Risk Committee. In certain Special
Purpose Committees of the Board have previously been
established to oversee the Firm’s compliance with
regulatory Consent Orders.
Code of Conduct
The Firm has a Code of Conduct (the “Code”) that sets
forth the Firm’s expectation that employees will conduct
themselves with integrity at all times and provides the
principles that govern employee conduct with clients,
customers, shareholders and one another, as well as
with the markets and communities in which the Firm
does business. The Code requires employees to
promptly report any potential or actual violation of the
Code, any internal Firm policy, or any law or regulation
applicable to the Firm’s business. It also requires
employees to report any illegal conduct, or conduct that
violates the underlying principles of the Code, by any of
the Firm’s employees, clients, customers, suppliers,
contract workers, business partners, or agents. All newly
hired employees are assigned Code training and current
employees are periodically assigned Code training on
an ongoing basis. Employees are required to affirm their
compliance with the Code periodically.
Employees can report any potential or actual violations
of the Code through the JPMC Conduct Hotline by
phone or the internet. The Hotline is anonymous, except
in certain non-U.S. jurisdictions where laws prohibit
anonymous reporting, and is available at all times
globally, with translation services. It is administered by
an outside service provider. The Code prohibits
retaliation against anyone who raises an issue or
concern in good faith. Periodically, the Audit Committee
receives reports on the Code of Conduct program.
 
 
148 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
CONDUCT RISK MANAGEMENT
Conduct risk, a subcategory of operational risk, is the
risk that any action or inaction by an employee or
employees could lead to unfair client or customer
outcomes, impact the integrity of the markets in which
the Firm operates, or compromise the Firm’s reputation.
Overview
Each LOB and Corporate is accountable for identifying
and managing its conduct risk to provide appropriate
engagement, ownership and sustainability of a culture
consistent with the Firm’s How We Do Business
Principles (the “Principles”). The Principles serve as a
guide for how employees are expected to conduct
themselves. With the Principles serving as a guide, the
Firm’s Code sets out the Firm’s expectations for each
employee and provides information and resources to
help employees conduct business ethically and in
compliance with the laws everywhere the Firm operates.
Refer to Compliance Risk Management on page 148 for
further discussion of the Code.
Governance and oversight
The Conduct Risk Program is governed by the CCOR
Management policy, which establishes the framework
for governance, identification, measurement, monitoring
and testing, management and reporting conduct risk in
the Firm.The Firm has a senior committee that provides oversight
of the Firm’s conduct initiatives to develop a more
holistic view of conduct risks and to connect key
programs across the Firm in order to identify
opportunities and emerging areas of focus. This
committee is responsible for setting overall program
direction for strategic enhancements to the Firm's
employee conduct framework and review the
consolidated Firmwide Conduct Risk Appetite
Assessment.
 
Conduct risk management encompasses various
aspects of people management practices throughout the
employee life cycle, including recruiting, onboarding,
training and development, performance management,
promotion and compensation processes. Each LOB,
Treasury and CIO, and designated corporate functions
completes an assessment of conduct risk periodically,
reviews metrics and issues which may involve conduct
risk, and provides business conduct training as
appropriate.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 149
Management’ s discussion and analysis
LEGAL RISK MANAGEMENT
Legal risk, a subcategory of operational risk, is the risk
of loss primarily caused by the actual or alleged failure
to meet legal obligations that arise from the rule of law in
jurisdictions in which the Firm operates, agreements
with clients and customers, and products and services
offered by the Firm.
Overview
The global Legal function (“Legal”) provides legal
services and advice to the Firm. Legal is responsible for
managing the Firm’s exposure to legal risk by:
•managing actual and potential litigation and
enforcement matters, including internal reviews and
investigations related to such matters
•advising on products and services, including contract
negotiation and documentation
•advising on offering and marketing documents and
new business initiatives
•managing dispute resolution
•interpreting existing laws, rules and regulations, and
advising on changes to them
•advising on advocacy in connection with
contemplated and proposed laws, rules and
regulations, and•providing legal advice to the LOBs, Corporate,
functions and the Board.
Legal selects, engages and manages outside counsel
for the Firm on all matters in which outside counsel is
engaged. In addition, Legal advises the Firm’s Conflicts
Office which reviews the Firm’s wholesale transactions
that may have the potential to create conflicts of interest
for the Firm.
Governance and oversight
The Firm’s General Counsel reports to the CEO and is a
member of the Operating Committee, the Firmwide Risk
Committee and the Firmwide Control Committee. The
Firm’s General Counsel and other members of Legal
report on significant legal matters to the Firm’s Board of
Directors and to the Audit Committee. 
Legal serves on and advises various committees and
advises the Firm’s LOBs and Corporate on potential
reputation risk issues.
 
150 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
ESTIMA TIONS AND MODEL RISK MANAGEMENT
Estimations and Model risk, a subcategory of
operational risk, is the potential for adverse
consequences from decisions based on incorrect or
misused estimation outputs.
The Firm uses models and other analytical and
judgment-based estimations across various businesses
and functions. The estimation methods are of varying
levels of sophistication and are used for many purposes,
such as the valuation of positions and measurement of
risk, assessing regulatory capital requirements,
conducting stress testing, and making business
decisions. A dedicated independent function, Model
Risk Governance and Review (“MRGR”), defines and
governs the Firm’s policies relating to the management
of model risk and risks associated with certain analytical
and judgment-based estimations, such as those used in
risk management, budget forecasting and capital
planning and analysis.
The governance of analytical and judgment-based
estimations within MRGR’s scope follows a consistent
approach to the approach used for models, which is
described in detail below.
Model risks are owned by the users of the models within
the Firm based on the specific purposes of such models.
Users and developers of models are responsible for
developing, implementing and testing their models, as
well as referring models to the MRGR for review and
approval. Once models have been approved, model
users and developers are responsible for maintaining a
robust operating environment, and must monitor and
evaluate the performance of the models on an ongoing
basis. Model users and developers may seek to
enhance models in response to changes in the portfolios
and in product and market developments, as well as to
capture improvements in available modeling techniques
and systems capabilities.Models are tiered based on an internal standard
according to their complexity, the exposure associated
with the model and the Firm’s reliance on the model.
This tiering is subject to the approval of the MRGR. In its
review of a model, the MRGR considers whether the
model is suitable for the specific purposes for which it
will be used. When reviewing a model, the MRGR
analyzes and challenges the model methodology and
the reasonableness of model assumptions, and may
perform or require additional testing, including back-
testing of model outcomes. Model reviews are approved
by the appropriate level of management within the
MRGR based on the relevant model tier.
Under the Firm’s Estimations and Model Risk
Management Policy, the MRGR reviews and approves
new models, as well as material changes to existing
models, prior to implementation in the operating
environment. In certain circumstances exceptions may
be granted to the Firm’s policy to allow a model to be
used prior to review or approval. The MRGR may also
require the user to take appropriate actions to mitigate
the model risk if it is to be used in the interim. These
actions will depend on the model and may include, for
example, limitation of trading activity.
While models are inherently imprecise, the degree of
imprecision or uncertainty can be heightened by the
market or economic environment. This is particularly
true when the current and forecasted environment is
significantly different from the historical macroeconomic
environments upon which the models were trained, as
the Firm has experienced during the COVID-19
pandemic. This uncertainty may necessitate a greater
degree of judgment and analytics to inform adjustments
to model outputs than in typical periods.
Refer to Critical Accounting Estimates Used by the Firm
on pages 152-155 and Note 2 for a summary of model-
based valuations and other valuation techniques.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 151
Management’ s discussion and analysis
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING ESTIMA TES USED BY THE FIRM
JPMorgan Chase’s accounting policies and use of
estimates are integral to understanding its reported
results. The Firm’s most complex accounting estimates
require management’s judgment to ascertain the
appropriate carrying value of assets and liabilities. The
Firm has established policies and control procedures
intended to ensure that estimation methods, including
any judgments made as part of such methods, are well-
controlled, independently reviewed and applied
consistently from period to period. The methods used
and judgments made reflect, among other factors, the
nature of the assets or liabilities and the related
business and risk management strategies, which may
vary across the Firm’s businesses and portfolios. In
addition, the policies and procedures are intended to
ensure that the process for changing methodologies
occurs in an appropriate manner. The Firm believes its
estimates for determining the carrying value of its assets
and liabilities are appropriate. The following is a brief
description of the Firm’s critical accounting estimates
involving significant judgments.
Allowance for credit losses
The Firm’s allowance for credit losses represents
management’s estimate of expected credit losses over
the remaining expected life of the Firm’s financial assets
measured at amortized cost and certain off-balance
sheet lending-related commitments. The allowance for
credit losses comprises:
•The allowance for loan losses, which covers the
Firm’s retained loan portfolios (scored and risk-rated),
•The allowance for lending-related commitments, and
•The allowance for credit losses on investment
securities, which covers the Firm’s HTM and AFS
securities.
The allowance for credit losses involves significant
judgment on a number of matters including development
and weighting of macroeconomic forecasts,
incorporation of historical loss experience, assessment
of risk characteristics, assignment of risk ratings,
valuation of collateral, and the determination of
remaining expected life. Refer to Note 10 and Note 13
for further information on these judgments as well as the
Firm’s policies and methodologies used to determine the
Firm’s allowance for credit losses.
One of the most significant judgments involved in
estimating the Firm’s allowance for credit losses relates
to the macroeconomic forecasts used to estimate credit
losses over the eight-quarter forecast period within the
Firm’s methodology. The eight-quarter forecast
incorporates hundreds of macroeconomic variables
(“MEVs”) that are relevant for exposures across the
Firm, with modeled credit losses being driven primarily
by a subset of less than twenty variables. The specific
variables that have the greatest effect on the modeled
losses of each portfolio vary by portfolio and geography.•Key MEVs for the consumer portfolio include U.S.
unemployment, house price index (“HPI”) and U.S.
real gross domestic product (“GDP”).
•Key MEVs for the wholesale portfolio include U.S. real
GDP, U.S. unemployment, U.S. equity prices,
corporate credit spreads, oil prices, commercial real
estate prices and HPI.
Changes in the Firm’s assumptions and forecasts of
economic conditions could significantly affect its
estimate of expected credit losses in the portfolio at the
balance sheet date or lead to significant changes in the
estimate from one reporting period to the next.
The COVID-19 pandemic has resulted in a weak labor
market and weak overall economic conditions that will
continue to affect borrowers across the Firm’s consumer
and wholesale lending portfolios. Significant judgment is
required to estimate the severity and duration of the
current economic downturn, as well as its potential
impact on borrower defaults and loss severities. In
particular, macroeconomic conditions and forecasts
regarding the duration and severity of the economic
downturn caused by the COVID-19 pandemic have
been rapidly changing and remain highly uncertain. It is
difficult to predict exactly how borrower behavior will be
impacted by these changes in economic conditions. The
effectiveness of government support, customer
assistance and enhanced unemployment benefits
should act as mitigants to credit losses, but the extent of
the mitigation impact remains uncertain.
It is difficult to estimate how potential changes in any
one factor or input might affect the overall allowance for
credit losses because management considers a wide
variety of factors and inputs in estimating the allowance
for credit losses. Changes in the factors and inputs
considered may not occur at the same rate and may not
be consistent across all geographies or product types,
and changes in factors and inputs may be directionally
inconsistent, such that improvement in one factor or
input may offset deterioration in others.
To consider the impact of a hypothetical alternate
macroeconomic forecast, the Firm compared the
modeled credit losses determined using its central and
relative adverse macroeconomic scenarios, which are
two of the five scenarios considered in estimating the
allowances for loan losses and lending-related
commitments. The central and relative adverse
scenarios each included a full suite of MEVs, but
differed in the levels, paths and peaks/troughs of those
variables over the eight-quarter forecast period.
For example, compared to the Firm’s central scenario
described on page 132 and in Note 13, the Firm’s
relative adverse scenario assumes a significantly
elevated U.S. unemployment rate throughout 2021,
averaging 3.0% higher over the eight-quarter forecast,
with a peak difference of approximately 4.0% in the
second quarter of 2021; lower U.S. real GDP with a
slower recovery,
152 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
remaining nearly 2.6% lower at the end of the eight-
quarter forecast, with a peak difference of nearly 4.1% in
the third quarter of 2021; and a 10.1% further
deterioration in the national HPI with a trough in the first
quarter of 2022.
This analysis is not intended to estimate expected future
changes in the allowance for credit losses, for a number
of reasons, including:
•the Firm has placed significant weight on its adverse
scenarios in estimating its allowance for credit losses
as of December 31, 2020, and accordingly, the
existing allowance already reflects credit losses
beyond those estimated under the central scenario
•the impacts of changes in many MEVs are both
interrelated and nonlinear, so the results of this
analysis cannot be simply extrapolated for more
severe changes in macroeconomic variables
•the COVID-19 pandemic has stressed many MEVs at
a speed and to degrees not seen in recent history,
adding significantly higher degrees of uncertainty
around modeled credit loss estimations
•significant changes in the expected severity and
duration of the economic downturn caused by the
COVID-19 pandemic, the effects of government
support and customer assistance, and the speed of
the subsequent recovery could significantly affect the
Firm’s estimate of expected credit losses irrespective
of the estimated sensitivities described below.
Without considering the additional weight the Firm has
placed on its adverse scenarios or any other offsetting
or correlated effects in other qualitative components of
the Firm’s allowance for credit losses for the lending
exposures noted below, the difference between the
modeled estimates under the Firm’s relative adverse
and central scenarios at December 31, 2020 would
result in the following:
•An increase of approximately $700 million for
residential real estate loans and lending-related
commitments
•An increase of approximately $5.1 billion for credit
card loans
•An increase of approximately $2.8 billion for
wholesale loans and lending-related commitments
This analysis relates only to the modeled credit loss
estimates and is not intended to estimate changes in the
overall allowance for credit losses as it does not reflect
any potential changes in other adjustments to the
quantitative calculation, which would also be influenced
by the judgment management applies to the modeled
lifetime loss estimates to reflect the uncertainty and
imprecision of these modeled lifetime loss estimates
based on then-current circumstances and conditions.
Recognizing that forecasts of macroeconomic conditions
are inherently uncertain, particularly in light of the recent
economic conditions, the Firm believes that its process
to consider the available information and associated
risks anduncertainties is appropriately governed and that its
estimates of expected credit losses were reasonable
and appropriate for the period ended December 31,
2020.
Fair value
JPMorgan Chase carries a portion of its assets and
liabilities at fair value. The majority of such assets and
liabilities are measured at fair value on a recurring basis,
including, derivatives and structured note products.
Certain assets and liabilities are measured at fair value
on a nonrecurring basis, including certain mortgage,
home equity and other loans, where the carrying value
is based on the fair value of the underlying collateral.
Assets measured at fair value
The following table includes the Firm’s assets measured
at fair value and the portion of such assets that are
classified within level 3 of the valuation hierarchy. Refer
to Note 2 for further information.
December 31, 2020
 (in billions, except ratios)Total assets
at fair valueTotal level 3
assets
Federal Funds sold and securities
purchased under resale
agreements $ 238.0 $ — 
Securities borrowed 53.0 — 
Trading assets:
    Trading debt and equity
instruments $ 423.5 $ 2.6 
    Derivative receivables 79.6 7.7 
Total trading assets 503.1 10.3 
AFS securities 388.2 — 
Loans 44.5 2.3 
MSRs 3.3 3.3 
Other 304.1 0.5 
Total assets measured at fair
value on a recurring basis 1,243.2 16.4 
Total assets measured at fair value
on a nonrecurring basis 3.6 2.0 
Total assets measured at fair
value $ 1,246.8 $ 18.4 
Total Firm assets $ 3,386.1 
Level 3 assets at fair value as a
percentage of total Firm assets 0.5 %
Level 3 assets at fair value as a
percentage of total Firm assets at
fair value 1.5 %
(a)For purposes of the table above, the derivative receivables total
reflects the impact of netting adjustments; however, the $7.7 billion
of derivative receivables classified as level 3 does not reflect the
netting adjustment as such netting is not relevant to a presentation
based on the transparency of inputs to the valuation of an asset.
The level 3 balances would be reduced if netting were applied,
including the netting benefit associated with cash collateral.
Valuation
Details of the Firm’s processes for determining fair value
are set out in Note 2. Estimating fair value requires the
application of judgment. The type and level of judgment
required is largely dependent on the amount of
observable market information available to the Firm. For
instruments valued using internally developed valuation
models and other valuation techniques that use
significant unobservable inputs and are therefore
classified within level 3 of the valuation hierarchy,
judgments used to estimate fair value are more
significant than those required when estimating the fair
value of instruments classified within levels 1 and 2.(a)
(a)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 153
Management’ s discussion and analysis
In arriving at an estimate of fair value for an instrument
within level 3, management must first determine the
appropriate valuation model or other valuation technique
to use. Second, the lack of observability of certain
significant inputs requires management to assess all
relevant empirical data in deriving valuation inputs
including, for example, transaction details, yield curves,
interest rates, prepayment speed, default rates,
volatilities, correlations, prices (such as commodity,
equity or debt prices), valuations of comparable
instruments, foreign exchange rates and credit curves.
Refer to Note 2 for a further discussion of the valuation
of level 3 instruments, including unobservable inputs
used.
For instruments classified in levels 2 and 3,
management judgment must be applied to assess the
appropriate level of valuation adjustments to reflect
counterparty credit quality, the Firm’s creditworthiness,
market funding rates, liquidity considerations,
unobservable parameters, and for portfolios that meet
specified criteria, the size of the net open risk position.
The judgments made are typically affected by the type
of product and its specific contractual terms, and the
level of liquidity for the product or within the market as a
whole. In periods of heightened market volatility and
uncertainty judgments are further affected by the wider
variation of reasonable valuation estimates, particularly
for positions that are less liquid. Refer to Note 2 for a
further discussion of valuation adjustments applied by
the Firm.
Imprecision in estimating unobservable market inputs or
other factors can affect the amount of gain or loss
recorded for a particular position. Furthermore, while the
Firm believes its valuation methods are appropriate and
consistent with those of other market participants, the
methods and assumptions used reflect management
judgment and may vary across the Firm’s businesses
and portfolios.
The Firm uses various methodologies and assumptions
in the determination of fair value. The use of
methodologies or assumptions different than those used
by the Firm could result in a different estimate of fair
value at the reporting date. Refer to Note 2 for a detailed
discussion of the Firm’s valuation process and
hierarchy, and its determination of fair value for
individual financial instruments.
Goodwill impairment
Under U.S. GAAP, goodwill must be allocated to
reporting units and tested for impairment at least
annually. The Firm’s process and methodology used to
conduct goodwill impairment testing is described in Note
15.
Management applies significant judgment when testing
goodwill for impairment. The goodwill associated with
each business combination is allocated to the related
reporting units for goodwill impairment testing.
For the year ended December 31, 2020, the Firm
reviewed current economic conditions, including the
potential impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic on
business performance, estimated market cost of equity,
as well as actual business results and projections of
businessperformance for all its reporting units. The Firm has
concluded that the goodwill allocated to its reporting
units was not impaired as of December 31, 2020. The
fair values of these reporting units exceeded their
carrying values by at least 15% and did not indicate a
significant risk of goodwill impairment based on current
projections and valuations.
The projections for all of the Firm’s reporting units are
consistent with management’s current business outlook
assumptions in the short term, and the Firm’s best
estimates of long-term growth and return on equity in
the longer term. Where possible, the Firm uses third-
party and peer data to benchmark its assumptions and
estimates.
Refer to Note 15 for additional information on goodwill,
including the goodwill impairment assessment as of
December 31, 2020.
Credit card rewards liability
JPMorgan Chase offers credit cards with various
rewards programs which allow cardholders to earn
rewards points based on their account activity and the
terms and conditions of the rewards program. Generally,
there are no limits on the points that an eligible
cardholder can earn, nor do the points expire, and the
points can be redeemed for a variety of rewards,
including cash (predominantly in the form of account
credits), gift cards and travel. The Firm maintains a
rewards liability which represents the estimated cost of
rewards points earned and expected to be redeemed by
cardholders. The liability is accrued as the cardholder
earns the benefit and is reduced when the cardholder
redeems points. This liability was $7.7 billion and $6.4
billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively,
and is recorded in accounts payable and other liabilities
on the Consolidated balance sheets.
The rewards liability is sensitive to redemption rate
(“RR”) and cost per point (“CPP”) assumptions. The RR
assumption is used to estimate the number of points
earned by customers that will be redeemed over the life
of the account. The CPP assumption is used to estimate
the cost of future point redemptions. These assumptions
are evaluated periodically considering historical actuals
and cardholder redemption behavior and updates to
them will impact the rewards liability. As of
December 31, 2020, a combined increase of 25 basis
points in RR and 1 basis point in CPP would increase
the rewards liability by approximately $215 million.
Income taxes
JPMorgan Chase is subject to the income tax laws of
the various jurisdictions in which it operates, including
U.S. federal, state and local, and non-U.S. jurisdictions.
These laws are often complex and may be subject to
different interpretations. To determine the financial
statement impact of accounting for income taxes,
including the provision for income tax expense and
unrecognized tax benefits, JPMorgan Chase must make
assumptions and judgments about how to interpret and
apply these complex tax laws to numerous transactions
and business events, as well as make judgments
regarding the timing of when
154 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
certain items may affect taxable income in the U.S. and
non-U.S. tax jurisdictions.
JPMorgan Chase’s interpretations of tax laws around
the world are subject to review and examination by the
various taxing authorities in the jurisdictions where the
Firm operates, and disputes may occur regarding its
view on a tax position. These disputes over
interpretations with the various taxing authorities may be
settled by audit, administrative appeals or adjudication
in the court systems of the tax jurisdictions in which the
Firm operates. JPMorgan Chase regularly reviews
whether it may be assessed additional income taxes as
a result of the resolution of these matters, and the Firm
records additional reserves as appropriate. In addition,
the Firm may revise its estimate of income taxes due to
changes in income tax laws, legal interpretations, and
business strategies. It is possible that revisions in the
Firm’s estimate of income taxes may materially affect
the Firm’s results of operations in any reporting period.
The Firm’s provision for income taxes is composed of
current and deferred taxes. Deferred taxes arise from
differences between assets and liabilities measured for
financial reporting versus income tax return purposes.
Deferred tax assets are recognized if, in management’s
judgment, their realizability is determined to be more
likely than not. The Firm has also recognized deferred
tax assets in connection with certain tax attributes,
including net operating loss (“NOL”) carryforwards and
foreign tax credit (“FTC”) carryforwards. The Firm
performs regular reviews to ascertain whether its
deferred tax assets are realizable. These reviews
include management’s estimates and assumptions
regarding future taxable income, which also
incorporates various tax planning strategies, including
strategies that may be available to utilize NOLs before
they expire. In connection with these reviews, if it is
determined that a deferred tax asset is not realizable, a
valuation allowance is established. The valuation
allowance may be reversed in a subsequent reporting
period if the Firm determines that, based on revised
estimates of future taxable income or changes in tax
planning strategies, it is more likely than not that all or
part of the deferred tax asset will become realizable. As
of December 31, 2020, management has determined it
is more likely than not that the Firm will realize its
deferred tax assets, net of the existing valuation
allowance.
The Firm adjusts its unrecognized tax benefits as
necessary when additional information becomes
available. Uncertain tax positions that meet the more-
likely-than-not recognition threshold are measured to
determine the amount of benefit to recognize. An
uncertain tax position is measured at the largest amount
of benefit that management believes is more likely than
not to be realized upon settlement. It is possible that the
reassessment of JPMorgan Chase’s unrecognized tax
benefits may have a material impact on its effective
income tax rate in the period in which the reassessment
occurs.
Refer to Note 25 for additional information on income
taxes.Litigation reserves
Refer to Note 30 for a description of the significant
estimates and judgments associated with establishing
litigation reserves.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 155
Management’ s discussion and analysis
ACCOUNTING AND REPOR TING DEVELOPMENTS
Financial Accounting Standards Board (“F ASB”) Standards Adopted since January 1, 2020
Standard Summary of guidance Effects on financial statements
Financial
Instruments -
Credit Losses
(“CECL”)
Issued June
2016•Establishes a single allowance framework for all
financial assets measured at amortized cost and
certain of f-balance sheet credit exposures. This
framework requires that management’ s estimate
reflects credit losses over the instrument’ s remaining
expected life and considers expected future changes
in macroeconomic conditions.
•Eliminates existing guidance for PCI loans, and
requires recognition of the nonaccretable dif ference
as an increase to the allowance for expected credit
losses on financial assets purchased with more than
insignificant credit deterioration since origination,
with a corresponding increase in the amortized cost
of the related loans.
•Requires inclusion of expected recoveries, limited to
the cumulative amount of prior writeof fs, when
estimating the allowance for credit losses for in
scope financial assets (including collateral-
dependent assets).
•Amends existing impairment guidance for AFS
securities to incorporate an allowance, which will
allow for reversals of credit impairments in the event
that the credit of an issuer improves.
•Requires a cumulative-ef fect adjustment to retained
earnings as of the beginning of the reporting period
of adoption.•Adopted January 1, 2020.
•Refer to Note 1 for further information.
Goodwill
Issued January
2017•Requires recognition of an impairment loss when the
estimated fair value of a reporting unit falls below its
carrying value.
•Eliminates the requirement that an impairment loss
be recognized only if the estimated implied fair value
of the goodwill is below its carrying value.•Adopted January 1, 2020.
•No impact upon adoption as the guidance was
applied prospectively .
•Refer to Note 15 for further information.
Reference Rate
Reform
 
Issued March
2020 and
updated January
2021•Provides optional expedients and exceptions to
current accounting guidance when financial
instruments, hedge accounting relationships, and
other transactions are amended due to reference
rate reform.
•Provides an election to account for certain contract
amendments related to reference rate reform as
modifications rather than extinguishments without
the requirement to assess the significance of the
amendments.
•Allows for changes in critical terms of a hedge
accounting relationship without automatic termination
of that relationship. Provides various practical
expedients and elections designed to allow hedge
accounting to continue uninterrupted during the
transition period.
•Provides a one-time election to transfer securities
out of the held-to-maturity classification if certain
criteria are met.
•The January 2021 update provides an election to
account for derivatives modified to change the rate
used for discounting, margining, or contract price
alignment (collectively “discounting transition”) as
modifications.•Issued and ef fective March 12, 2020. The January 7,
2021 update was ef fective when issued.
•The Firm elected to apply certain of the practical
expedients related to contract modifications and
hedge accounting relationships, and discounting
transition beginning in the third quarter of 2020. The
discounting transition election was applied
retrospectively . The main purpose of the practical
expedients is to ease the administrative burden of
accounting for contracts impacted by reference rate
reform, and these elections did not have a material
impact on the Consolidated Financial Statements.
156 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
FOR WARD-LOOKING ST ATEMENTS
From time to time, the Firm has made and will make
forward-looking statements. These statements can be
identified by the fact that they do not relate strictly to
historical or current facts. Forward-looking statements
often use words such as “anticipate,” “target,” “expect,”
“estimate,” “intend,” “plan,” “goal,” “believe,” or other
words of similar meaning. Forward-looking statements
provide JPMorgan Chase’s current expectations or
forecasts of future events, circumstances, results or
aspirations. JPMorgan Chase’s disclosures in this 2020
Form 10-K contain forward-looking statements within the
meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of
1995. The Firm also may make forward-looking
statements in its other documents filed or furnished with
the SEC. In addition, the Firm’s senior management may
make forward-looking statements orally to investors,
analysts, representatives of the media and others.
All forward-looking statements are, by their nature, subject
to risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond the
Firm’s control. JPMorgan Chase’s actual future results
may differ materially from those set forth in its forward-
looking statements. While there is no assurance that any
list of risks and uncertainties or risk factors is complete,
below are certain factors which could cause actual results
to differ from those in the forward-looking statements:
•Economic, financial, reputational and other impacts of
the COVID-19 pandemic;
•Local, regional and global business, economic and
political conditions and geopolitical events;
•Changes in laws and regulatory requirements,
including capital and liquidity requirements affecting
the Firm’s businesses, and the ability of the Firm to
address those requirements;
•Heightened regulatory and governmental oversight and
scrutiny of JPMorgan Chase’s business practices,
including dealings with retail customers;
•Changes in trade, monetary and fiscal policies and
laws;
•Changes in income tax laws and regulations;
•Securities and capital markets behavior, including
changes in market liquidity and volatility;
•Changes in investor sentiment or consumer spending
or savings behavior;
•Ability of the Firm to manage effectively its capital and
liquidity;
•Changes in credit ratings assigned to the Firm or its
subsidiaries;
•Damage to the Firm’s reputation;
•Ability of the Firm to appropriately address social,
environmental and sustainability concerns that may
arise, including from its business activities;
•Ability of the Firm to deal effectively with an economic
slowdown or other economic or market disruption,
including, but not limited to, in the interest rate
environment;
•Technology changes instituted by the Firm, its
counterparties or competitors;•The effectiveness of the Firm’s control agenda;
•Ability of the Firm to develop or discontinue products
and services, and the extent to which products or
services previously sold by the Firm require the Firm to
incur liabilities or absorb losses not contemplated at
their initiation or origination;
•Acceptance of the Firm’s new and existing products
and services by the marketplace and the ability of the
Firm to innovate and to increase market share;
•Ability of the Firm to attract and retain qualified and
diverse employees;
•Ability of the Firm to control expenses;
•Competitive pressures;
•Changes in the credit quality of the Firm’s clients,
customers and counterparties;
•Adequacy of the Firm’s risk management framework,
disclosure controls and procedures and internal control
over financial reporting;
•Adverse judicial or regulatory proceedings;
•Changes in applicable accounting policies, including
the introduction of new accounting standards;
•Ability of the Firm to determine accurate values of
certain assets and liabilities;
•Occurrence of natural or man-made disasters or
calamities, including health emergencies, the spread of
infectious diseases, pandemics or outbreaks of
hostilities, or the effects of climate change, and the
Firm’s ability to deal effectively with disruptions caused
by the foregoing;
•Ability of the Firm to maintain the security of its
financial, accounting, technology, data processing and
other operational systems and facilities;
•Ability of the Firm to withstand disruptions that may be
caused by any failure of its operational systems or
those of third parties;
•Ability of the Firm to effectively defend itself against
cyber attacks and other attempts by unauthorized
parties to access information of the Firm or its
customers or to disrupt the Firm’s systems; and
•The other risks and uncertainties detailed in Part I,
Item 1A: Risk Factors in JPMorgan Chase’s 2020 Form
10-K.
Any forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of
the Firm speak only as of the date they are made, and
JPMorgan Chase does not undertake to update any
forward-looking statements. The reader should, however,
consult any further disclosures of a forward-looking nature
the Firm may make in any subsequent Form 10-Ks,
Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Qs, or Current Reports on
Form 8-K.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 157
Management’ s report on internal control over financial reporting
Management of JPMorgan Chase & Co. (“JPMorgan
Chase” or the “Firm”) is responsible for establishing and
maintaining adequate internal control over financial
reporting. Internal control over financial reporting is a
process designed by, or under the supervision of, the
Firm’s principal executive and principal financial officers,
or persons performing similar functions, and effected by
JPMorgan Chase’s Board of Directors, management
and other personnel, to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the
preparation of financial statements for external purposes
in accordance with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America (“U.S. GAAP”).
JPMorgan Chase’s internal control over financial
reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1)
pertain to the maintenance of records, that, in
reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the Firm’s assets; (2)
provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with U.S. GAAP, and that
receipts and expenditures of the Firm are being made
only in accordance with authorizations of JPMorgan
Chase’s management and directors; and (3) provide
reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely
detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition
of the Firm’s assets that could have a material effect on
the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over
financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of
effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk
that controls may become inadequate because of
changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance
with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Management has completed an assessment of the
effectiveness of the Firm’s internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2020. In making the
assessment, management used the “Internal Control —
Integrated Framework” (“COSO 2013”) promulgated by
the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (“COSO”).Based upon the assessment performed, management
concluded that as of December 31, 2020, JPMorgan
Chase’s internal control over financial reporting was
effective based upon the COSO 2013 framework.
Additionally, based upon management’s assessment,
the Firm determined that there were no material
weaknesses in its internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2020.
The effectiveness of the Firm’s internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, has been
audited by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an
independent registered public accounting firm, as stated
in their report which appears herein.
 
James Dimon
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
 
 
Jennifer Piepszak
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
 
February 23, 2021
158 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Shar eholders of
JPMorgan Chase & Co.:
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal
Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated
balance sheets of JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its
subsidiaries (the “Firm”) as of December 31, 2020 and
2019, and the related consolidated statements of
income, comprehensive income, changes in
stockholders’ equity and cash flows for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2020, including
the related notes (collectively referred to as the
“consolidated financial statements”). We also have
audited the Firm’s internal control over financial reporting
as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established
in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued
by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements
referred to above present fairly, in all material respects,
the financial position of the Firm as of December 31,
2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its
cash flows for each of the three years in the period
ended December 31, 2020 in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of
America. Also in our opinion, the Firm maintained, in all
material respects, effective internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria
established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework
(2013) issued by the COSO.
Change in Accounting Principle
As discussed in Note 1 and Note 13 to the consolidated
financial statements, the Firm changed the manner in
which it accounts for credit losses on certain financial
instruments in 2020.
Basis for Opinions
The Firm’s management is responsible for these
consolidated financial statements, for maintaining
effective internal control over financial reporting, and for
its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control
over financial reporting, included in the accompanying
Management’s report on internal control over financial
reporting. Our responsibility is to express opinions on the
Firm’s consolidated financial statements and on the
Firm’s internal control over financial reporting based on
our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered
with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be
independent with respect to the Firm in accordance with
the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules
and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the
standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that
we plan andperform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about
whether the consolidated financial statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud,
and whether effective internal control over financial
reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements
included performing procedures to assess the risks of
material misstatement of the consolidated financial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis,
evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the
consolidated financial statements. Our audits also
included evaluating the accounting principles used and
significant estimates made by management, as well as
evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated
financial statements. Our audit of internal control over
financial reporting included obtaining an understanding
of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the
risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and
evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of
internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits
also included performing such other procedures as we
considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe
that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our
opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over
Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a
process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the
preparation of financial statements for external purposes
in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles. A company’s internal control over financial
reporting includes those policies and procedures that
(i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in
reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the
company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that
transactions are recorded as necessary to permit
preparation of financial statements in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, and that
receipts and expenditures of the company are being
made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the company; and
(iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention
or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company’s assets that could have a
material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over
financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of
effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in
conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the
policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP 300 Madison Avenue New York, NY 10017
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 159
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are
matters arising from the current period audit of the
consolidated financial statements that were
communicated or required to be communicated to the
audit committee and that: (i) relate to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated
financial statements and (ii) involved our especially
challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in
any way our opinion on the consolidated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by
communicating the critical audit matters below, providing
separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the
accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Allowance for Loan Losses – Portfolio-based component
of Wholesale Loan and Credit Card Loan Portfolios
As described in Note 13 to the consolidated financial
statements, the allowance for loan losses for the
portfolio-based component of the wholesale and credit
card loan portfolios was $23.4 billion on total portfolio-
based retained loans of $653.4 billion at December 31,
2020. The Firm’s allowance for loan losses represents
management’s estimate of expected credit losses over
the remaining expected life of the Firm's loan portfolios
and considers expected future changes in
macroeconomic conditions. The portfolio-based
component of the Firm’s allowance for loan losses for
the wholesale and credit card retained loan portfolios
begins with a quantitative calculation of expected credit
losses over the expected life of the loan by applying
credit loss factors to the estimated exposure at default.
The credit loss factors applied are determined based on
the weighted average of five internally developed
macroeconomic scenarios that take into consideration
the Firm's economic outlook as derived through forecast
macroeconomic variables, the most significant of which
are U.S. unemployment and U.S. real gross domestic
product. This quantitative calculation is further adjusted
to take into consideration model imprecision, emerging
risk assessments, trends and other subjective factors
that are not yet otherwise reflected in the credit loss
estimate.
The principal considerations for our determination that
performing procedures relating to the allowance for loan
losses for the portfolio-based component of the
wholesale and credit card loan portfolios is a critical
audit matter are (i) the significant judgment and
estimation by management in the forecast of
macroeconomic variables, specifically U.S.
unemployment and U.S. real gross domestic product, as
the Firm’s forecasts of economic conditions significantly
affect its estimate of expected credit losses at the
balance sheet date, (ii) the significant judgment and
estimation by management in determining the
quantitative calculation utilized in their credit loss
estimates and the adjustments to take into consideration
model imprecision, emerging risk assessments, trends
and other subjective factors that are not yet otherwise
reflected in the credit loss estimate, which both in turn
led to a high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity
and effort in performing procedures and in evaluating
audit evidence obtained relating to the creditloss estimates and the appropriateness of the
adjustments to the credit loss estimates, and (iii) the
audit effort involved professionals with specialized skill
and knowledge to assist in evaluating the audit
evidence.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures
and evaluating audit evidence in connection with
forming our overall opinion on the consolidated financial
statements. These procedures included testing the
effectiveness of controls relating to the Firm’s allowance
for loan losses, including controls over model validation
and generation of macroeconomic scenarios. These
procedures also included, among others, testing
management’s process for estimating the allowance for
loan losses, which involved (i) evaluating the
appropriateness of the models and methodologies used
in quantitative calculations; (ii) evaluating the
reasonableness of forecasts of U.S. unemployment and
U.S. real gross domestic product; (iii) testing the
completeness and accuracy of data used in the
estimate; and (iv) evaluating the reasonableness of
management’s adjustments to the quantitative output for
the impacts of model imprecision, emerging risk
assessments, trends and other subjective factors that
are not yet otherwise reflected in the credit loss
estimate. These procedures also included the use of
professionals with specialized skill and knowledge to
assist in evaluating the appropriateness of certain
models, methodologies and macroeconomic variables.
Fair Value of Certain Level 3 Financial Instruments
As described in Notes 2 and 3 to the consolidated
financial statements, the Firm carries $1.2 trillion of its
assets and $437.6 billion of its liabilities at fair value on
a recurring basis. Included in these balances are $10.3
billion of trading assets and $41.5 billion of liabilities
measured at fair value on a recurring basis, collectively
financial instruments, which are classified as level 3 as
they contain one or more inputs to valuation which are
unobservable and significant to their fair value
measurement. The Firm utilized internally developed
valuation models and unobservable inputs to estimate
fair value of the level 3 financial instruments. The
unobservable inputs used by management to estimate
the fair value of certain of these financial instruments
include forward equity prices, volatility relating to interest
rates and equity prices and correlation relating to
interest rates, equity prices, credit and foreign exchange
rates.
The principal considerations for our determination that
performing procedures relating to the fair value of
certain level 3 financial instruments is a critical audit
matter are (i) the significant judgment and estimation by
management in determining the inputs to estimate fair
value, which in turn led to a high degree of auditor
judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing
procedures related to the fair value of these financial
instruments, and (ii) the audit effort involved
professionals with specialized skill and knowledge to
assist in evaluating the audit evidence obtained from
these procedures.
160 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures
and evaluating audit evidence in connection with
forming our overall opinion on the consolidated financial
statements. These procedures included testing the
effectiveness of controls relating to the Firm’s processes
for determining fair value which include controls over
models, inputs, and data. These procedures also
included, among others, the involvement of
professionals with specialized skill and knowledge to
assist in developing an independent estimate of fair
value for a sample of these financial instruments.
Developing the independent estimate involved testing
the completeness and accuracy of data provided by
management, developing independent inputs and, as
appropriate, evaluating and utilizing management’s
aforementioned unobservable inputs; and comparing
management’s estimate to the independently developed
estimate of fair value.
February 23, 2021
We have served as the Firm’s auditor since 1965.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 161
Consolidated statements of income
Year ended December 31, (in millions, except per share data) 2020 2019 2018
Revenue
Investment banking fees $ 9,486 $ 7,501 $ 7,550 
Principal transactions 18,021 14,018 12,059 
Lending- and deposit-related fees 6,511 6,626 6,377 
Asset management, administration and commissions 18,177 16,908 16,793 
Investment securities gains/(losses) 802 258 (395)
Mortgage fees and related income 3,091 2,036 1,254 
Card income 4,435 5,076 4,743 
Other income 4,457 5,731 5,343 
Noninterest revenue 64,980 58,154 53,724 
Interest income 64,523 84,040 76,100 
Interest expense 9,960 26,795 21,041 
Net interest income 54,563 57,245 55,059 
Total net revenue 119,543 115,399 108,783 
Provision for credit losses 17,480 5,585 4,871 
Noninterest expense
Compensation expense 34,988 34,155 33,117 
Occupancy expense 4,449 4,322 3,952 
Technology, communications and equipment expense 10,338 9,821 8,802 
Professional and outside services 8,464 8,533 8,502 
Marketing 2,476 3,351 3,044 
Other expense 5,941 5,087 5,731 
Total noninterest expense 66,656 65,269 63,148 
Income before income tax expense 35,407 44,545 40,764 
Income tax expense 6,276 8,114 8,290 
Net income $ 29,131 $ 36,431 $ 32,474 
Net income applicable to common stockholders $ 27,410 $ 34,642 $ 30,709 
Net income per common share data
Basic earnings per share $ 8.89 $ 10.75 $ 9.04 
Diluted earnings per share 8.88 10.72 9.00 
Weighted-average basic shares 3,082.4 3,221.5 3,396.4 
Weighted-average diluted shares 3,087.4 3,230.4 3,414.0 
(a)In the first quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fees from asset management, administration and commissions to lending- and deposit-
related fees. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a reduction of
card income, with no effect on net income. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
The Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a)
(a)
(b)
(b)
162 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Consolidated statements of comprehensive income
Year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Net income $ 29,131 $ 36,431 $ 32,474 
Other comprehensive income/(loss), after–tax
Unrealized gains/(losses) on investment securities 4,123 2,855 (1,858)
Translation adjustments, net of hedges 234 20 20 
Fair value hedges 19 30 (107)
Cash flow hedges 2,320 172 (201)
Defined benefit pension and OPEB plans 212 964 (373)
DVA on fair value option elected liabilities (491) (965) 1,043 
Total other comprehensive income/(loss), after–tax 6,417 3,076 (1,476)
Comprehensive income $ 35,548 $ 39,507 $ 30,998 
The Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 163
Consolidated balance sheets
December 31, (in millions, except share data) 2020 2019
Assets
Cash and due from banks $ 24,874 $ 21,704 
Deposits with banks 502,735 241,927 
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under resale agreements (included $238,015 and $14,561 at fair
value) 296,284 249,157 
Securities borrowed (included $52,983 and $6,237 at fair value) 160,635 139,758 
Trading assets (included assets pledged of $130,645 and $111,522) 503,126 369,687 
Available-for-sale securities (amortized cost of $381,729 and $345,306; included assets pledged of $32,227 and
$10,325) 388,178 350,699 
Held-to-maturity securities (net of allowance for credit losses of $78) 201,821 47,540 
Investment securities, net of allowance for credit losses 589,999 398,239 
Loans (included $44,474 and $44,955 at fair value) 1,012,853 997,620 
Allowance for loan losses (28,328) (13,123)
Loans, net of allowance for loan losses 984,525 984,497 
Accrued interest and accounts receivable 90,503 72,861 
Premises and equipment 27,109 25,813 
Goodwill, MSRs and other intangible assets 53,428 53,341 
Other assets (included $13,827 and $12,676 at fair value and assets pledged of $3,739 and $3,349) 152,853 130,395 
Total assets $ 3,386,071 $ 2,687,379 
Liabilities
Deposits (included $14,484 and $28,589 at fair value) $ 2,144,257 $ 1,562,431 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under repurchase agreements (included $155,735 and
$549 at fair value) 215,209 183,675 
Short-term borrowings (included $16,893 and $5,920 at fair value) 45,208 40,920 
Trading liabilities 170,181 119,277 
Accounts payable and other liabilities (included $3,476 and $3,728 at fair value) 232,599 210,407 
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs (included $41 and $36 at fair value) 17,578 17,841 
Long-term debt (included $76,817 and $75,745 at fair value) 281,685 291,498 
Total liabilities 3,106,717 2,426,049 
Commitments and contingencies (refer to Notes 28, 29 and 30)
Stockholders’ equity
Preferred stock ($1 par value; authorized 200,000,000 shares: issued 3,006,250 and 2,699,250 shares) 30,063 26,993 
Common stock ($1 par value; authorized 9,000,000,000 shares; issued 4,104,933,895 shares) 4,105 4,105 
Additional paid-in capital 88,394 88,522 
Retained earnings 236,990 223,211 
Accumulated other comprehensive income 7,986 1,569 
Shares held in restricted stock units (“RSU”) trust, at cost (zero and 472,953 shares) — (21)
Treasury stock, at cost (1,055,499,435 and 1,020,912,567 shares) (88,184) (83,049)
Total stockholders’ equity 279,354 261,330 
Total liabilities and stockholders’ equity $ 3,386,071 $ 2,687,379 
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL accounting guidance. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other
assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)The following table presents information on assets and liabilities related to VIEs that are consolidated by the Firm at December 31, 2020 and
2019. The assets of the consolidated VIEs are used to settle the liabilities of those entities. The holders of the beneficial interests do not have
recourse to the general credit of JPMorgan Chase. The assets and liabilities in the table below include third-party assets and liabilities of
consolidated VIEs and exclude intercompany balances that eliminate in consolidation. Refer to Note 14 for a further discussion.
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Assets
Trading assets $ 1,934 $ 2,633 
Loans 37,619 42,931 
All other assets 681 881 
Total assets $ 40,234 $ 46,445 
Liabilities
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs $ 17,578 $ 17,841 
All other liabilities 233 447 
Total liabilities $ 17,811 $ 18,288 
The Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(b)
164 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Consolidated statements of changes in stockholders’ equity
Year ended December 31, (in millions, except per share data) 2020 2019 2018
Preferred stock
Balance at January 1 $ 26,993 $ 26,068 $ 26,068 
Issuance 4,500 5,000 1,696 
Redemption (1,430) (4,075) (1,696)
Balance at December 31 30,063 26,993 26,068 
Common stock
Balance at January 1 and December 31 4,105 4,105 4,105 
Additional paid-in capital
Balance at January 1 88,522 89,162 90,579 
Shares issued and commitments to issue common stock for employee share-based compensation
awards, and related tax effects (72) (591) (738)
Other (56) (49) (679)
Balance at December 31 88,394 88,522 89,162 
Retained earnings
Balance at January 1 223,211 199,202 177,676 
Cumulative effect of change in accounting principles (2,650) 62 (183)
Net income 29,131 36,431 32,474 
Dividends declared:
Preferred stock (1,583) (1,587) (1,551)
Common stock ($3.60, $3.40 and $2.72 per share for 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively) (11,119) (10,897) (9,214)
Balance at December 31 236,990 223,211 199,202 
Accumulated other comprehensive income
Balance at January 1 1,569 (1,507) (119)
Cumulative effect of change in accounting principles — — 88 
Other comprehensive income/(loss), after-tax 6,417 3,076 (1,476)
Balance at December 31 7,986 1,569 (1,507)
Shares held in RSU Trust, at cost
Balance at the beginning of the period (21) (21) (21)
Liquidation of RSU Trust 21 — — 
Balance at December 31 — (21) (21)
Treasury stock, at cost
Balance at January 1 (83,049) (60,494) (42,595)
Repurchase (6,397) (24,121) (19,983)
Reissuance 1,262 1,566 2,084 
Balance at December 31 (88,184) (83,049) (60,494)
Total stockholders’ equity $279,354 $261,330 $256,515 
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL accounting guidance. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
The Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 165
Consolidated statements of cash flows
Year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Operating activities
Net income $ 29,131 $ 36,431 $ 32,474 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by/(used in) operating activities:
Provision for credit losses 17,480 5,585 4,871 
Depreciation and amortization 8,614 8,368 7,791 
Deferred tax expense (3,981) 949 1,721 
Other 1,649 1,996 2,717 
Originations and purchases of loans held-for-sale (166,504) (169,289) (172,728)
Proceeds from sales, securitizations and paydowns of loans held-for-sale 175,490 171,415 163,747 
Net change in:
Trading assets (148,749) 6,551 (35,067)
Securities borrowed (20,734) (27,631) (6,861)
Accrued interest and accounts receivable (18,012) (78) (5,849)
Other assets (42,434) (17,570) (8,779)
Trading liabilities 77,198 (14,516) 18,290 
Accounts payable and other liabilities 7,827 (352) 14,630 
Other operating adjustments 3,115 2,233 (1,343)
Net cash provided by/(used in) operating activities (79,910) 4,092 15,614 
Investing activities
Net change in:
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under resale agreements (47,115) 72,396 (123,201)
Held-to-maturity securities:
Proceeds from paydowns and maturities 21,360 3,423 2,945 
Purchases (12,400) (13,427) (9,368)
Available-for-sale securities:
Proceeds from paydowns and maturities 57,675 52,200 37,401 
Proceeds from sales 149,758 70,181 46,067 
Purchases (397,145) (242,149) (95,091)
Proceeds from sales and securitizations of loans held-for-investment 23,559 62,095 29,826 
Other changes in loans, net (50,263) (51,743) (83,013)
All other investing activities, net (7,341) (5,035) (4,986)
Net cash (used in) investing activities (261,912) (52,059) (199,420)
Financing activities
Net change in:
Deposits 602,765 101,002 26,728 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under repurchase agreements 31,528 1,347 23,415 
Short-term borrowings 4,438 (28,561) 18,476 
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs 1,347 4,289 1,712 
Proceeds from long-term borrowings 78,686 61,085 71,662 
Payments of long-term borrowings (105,055) (69,610) (76,313)
Proceeds from issuance of preferred stock 4,500 5,000 1,696 
Redemption of preferred stock (1,430) (4,075) (1,696)
Treasury stock repurchased (6,517) (24,001) (19,983)
Dividends paid (12,690) (12,343) (10,109)
All other financing activities, net (927) (1,146) (1,430)
Net cash provided by financing activities 596,645 32,987 34,158 
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and due from banks and deposits with banks 9,155 (182) (2,863)
Net increase/(decrease) in cash and due from banks and deposits with banks 263,978 (15,162) (152,511)
Cash and due from banks and deposits with banks at the beginning of the period 263,631 278,793 431,304 
Cash and due from banks and deposits with banks at the end of the period $527,609 $263,631 $278,793 
Cash interest paid $ 13,077 $ 29,918 $ 21,152 
Cash income taxes paid, net 7,661 5,624 3,542 
(a) In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other
assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
The Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
166 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 1 – Basis of presentation
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (“JPMorgan Chase” or the
“Firm”), a financial holding company incorporated under
Delaware law in 1968, is a leading global financial
services firm in the U.S., with operations worldwide. The
Firm is a leader in investment banking, financial services
for consumers and small businesses, commercial
banking, financial transaction processing and asset
management. Refer to Note 32 for a further discussion
of the Firm’s business segments.
The accounting and financial reporting policies of
JPMorgan Chase and its subsidiaries conform to U.S.
GAAP. Additionally, where applicable, the policies
conform to the accounting and reporting guidelines
prescribed by regulatory authorities.
Certain amounts reported in prior periods have been
reclassified to conform with the current presentation.
Consolidation
The Consolidated Financial Statements include the
accounts of JPMorgan Chase and other entities in which
the Firm has a controlling financial interest. All material
intercompany balances and transactions have been
eliminated.
Assets held for clients in an agency or fiduciary capacity
by the Firm are not assets of JPMorgan Chase and are
not included on the Consolidated balance sheets.
The Firm determines whether it has a controlling
financial interest in an entity by first evaluating whether
the entity is a voting interest entity or a variable interest
entity.
Voting interest entities
Voting interest entities are entities that have sufficient
equity and provide the equity investors voting rights that
enable them to make significant decisions relating to the
entity’s operations. For these types of entities, the Firm’s
determination of whether it has a controlling interest is
primarily based on the amount of voting equity interests
held. Entities in which the Firm has a controlling
financial interest, through ownership of the majority of
the entities’ voting equity interests, or through other
contractual rights that give the Firm control, are
consolidated by the Firm.
Investments in companies in which the Firm has
significant influence over operating and financing
decisions (but does not own a majority of the voting
equity interests) are accounted for (i) in accordance with
the equity method of accounting (which requires the
Firm to recognize its proportionate share of the entity’s
net earnings), or (ii) at fair value if the fair value option
was elected. These investments are generally included
in other assets, with income or loss included in
noninterest revenue.
Certain Firm-sponsored asset management funds are
structured as limited partnerships or limited liability
companies. For many of these entities, the Firm is the
general partner or managing member, but the non-
affiliated partners or members have the ability to remove
the Firm as the general partner or managing memberwithout cause (i.e., kick-out rights), based on a simple
majority vote, or the non-affiliated partners or members
have rights to participate in important decisions.
Accordingly, the Firm does not consolidate these voting
interest entities. However, in the limited cases where the
non-managing partners or members do not have
substantive kick-out or participating rights, the Firm
evaluates the funds as VIEs and consolidates the funds
if the Firm is the general partner or managing member
and has a potentially significant interest.
The Firm’s investment companies and asset
management funds have investments in both publicly-
held and privately-held entities, including investments in
buyouts, growth equity and venture opportunities. These
investments are accounted for under investment
company guidelines and, accordingly, irrespective of the
percentage of equity ownership interests held, are
carried on the Consolidated balance sheets at fair value,
and are recorded in other assets, with income or loss
included in noninterest revenue. If consolidated, the
Firm retains the accounting under such specialized
investment company guidelines.
Variable interest entities
VIEs are entities that, by design, either (1) lack sufficient
equity to permit the entity to finance its activities without
additional subordinated financial support from other
parties, or (2) have equity investors that do not have the
ability to make significant decisions relating to the
entity’s operations through voting rights, or do not have
the obligation to absorb the expected losses, or do not
have the right to receive the residual returns of the
entity.
The most common type of VIE is an SPE. SPEs are
commonly used in securitization transactions in order to
isolate certain assets and distribute the cash flows from
those assets to investors. The basic SPE structure
involves a company selling assets to the SPE; the SPE
funds the purchase of those assets by issuing securities
to investors. The legal documents that govern the
transaction specify how the cash earned on the assets
must be allocated to the SPE’s investors and other
parties that have rights to those cash flows. SPEs are
generally structured to insulate investors from claims on
the SPE’s assets by creditors of other entities, including
the creditors of the seller of the assets.
The primary beneficiary of a VIE (i.e., the party that has
a controlling financial interest) is required to consolidate
the assets and liabilities of the VIE. The primary
beneficiary is the party that has both (1) the power to
direct the activities of the VIE that most significantly
impact the VIE’s economic performance; and (2)
through its interests in the VIE, the obligation to absorb
losses or the right to receive benefits from the VIE that
could potentially be significant to the VIE.
To assess whether the Firm has the power to direct the
activities of a VIE that most significantly impact the VIE’s
economic performance, the Firm considers all the facts
and
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 167
Notes to consolidated financial statements
circumstances, including its role in establishing the VIE
and its ongoing rights and responsibilities. This
assessment includes, first, identifying the activities that
most significantly impact the VIE’s economic
performance; and second, identifying which party, if any,
has power over those activities. In general, the parties
that make the most significant decisions affecting the
VIE (such as asset managers, collateral managers,
servicers, or owners of call options or liquidation rights
over the VIE’s assets) or have the right to unilaterally
remove those decision-makers are deemed to have the
power to direct the activities of a VIE.
To assess whether the Firm has the obligation to absorb
losses of the VIE or the right to receive benefits from the
VIE that could potentially be significant to the VIE, the
Firm considers all of its economic interests, including
debt and equity investments, servicing fees, and
derivatives or other arrangements deemed to be
variable interests in the VIE. This assessment requires
that the Firm apply judgment in determining whether
these interests, in the aggregate, are considered
potentially significant to the VIE. Factors considered in
assessing significance include: the design of the VIE,
including its capitalization structure; subordination of
interests; payment priority; relative share of interests
held across various classes within the VIE’s capital
structure; and the reasons why the interests are held by
the Firm.
The Firm performs on-going reassessments of: (1)
whether entities previously evaluated under the majority
voting-interest framework have become VIEs, based on
certain events, and are therefore subject to the VIE
consolidation framework; and (2) whether changes in
the facts and circumstances regarding the Firm’s
involvement with a VIE cause the Firm’s consolidation
conclusion to change.
Refer to Note 14 for further discussion of the Firm’s
VIEs.
Revenue recognition
Interest income
The Firm recognizes interest income on loans, debt
securities, and other debt instruments, generally on a
level-yield basis, based on the underlying contractual
rate. Refer to Note 7 for further discussion of interest
income.
Revenue from contracts with customers
JPMorgan Chase recognizes noninterest revenue from
certain contracts with customers, in investment banking
fees, deposit-related fees, asset management
administration and commissions, and components of
card income, when the Firm’s related performance
obligations are satisfied. Refer to Note 6 for further
discussion of the Firm’s revenue from contracts with
customers.
Principal transactions revenue
JPMorgan Chase carries a portion of its assets and
liabilities at fair value. Changes in fair value are reported
primarily in principal transactions revenue. Refer to
Notes 2 and 3 for further discussion of fair value
measurement. Refer to Note 6 for further discussion of
principal transactions revenue.Use of estimates in the preparation of consolidated
financial statements
The preparation of the Consolidated Financial
Statements requires management to make estimates
and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of
assets and liabilities, revenue and expense, and
disclosures of contingent assets and liabilities. Actual
results could be different from these estimates.
Foreign currency translation
JPMorgan Chase revalues assets, liabilities, revenue
and expense denominated in non-U.S. currencies into
U.S. dollars using applicable exchange rates.
Gains and losses relating to translating functional
currency financial statements for U.S. reporting are
included in the Consolidated statements of
comprehensive income. Gains and losses relating to
nonfunctional currency transactions, including non-U.S.
operations where the functional currency is the U.S.
dollar, are reported in the Consolidated statements of
income.
Offsetting assets and liabilities
U.S. GAAP permits entities to present derivative
receivables and derivative payables with the same
counterparty and the related cash collateral receivables
and payables on a net basis on the Consolidated
balance sheets when a legally enforceable master
netting agreement exists. U.S. GAAP also permits
securities sold and purchased under repurchase
agreements and securities borrowed or loaned under
securities loan agreements to be presented net when
specified conditions are met, including the existence of a
legally enforceable master netting agreement. The Firm
has elected to net such balances when the specified
conditions are met.
The Firm uses master netting agreements to mitigate
counterparty credit risk in certain transactions, including
derivative contracts, resale, repurchase, securities
borrowed and securities loaned agreements. A master
netting agreement is a single agreement with a
counterparty that permits multiple transactions governed
by that agreement to be terminated or accelerated and
settled through a single payment in a single currency in
the event of a default (e.g., bankruptcy, failure to make a
required payment or securities transfer or deliver
collateral or margin when due). Upon the exercise of
derivatives termination rights by the non-defaulting party
(i) all transactions are terminated, (ii) all transactions are
valued and the positive values of “in the money”
transactions are netted against the negative values of
“out of the money” transactions and (iii) the only
remaining payment obligation is of one of the parties to
pay the netted termination amount. Upon exercise of
default rights under repurchase agreements and
securities loan agreements in general (i) all transactions
are terminated and accelerated, (ii) all values of
securities or cash held or to be delivered are calculated,
and all such sums are netted against each other and (iii)
the only remaining payment obligation is of one of the
parties to pay the netted termination amount.
168 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Typical master netting agreements for these types of
transactions also often contain a collateral/margin
agreement that provides for a security interest in, or title
transfer of, securities or cash collateral/margin to the
party that has the right to demand margin (the
“demanding party”). The collateral/margin agreement
typically requires a party to transfer collateral/margin to
the demanding party with a value equal to the amount of
the margin deficit on a net basis across all transactions
governed by the master netting agreement, less any
threshold. The collateral/margin agreement grants to the
demanding party, upon default by the counterparty, the
right to set-off any amounts payable by the counterparty
against any posted collateral or the cash equivalent of
any posted collateral/margin. It also grants to the
demanding party the right to liquidate collateral/margin
and to apply the proceeds to an amount payable by the
counterparty.
Refer to Note 5 for further discussion of the Firm’s
derivative instruments. Refer to Note 11 for further
discussion of the Firm’s securities financing
agreements.
Statements of cash flows
For JPMorgan Chase’s Consolidated statements of cash
flows, cash is defined as those amounts included in
cash and due from banks and deposits with banks.
Accounting standard adopted January 1, 2020
Financial Instruments – Credit Losses (“CECL”)
The adoption of this guidance established a single
allowance framework for all financial assets measured
at amortized cost and certain off-balance sheet credit
exposures. This framework requires that management’s
estimate reflects credit losses over the instrument’s
remaining expected life and considers expected future
changes in macroeconomic conditions. Refer to Note 13
for further information. Prior to the adoption of the CECL
accounting guidance, the Firm’s allowance for credit
losses represented management’s estimate of probable
credit losses inherent in the Firm’s retained loan
portfolios and certain lending-related commitments.The following table presents the impacts to the
allowance for credit losses and retained earnings upon
adoption of this guidance on January 1, 2020:
(in billions)December
31, 2019CECL
adoption
impactJanuary 1,
2020
Allowance for credit losses
Consumer, excluding credit
card $ 2.6 $ 0.4 $ 3.0 
Credit card 5.7 5.5 11.2 
Wholesale 6.0 (1.6) 4.4 
Firmwide $ 14.3 $ 4.3 $ 18.6 
Retained earnings
Firmwide allowance increase $ 4.3 
Balance sheet
reclassification (0.8)
Total pre-tax impact 3.5 
Tax effect (0.8)
Decrease to retained
earnings $ 2.7 
(a)In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the Firm reclassified
risk-rated business banking and auto dealer loans and lending-
related commitments held in CCB from the consumer, excluding
credit card portfolio segment to the wholesale portfolio segment, to
align with the methodology applied when determining the
allowance. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform
with the current presentation. Accordingly, $0.6 billion of the
allowance for credit losses at December 31, 2019 and $(0.2) billion
of the CECL adoption impact were reclassified.
(b)Represents the recognition of the nonaccretable difference on
purchased credit deteriorated loans and the Firm's election to
recognize the reserve for uncollectible accrued interest on credit
card loans in the allowance, both of which resulted in a
corresponding increase to loans.
Securities Financing Agreements
As permitted by the guidance, the Firm elected the fair
value option for certain securities financing agreements.
The difference between their carrying amount and fair
value was immaterial and was recorded as part of the
Firm’s cumulative-effect adjustment. Refer to Note 11
for further information.
Investment securities
Upon adoption, HTM securities are presented net of an
allowance for credit losses. The guidance also amended
the
previous other-than-temporary impairment (“OTTI”)
model
for AFS securities to incorporate an allowance. Refer to
Note 10 for further information.
Credit quality disclosures
As a result of the adoption of this guidance, the Firm
expanded credit quality disclosures for financial assets
measured at amortized cost particularly within the
retained
loan portfolios. Refer to Note 12 for further information.
PCD loans
The adoption resulted in a change in the accounting for
PCI
loans, which are considered purchased credit
deteriorated
(“PCD”) loans under CECL. Upon adoption, the Firm
recognized the nonaccretable difference on PCD loans
in
the allowance, which resulted in a corresponding
increase(a)
(a)
(b)
increase
to loans. PCD loans are subject to the Firm’s nonaccrual
and
charge-off policies and are now reported in the
consumer,
excluding credit card portfolio’s residential real estate
loan
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 169
Notes to consolidated financial statements
class. Refer to Note 12 for further information.
Changes in credit portfolio segments and classes
In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the Firm
reclassified risk-rated loans and lending-related
commitments from the consumer excluding credit card
portfolio segment to the wholesale portfolio segment, to
align with the methodology applied when determining
the allowance. The Firm also revised its loan classes.
Prior- period amounts have been revised to conform
with the current presentation. Refer to Note 12 for
further information.
Accrued interest receivables
As permitted by the guidance, the Firm elected to
continue
classifying accrued interest on loans, including accrued
but
unbilled interest on credit card loans, and investment
securities in accrued interest and accounts receivables
on
the Consolidated balance sheets. For credit card loans,
accrued interest once billed is then recognized in the
loan
balances, with the related allowance recorded in the
allowance for credit losses. Changes in the allowance
for
credit losses on accrued interest on credit card loans
are
recognized in the provision for credit losses and charge-
offs
are recognized by reversing interest income. For other
loans and securities, the Firm generally does not
recognize
an allowance for credit losses on accrued interest
receivables, consistent with its policy to write them off
no
later than 90 days past due by reversing interest
income.
Capital transition provisions
As permitted under the U.S. capital rules issued by the
federal banking agencies in 2019, the Firm initially
elected to phase-in the January 1, 2020 (“day 1”) CECL
adoption impact to retained earnings of $2.7 billion to
CET1 capital, at 25% per year in each of 2020 to 2023.
As part of their response to the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic, on March 31, 2020, the federal banking
agencies issued an interim final rule (issued as final on
August 26, 2020) that provided the option to delay the
effects of CECL on regulatory capital for two years,
followed by a three-year transition period (“CECL capital
transition provisions”). Refer to Note 27 for further
information.
Accounting standards adopted January 1, 2018
Effective January 1, 2018, the Firm adopted several
accounting standards resulting in a net decrease of
$183 million to retained earnings and a net increase of
$88 million to AOCI. The adoption of the recognition and
measurement guidance resulted in $505 million of fair
value gains in the first quarter of 2018, recorded in total
net revenue, on certain equity investments that were
previously held at cost.Significant accounting policies
The following table identifies JPMorgan Chase’s other
significant accounting policies and the Note and page
where a detailed description of each policy can be
found.
Fair value measurement Note 2 page 171
Fair value option Note 3 page 192
Derivative instruments Note 5 page 198
Noninterest revenue and noninterest
expense Note 6 page 212
Interest income and Interest expense Note 7 page 215
Pension and other postretirement
employee benefit plans Note 8 page 216
Employee share-based incentives Note 9 page 221
Investment securities Note 10 page 223
Securities financing activities Note 11 page 229
Loans Note 12 page 232
Allowance for credit losses Note 13 page 248
Variable interest entities Note 14 page 253
Goodwill and Mortgage servicing rights Note 15 page 261
Premises and equipment Note 16 page 265
Leases Note 18 page 266
Long-term debt Note 20 page 269
Earnings per share Note 23 page 274
Income taxes Note 25 page 277
Off–balance sheet lending-related
financial instruments, guarantees and
other commitments Note 28 page 283
Litigation Note 30 page 290
170 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 2 – Fair value measurement
JPMorgan Chase carries a portion of its assets and
liabilities at fair value. These assets and liabilities are
predominantly carried at fair value on a recurring basis
(i.e., assets and liabilities that are measured and
reported at fair value on the Firm’s Consolidated
balance sheets). Certain assets, liabilities and unfunded
lending-related commitments are measured at fair value
on a nonrecurring basis; that is, they are not measured
at fair value on an ongoing basis but are subject to fair
value adjustments only in certain circumstances (for
example, when there is evidence of impairment).
Fair value is defined as the price that would be received
to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly
transaction between market participants at the
measurement date. Fair value is based on quoted
market prices or inputs, where available. If prices or
quotes are not available, fair value is based on valuation
models and other valuation techniques that consider
relevant transaction characteristics (such as maturity)
and use, as inputs, observable or unobservable market
parameters, including yield curves, interest rates,
volatilities, prices (such as commodity, equity or debt
prices), correlations, foreign exchange rates and credit
curves. Valuation adjustments may be made to ensure
that financial instruments are recorded at fair value, as
described below.
The level of precision in estimating unobservable market
inputs or other factors can affect the amount of gain or
loss recorded for a particular position. Furthermore,
while the Firm believes its valuation methods are
appropriate and consistent with those of other market
participants, the methods and assumptions used reflect
management judgment and may vary across the Firm’s
businesses and portfolios.
The Firm uses various methodologies and assumptions
in the determination of fair value. The use of different
methodologies or assumptions by other market
participants compared with those used by the Firm could
result in the Firm deriving a different estimate of fair
value at the reporting date.
Valuation process
Risk-taking functions are responsible for providing fair
value estimates for assets and liabilities carried on the
Consolidated balance sheets at fair value. The Firm’s
VCG, which is part of the Firm’s Finance function and
independent of the risk-taking functions, is responsible
for verifying these estimates and determining any fair
value adjustments that may be required to ensure that
the Firm’s positions are recorded at fair value. The VGF
is composed of senior finance and risk executives and is
responsible for overseeing the management of risks
arising from valuation activities conducted across the
Firm. The Firmwide VGF is chaired by the Firmwide
head of the VCG (under the direction of the Firm’s
Controller), and includes sub-forums covering the CIB,
CCB, CB, AWM and certain corporate functions
including Treasury and CIO. 
Price verification process
The VCG verifies fair value estimates provided by the
risk-taking functions by leveraging independently
derived prices, valuation inputs and other market data,
where available. Where independent prices or inputs are
not available, the VCG performs additional review to
ensure the reasonableness of the estimates. The
additional review may include evaluating the limited
market activity including client unwinds, benchmarking
valuation inputs to those used for similar instruments,
decomposing the valuation of structured instruments
into individual components, comparing expected to
actual cash flows, reviewing profit and loss trends, and
reviewing trends in collateral valuation. There are also
additional levels of management review for more
significant or complex positions.
The VCG determines any valuation adjustments that
may be required to the estimates provided by the risk-
taking functions. No adjustments to quoted prices are
applied for instruments classified within level 1 of the fair
value hierarchy (refer to the discussion below for further
information on the fair value hierarchy). For other
positions, judgment is required to assess the need for
valuation adjustments to appropriately reflect liquidity
considerations, unobservable parameters, and, for
certain portfolios that meet specified criteria, the size of
the net open risk position. The determination of such
adjustments follows a consistent framework across the
Firm:
•Liquidity valuation adjustments are considered where
an observable external price or valuation parameter
exists but is of lower reliability, potentially due to
lower market activity. Liquidity valuation adjustments
are made based on current market conditions.
Factors that may be considered in determining the
liquidity adjustment include analysis of: (1) the
estimated bid-offer spread for the instrument being
traded; (2) alternative pricing points for similar
instruments in active markets; and (3) the range of
reasonable values that the price or parameter could
take.
•The Firm manages certain portfolios of financial
instruments on the basis of net open risk exposure
and, as permitted by U.S. GAAP, has elected to
estimate the fair value of such portfolios on the basis
of a transfer of the entire net open risk position in an
orderly transaction. Where this is the case, valuation
adjustments may be necessary to reflect the cost of
exiting a larger-than-normal market-size net open
risk position. Where applied, such adjustments are
based on factors that a relevant market participant
would consider in the transfer of the net open risk
position, including the size of the adverse market
move that is likely to occur during the period required
to reduce the net open risk position to a normal
market-size.
•Uncertainty adjustments related to unobservable
parameters may be made when positions are valued
using prices or input parameters to valuation models
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 171
Notes to consolidated financial statements
that are unobservable due to a lack of market activity
or because they cannot be implied from observable
market data. Such prices or parameters must be
estimated and are, therefore, subject to management
judgment. Adjustments are made to reflect the
uncertainty inherent in the resulting valuation
estimate.
•Where appropriate, the Firm also applies
adjustments to its estimates of fair value in order to
appropriately reflect counterparty credit quality
(CVA), the Firm’s own creditworthiness (DVA) and
the impact of funding (FVA), using a consistent
framework across the Firm. Refer to Credit and
funding adjustments on page 188 of this Note for
more information on such adjustments.
Valuation model review and approval
If prices or quotes are not available for an instrument or
a similar instrument, fair value is generally determined
using valuation models that consider relevant
transaction terms such as maturity and use as inputs
market-based or independently sourced parameters.
Where this is the case the price verification process
described above is applied to the inputs in those
models.
Under the Firm’s Estimations and Model Risk
Management Policy, the MRGR reviews and approves
new models, as well as material changes to existing
models, prior to implementation in the operating
environment. In certain circumstances exceptions may
be granted to the Firm’s policy to allow a model to be
used prior to review or approval. The MRGR may also
require the user to take appropriate actions to mitigate
the model risk if it is to be used in the interim. These
actions will depend on the model and may include, for
example, limitation of trading activity.
Valuation hierarchy
A three-level valuation hierarchy has been established
under U.S. GAAP for disclosure of fair value
measurements. The valuation hierarchy is based on the
observability of inputs to the valuation of an asset or
liability as of the measurement date. The three levels
are defined as follows.
•Level 1 – inputs to the valuation methodology are
quoted prices (unadjusted) for identical assets or
liabilities in active markets.
•Level 2 – inputs to the valuation methodology include
quoted prices for similar assets and liabilities in
active markets, and inputs that are observable for the
asset or liability, either directly or indirectly, for
substantially the full term of the financial instrument.
•Level 3 – one or more inputs to the valuation
methodology are unobservable and significant to the
fair value measurement.
A financial instrument’s categorization within the
valuation hierarchy is based on the lowest level of input
that is significant to the fair value measurement.
172 JPMorganChase&Co/2020Form10-K
172 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10K
The following table describes the valuation methodologies generally used by the Firm to measure its significant
products/instruments at fair value, including the general classification of such instruments pursuant to the valuation
hierarchy.
Product/instrument  Valuation methodologyClassifications in the
valuation hierarchy
Securities financing
agreementsValuations are based on discounted cash flows, which consider: Predominantly level 2
• Derivative features: refer to the discussion of derivatives below
for further information.
• Market rates for the respective maturity
• Collateral characteristics
Loans and lending-related commitments — wholesale
Loans carried at fair value
(trading loans and non-trading
loans) and associated
lending-related commitmentsWhere observable market data is available, valuations are based
on:Level 2 or 3
• Observed market prices (circumstances are infrequent)
• Relevant broker quotes
• Observed market prices for similar instruments
Where observable market data is unavailable or limited, valuations
are based on discounted cash flows, which consider the following:
• Credit spreads derived from the cost of CDS; or benchmark
credit curves developed by the Firm, by industry and credit
rating
• Prepayment speed
• Collateral characteristics
Loans — consumer
Loans carried at fair value —
conforming residential
mortgage loans expected to
be soldFair value is based on observable prices for mortgage-backed
securities with similar collateral and incorporates adjustments to
these prices to account for dif ferences between the securities and
the value of the underlying loans, which include credit
characteristics, portfolio composition, and liquidity .Predominantly level 2
Investment and trading
securitiesQuoted market prices Level 1
In the absence of quoted market prices, securities are valued
based on:Level 2 or 3
• Observable market prices for similar securities
•  Relevant broker quotes
•  Discounted cash flows
In addition, the following inputs to discounted cash flows are used
for the following products:
Mortgage- and asset-backed securities specific inputs:
•  Collateral characteristics
• Deal-specific payment and loss allocations
• Current market assumptions related to yield, prepayment
speed, conditional default rates and loss severity
Collateralized loan obligations (“CLOs”) specific inputs:
•  Collateral characteristics
•  Deal-specific payment and loss allocations
•Expected prepayment speed, conditional default rates, loss
severity
•  Credit spreads
• Credit rating data
Physical commodities Valued using observable market prices or data. Level 1 or 2
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 173
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Product/instrument Valuation methodologyClassifications in the
valuation hierarchy
Derivatives Exchange-traded derivatives that are actively traded and valued
using the exchange price.Level 1
Derivatives that are valued using models such as the Black-Scholes
option pricing model, simulation models, or a combination of models
that may use observable or unobservable valuation inputs as well as
considering the contractual terms. 
The key valuation inputs used will depend on the type of derivative
and the nature of the underlying instruments and may include equity
prices, commodity prices, interest rate yield curves, foreign exchange
rates, volatilities, correlations, CDS spreads and recovery rates.
 Additionally , the credit quality of the counterparty and of the Firm as
well as market funding levels may also be considered.Level 2 or 3
In addition, specific inputs used for derivatives that are valued based
on models with significant unobservable inputs are as follows:
Structured credit derivatives specific inputs include:
•   CDS spreads and recovery rates
•   Credit correlation between the underlying debt instruments
Equity option specific inputs include:
•   Forward equity price
•   Equity volatility
•   Equity correlation
•   Equity-FX correlation
•   Equity-IR correlation
Interest rate and FX exotic options specific inputs include:
•   Interest rate volatility
•   Interest rate spread volatility
•   Interest rate correlation
•   Foreign exchange correlation
•   Interest rate-FX correlation
Commodity derivatives specific inputs include:
•   Commodity volatility
•   Forward commodity price
•   Commodity correlation
Additionally , adjustments are made to reflect counterparty credit
quality (CV A) and the impact of funding (FV A). Refer to page 188 of
this Note.
Mortgage servicing rights Refer to Mortgage servicing rights in Note 15. Level 3
Private equity direct
investmentsFair value is estimated using all available information; the range of
potential inputs include:Level 2 or 3
• Transaction prices
• Trading multiples of comparable public companies
• Operating performance of the underlying portfolio company
• Adjustments as required, since comparable public companies are
not identical to the company being valued, and for company-
specific issues and lack of liquidity .
• Additional available inputs relevant to the investment.
Fund investments (e.g.,
mutual/collective investment
funds, private equity funds,
hedge funds, and real estate
funds)Net asset value
• NAV is supported by the ability to redeem and purchase at the
NAV level.Level 1
• Adjustments to the NA V as required, for restrictions on redemption
(e.g., lock-up periods or withdrawal limitations) or where
observable activity is limited.Level 2 or 3
Beneficial interests issued by
consolidated VIEsValued using observable market information, where available. Level 2 or 3
In the absence of observable market information, valuations are
based on the fair value of the underlying assets held by the VIE.
(a)Excludes certain investments that are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share (or its equivalent) as a practical expedient.(a)
174 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Product/instrument Valuation methodologyClassification in the
valuation hierarchy
Structured notes (included in
deposits, short-term
borrowings and long-term
debt)• Valuations are based on discounted cash flow analyses that
consider the embedded derivative and the terms and payment
structure of the note.
 
• The embedded derivative features are considered using models
such as the Black-Scholes option pricing model, simulation
models, or a combination of models that may use observable or
unobservable valuation inputs, depending on the embedded
derivative. The specific inputs used vary according to the nature
of the embedded derivative features, as described in the
discussion above regarding derivatives valuation. Adjustments
are then made to this base valuation to reflect the Firm’ s own
credit risk (DV A). Refer to page 188 of this Note.Level 2 or 3
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 175
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The following table presents the assets and liabilities reported at fair value as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, by
major product category and fair value hierarchy.
Assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis
Fair value hierarchy
December 31, 2020 (in millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Derivative netting
adjustments Total fair value
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under resale agreements $ — $ 238,015  $ — $ — $ 238,015  
Securities borrowed — 52,983  — — 52,983  
Trading assets:
Debt instruments:
Mortgage-backed securities:
U.S. GSEs and government agencies — 68,395  449 — 68,844  
Residential – nonagency — 2,138  28 — 2,166  
Commercial – nonagency — 1,327  3 — 1,330  
Total mortgage-backed securities — 71,860  480 — 72,340  
U.S. T reasury , GSEs and government agencies 104,263  10,996  — — 115,259  
Obligations of U.S. states and municipalities — 7,184  8 — 7,192  
Certificates of deposit, bankers’ acceptances and commercial paper — 1,230  — — 1,230  
Non-U.S. government debt securities 26,772  40,671  182 — 67,625  
Corporate debt securities — 21,017  507 — 21,524  
Loans — 6,101  893 — 6,994  
Asset-backed securities — 2,304  28 — 2,332  
Total debt instruments 131,035  161,363  2,098  — 294,496  
Equity securities 97,035  2,652  179 — 99,866  
Physical commodities 6,382  5,189  — — 11,571  
Other — 17,165  346 — 17,511  
Total debt and equity instruments 234,452  186,369  2,623  — 423,444  
Derivative receivables:
Interest rate 2,318  386,865  2,307  (355,765 ) 35,725  
Credit — 12,879  624 (12,823 ) 680 
Foreign exchange 146 205,127  987 (190,479 ) 15,781  
Equity — 71,279  3,519  (54,125 ) 20,673  
Commodity — 21,272  231 (14,732 ) 6,771  
Total derivative receivables 2,464  697,422  7,668  (627,924 ) 79,630  
Total trading assets 236,916  883,791  10,291  (627,924 ) 503,074  
Available-for-sale securities:
Mortgage-backed securities:
U.S. GSEs and government agencies 21,018  92,283  — — 113,301  
Residential – nonagency — 10,233  — — 10,233  
Commercial – nonagency — 2,856  — — 2,856  
Total mortgage-backed securities 21,018  105,372  — — 126,390  
U.S. T reasury and government agencies 201,951  — — — 201,951  
Obligations of U.S. states and municipalities — 20,396  — — 20,396  
Certificates of deposit — — — — — 
Non-U.S. government debt securities 13,135  9,793  — — 22,928  
Corporate debt securities — 216 — — 216 
Asset-backed securities:
Collateralized loan obligations — 10,048  — — 10,048  
Other — 6,249  — — 6,249  
Total available-for-sale securities 236,104  152,074  — — 388,178  
Loans — 42,169  2,305  — 44,474  
Mortgage servicing rights — — 3,276  — 3,276  
Other assets 8,110  4,561  538 — 13,209  
Total assets measured at fair value on a recurring basis $ 481,130  $ 1,373,593  $ 16,410  $ (627,924 )$ 1,243,209  
Deposits $ — $ 11,571  $ 2,913  $ — $ 14,484  
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under repurchase agreements — 155,735  — — 155,735  
Short-term borrowings — 14,473  2,420  — 16,893  
Trading liabilities:
Debt and equity instruments 82,669  16,838  51 — 99,558  
Derivative payables:
Interest rate 2,496  349,082  2,049  (340,615 ) 13,012  
Credit — 14,344  848 (13,197 ) 1,995  
Foreign exchange 132 214,373  1,421  (194,493 ) 21,433  
Equity — 74,032  7,381  (55,515 ) 25,898  
Commodity — 21,767  962 (14,444 ) 8,285  
Total derivative payables 2,628  673,598  12,661  (618,264 ) 70,623  
Total trading liabilities 85,297  690,436  12,712  (618,264 ) 170,181  
Accounts payable and other liabilities 2,895  513 68 — 3,476  
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs — 41 — — 41 
Long-term debt — 53,420  23,397  — 76,817  
Total liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis $ 88,192  $ 926,189  $ 41,510  $ (618,264 )$ 437,627  (g)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(a)
(b)(f)
(b)(e)
(d)
176 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Fair value hierarchy
December 31, 2019 (in millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Derivative netting
adjustments Total fair value
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under resale agreements $ — $ 14,561  $ — $ — $ 14,561  
Securities borrowed — 6,237  — — 6,237  
Trading assets: — 
Debt instruments: — 
Mortgage-backed securities: — 
U.S. GSEs and government agencies — 44,510  797 — 45,307  
Residential – nonagency — 1,977  23 — 2,000  
Commercial – nonagency — 1,486  4 — 1,490  
Total mortgage-backed securities — 47,973  824 — 48,797  
U.S. T reasury , GSEs and government agencies 78,289  10,295  — — 88,584  
Obligations of U.S. states and municipalities — 6,468  10 — 6,478  
Certificates of deposit, bankers’ acceptances and commercial paper — 252 — — 252 
Non-U.S. government debt securities 26,600  27,169  155 — 53,924  
Corporate debt securities — 17,956  558 — 18,514  
Loans — 6,340  673 — 7,013  
Asset-backed securities — 2,593  37 — 2,630  
Total debt instruments 104,889  119,046  2,257  — 226,192  
Equity securities 71,890  244 196 — 72,330  
Physical commodities 3,638  3,579  — — 7,217  
Other — 13,896  232 — 14,128  
Total debt and equity instruments 180,417  136,765  2,685  — 319,867  
Derivative receivables:
Interest rate 721 311,173  1,400  (285,873 ) 27,421  
Credit — 14,252  624 (14,175 ) 701 
Foreign exchange 117 137,938  432 (129,482 ) 9,005  
Equity — 43,642  2,085  (39,250 ) 6,477  
Commodity — 17,058  184 (11,080 ) 6,162  
Total derivative receivables 838 524,063  4,725  (479,860 ) 49,766  
Total trading assets 181,255  660,828  7,410  (479,860 ) 369,633  
Available-for-sale securities:
Mortgage-backed securities:
U.S. GSEs and government agencies — 110,117  — — 110,117  
Residential – nonagency — 12,989  1 — 12,990  
Commercial – nonagency — 5,188  — — 5,188  
Total mortgage-backed securities — 128,294  1 — 128,295  
U.S. T reasury and government agencies 139,436  — — — 139,436  
Obligations of U.S. states and municipalities — 29,810  — — 29,810  
Certificates of deposit — 77 — — 77 
Non-U.S. government debt securities 12,966  8,821  — — 21,787  
Corporate debt securities — 845 — — 845 
Asset-backed securities: — — — 
Collateralized loan obligations — 24,991  — — 24,991  
Other — 5,458  — — 5,458  
Total available-for-sale securities 152,402  198,296  1 — 350,699  
Loans — 44,439  516 — 44,955  
Mortgage servicing rights — — 4,699  — 4,699  
Other assets 7,305  3,824  917 — 12,046  
Total assets measured at fair value on a recurring basis $ 340,962  $ 928,185  $ 13,543  $ (479,860 ) $ 802,830  
Deposits $ — $ 25,229  $ 3,360  $ — $ 28,589  
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under repurchase agreements — 549 — — 549 
Short-term borrowings — 4,246  1,674  — 5,920  
Trading liabilities:
Debt and equity instruments 59,047  16,481  41 — 75,569  
Derivative payables:
Interest rate 795 276,746  1,732  (270,670 ) 8,603  
Credit — 14,358  763 (13,469 ) 1,652  
Foreign exchange 109 143,960  1,039  (131,950 ) 13,158  
Equity — 47,261  5,480  (40,204 ) 12,537  
Commodity — 19,685  200 (12,127 ) 7,758  
Total derivative payables 904 502,010  9,214  (468,420 ) 43,708  
Total trading liabilities 59,951  518,491  9,255  (468,420 ) 119,277  
Accounts payable and other liabilities 3,231  452 45 — 3,728  
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs — 36 — — 36 
Long-term debt — 52,406  23,339  — 75,745  
Total liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis $ 63,182  $ 601,409  $ 37,673  $ (468,420 ) $ 233,844  
(a)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, included total U.S. GSE obligations of $117.6 billion and $104.5 billion, respectively, which were mortgage-
related.
(b)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other
assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(c)Physical commodities inventories are generally accounted for at the lower of cost or net realizable value. “Net realizable value” is a term defined
in U.S. GAAP as not exceeding fair value less costs to sell (“transaction costs”). Transaction costs for the Firm’s physical commodities inventories
are either not applicable or immaterial to the value of the inventory. Therefore, net realizable value approximates fair value for the Firm’s physical
commodities inventories. When fair value hedging has been applied (or when net realizable value is below cost), the carrying value of physical
commodities approximates fair value, because under fair value hedge accounting, the cost basis is adjusted for changes in fair value. Refer to
Note 5 for a further(g)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(a)
(b)(f)
(b)(e)
(d)
JPMorganChase&Co/2020Form10K 177
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 177
Notes to consolidated financial statements
discussion of the Firm’s hedge accounting relationships. To provide consistent fair value disclosure information, all physical commodities
inventories have been included in each period presented.
(d)Balances reflect the reduction of securities owned (long positions) by the amount of identical securities sold but not yet purchased (short
positions).
(e)Certain investments that are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share (or its equivalent) as a practical expedient are not
required to be classified in the fair value hierarchy. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the fair values of these investments, which include certain
hedge funds, private equity funds, real estate and other funds, were $670 million and $684 million, respectively. Included in these balances at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, were trading assets of $52 million and $54 million, respectively, and other assets of $618 million and $630 million,
respectively.
(f)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, included within loans were $15.1 billion and $19.8 billion, respectively, of residential first-lien mortgages, and
$6.3 billion and $8.2 billion, respectively, of commercial first-lien mortgages. Residential mortgage loans include conforming mortgage loans
originated with the intent to sell to U.S. GSEs and government agencies of $8.4 billion and $13.6 billion, respectively.
(g)As permitted under U.S. GAAP, the Firm has elected to net derivative receivables and derivative payables and the related cash collateral received
and paid when a legally enforceable master netting agreement exists. The level 3 balances would be reduced if netting were applied, including
the netting benefit associated with cash collateral.
 
178 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Level 3 valuations
The Firm has established well-structured processes for
determining fair value, including for instruments where
fair value is estimated using significant unobservable
inputs (level 3). Refer to pages 171-175 of this Note for
further information on the Firm’s valuation process and a
detailed discussion of the determination of fair value for
individual financial instruments.
Estimating fair value requires the application of
judgment. The type and level of judgment required is
largely dependent on the amount of observable market
information available to the Firm. For instruments valued
using internally developed valuation models and other
valuation techniques that use significant unobservable
inputs and are therefore classified within level 3 of the
fair value hierarchy, judgments used to estimate fair
value are more significant than those required when
estimating the fair value of instruments classified within
levels 1 and 2.
In arriving at an estimate of fair value for an instrument
within level 3, management must first determine the
appropriate valuation model or other valuation technique
to use. Second, due to the lack of observability of
significant inputs, management must assess relevant
empirical data in deriving valuation inputs including
transaction details, yield curves, interest rates,
prepayment speed, default rates, volatilities,
correlations, prices (such as commodity, equity or debt
prices), valuations of comparable instruments, foreign
exchange rates and credit curves.
The following table presents the Firm’s primary level 3
financial instruments, the valuation techniques used to
measure the fair value of those financial instruments,
the significant unobservable inputs, the range of values
for those inputs and the weighted or arithmetic averages
of such inputs. While the determination to classify an
instrument within level 3 is based on the significance of
the unobservable inputs to the overall fair value
measurement, level 3 financial instruments typically
include observable components (that is, components
that are actively quoted and can be validated to external
sources) in addition to the unobservable components.
The level 1 and/or level 2 inputs are not included in the
table. In addition, the Firm manages the risk of the
observable components of level 3 financial instruments
using securities and derivative positions that are
classified within levels 1 or 2 of the fair value hierarchy.
The range of values presented in the table is
representative of the highest and lowest level input used
to value the significant groups of instruments within a
product/instrument classification. Where provided, the
weighted averages of the input values presented in the
table are calculated based on the fair value of the
instruments that the input is being used to value.In the Firm’s view, the input range, weighted and
arithmetic average values do not reflect the degree of
input uncertainty or an assessment of the
reasonableness of the Firm’s estimates and
assumptions. Rather, they reflect the characteristics of
the various instruments held by the Firm and the relative
distribution of instruments within the range of
characteristics. For example, two option contracts may
have similar levels of market risk exposure and
valuation uncertainty, but may have significantly different
implied volatility levels because the option contracts
have different underlyings, tenors, or strike prices. The
input range and weighted average values will therefore
vary from period-to-period and parameter-to-parameter
based on the characteristics of the instruments held by
the Firm at each balance sheet date.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 179
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Level 3 inputs
December 31, 2020
Product/InstrumentFair value
(in millions)Principal valuation
technique Unobservable inputs Range of input valuesAverage
Residential mortgage-backed securities
and loans $ 1,282 Discounted cash flows Yield 0% – 18% 6%
Prepayment speed 0% – 46% 10%
Conditional default rate 0% – 30% 14%
Loss severity 0% – 107% 7%
Commercial mortgage-backed securities
and loans 466 Market comparables Price $0 – $101 $84
Corporate debt securities 507 Market comparables Price $2 – $116 $85
Loans 1,930 Market comparables Price $10 – $104 $72
Asset-backed securities 28 Market comparables Price $1 – $97 $57
Net interest rate derivatives 238 Option pricing Interest rate volatility 7bps –513bps 101bps
Interest rate spread volatility 11bps – 23bps 15bps
Interest rate correlation (65)% – 99% 35%
IR-FX correlation (35)% – 50% 0%
20 Discounted cash flows Prepayment speed 0% – 30% 8%
Net credit derivatives (260)Discounted cash flows Credit correlation 34% – 65% 48%
Credit spread 3bps –1,302bps 441bps
Recovery rate 0% – 67% 46%
Conditional default rate 2% – 100% 58%
Loss severity 100% 100%
36 Market comparables Price $1 – $115 $71
Net foreign exchange derivatives (298)Option pricing IR-FX correlation (40)% – 65% 18%
(136)Discounted cash flows Prepayment speed 9% 9%
Net equity derivatives (3,862)Option pricing Forward equity price 61% – 106% 99%
Equity volatility 5% – 138% 35%
Equity correlation 18% – 99% 60%
Equity-FX correlation (79)% – 55% (27)%
Equity-IR correlation 20% – 50% 28%
Net commodity derivatives (731)Option pricing Oil Commodity Forward $600 / MT–$609 / MT $605 / MT
Forward power price $12 / MWH–$55 / MWH$34 / MWH
Commodity volatility 1% – 58% 29%
Commodity correlation (49)% – 95% 23%
MSRs 3,276 Discounted cash flows Refer to Note 15
Other assets 299 Discounted cash flows Credit spread 45bps 45bps
Yield 4% 30% 7%
585 Market comparables Price $29 – $29 $29
Long-term debt, short-term borrowings,
and deposits27,912 Option pricing Interest rate volatility 7bps –513bps 101bps
Interest rate correlation (65)% – 99% 35%
IR-FX correlation (35)% – 50% 0%
Equity correlation 18% – 99% 60%
Equity-FX correlation (79)% – 55% (27)%
Equity-IR correlation 20% – 50% 28%
818 Discounted cash flows Credit correlation 34% – 65% 48%
Other level 3 assets and liabilities, net 250 
(a)The categories presented in the table have been aggregated based upon the product type, which may differ from their classification on the
Consolidated balance sheets. Furthermore, the inputs presented for each valuation technique in the table are, in some cases, not applicable to
every instrument valued using the technique as the characteristics of the instruments can differ.
(b)Comprises U.S. GSE and government agency securities of $449 million, nonagency securities of $28 million and non-trading loans of $805
million.
(c)Comprises nonagency securities of $3 million, trading loans of $43 million and non-trading loans of $420 million.
(d)Comprises trading loans of $850 million and non-trading loans of $1.1 billion.
(e)Long-term debt, short-term borrowings and deposits include structured notes issued by the Firm that are financial instruments that typically
contain embedded derivatives. The estimation of the fair value of structured notes includes the derivative features embedded within the
instrument. The significant unobservable inputs are broadly consistent with those presented for derivative receivables.
(f)Includes level 3 assets and liabilities that are insignificant both individually and in aggregate.
(g)Price is a significant unobservable input for certain instruments. When quoted market prices are not readily available, reliance is generally placed
on price-based internal valuation techniques. The price input is expressed assuming a par value of $100.
(h)Forward equity price is expressed as a percentage of the current equity price.
(i)Amounts represent weighted averages except for derivative related inputs where arithmetic averages are used.(a)
(g) (i)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(h)
(e)
(f)
180 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Changes in and ranges of unobservable inputs
The following discussion provides a description of the
impact on a fair value measurement of a change in each
unobservable input in isolation, and the interrelationship
between unobservable inputs, where relevant and
significant. The impact of changes in inputs may not be
independent, as a change in one unobservable input
may give rise to a change in another unobservable
input. Where relationships do exist between two
unobservable inputs, those relationships are discussed
below. Relationships may also exist between observable
and unobservable inputs (for example, as observable
interest rates rise, unobservable prepayment rates
decline); such relationships have not been included in
the discussion below. In addition, for each of the
individual relationships described below, the inverse
relationship would also generally apply.
The following discussion also provides a description of
attributes of the underlying instruments and external
market factors that affect the range of inputs used in the
valuation of the Firm’s positions.
Yield – The yield of an asset is the interest rate used to
discount future cash flows in a discounted cash flow
calculation. An increase in the yield, in isolation, would
result in a decrease in a fair value measurement.
Credit spread – The credit spread is the amount of
additional annualized return over the market interest
rate that a market participant would demand for taking
exposure to the credit risk of an instrument. The credit
spread for an instrument forms part of the discount rate
used in a discounted cash flow calculation. Generally, an
increase in the credit spread would result in a decrease
in a fair value measurement.
The yield and the credit spread of a particular mortgage-
backed security primarily reflect the risk inherent in the
instrument. The yield is also impacted by the absolute
level of the coupon paid by the instrument (which may
not correspond directly to the level of inherent risk).
Therefore, the range of yield and credit spreads reflects
the range of risk inherent in various instruments owned
by the Firm. The risk inherent in mortgage-backed
securities is driven by the subordination of the security
being valued and the characteristics of the underlying
mortgages within the collateralized pool, including
borrower FICO scores, LTV ratios for residential
mortgages and the nature of the property and/or any
tenants for commercial mortgages. For corporate debt
securities, obligations of U.S. states and municipalities
and other similar instruments, credit spreads reflect the
credit quality of the obligor and the tenor of the
obligation.
Prepayment speed – The prepayment speed is a
measure of the voluntary unscheduled principal
repayments of a prepayable obligation in a collateralized
pool. Prepayment speeds generally decline as borrower
delinquencies rise. An increase in prepayment speeds,
in isolation, would result in a decrease in a fair value
measurement of assets valued at a premium to par and
an increase in a fair value measurement of assets
valued at a discount to par.Prepayment speeds may vary from collateral pool to
collateral pool, and are driven by the type and location
of the underlying borrower, and the remaining tenor of
the obligation as well as the level and type (e.g., fixed or
floating) of interest rate being paid by the borrower.
Typically collateral pools with higher borrower credit
quality have a higher prepayment rate than those with
lower borrower credit quality, all other factors being
equal.
Conditional default rate – The conditional default rate is
a measure of the reduction in the outstanding collateral
balance underlying a collateralized obligation as a result
of defaults. While there is typically no direct relationship
between conditional default rates and prepayment
speeds, collateralized obligations for which the
underlying collateral has high prepayment speeds will
tend to have lower conditional default rates. An increase
in conditional default rates would generally be
accompanied by an increase in loss severity and an
increase in credit spreads. An increase in the conditional
default rate, in isolation, would result in a decrease in a
fair value measurement. Conditional default rates reflect
the quality of the collateral underlying a securitization
and the structure of the securitization itself. Based on
the types of securities owned in the Firm’s market-
making portfolios, conditional default rates are most
typically at the lower end of the range presented.
Loss severity – The loss severity (the inverse concept is
the recovery rate) is the expected amount of future
realized losses resulting from the ultimate liquidation of
a particular loan, expressed as the net amount of loss
relative to the outstanding loan balance. An increase in
loss severity is generally accompanied by an increase in
conditional default rates. An increase in the loss
severity, in isolation, would result in a decrease in a fair
value measurement.
The loss severity applied in valuing a mortgage-backed
security investment depends on factors relating to the
underlying mortgages, including the LTV ratio, the
nature of the lender’s lien on the property and other
instrument-specific factors.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 181
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Correlation – Correlation is a measure of the
relationship between the movements of two variables.
Correlation is a pricing input for a derivative product
where the payoff is driven by one or more underlying
risks. Correlation inputs are related to the type of
derivative (e.g., interest rate, credit, equity, foreign
exchange and commodity) due to the nature of the
underlying risks. When parameters are positively
correlated, an increase in one parameter will result in an
increase in the other parameter. When parameters are
negatively correlated, an increase in one parameter will
result in a decrease in the other parameter. An increase
in correlation can result in an increase or a decrease in
a fair value measurement. Given a short correlation
position, an increase in correlation, in isolation, would
generally result in a decrease in a fair value
measurement.
The level of correlation used in the valuation of
derivatives with multiple underlying risks depends on a
number of factors including the nature of those risks. For
example, the correlation between two credit risk
exposures would be different than that between two
interest rate risk exposures. Similarly, the tenor of the
transaction may also impact the correlation input, as the
relationship between the underlying risks may be
different over different time periods. Furthermore,
correlation levels are very much dependent on market
conditions and could have a relatively wide range of
levels within or across asset classes over time,
particularly in volatile market conditions.
Volatility – Volatility is a measure of the variability in
possible returns for an instrument, parameter or market
index given how much the particular instrument,
parameter or index changes in value over time. Volatility
is a pricing input for options, including equity options,
commodity options, and interest rate options. Generally,
the higher the volatility of the underlying, the riskier the
instrument. Given a long position in an option, an
increase in volatility, in isolation, would generally result
in an increase in a fair value measurement.
The level of volatility used in the valuation of a particular
option-based derivative depends on a number of factors,
including the nature of the risk underlying the option
(e.g., the volatility of a particular equity security may be
significantly different from that of a particular commodity
index), the tenor of the derivative as well as the strike
price of the option.Forward price - Forward price is the price at which the
buyer agrees to purchase the asset underlying a forward
contract on the predetermined future delivery date, and
is such that the value of the contract is zero at inception.
The forward price is used as an input in the valuation of
certain derivatives and depends on a number of factors
including interest rates, the current price of the
underlying asset, and the expected income to be
received and costs to be incurred by the seller as a
result of holding that asset until the delivery date. An
increase in the forward can result in an increase or a
decrease in a fair value measurement.
Changes in level 3 recurring fair value
measurements
The following tables include a rollforward of the
Consolidated balance sheets amounts (including
changes in fair value) for financial instruments classified
by the Firm within level 3 of the fair value hierarchy for
the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
When a determination is made to classify a financial
instrument within level 3, the determination is based on
the significance of the unobservable inputs to the overall
fair value measurement. However, level 3 financial
instruments typically include, in addition to the
unobservable or level 3 components, observable
components (that is, components that are actively
quoted and can be validated to external sources);
accordingly, the gains and losses in the table below
include changes in fair value due in part to observable
factors that are part of the valuation methodology. Also,
the Firm risk-manages the observable components of
level 3 financial instruments using securities and
derivative positions that are classified within level 1 or 2
of the fair value hierarchy; as these level 1 and level 2
risk management instruments are not included below,
the gains or losses in the following tables do not reflect
the effect of the Firm’s risk management activities
related to such level 3 instruments.
182 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Fair value measurements using significant unobservable inputs
Year ended
 December 31, 2020
 (in millions)Fair
value at
January
1, 2020Total
realized/unrealized
gains/(losses)Transfers
into 
 level 3Transfers
(out of)
level 3Fair
value at
Dec. 31,
2020Change in
unrealized
gains/(losses)
related to
financial
instruments
held at Dec. 31,
2020 Purchases Sales Settlements
Assets:
Trading assets:
Debt instruments:
Mortgage-backed
securities:  
U.S. GSEs and
government agencies$ 797 $ (172) $ 134 $(149)  $ (161)$ — $ — $ 449 $(150)
Residential –
nonagency 23 2 15 (5)  (4) — (3) 28 (1)
Commercial –
nonagency 4 — 1 —  (1) 2 (3) 3 — 
Total mortgage-backed
securities 824 (170) 150 (154) (166) 2 (6) 480 (151)
U.S. Treasury, GSEs and
government agencies — — — —  — — — — — 
Obligations of U.S. states
and municipalities 10 — — (1)  (1) — — 8 — 
Non-U.S. government
debt securities 155 21 281 (245)  (7) — (23) 182 11 
Corporate debt securities 558 (23) 582 (205)  (236) 411 (580) 507 (25)
Loans 673 (73) 1,112 (484)  (182) 791 (944) 893 (40)
Asset-backed securities 37 (3) 44 (40)  (9) 9 (10) 28 (4)
Total debt instruments 2,257 (248) 2,169 (1,129) (601) 1,213 (1,563)2,098 (209)
Equity securities 196 (75) 53 (376)  (1) 535 (153) 179 (20)
Other 232 271 245 (9)  (154) 6 (245) 346 206 
Total trading assets –
debt and equity
instruments 2,685 (52) 2,467 (1,514) (756) 1,754 (1,961)2,623 (23)
Net derivative receivables: 
Interest rate (332) 2,682 308 (148)  (2,228) (332) 308 258 325 
Credit (139) (212) 73 (154)  181 59 (32) (224) (110)
Foreign exchange (607) 49 49 (24)  83 13 3 (434) 116 
Equity (3,395) (65) 1,664 (2,317)  1,162 (935) 24 (3,862) (556)
Commodity (16) (546) 27 (241)  356 (310) (1) (731) 267 
Total net derivative
receivables (4,489) 1,908 2,121 (2,884) (446) (1,505) 302 (4,993) 42 
Available-for-sale securities:
Mortgage-backed
securities 1 — — — (1) — — — — 
Asset-backed securities — — — — — — — — — 
Total available-for-sale
securities 1 — — — (1) — — — — 
Loans 516 (243) 962 (84)  (733) 2,571 (684)2,305 (18)
Mortgage servicing rights 4,699 (1,540) 1,192 (176)  (899) — — 3,276 (1,540)
Other assets 917 (63) 75 (104) (320) 40 (7) 538 (3)
Fair value measurements using significant unobservable inputs
Year ended
 December 31, 2020
 (in millions)Fair
value at
January
1, 2020Total
realized/unrealized
(gains)/lossesTransfers
(out of)
level 3Fair
value at
Dec. 31,
2020Change in
unrealized
(gains)/losses
related to
financial
instruments
held at Dec. 31,
2020 Purchases SalesIssuancesSettlementsTransfers
into 
 level 3
Liabilities:
Deposits $3,360 $ 165 $ — $ — $ 671 $ (605)$ 265 $ (943)$2,913 $455 
Short-term borrowings 1,674 (338) — — 5,140 (4,115) 105 (46)2,420 143 
Trading liabilities – debt and
equity instruments 41 (2) (126) 14 — (4) 136 (8) 51 (1)
Accounts payable and other
liabilities 45 33 (87) 37 — — 47 (7) 68 28 
Beneficial interests issued by
consolidated VIEs — —  — — — — — — — — 
Long-term debt 23,339 40 — — 9,883 (9,833) 1,250 (1,282)23,397 1,920 (i) (i) (g) (h)
(a)
(b)
(d) (d)
(c)
(d) (d)
(b) (d) (d)
(e) (e)
(b) (d) (d)
(i) (h) (i)
(a)
(d)(f) (d)(f)
(d)(f) (d)(f)
(d) (d)
(d) (d)
(d)(f) (d)(f)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 183
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Fair value measurements using significant unobservable inputs
Year ended
 December 31, 2019
 (in millions)Fair
value at
January
1, 2019Total
realized/unrealized
gains/(losses)Transfers
(out of)
level 3Fair
value at
Dec. 31,
2019Change in
unrealized
gains/(losses)
related to
financial
instruments
held at Dec. 31,
2019 Purchases Sales SettlementsTransfers
into 
 level 3
Assets:
Trading assets:
Debt instruments:
Mortgage-backed
securities:
U.S. GSEs and
government agencies$ 549 $ (62) $ 773 $(310)  $ (134)$ 1 $ (20)$797 $(58)
Residential –
nonagency 64 25 83 (86)  (20) 15 (58) 23 2 
Commercial –
nonagency 11 2 20 (26)  (14) 15 (4) 4 1 
Total mortgage-backed
securities 624 (35) 876 (422) (168) 31 (82) 824 (55)
U.S. Treasury, GSEs and
government agencies — — — —  — — — — — 
Obligations of U.S. states
and municipalities 689 13 85 (159)  (8) — (610) 10 13 
Non-U.S. government
debt securities 155 1 290 (287)  — 14 (18) 155 4 
Corporate debt securities 334 47 437 (247)  (52) 112 (73) 558 40 
Loans 738 29 456 (519)  (82) 437 (386) 673 13 
Asset-backed securities 127 — 37 (93)  (40) 28 (22) 37 (3)
Total debt instruments 2,667 55 2,181 (1,727)  (350) 622 (1,191)2,257 12 
Equity securities 232 (41) 58 (103) (22) 181 (109) 196 (18)
Other 301 (36) 50 (26) (54) 2 (5) 232 91 
Total trading assets –
debt and equity
instruments 3,200 (22) 2,289 (1,856)  (426) 805 (1,305)2,685 85 
Net derivative receivables:
Interest rate (38) (394) 109 (125) 5 (7) 118 (332) (599)
Credit (107) (36) 20 (9) 8 29 (44) (139) (127)
Foreign exchange (297) (551) 17 (67) 312 (22) 1 (607) (380)
Equity (2,225) (310) 397 (573) (503) (405) 224 (3,395) (1,608)
Commodity (1,129) 497 36 (348) 89 (6) 845 (16) 130 
Total net derivative
receivables (3,796) (794) 579 (1,122)  (89) (411) 1,144 (4,489) (2,584)
Available-for-sale securities:
Mortgage-backed
securities 1 — — — — — — 1 — 
Asset-backed securities — — — — — — — — — 
Total available-for-sale
securities 1 —  — —  — — — 1 — 
Loans 856 59 236 (188) (482) 188 (153) 516 38 
Mortgage servicing rights 6,130 (1,180) 1,489 (789) (951) — — 4,699 (1,180)
Other assets 1,161 (150) 229 (166)  (156) 6 (7) 917 (180)
Fair value measurements using significant unobservable inputs
Year ended
 December 31, 2019
 (in millions)Fair
value at
January
1, 2019Total
realized/unrealized
(gains)/losses 
Transfers
(out of)
level 3Fair
value at
Dec. 31,
2019Change in
unrealized
(gains)/losses
related to
financial
instruments
held at Dec. 31,
2019 PurchasesSalesIssuancesSettlementsTransfers
into 
 level 3
Liabilities:
Deposits $4,169 $ 278 $ — $ — $ 916 $ (806)$ 12 $(1,209)$3,360 $307 
Short-term borrowings 1,523 229 — — 3,441 (3,356) 85 (248)1,674 155 
Trading liabilities – debt and
equity instruments 50 2 (22) 41 — 1 16 (47) 41 3 
Accounts payable and other
liabilities 10 (2) (84) 115 — — 6 — 45 29 
Beneficial interests issued by
consolidated VIEs 1 (1) — — — — — — — —  
Long-term debt 19,418 2,815 — — 10,441 (8,538) 651 (1,448)23,339 2,822 (i) (g) (h) (i)
(a)
(b)
(d) (d)
(c)
(d) (d)
(b) (d) (d)
(e) (e)
(b) (d) (d)
(i) (h) (i)
(a)
(d)(f) (d)(f)
(d)(f) (d)(f)
(d) (d)
(d) (d)
(d)
(d)(f) (d)(f)
184 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Fair value measurements using significant unobservable inputs
Year ended
 December 31, 2018
 (in millions)Fair
value at
January
1, 2018Total
realized/unrealized
gains/(losses)Transfers
(out of)
level 3Fair
value at
 Dec. 31,
2018Change in
unrealized
gains/(losses)
related to
financial
instruments held
at Dec. 31, 2018 Purchases Sales SettlementsTransfers
into 
 level 3
Assets:
Trading assets:
Debt instruments:
Mortgage-backed
securities:
U.S. GSEs and
government agencies$307 $ (23) $ 478 $(164) $ (73) $ 94 $ (70)$ 549 $(21)
Residential –
nonagency 60 (2) 78 (50) (7) 59 (74) 64 1 
Commercial –
nonagency 11 2 18 (18) (17) 36 (21) 11 (2)
Total mortgage-backed
securities 378 (23) 574 (232) (97) 189 (165) 624 (22)
U.S. Treasury, GSEs and
government agencies 1 — — — — — (1) — — 
Obligations of U.S. states
and municipalities 744 (17) 112 (70) (80) — — 689 (17)
Non-U.S. government
debt securities 78 (22) 459 (277) (12) 23 (94) 155 (9)
Corporate debt securities 312 (18) 364 (309) (48) 262 (229) 334 (1)
Loans 612 1 941 (536) (219) 619 (680) 738 (13)
Asset-backed securities 153 28 98 (41) (55) 45 (101) 127 22 
Total debt instruments 2,278 (51) 2,548 (1,465) (511) 1,138 (1,270)2,667 (40)
Equity securities 295 (40) 118 (120) (1) 107 (127) 232 9 
Other 690 (285) 55 (40) (118) 3 (4) 301 (301)
Total trading assets –
debt and equity
instruments 3,263 (376) 2,721 (1,625) (630) 1,248 (1,401)3,200 (332)
Net derivative receivables:
Interest rate 264 150 107 (133) (430) (15) 19 (38) 187 
Credit (35) (40) 5 (7) (57) 4 23 (107) (28)
Foreign exchange (396) 103 52 (20) 30 (108) 42 (297) (63)
Equity (3,409) 198 1,676 (2,208) 1,805 (617) 330 (2,225) 561 
Commodity (674) (73) 1 (72) (301) 7 (17)(1,129) 146 
Total net derivative
receivables (4,250) 338 1,841 (2,440) 1,047 (729) 397 (3,796) 803 
Available-for-sale securities: — 
Mortgage-backed
securities 1 — — — — — — 1 — 
Asset-backed securities 276 1 — — (277) — — — — 
Total available-for-sale
securities 277 1 — — (277) — — 1 —  
Loans 2,152 9 412 (1,256) (496) 194 (159) 856 (4)
Mortgage servicing rights 6,030 230 1,246 (636) (740) — — 6,130 230 
Other assets 1,496 (319) 195 (38) (176) 4 (1)1,161 (331)
Fair value measurements using significant unobservable inputs
Year ended
 December 31, 2018
 (in millions)Fair
value at
January
1, 2018Total
realized/unrealized
(gains)/lossesTransfers
into
level 3Transfers
(out of)
level 3Fair
value at
Dec. 31,
2018Change in
unrealized
(gains)/losses
related to
financial
instruments held
at Dec. 31, 2018 Purchases SalesIssuances Settlements
Liabilities:
Deposits $4,142 $ (136) $ — $ — $1,437 $ (736) $ 2 $ (540)$4,169 $(204)
Short-term borrowings 1,665 (329) — — 3,455 (3,388) 272 (152)1,523 (131)
Trading liabilities – debt and
equity instruments 39 19 (99) 114 — (1) 14 (36) 50 16 
Accounts payable and other
liabilities 13 —  (12) 5 — — 4 — 10 —  
Beneficial interests issued by
consolidated VIEs 39 —  — 1 — (39) — — 1 — 
Long-term debt 16,125 (1,169) — — 11,919 (7,769) 1,143 (831)19,418 (1,385)(i) (g) (h) (i)
(a)
(b)
(d) (d)
(c)
(d) (d)
(j)
(b) (d) (d)
(e) (e)
(b) (d) (d)
(i) (i) (h)
(a)
(d)(f) (d)(f)
(d)(f) (d)(f)
(d) (d)
(d)(f) (d)(f)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 185
Notes to consolidated financial statements
(a)Level 3 assets at fair value as a percentage of total Firm assets accounted for at fair value (including assets measured at fair value on a
nonrecurring basis) were 1%, 2% and 3% at December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. Level 3 liabilities at fair value as a percentage of
total Firm liabilities at fair value (including liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis) were 9%, 16% and 15% at December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
(b)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other
assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(c)All level 3 derivatives are presented on a net basis, irrespective of underlying counterparty.
(d)Predominantly reported in principal transactions revenue, except for changes in fair value for CCB mortgage loans, and lending-related
commitments originated with the intent to sell, and mortgage loan purchase commitments, which are reported in mortgage fees and related
income.
(e)Changes in fair value for MSRs are reported in mortgage fees and related income.
(f)Realized (gains)/losses due to DVA for fair value option elected liabilities are reported in principal transactions revenue, and they were not
material for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. Unrealized (gains)/losses are reported in OCI, and they were
$221 million, $319 million and $(277) million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
(g)Loan originations are included in purchases.
(h)Includes financial assets and liabilities that have matured, been partially or fully repaid, impacts of modifications, deconsolidation associated with
beneficial interests in VIEs and other items.
(i)All transfers into and/or out of level 3 are based on changes in the observability and/or significance of the valuation inputs and are assumed to
occur at the beginning of the quarterly reporting period in which they occur.
(j)Realized gains/(losses) on AFS securities, as well as other-than-temporary impairment (“OTTI”) losses that are recorded in earnings, are reported
in investment securities gains/(losses). Unrealized gains/(losses) are reported in OCI. There were no realized gains/(losses) and foreign
exchange hedge accounting adjustments recorded in income on AFS securities for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively
and $1 million recorded for the year ended December 31, 2018. There were no material unrealized gains/(losses) recorded on AFS securities in
OCI for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 respectively.
Level 3 analysis
Consolidated balance sheets changes
Level 3 assets at fair value including assets measured
at fair value on a nonrecurring basis were 0.5% of total
Firm assets at December 31, 2020. The following
describes significant changes to level 3 assets since
December 31, 2019, for those items measured at fair
value on a recurring basis. Refer to Assets and liabilities
measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis on page
189 for further information on changes impacting items
measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis.
For the year ended December 31, 2020
Level 3 assets were $16.4 billion at December 31, 2020,
reflecting an increase of $2.9 billion from December 31,
2019.
The increase for the year ended December 31, 2020
was driven by:
•$907 million increase in gross interest rate derivative
receivables and $1.4 billion increase in gross equity
derivative receivables largely due to gains net of
settlements.
•$1.8 billion increase in non-trading loans due to net
transfers.
partially offset by
•$1.4 billion decrease in MSRs due to losses and
settlements partially offset by purchases.
Refer to the sections below for additional
information.
Transfers between levels for instruments carried at
fair value on a recurring basis
During the year ended December 31, 2020, significant
transfers from level 2 into level 3 included the following:
•$1.8 billion of total debt and equity instruments,
predominantly equity securities and trading loans,
driven by a decrease in observability.
•$2.6 billion of gross equity derivative receivables and
$3.5 billion of gross equity derivative payables as a
resultof a decrease in observability and an increase in the
significance of unobservable inputs.
•$880 million of gross interest rate derivative payables
as a result of a decrease in observability and an
increase in the significance of unobservable inputs.
•$2.6 billion of non-trading loans driven by a decrease
in observability.
•$1.2 billion of long-term debt driven by a decrease in
observability and an increase in the significance of
unobservable inputs for structured notes.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, significant
transfers from level 3 into level 2 included the following:
•$2.0 billion of total debt and equity instruments,
predominantly due to corporate debt and trading
loans, driven by an increase in observability.
•$2.4 billion of gross equity derivative receivables and
$2.4 billion of gross equity derivative payables as a
result of an increase in observability and a decrease
in the significance of unobservable inputs.
•$943 million of deposits as a result of an increase in
observability and a decrease in the significance of
unobservable inputs.
•$1.3 billion of long-term debt driven by an increase in
observability and a decrease in the significance of
unobservable inputs for structured notes.
During the year ended December 31, 2019, significant
transfers from level 2 into level 3 included the following:
•$993 million of total debt and equity instruments, the
majority of which were trading loans, driven by a
decrease in observability.
•$904 million of gross equity derivative payables as a
result of a decrease in observability and an increase
in the significance of unobservable inputs.
 
186 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
During the year ended December 31, 2019, significant
transfers from level 3 into level 2 included the following:
•$1.5 billion of total debt and equity instruments, the
majority of which were obligations of U.S. states and
municipalities and trading loans, driven by an
increase in observability.
•$1.1 billion of gross equity derivative receivables and
$1.3 billion of gross equity derivative payables as a
result of an increase in observability and a decrease
in the significance of unobservable inputs.
•$962 million of gross commodities derivative
payables as a result of an increase in observability.
•$1.2 billion of deposits as a result of an increase in
observability and a decrease in the significance of
unobservable inputs.
•$1.4 billion of long-term debt as a result of an
increase in observability and a decrease in the
significance of unobservable inputs.
During the year ended December 31, 2018, significant
transfers from level 2 into level 3 included the following:
•$1.4 billion of total debt and equity instruments, the
majority of which were trading loans, driven by a
decrease in observability.
•$1.0 billion of gross equity derivative receivables and
$1.6 billion of gross equity derivative payables as a
result of a decrease in observability and an increase
in the significance of unobservable inputs.
•$1.1 billion of long-term debt driven by a decrease in
observability and an increase in the significance of
unobservable inputs for certain structured notes.
During the year ended December 31, 2018, significant
transfers from level 3 into level 2 included the following:
•$1.5 billion of total debt and equity instruments, the
majority of which were trading loans, driven by an
increase in observability.
•$1.2 billion of gross equity derivative receivables and
$1.5 billion of gross equity derivative payables as a
result of an increase in observability and a decrease
in the significance of unobservable inputs.
All transfers are based on changes in the observability
and/or significance of the valuation inputs and are
assumed to occur at the beginning of the quarterly
reporting period in which they occur.Gains and losses
The following describes significant components of total
realized/unrealized gains/(losses) for instruments
measured at fair value on a recurring basis for the years
ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. These
amounts exclude any effects of the Firm’s risk
management activities where the financial instruments
are classified as level 1 and 2 of the fair value hierarchy.
Refer to Changes in level 3 recurring fair value
measurements rollforward tables on pages 182-186 for
further information on these instruments.
2020
•$10 million of net gains on assets driven by gains in
net interest rate derivative receivables due to market
movements largely offset by losses in MSRs
reflecting faster prepayment speeds on lower rates.
Refer to Note 15 for additional information on MSRs.
•$102 million of net gains on liabilities driven by
market movements in short-term borrowings.
2019
•$2.1 billion of net losses on assets largely due to
MSRs reflecting faster prepayment speeds on lower
rates. Refer to Note 15 for additional information on
MSRs.
•$3.3 billion of net losses on liabilities predominantly
driven by market movements in long-term debt.
2018
•$1.6 billion of net gains on liabilities largely driven by
market movements in long-term debt.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 187
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Credit and funding adjustments – derivatives
Derivatives are generally valued using models that use
as their basis observable market parameters. These
market parameters generally do not consider factors
such as counterparty nonperformance risk, the Firm’s
own credit quality, and funding costs. Therefore, it is
generally necessary to make adjustments to the base
estimate of fair value to reflect these factors.
CVA represents the adjustment, relative to the relevant
benchmark interest rate, necessary to reflect
counterparty nonperformance risk. The Firm estimates
CVA using a scenario analysis to estimate the expected
positive credit exposure across all of the Firm’s existing
positions with each counterparty, and then estimates
losses based on the probability of default and estimated
recovery rate as a result of a counterparty credit event
considering contractual factors designed to mitigate the
Firm’s credit exposure, such as collateral and legal
rights of offset. The key inputs to this methodology are
(i) the probability of a default event occurring for each
counterparty, as derived from observed or estimated
CDS spreads; and (ii) estimated recovery rates implied
by CDS spreads, adjusted to consider the differences in
recovery rates as a derivative creditor relative to those
reflected in CDS spreads, which generally reflect senior
unsecured creditor risk.
FVA represents the adjustment to reflect the impact of
funding and is recognized where there is evidence that a
market participant in the principal market would
incorporate it in a transfer of the instrument. The Firm’s
FVA framework, applied to uncollateralized (including
partially collateralized) over-the-counter (“OTC”)
derivatives incorporates key inputs such as: (i) the
expected funding requirements arising from the Firm’s
positions witheach counterparty and collateral arrangements; and (ii)
the estimated market funding cost in the principal
market which, for derivative liabilities, considers the
Firm’s credit risk (DVA). For collateralized derivatives,
the fair value is estimated by discounting expected
future cash flows at the relevant overnight indexed swap
rate given the underlying collateral agreement with the
counterparty, and therefore a separate FVA is not
necessary.
The following table provides the impact of credit and
funding adjustments on principal transactions revenue in
the respective periods, excluding the effect of any
associated hedging activities. The FVA presented below
includes the impact of the Firm’s own credit quality on
the inception value of liabilities as well as the impact of
changes in the Firm’s own credit quality over time.
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Credit and funding
adjustments:
Derivatives CVA $ (337)$ 241 $ 193 
Derivatives FVA (64) 199 (74)
Valuation adjustments on fair value option elected
liabilities
The valuation of the Firm’s liabilities for which the fair
value option has been elected requires consideration of
the Firm’s own credit risk. DVA on fair value option
elected liabilities reflects changes (subsequent to the
issuance of the liability) in the Firm’s probability of
default and LGD, which are estimated based on
changes in the Firm’s credit spread observed in the
bond market. Realized (gains)/losses due to DVA for fair
value option elected liabilities are reported in principal
transactions revenue. Unrealized (gains)/losses are
reported in OCI. Refer to page 186 in this Note and Note
24 for further information.
188 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis
The following tables present the assets and liabilities held as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, for which
nonrecurring fair value adjustments were recorded during the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively,
by major product category and fair value hierarchy.
Fair value hierarchy
Total fair
value December 31, 2020 (in millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Loans $ — $ 1,611 $ 972 $ 2,583 
Other assets — 5 979 984 
Total assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis $ — $ 1,616 $ 1,951 $ 3,567 
Accounts payable and other liabilities — — 12 12 
Total liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis $ — $ — $ 12 $ 12 
Fair value hierarchy
Total fair
value December 31, 2019 (in millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Loans $ — $ 3,462 $ 269 $ 3,731 
Other assets — 14 1,043 1,057 
Total assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis $ — $ 3,476 $ 1,312 $ 4,788 
(a) Primarily includes equity securities without readily determinable fair values that were adjusted based on observable price changes in orderly
transactions from an identical or similar investment of the same issuer (measurement alternative). Of the $979 million in level 3 assets measured
at fair value on a nonrecurring basis as of December 31, 2020, $535 million related to equity securities adjusted based on the measurement
alternative. These equity securities are classified as level 3 due to the infrequency of the observable prices and/or the restrictions on the shares.
(b) There were no liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis at December 31, 2019.
(c) Primarily includes certain mortgage loans that were reclassified to held-for-sale.
(d) Of the $972 million in level 3 assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis as of December 31, 2020, $602 million related to residential
real estate loans carried at the net realizable value of the underlying collateral (e.g., collateral-dependent loans). These amounts are classified as
level 3 as they are valued using information from broker’s price opinions, appraisals and automated valuation models and discounted based upon
the Firm’s experience with actual liquidation values. These discounts ranged from 13% to 46% with a weighted average of 27%.
(e) Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
Nonrecurring fair value changes
The following table presents the total change in value of
assets and liabilities for which fair value adjustments
have been recognized for the years ended December
31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, related to assets and liabilities
held at those dates.
December 31, (in
millions) 2020 2019 2018
Loans $(393)  $(274) $(68)
Other assets (529) 182 132  
Accounts payable and
other liabilities (11) — — 
Total nonrecurring fair
value gains/(losses) $(933) $(92) $ 64 
(a)Includes the impact of certain mortgage loans that were
reclassified to held-for-sale.
(b)Included $(134) million, $201 million and $149 million for the years
ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively,of net
(losses)/gains as a result of the measurement alternative.
(c)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
Refer to Note 12 for further information about the
measurement of collateral-dependent loans.(c) (d)
(a)
 
(b)
(c)
(e)
(a)
(b) (c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 189
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Equity securities without readily determinable fair values
The Firm measures certain equity securities without readily determinable fair values at cost less impairment (if any),
plus or minus observable price changes from an identical or similar investment of the same issuer, with such changes
recognized in other income.
In its determination of the new carrying values upon observable price changes, the Firm may adjust the prices if
deemed necessary to arrive at the Firm’s estimated fair values. Such adjustments may include adjustments to reflect
the different rights and obligations of similar securities, and other adjustments that are consistent with the Firm’s
valuation techniques for private equity direct investments.
The following table presents the carrying value of equity securities without readily determinable fair values held as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, that are measured under the measurement alternative and the related adjustments
recorded during the periods presented for those securities with observable price changes. These securities are
included in the nonrecurring fair value tables when applicable price changes are observable.
As of or for the year ended December 31,
(in millions) 2020 2019
Other assets
Carrying value $ 2,368 $ 2,441 
Upward carrying value changes 167  243 
Downward carrying value changes/impairment (301) (42)
(a)The period-end carrying values reflect cumulative purchases and sales in addition to upward and downward carrying value changes.
(b)The cumulative upward carrying value changes between January 1, 2018 and December 31, 2020 were $708 million.
(c)The cumulative downward carrying value changes/impairment between January 1, 2018 and December 31, 2020 were $(430) million.
(d)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
Included in other assets above is the Firm’s interest in approximately 40 million Visa Class B common shares, recorded
at a nominal carrying value. These shares are subject to certain transfer restrictions currently and will be convertible
into Visa Class A common shares upon final resolution of certain litigation matters involving Visa. The conversion rate
of Visa Class B common shares into Visa Class A common shares is 1.6228 at December 31, 2020, and may be
adjusted by Visa depending on developments related to the litigation matters.
Additional disclosures about the fair value of
financial instruments that are not carried on the
Consolidated balance sheets at fair value
U.S. GAAP requires disclosure of the estimated fair
value of certain financial instruments, which are included
in the following table. However, this table does not
include other items, such as nonfinancial assets,
intangible assets, certain financial instruments, and
customer relationships. In the opinion of management,
these items, in the aggregate, add significant value to
JPMorgan Chase, but their fair value is not disclosed in
this table. 
Financial instruments for which carrying value
approximates fair value
Certain financial instruments that are not carried at fair
value on the Consolidated balance sheets are carried at
amounts that approximate fair value, due to their short-
term nature and generally negligible credit risk. These
instruments include cash and due from banks, deposits
with banks, federal funds sold, securities purchased
under resale agreements and securities borrowed,
short-term receivables and accrued interest receivable,
short-term borrowings, federal funds purchased,
securities loaned and sold under repurchase
agreements, accounts payable, and accrued liabilities.
In addition, U.S. GAAP requires that the fair value of
deposit liabilities with no stated maturity (i.e., demand,
savings and certain money market deposits) be equal to
their carrying value; recognition of the inherent funding
value of these instruments is not permitted.(a)
(b) (d)
(c)
190 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The following table presents by fair value hierarchy classification the carrying values and estimated fair values at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, of financial assets and liabilities, excluding financial instruments that are carried at fair
value on a recurring basis, and their classification within the fair value hierarchy.
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Estimated fair value hierarchy Estimated fair value hierarchy
(in billions)Carrying 
 value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total
estimated 
 fair valueCarrying 
 value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total
estimated 
 fair value
Financial assets
Cash and due from banks$ 24.9 $ 24.9 $ — $ — $ 24.9 $ 21.7 $ 21.7 $ — $ — $ 21.7 
Deposits with banks 502.7 502.7 — — 502.7 241.9 241.9 — — 241.9 
Accrued interest and
accounts receivable 89.4 — 89.3 0.1 89.4 71.3 — 71.2 0.1 71.3 
Federal funds sold and
securities purchased under
resale agreements 58.3 — 58.3 — 58.3 234.6 — 234.6 — 234.6 
Securities borrowed 107.7 — 107.7 — 107.7 133.5 — 133.5 — 133.5 
Investment securities, held-
to-maturity 201.8 53.2 152.3 — 205.5 47.5 0.1 48.8 — 48.9 
Loans, net of allowance for
loan losses 940.1 — 210.9 755.6 966.5 939.5 — 214.1 734.9 949.0 
Other 81.8 — 80.0 1.9 81.9 61.3 — 60.6 0.8 61.4 
Financial liabilities
Deposits $2,129.8 $ — $2,128.9 $ — $2,128.9 $1,533.8 $ — $1,534.1 $ — $1,534.1 
Federal funds purchased
and securities loaned or
sold under repurchase
agreements 59.5 — 59.5 — 59.5 183.1 — 183.1 — 183.1 
Short-term borrowings 28.3 — 28.3 — 28.3 35.0 — 35.0 — 35.0 
Accounts payable and other
liabilities 186.6 — 181.9 4.3 186.2 164.0 0.1 160.0 3.5 163.6 
Beneficial interests issued
by consolidated VIEs 17.5 — 17.6 — 17.6 17.8 — 17.9 — 17.9 
Long-term debt 204.8 — 209.2 3.2 212.4 215.5 — 218.3 3.5 221.8 
(a)Fair value is typically estimated using a discounted cash flow model that incorporates the characteristics of the underlying loans (including
principal, contractual interest rate and contractual fees) and other key inputs, including expected lifetime credit losses, interest rates, prepayment
rates, and primary origination or secondary market spreads. For certain loans, the fair value is measured based on the value of the underlying
collateral. Carrying value of the loan takes into account the loan’s allowance for loan losses, which represents the loan’s expected credit losses
over its remaining expected life. The difference between the estimated fair value and carrying value of a loan is generally attributable to changes
in market interest rates, including credit spreads, market liquidity premiums and other factors that affect the fair value of a loan but do not affect
its carrying value.
The majority of the Firm’s lending-related commitments are not carried at fair value on a recurring basis on the
Consolidated balance sheets. The carrying value and the estimated fair value of these wholesale lending-related
commitments were as follows for the periods indicated.
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Estimated fair value hierarchy Estimated fair value hierarchy
(in billions)Carrying
value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total
estimated
fair valueCarrying
value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total
estimated
fair value
Wholesale lending-
related
commitments $ 2.2 $ — $ — $ 2.1 $ 2.1 $ 1.2 $ — $ — $ 1.9 $ 1.9 
(a)Excludes the current carrying values of the guarantee liability and the offsetting asset, each of which is recognized at fair value at the inception of
the guarantees.
(b)Includes the wholesale allowance for lending-related commitments.
The Firm does not estimate the fair value of consumer off-balance sheet lending-related commitments. In many cases,
the Firm can reduce or cancel these commitments by providing the borrower notice or, in some cases as permitted by
law, without notice. Refer to page 173 of this Note for a further discussion of the valuation of lending-related
commitments.(a)
(a)(b) (a)(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 191
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 3 – Fair value option
The fair value option provides an option to elect fair
value as an alternative measurement for selected
financial assets, financial liabilities, unrecognized firm
commitments, and written loan commitments.
The Firm has elected to measure certain instruments at
fair value for several reasons including to mitigate
income statement volatility caused by the differences
between the measurement basis of elected instruments
(e.g., certain instruments that otherwise would be
accounted for on an accrual basis) and the associated
risk management arrangements that are accounted for
on a fair value basis, as well as to better reflect those
instruments that are managed on a fair value basis.The Firm’s election of fair value includes the following
instruments:
•Loans purchased or originated as part of
securitization warehousing activity, subject to
bifurcation accounting, or managed on a fair value
basis, including lending-related commitments
•Certain securities financing agreements
•Owned beneficial interests in securitized financial
assets that contain embedded credit derivatives,
which would otherwise be required to be separately
accounted for as a derivative instrument
•Structured notes, which are predominantly financial
instruments that contain embedded derivatives, that
are issued as part of client-driven activities
•Certain long-term beneficial interests issued by CIB’s
consolidated securitization trusts where the
underlying assets are carried at fair value
192 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Changes in fair value under the fair value option election
The following table presents the changes in fair value included in the Consolidated statements of income for the years
ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, for items for which the fair value option was elected. The profit and loss
information presented below only includes the financial instruments that were elected to be measured at fair value;
related risk management instruments, which are required to be measured at fair value, are not included in the table.
2020 2019 2018
December 31, (in millions)Principal
transactionsAll other
incomeTotal
changes in
fair value
recordedPrincipal
transactionsAll other
incomeTotal
changes in
fair value
recordedPrincipal
transactionsAll other
incomeTotal
changes in
fair value
recorded
Federal funds sold and
securities purchased under
resale agreements $ 12 $ — $ 12 $ (36)$— $ (36)$ (35)$— $ (35)
Securities borrowed 143 — 143 133 — 133 22 — 22 
Trading assets:
Debt and equity
instruments, excluding
loans 1,546 (1) 1,545 2,482 (1) 2,481 (1,680) 1 (1,679)
Loans reported as trading
 assets:
Changes in instrument-
specific credit risk 135 —  135 248 —  248 15 —  15 
Other changes in fair
value (19) —  (19) (1) —  (1) 28 —  28 
Loans:
Changes in instrument-
specific credit risk 190 7 197 475 2 477 385 1 386 
Other changes in fair
value 470 3,239 3,709 267 1,224 1,491 138 185 323 
Other assets 103 (65) 38 8 6 14 11 (45) (34)
Deposits (726) — (726) (1,730) — (1,730) 181 — 181 
Federal funds purchased
and securities loaned or
sold under repurchase
agreements (6) — (6) (8) — (8) 11 — 11 
Short-term borrowings 294 — 294 (693) — (693) 862 — 862 
Trading liabilities 2 — 2 6 — 6 1 — 1 
Other liabilities (94) — (94) (16) — (16) — — — 
Long-term debt (2,120) (1) (2,121) (6,173) 1 (6,172) 2,695 — 2,695 
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other
assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)Unrealized gains/(losses) due to instrument-specific credit risk (DVA) for liabilities for which the fair value option has been elected are recorded in
OCI and subsequently recorded in principal transactions revenue when realized. Realized gains/(losses) due to instrument-specific credit risk
recorded in principal transactions revenue were $20 million for the year ended December 31,2020 and were not material for the years ended
December 31, 2019 and 2018.
(c)Long-term debt measured at fair value predominantly relates to structured notes. Although the risk associated with the structured notes is actively
managed, the gains/(losses) reported in this table do not include the income statement impact of the risk management instruments used to
manage such risk.
(d)Reported in mortgage fees and related income.
(e)Reported in other income.
(f)Changes in fair value exclude contractual interest, which is included in interest income and interest expense for all instruments other than hybrid
financial instruments. Refer to Note 7 for further information regarding interest income and interest expense.
Determination of instrument-specific credit risk for
items for which the fair value option was elected
The following describes how the gains and losses that
are attributable to changes in instrument-specific credit
risk, were determined.
•Loans and lending-related commitments: For
floating-rate instruments, all changes in value are
attributed to instrument-specific credit risk. For fixed-
rate instruments, an allocation of the changes in
value for the period is made between those changes
in value that are interest rate-related and changes in
value that are credit-related. Allocations are generally
based on an analysis of borrower-specific credit
spread and recovery information, where available, or
benchmarking to similar entities or industries.•Long-term debt: Changes in value attributable to
instrument-specific credit risk were derived principally
from observable changes in the Firm’s credit spread
as observed in the bond market.
•Securities financing agreements: Generally, for these
types of agreements, there is a requirement that
collateral be maintained with a market value equal to
or in excess of the principal amount loaned; as a
result, there would be no adjustment or an immaterial
adjustment for instrument-specific credit risk related
to these agreements.(f) (f) (f)
(d) (d) (d)
(a)
(a)
(a) (d) (d) (d)
(a) (d) (d) (d)
(a) (e) (e) (e)
(b)
(b)
(b)(c) (d) (d)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 193
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Difference between aggregate fair value and aggregate remaining contractual principal balance outstanding
The following table reflects the difference between the aggregate fair value and the aggregate remaining contractual
principal balance outstanding as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, for loans, long-term debt and long-term beneficial
interests for which the fair value option has been elected.
2020 2019
December 31, (in millions)Contractual
principal
outstanding Fair valueFair value
over/(under)
contractual
principal
outstandingContractual
principal
outstanding Fair valueFair value
over/(under)
contractual
principal
outstanding
Loans
Nonaccrual loans
Loans reported as trading assets $ 3,386 $ 555 $ (2,831)$ 2,563 $ 234 $ (2,329)
Loans 1,867 1,507 (360) 964 696 (268)
Subtotal 5,253 2,062 (3,191) 3,527 930 (2,597)
90 or more days past due and government
guaranteed
Loans reported as trading assets — — — — — — 
Loans 328 317 (11) 138 129 (9)
Subtotal 328 317 (11) 138 129 (9)
All other performing loans
Loans reported as trading assets 7,917 6,439 (1,478) 8,288 6,779 (1,509)
Loans 42,022 42,650 628 43,955 44,130 175 
Subtotal 49,939 49,089 (850) 52,243 50,909 (1,334)
Total loans $ 55,520 $ 51,468 $ (4,052)$ 55,908 $ 51,968 $ (3,940)
Long-term debt
Principal-protected debt $ 40,560 $ 40,526 $ (34)$ 40,124 $ 39,246 $ (878)
Nonprincipal-protected debt NA 36,291 NA NA 36,499 NA
Total long-term debt NA $ 76,817 NA NA $ 75,745 NA
Long-term beneficial interests
Nonprincipal-protected debt NA $ 41 NA NA $ 36 NA
Total long-term beneficial interests NA $ 41 NA NA $ 36 NA
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other
assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)These balances are excluded from nonaccrual loans as the loans are insured and/or guaranteed by U.S. government agencies.
(c)There were no performing loans that were ninety days or more past due as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
(d)Remaining contractual principal is not applicable to nonprincipal-protected structured notes and long-term beneficial interests. Unlike principal-
protected structured notes and long-term beneficial interests, for which the Firm is obligated to return a stated amount of principal at maturity,
nonprincipal-protected structured notes and long-term beneficial interests do not obligate the Firm to return a stated amount of principal at
maturity, but for structured notes to return an amount based on the performance of an underlying variable or derivative feature embedded in the
note. However, investors are exposed to the credit risk of the Firm as issuer for both nonprincipal-protected and principal-protected notes.
(e)Where the Firm issues principal-protected zero-coupon or discount notes, the balance reflects the contractual principal payment at maturity or, if
applicable, the contractual principal payment at the Firm’s next call date.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the contractual amount of lending-related commitments for which the fair value option
was elected was $18.1 billion and $8.6 billion, respectively, with a corresponding fair value of $(39) million and $(120)
million, respectively. Refer to Note 28 for further information regarding off-balance sheet lending-related financial
instruments. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(a)
(e) (e)
(d)
(d)
194 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Structured note products by balance sheet classification and risk component
The following table presents the fair value of structured notes, by balance sheet classification and the primary risk type.
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
(in millions)Long-term
debtShort-term
borrowingsDeposits TotalLong-term
debtShort-term
borrowingsDeposits Total
Risk exposure
Interest rate $38,129 $ 65 $5,057 $43,251 $35,470 $ 34 $16,692 $52,196 
Credit 6,409 1,022 — 7,431 5,715 875 — 6,590 
Foreign exchange 3,613 92 — 3,705 3,862 48 5 3,915 
Equity 26,943 5,021 6,893 38,857 29,294 4,852 8,177 42,323 
Commodity 250 13 232 495 472 32 1,454 1,958 
Total structured notes $75,344 $ 6,213 $12,182 $93,739 $74,813 $ 5,841 $26,328 $106,982 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 195
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 4 – Credit risk concentrations
Concentrations of credit risk arise when a number of
clients, counterparties or customers are engaged in
similar business activities or activities in the same
geographic region, or when they have similar economic
features that would cause their ability to meet
contractual obligations to be similarly affected by
changes in economic conditions.
JPMorgan Chase regularly monitors various segments
of its credit portfolios to assess potential credit risk
concentrations and to obtain additional collateral when
deemed necessary and permitted under the Firm’s
agreements. Senior management is significantly
involved in the credit approval and review process, and
risk levels are adjusted as needed to reflect the Firm’s
risk appetite.
In the Firm’s consumer portfolio, concentrations are
managed primarily by product and by U.S. geographic
region, with a key focus on trends and concentrations at
the portfolio level, where potential credit risk
concentrations can be remedied through changes in
underwriting policies and portfolio guidelines. Refer to
Note 12 for additional information on the geographic
composition of the Firm’s consumer loan portfolios. In
the wholesale portfolio, credit risk concentrations are
evaluated primarily by industry and monitored regularly
on both an aggregate portfolio level and on an individual
client or counterparty basis.The Firm’s wholesale exposure is managed through
loan syndications and participations, loan sales,
securitizations, credit derivatives, master netting
agreements, collateral and other risk-reduction
techniques. Refer to Note 12 for additional information
on loans.
The Firm does not believe that its exposure to any
particular loan product or industry segment (e.g., real
estate), or its exposure to residential real estate loans
with high LTV ratios, results in a significant
concentration of credit risk.
Terms of loan products and collateral coverage are
included in the Firm’s assessment when extending
credit and establishing its allowance for loan losses.
196 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The table below presents both on–balance sheet and off–balance sheet consumer and wholesale credit exposure by
the Firm’s three credit portfolio segments as of December 31, 2020 and 2019. The wholesale industry of risk category
is generally based on the client or counterparty’s primary business activity.
In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the Firm reclassified risk-rated loans and lending-related commitments from
the consumer, excluding credit card portfolio segment to the wholesale portfolio segment, to align with the methodology
applied when determining the allowance. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current
presentation. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
2020 2019
Credit
exposureOn-balance sheetOff-balance
sheetCredit
exposureOn-balance sheetOff-balance
sheet December 31, (in millions) Loans Derivatives Loans Derivatives
Consumer , excluding credit card $375,898  $318,579  $ — $ 57,319  $357,986  $317,817  $ — $ 40,169  
Credit card 802,722  144,216  — 658,506  819,644  168,924  — 650,720  
Total consumer-related 1,178,620  462,795  — 715,825  1,177,630  486,741  — 690,889  
Wholesale-related
Real Estate 148,498  118,299  1,385  28,814  150,919  117,709  619 32,591  
Individuals and Individual Entities 122,870  109,746  1,750  11,374  105,027  94,616  694 9,717  
Consumer & Retail 108,437  39,013  2,802  66,622  106,986  36,985  1,424  68,577  
Technology , Media & 
 Telecommunications 72,150  14,687  4,252  53,211  60,033  15,322  2,766  41,945  
Asset Managers 66,573  31,059  9,277  26,237  54,304  24,008  7,160  23,136  
Industrials 66,470  21,143  1,851  43,476  62,483  22,063  878 39,542  
Healthcare 60,118  19,405  3,252  37,461  50,824  17,607  2,078  31,139  
Banks & Finance Cos 54,032  31,004  8,044  14,984  50,786  31,191  5,165  14,430  
Automotive 43,331  17,128  5,995  20,208  35,118  18,844  368 15,906  
Oil & Gas 39,159  11,267  1,643  26,249  41,641  13,101  852 27,688  
State & Municipal Govt 38,286  18,054  2,347  17,885  30,095  13,271  2,000  14,824  
Utilities 30,124  4,874  3,340  21,910  34,843  5,157  2,573  27,113  
Chemicals & Plastics 17,176  4,884  856 11,436  17,499  4,864  459 12,176  
Central Govt 17,025  3,396  12,313  1,316  14,865  2,840  10,477  1,548  
Transportation 16,232  6,566  1,495  8,171  14,497  5,253  715 8,529  
Metals & Mining 15,542  4,854  882 9,806  15,586  5,364  402 9,820  
Insurance 13,141  1,042  2,527  9,572  12,348  1,356  2,282  8,710  
Securities Firms 8,048  469 4,838  2,741  7,381  757 4,507  2,117  
Financial Markets Infrastructure 6,515  19 3,757  2,739  4,121  13 2,482  1,626  
All other 100,713  58,038  7,024  35,651  79,598  51,357  1,865  26,376  
Subtotal 1,044,440  514,947  79,630  449,863  948,954  481,678  49,766  417,510  
Loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value 35,111  35,111  — — 29,201  29,201  — — 
Receivables from customers 47,710  — — — 33,706  — — — 
Total wholesale-related 1,127,261  550,058  79,630  449,863  1,011,861  510,879  49,766  417,510  
Total exposure $2,305,881  $1,012,853  $ 79,630  $1,165,688  $2,189,491  $997,620  $49,766  $1,108,399  
(a)Also includes commercial card lending-related commitments primarily in CB and CIB.
(b)The industry rankings prese nted in the table as of December 31, 2019, are based on the industry ranking s of the corresponding exposures at
December 31, 2020, not actual rankings of such exposures at December 31, 2019.
(c)Individuals and Individual Entities predominantly consists of Wealth Management clients within AWM and includes exposure to personal investment
companies and personal and testamentary trusts.
(d)In addition to the credit risk exposure to states and municipal governments (both U.S. and non-U.S.) at December 31, 2020 and 2019, noted above, the
Firm held: $7.2 billion and $6.5 billion, respectively , of trading assets; $20.4 billion and $29.8 billion, respec tively , of AFS securities; and $12.8 billion and
$4.8 billion, respectively , of HTM securities, issued by U.S. state and municipal governments. Refer to Note 2 and Note 10 for further information.
(e)All other includes: SPEs and Private education and civic organizations, representing approximately 92% and 8%, respectively , at December 31, 2020 and
90% and 10%, respectively , at December 31, 2019 . Refer to Note 14 for more information on exposures to SPEs.
(f)Receivables from customers reflect held-for-investment margin loans to brokerage clients in CIB, CCB and AWM that are collateralized by assets
maintained in the clients’ brokerage accounts (e.g., cash on deposit, liquid and readily marketable debt or equity securities). Because of this
collateralization, no allowance for credit losses is generally held against these receivables. To manage its credit risk the Firm establishes margin
requirements and monitors the required margin levels on an ongoing basis, and requires clients to deposit additional cash or other collateral, or to reduce
positions, when appropriate. These receivables are reported within accrued interest and accounts receivable on the Firm’ s Consolidated balance sheets.
(g)Excludes cash  placed with banks of $516.9  billion and $254.0  billion, at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively , which is predominantly placed with
various central banks, primarily Federal Reserve Banks.
(h)Credit exposure is net of risk participations and excludes the benefit of credit derivatives used in credit portfolio management activities held against
derivative receivables or loans and liquid securities and other cash collateral held against derivative receivables.
(i)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans, which resulted in a
corresponding reclassification of certain of f-balance sheet commitments. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(j)At Dece mber 31, 2020, included $19.2 billion of loans  in Business Banking under the PPP. PPP loans are guaranteed by the SBA. Other than in certain
limited circumstances, the Firm typically does not recognize charge-of fs, classify as nonaccrual nor record an allowance for loan losses on these loans.
(k)Represents lending-related financial instruments.(h)(i) (i)(k) (h)(i) (i)(k) (i) (i)
(j)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)(h)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 197
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 5 – Derivative instruments
Derivative contracts derive their value from underlying
asset prices, indices, reference rates, other inputs or a
combination of these factors and may expose
counterparties to risks and rewards of an underlying
asset or liability without having to initially invest in, own
or exchange the asset or liability. JPMorgan Chase
makes markets in derivatives for clients and also uses
derivatives to hedge or manage its own risk exposures.
Predominantly all of the Firm’s derivatives are entered
into for market-making or risk management purposes.
Market-making derivatives
The majority of the Firm’s derivatives are entered into
for market-making purposes. Clients use derivatives to
mitigate or modify interest rate, credit, foreign exchange,
equity and commodity risks. The Firm actively manages
the risks from its exposure to these derivatives by
entering into other derivative contracts or by purchasing
or selling other financial instruments that partially or fully
offset the exposure from client derivatives.
Risk management derivatives
The Firm manages certain market and credit risk
exposures using derivative instruments, including
derivatives in hedge accounting relationships and other
derivatives that are used to manage risks associated
with specified assets and liabilities.
The Firm generally uses interest rate derivatives to
manage the risk associated with changes in interest
rates. Fixed-rate assets and liabilities appreciate or
depreciate in market value as interest rates change.
Similarly, interest income and expense increase or
decrease as a result of variable-rate assets and
liabilities resetting to current market rates, and as a
result of the repayment and subsequent origination or
issuance of fixed-rate assets and liabilities at current
market rates. Gains and losses on the derivative
instruments related to these assets and liabilities are
expected to substantially offset this variability.
Foreign currency derivatives are used to manage the
foreign exchange risk associated with certain foreign
currency–denominated (i.e., non-U.S. dollar) assets and
liabilities and forecasted transactions, as well as the
Firm’s net investments in certain non-U.S. subsidiaries
or branches whose functional currencies are not the
U.S. dollar. As a result of fluctuations in foreign
currencies, the U.S. dollar–equivalent values of the
foreign currency–denominated assets and liabilities or
the forecasted revenues or expenses increase or
decrease. Gains or losses on the derivative instruments
related to these foreign currency–denominated assets or
liabilities, or forecasted transactions, are expected to
substantially offset this variability.Commodities derivatives are used to manage the price
risk of certain commodities inventories. Gains or losses
on these derivative instruments are expected to
substantially offset the depreciation or appreciation of
the related inventory.
Credit derivatives are used to manage the counterparty
credit risk associated with loans and lending-related
commitments. Credit derivatives compensate the
purchaser when the entity referenced in the contract
experiences a credit event, such as bankruptcy or a
failure to pay an obligation when due. Credit derivatives
primarily consist of CDS. Refer to the Credit derivatives
section on pages 209-211 of this Note for a further
discussion of credit derivatives.
Refer to the risk management derivatives gains and
losses table on page 209 of this Note, and the hedge
accounting gains and losses tables on pages 206-208 of
this Note for more information about risk management
derivatives.
Derivative counterparties and settlement types
The Firm enters into OTC derivatives, which are
negotiated and settled bilaterally with the derivative
counterparty. The Firm also enters into, as principal,
certain ETD such as futures and options, and OTC-
cleared derivative contracts with CCPs. ETD contracts
are generally standardized contracts traded on an
exchange and cleared by the CCP, which is the Firm’s
counterparty from the inception of the transactions.
OTC-cleared derivatives are traded on a bilateral basis
and then novated to the CCP for clearing.
Derivative clearing services
The Firm provides clearing services for clients in which
the Firm acts as a clearing member at certain
exchanges and clearing houses. The Firm does not
reflect the clients’ derivative contracts in its
Consolidated Financial Statements. Refer to Note 28 for
further information on the Firm’s clearing services.
Accounting for derivatives
All free-standing derivatives that the Firm executes for
its own account are required to be recorded on the
Consolidated balance sheets at fair value.
As permitted under U.S. GAAP, the Firm nets derivative
assets and liabilities, and the related cash collateral
receivables and payables, when a legally enforceable
master netting agreement exists between the Firm and
the derivative counterparty. Refer to Note 1 for further
discussion of the offsetting of assets and liabilities. The
accounting for changes in value of a derivative depends
on whether or not the transaction has been designated
and qualifies for hedge accounting. Derivatives that are
not designated as hedges are reported and measured at
fair value through earnings. The tabular disclosures on
pages 202-209 of this Note provide additional
information on the amount of, and reporting for,
derivative assets, liabilities, gains and losses. Refer to
Notes 2 and 3 for a further discussion of derivatives
embedded in structured notes.
198 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Derivatives designated as hedges
The Firm applies hedge accounting to certain
derivatives executed for risk management purposes –
generally interest rate, foreign exchange and commodity
derivatives. However, JPMorgan Chase does not seek
to apply hedge accounting to all of the derivatives
involved in the Firm’s risk management activities. For
example, the Firm does not apply hedge accounting to
purchased CDS used to manage the credit risk of loans
and lending-related commitments, because of the
difficulties in qualifying such contracts as hedges. For
the same reason, the Firm does not apply hedge
accounting to certain interest rate, foreign exchange,
and commodity derivatives used for risk management
purposes.
To qualify for hedge accounting, a derivative must be
highly effective at reducing the risk associated with the
exposure being hedged. In addition, for a derivative to
be designated as a hedge, the risk management
objective and strategy must be documented. Hedge
documentation must identify the derivative hedging
instrument, the asset or liability or forecasted transaction
and type of risk to be hedged, and how the effectiveness
of the derivative is assessed prospectively and
retrospectively. To assess effectiveness, the Firm uses
statistical methods such as regression analysis,
nonstatistical methods such as dollar-value comparisons
of the change in the fair value of the derivative to the
change in the fair value or cash flows of the hedged
item, and qualitative comparisons of critical terms and
the evaluation of any changes in those terms. The
extent to which a derivative has been, and is expected
to continue to be, highly effective at offsetting changes
in the fair value or cash flows of the hedged item must
be assessed and documented at least quarterly. If it is
determined that a derivative is not highly effective at
hedging the designated exposure, hedge accounting is
discontinued.There are three types of hedge accounting designations:
fair value hedges, cash flow hedges and net investment
hedges. JPMorgan Chase uses fair value hedges
primarily to hedge fixed-rate long-term debt, AFS
securities and certain commodities inventories. For
qualifying fair value hedges, the changes in the fair
value of the derivative, and in the value of the hedged
item for the risk being hedged, are recognized in
earnings. Certain amounts excluded from the
assessment of effectiveness are recorded in OCI and
recognized in earnings over the life of the derivative. If
the hedge relationship is terminated, then the
adjustment to the hedged item continues to be reported
as part of the basis of the hedged item, and for
benchmark interest rate hedges, is amortized to
earnings as a yield adjustment. Derivative amounts
affecting earnings are recognized consistent with the
classification of the hedged item – primarily net interest
income and principal transactions revenue.
JPMorgan Chase uses cash flow hedges primarily to
hedge the exposure to variability in forecasted cash
flows from floating-rate assets and liabilities and foreign
currency–denominated revenue and expense. For
qualifying cash flow hedges, changes in the fair value of
the derivative are recorded in OCI and recognized in
earnings as the hedged item affects earnings. Derivative
amounts affecting earnings are recognized consistent
with the classification of the hedged item – primarily
noninterest revenue, net interest income and
compensation expense. If the hedge relationship is
terminated, then the change in value of the derivative
recorded in AOCI is recognized in earnings when the
cash flows that were hedged affect earnings. For hedge
relationships that are discontinued because a forecasted
transaction is expected to not occur according to the
original hedge forecast, any related derivative values
recorded in AOCI are immediately recognized in
earnings.
JPMorgan Chase uses net investment hedges to protect
the value of the Firm’s net investments in certain non-
U.S. subsidiaries or branches whose functional
currencies are not the U.S. dollar. For qualifying net
investment hedges, changes in the fair value of the
derivatives due to changes in spot foreign exchange
rates are recorded in OCI as translation adjustments.
Amounts excluded from the assessment of effectiveness
are recorded directly in earnings.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 199
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The following table outlines the Firm’s primary uses of derivatives and the related hedge accounting designation or
disclosure category.
Type of Derivative Use of DerivativeDesignation and
disclosureAffected
segment or unitPage
reference
Manage specifically identified risk exposures in qualifying hedge accounting relationships:
•Interest rate
 Hedge fixed rate assets and liabilities Fair value hedge Corporate 206-207
•Interest rate Hedge floating-rate assets and liabilities Cash flow hedge Corporate 208
•Foreign exchangeHedge foreign currency-denominated assets and liabilities Fair value hedge Corporate 206-207
•Foreign exchangeHedge foreign currency-denominated forecasted revenue and
expenseCash flow hedge Corporate 208
•Foreign exchangeHedge the value of the Firm’s investments in non-U.S. dollar
functional currency entitiesNet investment hedge Corporate 208
•Commodity Hedge commodity inventory Fair value hedge CIB 206-207
Manage specifically identified risk exposures not designated in qualifying hedge accounting relationships:
•Interest rate Manage the risk associated with mortgage commitments,
warehouse loans and MSRsSpecified risk managementCCB 209
•Credit Manage the credit risk associated with wholesale lending
exposuresSpecified risk managementCIB 209
•Interest rate and
foreign exchangeManage the risk associated with certain other specified assets
and liabilitiesSpecified risk managementCorporate 209
Market-making derivatives and other activities:
•Various Market-making and related risk management Market-making and otherCIB 209
•Various Other derivatives Market-making and otherCIB, AWM,
Corporate209
200 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Notional amount of derivative contracts
The following table summarizes the notional amount of
derivative contracts outstanding as of December 31,
2020 and 2019.
Notional amounts
December 31, (in billions) 2020 2019
Interest rate contracts
Swaps $ 20,986 $ 21,228 
Futures and forwards 3,057 3,152 
Written options 3,375 3,938 
Purchased options 3,675 4,361 
Total interest rate contracts 31,093 32,679 
Credit derivatives 1,201 1,242 
Foreign exchange contracts
Cross-currency swaps 3,924 3,604 
Spot, futures and forwards 6,871 5,577 
Written options 830 700 
Purchased options 825 718 
Total foreign exchange contracts 12,450 10,599 
Equity contracts
Swaps 448 406 
Futures and forwards 140 142 
Written options 676 646 
Purchased options 621 611 
Total equity contracts 1,885 1,805 
Commodity contracts
Swaps 138 147 
Spot, futures and forwards 198 211 
Written options 124 135 
Purchased options 105 124 
Total commodity contracts 565 617 
Total derivative notional amounts$ 47,194 $ 46,942 
(a)     Refer to the Credit derivatives discussion on pages 209-211 for
more information on volumes and types of credit derivative
contracts.
(b)     Represents the sum of gross long and gross short third-party
notional derivative contracts.
While the notional amounts disclosed above give an
indication of the volume of the Firm’s derivatives activity,
the notional amounts significantly exceed, in the Firm’s
view, the possible losses that could arise from such
transactions. For most derivative contracts, the notional
amount is not exchanged; it is simply a reference
amount used to calculate payments.(b)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 201
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Impact of derivatives on the Consolidated balance sheets
The following table summarizes information on derivative receivables and payables (before and after netting
adjustments) that are reflected on the Firm’s Consolidated balance sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, by
accounting designation (e.g., whether the derivatives were designated in qualifying hedge accounting relationships or
not) and contract type.
Free-standing derivative receivables and payables
Gross derivative receivables Gross derivative payables
December 31, 2020
(in millions)Not
designated
as hedgesDesignated as
hedgesTotal
derivative
receivablesNet derivative
receivablesNot
designated
as hedgesDesignated
as hedgesTotal
derivative
payablesNet
derivative
payables
Trading assets and
liabilities
Interest rate $390,659 $ 831 $391,490 $ 35,725 $353,627 $ — $353,627 $13,012 
Credit 13,503 — 13,503 680 15,192 — 15,192 1,995 
Foreign exchange 205,359 901 206,260 15,781 214,229 1,697 215,926 21,433 
Equity 74,798 — 74,798 20,673 81,413 — 81,413 25,898 
Commodity 20,579 924 21,503 6,771 20,834 1,895 22,729 8,285 
Total fair value of
trading assets and
liabilities $704,898 $ 2,656 $707,554 $ 79,630 $685,295 $ 3,592 $688,887 $70,623 
Gross derivative receivables Gross derivative payables
December 31, 2019
(in millions)Not
designated
as hedgesDesignated as
hedgesTotal
derivative
receivablesNet derivative
receivablesNot
designated
as hedgesDesignated
as hedgesTotal
derivative
payablesNet
derivative
payables
Trading assets and
liabilities
Interest rate $312,451 $ 843 $313,294 $ 27,421 $279,272 $ 1 $279,273 $ 8,603 
Credit 14,876 — 14,876 701 15,121 — 15,121 1,652 
Foreign exchange 138,179 308 138,487 9,005 144,125 983 145,108 13,158 
Equity 45,727 — 45,727 6,477 52,741 — 52,741 12,537 
Commodity 16,914 328 17,242 6,162 19,736 149 19,885 7,758 
Total fair value of
trading assets and
liabilities $528,147 $ 1,479 $529,626 $ 49,766 $510,995 $ 1,133 $512,128 $43,708 
(a)Balances exclude structured notes for which the fair value option has been elected. Refer to Note 3 for further information.
(b)As permitted under U.S. GAAP, the Firm has elected to net derivative receivables and derivative payables and the related cash collateral
receivables and payables when a legally enforceable master netting agreement exists.(a)
(b) (b)
(b) (b)
202 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Derivatives netting
The following tables present, as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, gross and net derivative receivables and payables by
contract and settlement type. Derivative receivables and payables, as well as the related cash collateral from the same
counterparty, have been netted on the Consolidated balance sheets where the Firm has obtained an appropriate legal
opinion with respect to the master netting agreement. Where such a legal opinion has not been either sought or
obtained, amounts are not eligible for netting on the Consolidated balance sheets, and those derivative receivables and
payables are shown separately in the tables below.
In addition to the cash collateral received and transferred that is presented on a net basis with derivative receivables
and payables, the Firm receives and transfers additional collateral (financial instruments and cash). These amounts
mitigate counterparty credit risk associated with the Firm’s derivative instruments, but are not eligible for net
presentation:
•collateral that consists of liquid securities and other cash collateral held at third-party custodians, which are shown
separately as “Collateral not nettable on the Consolidated balance sheets” in the tables below, up to the fair value
exposure amount. Liquid securities represent high quality liquid assets as defined in the LCR rule;
•the amount of collateral held or transferred that exceeds the fair value exposure at the individual counterparty level,
as of the date presented, which is excluded from the tables below; and
•collateral held or transferred that relates to derivative receivables or payables where an appropriate legal opinion has
not been either sought or obtained with respect to the master netting agreement, which is excluded from the tables
below.
2020 2019
December 31, (in millions)Gross
derivative
receivablesAmounts
netted on the
Consolidated
balance sheetsNet
derivative
receivablesGross
derivative
receivablesAmounts
netted on the
Consolidated
balance sheetsNet
 derivative
receivables
U.S. GAAP nettable derivative receivables
Interest rate contracts:
OTC $ 367,056 $(337,451)$ 29,605 $299,205 $(276,255)$22,950 
OTC–cleared 18,340 (17,919) 421 9,442 (9,360) 82 
Exchange-traded 554 (395) 159 347 (258) 89 
Total interest rate contracts 385,950 (355,765) 30,185 308,994 (285,873) 23,121 
Credit contracts:
OTC 9,052 (8,514) 538 10,743 (10,317) 426 
OTC–cleared 4,326 (4,309) 17 3,864 (3,858) 6 
Total credit contracts 13,378 (12,823) 555 14,607 (14,175) 432 
Foreign exchange contracts:
OTC 201,349 (189,655) 11,694 136,252 (129,324) 6,928 
OTC–cleared 834 (819) 15 185 (152) 33 
Exchange-traded 35 (5) 30 10 (6) 4 
Total foreign exchange contracts 202,218 (190,479) 11,739 136,447 (129,482) 6,965 
Equity contracts:
OTC 34,030 (27,374) 6,656 23,106 (20,820) 2,286 
Exchange-traded 28,294 (26,751) 1,543 19,654 (18,430) 1,224 
Total equity contracts 62,324 (54,125) 8,199 42,760 (39,250) 3,510 
Commodity contracts:
OTC 10,924 (7,901) 3,023 7,093 (5,149) 1,944 
OTC–cleared 20 (20) — 28 (28) — 
Exchange-traded 6,833 (6,811) 22 6,154 (5,903) 251 
Total commodity contracts 17,777 (14,732) 3,045 13,275 (11,080) 2,195 
Derivative receivables with appropriate legal
opinion 681,647 (627,924) 53,723 516,083 (479,860) 36,223 
Derivative receivables where an appropriate
legal opinion has not been either sought or
obtained 25,907 25,907 13,543 13,543 
Total derivative receivables recognized on the
Consolidated balance sheets $ 707,554 $ 79,630 $529,626 $49,766 
Collateral not nettable on the Consolidated
balance sheets (14,806) (13,052)
Net amounts $ 64,824 $36,714 (a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(d) (d)
(b)(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 203
Notes to consolidated financial statements
2020 2019
December 31, (in millions)Gross
derivative
payablesAmounts
netted on the
Consolidated
balance sheetsNet
derivative
payablesGross
derivative
payablesAmounts
netted on the
Consolidated
balance sheetsNet
 derivative
payables
U.S. GAAP nettable derivative payables
Interest rate contracts:
OTC $ 331,854 $(320,780)$ 11,074 $267,311 $(260,229)$7,082 
OTC–cleared 19,710 (19,494) 216 10,217 (10,138) 79 
Exchange-traded 358 (341) 17 365 (303) 62 
Total interest rate contracts 351,922 (340,615) 11,307 277,893 (270,670) 7,223 
Credit contracts:
OTC 10,671 (9,141) 1,530 11,570 (10,080) 1,490 
OTC–cleared 4,075 (4,056) 19 3,390 (3,389) 1 
Total credit contracts 14,746 (13,197) 1,549 14,960 (13,469) 1,491 
Foreign exchange contracts:
OTC 210,803 (193,672) 17,131 142,360 (131,792) 10,568 
OTC–cleared 836 (819) 17 186 (152) 34 
Exchange-traded 34 (2) 32 12 (6) 6 
Total foreign exchange contracts 211,673 (194,493) 17,180 142,558 (131,950) 10,608 
Equity contracts:
OTC 35,330 (28,763) 6,567 27,594 (21,778) 5,816 
Exchange-traded 34,491 (26,752) 7,739 20,216 (18,426) 1,790 
Total equity contracts 69,821 (55,515) 14,306 47,810 (40,204) 7,606 
Commodity contracts:
OTC 10,365 (7,544) 2,821 8,714 (6,235) 2,479 
OTC–cleared 32 (32) — 30 (30) — 
Exchange-traded 7,391 (6,868) 523 6,012 (5,862) 150 
Total commodity contracts 17,788 (14,444) 3,344 14,756 (12,127) 2,629 
Derivative payables with appropriate legal
opinion 665,950 (618,264) 47,686 497,977 (468,420) 29,557 
Derivative payables where an appropriate legal
opinion has not been either sought or
obtained 22,937 22,937 14,151 14,151 
Total derivative payables recognized on the
Consolidated balance sheets $ 688,887 $ 70,623 $512,128 $43,708 
Collateral not nettable on the Consolidated
balance sheets (11,964) (6,960)
Net amounts $ 58,659 $36,748 
(a)Exchange-traded derivative balances that relate to futures contracts are settled daily.
(b)Includes liquid securities and other cash collateral held at third-party custodians related to derivative instruments where an appropriate legal
opinion has been obtained. For some counterparties, the collateral amounts of financial instruments may exceed the derivative receivables and
derivative payables balances. Where this is the case, the total amount reported is limited to the net derivative receivables and net derivative
payables balances with that counterparty. In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm refined its approach for disclosing additional collateral held by
the Firm that may be used as security when the fair value of the client’s exposure is in the Firm’s favor. Prior-period amounts have been revised
to conform with the current presentation.
(c)Derivative collateral relates only to OTC and OTC-cleared derivative instruments.
(d)Net derivatives receivable included cash collateral netted of $88.0 billion and $65.9 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Net
derivatives payable included cash collateral netted of $78.4 billion and $54.4 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Derivative cash
collateral relates to OTC and OTC-cleared derivative instruments.(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(d) (d)
(b)(c)
204 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Liquidity risk and credit-related contingent features
In addition to the specific market risks introduced by each derivative contract type, derivatives expose JPMorgan Chase
to credit risk — the risk that derivative counterparties may fail to meet their payment obligations under the derivative
contracts and the collateral, if any, held by the Firm proves to be of insufficient value to cover the payment obligation. It
is the policy of JPMorgan Chase to actively pursue, where possible, the use of legally enforceable master netting
arrangements and collateral agreements to mitigate derivative counterparty credit risk inherent in derivative
receivables.
While derivative receivables expose the Firm to credit risk, derivative payables expose the Firm to liquidity risk, as the
derivative contracts typically require the Firm to post cash or securities collateral with counterparties as the fair value of
the contracts moves in the counterparties’ favor or upon specified downgrades in the Firm’s and its subsidiaries’
respective credit ratings. Certain derivative contracts also provide for termination of the contract, generally upon a
downgrade of either the Firm or the counterparty, at the fair value of the derivative contracts. The following table shows
the aggregate fair value of net derivative payables related to OTC and OTC-cleared derivatives that contain contingent
collateral or termination features that may be triggered upon a ratings downgrade, and the associated collateral the
Firm has posted in the normal course of business, at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
OTC and OTC-cleared derivative payables containing downgrade triggers
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Aggregate fair value of net derivative payables $ 27,712 $ 14,819 
Collateral posted 26,289 13,329 
The following table shows the impact of a single-notch and two-notch downgrade of the long-term issuer ratings of
JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its subsidiaries, predominantly JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., at December 31, 2020 and
2019, related to OTC and OTC-cleared derivative contracts with contingent collateral or termination features that may
be triggered upon a ratings downgrade. Derivatives contracts generally require additional collateral to be posted or
terminations to be triggered when the predefined threshold rating is breached. A downgrade by a single rating agency
that does not result in a rating lower than a preexisting corresponding rating provided by another major rating agency
will generally not result in additional collateral (except in certain instances in which additional initial margin may be
required upon a ratings downgrade), nor in termination payments requirements. The liquidity impact in the table is
calculated based upon a downgrade below the lowest current rating of the rating agencies referred to in the derivative
contract.
Liquidity impact of downgrade triggers on OTC and OTC-cleared derivatives
2020 2019
December 31, (in millions)Single-notch
downgradeTwo-notch
downgradeSingle-notch
downgradeTwo-notch
downgrade
Amount of additional collateral to be posted upon downgrade
$ 119 $ 1,243 $ 189 $ 1,467 
Amount required to settle contracts with termination triggers upon downgrade
153 2,449 104 1,398 
(a)Includes the additional collateral to be posted for initial margin.
(b)Amounts represent fair values of derivative payables, and do not reflect collateral posted.
Derivatives executed in contemplation of a sale of the underlying financial asset
In certain instances the Firm enters into transactions in which it transfers financial assets but maintains the economic
exposure to the transferred assets by entering into a derivative with the same counterparty in contemplation of the
initial transfer. The Firm generally accounts for such transfers as collateralized financing transactions as described in
Note 11, but in limited circumstances they may qualify to be accounted for as a sale and a derivative under U.S. GAAP.
The amount of such transfers accounted for as a sale where the associated derivative was outstanding was not
material at both December 31, 2020 and 2019.(a)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 205
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Impact of derivatives on the Consolidated statements of income
The following tables provide information related to gains and losses recorded on derivatives based on their hedge
accounting
designation or purpose.
Fair value hedge gains and losses
The following tables present derivative instruments, by contract type, used in fair value hedge accounting relationships,
as well as pre-tax gains/(losses) recorded on such derivatives and the related hedged items for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The Firm includes gains/(losses) on the hedging derivative in the
same line item in the Consolidated statements of income as the related hedged item.
Gains/(losses) recorded in incomeIncome statement impact of 
 excluded components OCI impact
Year ended December 31, 2020
 (in millions) DerivativesHedged itemsIncome
statement
impactAmortization
approachChanges in fair
valueDerivatives -
Gains/(losses)
recorded in OCI
Contract type
Interest rate $ 2,962 $ (1,889)$ 1,073 $ — $ 1,093 $ — 
Foreign exchange 793 (619) 174 (457) 174 25 
Commodity (2,507) 2,650 143 — 137 — 
Total $ 1,248 $ 142 $ 1,390 $ (457)$ 1,404 $ 25 
Gains/(losses) recorded in incomeIncome statement impact of
excluded components OCI impact
Year ended December 31, 2019
 (in millions) DerivativesHedged itemsIncome
statement
impactAmortization
approachChanges in fair
valueDerivatives -
Gains/(losses)
recorded in OCI
Contract type
Interest rate $ 3,204 $ (2,373)$ 831 $ — $ 828 $ — 
Foreign exchange 154 328 482 (866) 482 39 
Commodity (77) 148 71 — 63 — 
Total $ 3,281 $ (1,897)$ 1,384 $ (866)$ 1,373 $ 39 
Gains/(losses) recorded in incomeIncome statement impact of
excluded components OCI impact
Year ended December 31, 2018
 (in millions) DerivativesHedged itemsIncome
statement
impactAmortization
approachChanges in fair
valueDerivatives -
Gains/(losses)
recorded in OCI
Contract type
Interest rate $ (1,145)$ 1,782 $ 637 $ — $ 623 $ — 
Foreign exchange 1,092 (616) 476 (566) 476 (140)
Commodity 789 (754) 35 — 26 — 
Total $ 736 $ 412 $ 1,148 $ (566)$ 1,125 $ (140)
(a)Primarily consists of hedges of the benchmark (e.g., London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”)) interest rate risk of fixed-rate long-term debt and
AFS securities. Gains and losses were recorded in net interest income.
(b)Excludes the amortization expense associated with the inception hedge accounting adjustment applied to the hedged item. This expense is
recorded in net interest income and substantially offsets the income statement impact of the excluded components. Also excludes the accrual of
interest on interest rate swaps and the related hedged items.
(c)Primarily consists of hedges of the foreign currency risk of long-term debt and AFS securities for changes in spot foreign currency rates. Gains
and losses related to the derivatives and the hedged items due to changes in foreign currency rates and the income statement impact of excluded
components were recorded primarily in principal transactions revenue and net interest income.
(d)Consists of overall fair value hedges of physical commodities inventories that are generally carried at the lower of cost or net realizable value (net
realizable value approximates fair value). Gains and losses were recorded in principal transactions revenue.
(e)The assessment of hedge effectiveness excludes certain components of the changes in fair values of the derivatives and hedged items such as
forward points on foreign exchange forward contracts, time values and cross-currency basis spreads. Excluded components may impact earnings
either through amortization of the initial amount over the life of the derivative or through fair value changes recognized in the current period.
(f)Represents the change in value of amounts excluded from the assessment of effectiveness under the amortization approach, predominantly
cross-currency basis spreads. The amount excluded at inception of the hedge is recognized in earnings over the life of the derivative.(e)
(f)
(a)(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(a)(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(a)(b)
(c)
(d)
206 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the following amounts were recorded on the Consolidated balance sheets related
to certain cumulative fair value hedge basis adjustments that are expected to reverse through the income statement in
future periods as an adjustment to yield.
Carrying amount
of the hedged
itemsCumulative amount of fair value hedging adjustments
included in the carrying amount of hedged items:
December 31, 2020
 (in millions)Active hedging
relationshipsDiscontinued
hedging
relationships Total
Assets
Investment securities - AFS $ 139,684 $ 3,572 $ 847 $ 4,419 
Liabilities
Long-term debt $ 177,611 $ 3,194 $ 11,473 $ 14,667 
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs 746 — (3) (3)
Carrying amount
of the hedged
itemsCumulative amount of fair value hedging adjustments
included in the carrying amount of hedged items:
December 31, 2019
 (in millions)Active hedging
relationshipsDiscontinued
hedging
relationships Total
Assets
Investment securities - AFS $ 125,860 $ 2,110 $ 278 $ 2,388 
Liabilities
Long-term debt $ 157,545 $ 6,719 $ 161 $ 6,880 
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs 2,365 — (8) (8)
(a)Excludes physical commodities with a carrying value of $11.5 billion and $6.5 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, to which the
Firm applies fair value hedge accounting. As a result of the application of hedge accounting, these inventories are carried at fair value, thus
recognizing unrealized gains and losses in current periods. Since the Firm exits these positions at fair value, there is no incremental impact to net
income in future periods.
(b)Excludes hedged items where only foreign currency risk is the designated hedged risk, as basis adjustments related to foreign currency hedges
will not reverse through the income statement in future periods. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the carrying amount excluded for AFS
securities is $14.5 billion and $14.9 billion, respectively, and for long-term debt is $6.6 billion and $2.8 billion, respectively.
(c)Carrying amount represents the amortized cost, net of allowance if applicable. Refer to Note 10 for additional information.
(d)Represents basis adjustments existing on the balance sheet date associated with hedged items that have been de-designated from qualifying fair
value hedging relationships.
(e)Positive amounts related to assets represent cumulative fair value hedge basis adjustments that will reduce net interest income in future periods.
Positive (negative) amounts related to liabilities represent cumulative fair value hedge basis adjustments that will increase (reduce) net interest
income in future periods.(a)(b) (d)(e)
(c)
(a)(b) (d)(e)
(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 207
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Cash flow hedge gains and losses
The following tables present derivative instruments, by contract type, used in cash flow hedge accounting relationships,
and the pre-tax gains/(losses) recorded on such derivatives, for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively. The Firm includes the gains/(losses) on the hedging derivative in the same line item in the Consolidated
statements of income as the change in cash flows on the related hedged item.
Derivatives gains/(losses) recorded in income and other
comprehensive income/(loss)
Year ended December 31, 2020
(in millions)Amounts
reclassified from
AOCI to incomeAmounts recorded
in OCITotal change
in OCI
for period
Contract type
Interest rate $ 570 $ 3,582 $ 3,012 
Foreign exchange — 41 41 
Total $ 570 $ 3,623 $ 3,053 
Derivatives gains/(losses) recorded in income and other
comprehensive income/(loss)
Year ended December 31, 2019
(in millions)Amounts
reclassified from
AOCI to incomeAmounts recorded
in OCITotal change 
 in OCI 
 for period
Contract type
Interest rate $ (28)$ (3)$ 25 
Foreign exchange (75) 125 200 
Total $ (103)$ 122 $ 225 
Derivatives gains/(losses) recorded in income and other
comprehensive income/(loss)
Year ended December 31, 2018
(in millions)Amounts
reclassified from
AOCI to incomeAmounts recorded
in OCITotal change 
 in OCI 
 for period
Contract type
Interest rate $ 44 $ (44)$ (88)
Foreign exchange (26) (201) (175)
Total $ 18 $ (245)$ (263)
(a)Primarily consists of hedges of LIBOR-indexed floating-rate assets and floating-rate liabilities. Gains and losses were recorded in net interest
income.
(b)Primarily consists of hedges of the foreign currency risk of non-U.S. dollar-denominated revenue and expense. The income statement
classification of gains and losses follows the hedged item – primarily noninterest revenue and compensation expense.
The Firm did not experience any forecasted transactions that failed to occur for the years ended 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Over the next 12 months, the Firm expects that approximately $818 million (after-tax) of net gains recorded in AOCI at
December 31, 2020, related to cash flow hedges will be recognized in income. For cash flow hedges that have been
terminated, the maximum length of time over which the derivative results recorded in AOCI will be recognized in
earnings is approximately nine years, corresponding to the timing of the originally hedged forecasted cash flows. For
open cash flow hedges, the maximum length of time over which forecasted transactions are hedged is approximately
seven years. The Firm’s longer-dated forecasted transactions relate to core lending and borrowing activities.
Net investment hedge gains and losses
The following table presents hedging instruments, by contract type, that were used in net investment hedge accounting
relationships, and the pre-tax gains/(losses) recorded on such instruments for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018.
2020 2019 2018
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions)Amounts
recorded in
incomeAmounts
recorded in 
 OCIAmounts
recorded in
incomeAmounts
recorded in
 OCIAmounts
recorded in
incomeAmounts
recorded in
 OCI
Foreign exchange derivatives $(122) $(1,408) $72 $64 $11 $1,219
(a)Certain components of hedging derivatives are permitted to be excluded from the assessment of hedge effectiveness, such as forward points on
foreign exchange forward contracts. The Firm elects to record changes in fair value of these amounts directly in other income.
(b)Excludes amounts reclassified from AOCI to income on the sale or liquidation of hedged entities. The Firm reclassified net pre-tax gains/(losses)
of $3 million and $18 million to other income, and $(17) million to other expense related to the liquidation of certain legal entities during the years
ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. Refer to Note 24 for further information.(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(a)(b) (a)(b) (a)(b)
208 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Gains and losses on derivatives used for specified risk
management purposes
The following table presents pre-tax gains/(losses)
recorded on a limited number of derivatives, not
designated in hedge accounting relationships, that are
used to manage risks associated with certain specified
assets and liabilities, including certain risks arising from
mortgage commitments, warehouse loans, MSRs,
wholesale lending exposures, and foreign currency
denominated assets and liabilities.
Derivatives gains/(losses) 
 recorded in income
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Contract type
Interest rate $ 2,994 $ 1,491 $ 79 
Credit (176) (30) (21)
Foreign exchange 43 (5) 117 
Total $ 2,861 $ 1,456 $ 175 
(a)Primarily represents interest rate derivatives used to hedge the
interest rate risk inherent in mortgage commitments, warehouse
loans and MSRs, as well as written commitments to originate
warehouse loans. Gains and losses were recorded predominantly
in mortgage fees and related income.
(b)Relates to credit derivatives used to mitigate credit risk associated
with lending exposures in the Firm’s wholesale businesses. These
derivatives do not include credit derivatives used to mitigate
counterparty credit risk arising from derivative receivables, which
is included in gains and losses on derivatives related to market-
making activities and other derivatives. Gains and losses were
recorded in principal transactions revenue.
(c)Primarily relates to derivatives used to mitigate foreign exchange
risk of specified foreign currency-denominated assets and
liabilities. Gains and losses were recorded in principal transactions
revenue.
Gains and losses on derivatives related to market-
making activities and other derivatives
The Firm makes markets in derivatives in order to meet
the needs of customers and uses derivatives to manage
certain risks associated with net open risk positions from
its market-making activities, including the counterparty
credit risk arising from derivative receivables. All
derivatives not included in the hedge accounting or
specified risk management categories above are
included in this category. Gains and losses on these
derivatives are primarily recorded in principal
transactions revenue. Refer to Note 6 for information on
principal transactions revenue.Credit derivatives
Credit derivatives are financial instruments whose value
is derived from the credit risk associated with the debt of
a third-party issuer (the reference entity) and which
allow one party (the protection purchaser) to transfer
that risk to another party (the protection seller). Credit
derivatives expose the protection purchaser to the
creditworthiness of the protection seller, as the
protection seller is required to make payments under the
contract when the reference entity experiences a credit
event, such as a bankruptcy, a failure to pay its
obligation or a restructuring. The seller of credit
protection receives a premium for providing protection
but has the risk that the underlying instrument
referenced in the contract will be subject to a credit
event.
The Firm is both a purchaser and seller of protection in
the credit derivatives market and uses these derivatives
for two primary purposes. First, in its capacity as a
market-maker, the Firm actively manages a portfolio of
credit derivatives by purchasing and selling credit
protection, predominantly on corporate debt obligations,
to meet the needs of customers. Second, as an end-
user, the Firm uses credit derivatives to manage credit
risk associated with lending exposures (loans and
unfunded commitments) and derivatives counterparty
exposures in the Firm’s wholesale businesses, and to
manage the credit risk arising from certain financial
instruments in the Firm’s market-making businesses.
Following is a summary of various types of credit
derivatives.(a)
(b)
(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 209
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Credit default swaps
Credit derivatives may reference the credit of either a
single reference entity (“single-name”) or a broad-based
index. The Firm purchases and sells protection on both
single- name and index-reference obligations. Single-
name CDS and index CDS contracts are either OTC or
OTC-cleared derivative contracts. Single-name CDS are
used to manage the default risk of a single reference
entity, while index CDS contracts are used to manage
the credit risk associated with the broader credit markets
or credit market segments. Like the S&P 500 and other
market indices, a CDS index consists of a portfolio of
CDS across many reference entities. New series of CDS
indices are periodically established with a new
underlying portfolio of reference entities to reflect
changes in the credit markets. If one of the reference
entities in the index experiences a credit event, then the
reference entity that defaulted is removed from the
index. CDS can also be referenced against specific
portfolios of reference names or against customized
exposure levels based on specific client demands: for
example, to provide protection against the first $1 million
of realized credit losses in a $10 million portfolio of
exposure. Such structures are commonly known as
tranche CDS.
For both single-name CDS contracts and index CDS
contracts, upon the occurrence of a credit event, under
the terms of a CDS contract neither party to the CDS
contract has recourse to the reference entity. The
protection purchaser has recourse to the protection
seller for the difference between the face value of the
CDS contract and the fair value of the reference
obligation at settlement of the credit derivative contract,
also known as the recovery value. The protection
purchaser does not need to hold the debt instrument of
the underlying reference entity in order to receive
amounts due under the CDS contract when a credit
event occurs.Credit-related notes
A credit-related note is a funded credit derivative where
the issuer of the credit-related note purchases from the
note investor credit protection on a reference entity or
an index. Under the contract, the investor pays the
issuer the par value of the note at the inception of the
transaction, and in return, the issuer pays periodic
payments to the investor, based on the credit risk of the
referenced entity. The issuer also repays the investor
the par value of the note at maturity unless the
reference entity (or one of the entities that makes up a
reference index) experiences a specified credit event. If
a credit event occurs, the issuer is not obligated to repay
the par value of the note, but rather, the issuer pays the
investor the difference between the par value of the note
and the fair value of the defaulted reference obligation at
the time of settlement. Neither party to the credit-related
note has recourse to the defaulting reference entity.
The following tables present a summary of the notional
amounts of credit derivatives and credit-related notes
the Firm sold and purchased as of December 31, 2020
and 2019. Upon a credit event, the Firm as a seller of
protection would typically pay out only a percentage of
the full notional amount of net protection sold, as the
amount actually required to be paid on the contracts
takes into account the recovery value of the reference
obligation at the time of settlement. The Firm manages
the credit risk on contracts to sell protection by
purchasing protection with identical or similar underlying
reference entities. Other purchased protection
referenced in the following tables includes credit
derivatives bought on related, but not identical,
reference positions (including indices, portfolio coverage
and other reference points) as well as protection
purchased through credit-related notes.
210 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The Firm does not use notional amounts of credit derivatives as the primary measure of risk management for such
derivatives, because the notional amount does not take into account the probability of the occurrence of a credit event,
the recovery value of the reference obligation, or related cash instruments and economic hedges, each of which
reduces, in the Firm’s view, the risks associated with such derivatives.
Total credit derivatives and credit-related notes
Maximum payout/Notional amount
Protection soldProtection purchased
with identical
underlyingsNet protection
(sold)/purchasedOther
protection
purchased December 31, 2020 (in millions)
Credit derivatives
Credit default swaps $ (535,094) $ 554,565 $ 19,471 $ 4,001 
Other credit derivatives (40,084) 57,344 17,260 9,415 
Total credit derivatives (575,178) 611,909 36,731 13,416 
Credit-related notes — — — 10,248 
Total $ (575,178) $ 611,909 $ 36,731 $ 23,664 
Maximum payout/Notional amount
Protection soldProtection purchased
with identical
underlyingsNet protection
(sold)/purchasedOther
protection
purchased December 31, 2019 (in millions)
Credit derivatives
Credit default swaps $ (562,338) $ 571,892 $ 9,554 $ 3,936 
Other credit derivatives (50,395) 46,541 (3,854) 7,364 
Total credit derivatives (612,733) 618,433 5,700 11,300 
Credit-related notes — — — 9,606 
Total $ (612,733) $ 618,433 $ 5,700 $ 20,906 
(a)Other credit derivatives predominantly consist of credit swap options and total return swaps.
(b)Represents the total notional amount of protection purchased where the underlying reference instrument is identical to the reference instrument
on protection sold; the notional amount of protection purchased for each individual identical underlying reference instrument may be greater or
lower than the notional amount of protection sold.
(c)Does not take into account the fair value of the reference obligation at the time of settlement, which would generally reduce the amount the seller
of protection pays to the buyer of protection in determining settlement value.
(d)Represents protection purchased by the Firm on referenced instruments (single-name, portfolio or index) where the Firm has not sold any
protection on the identical reference instrument.
(e)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
The following tables summarize the notional amounts by the ratings, maturity profile, and total fair value, of credit
derivatives and credit-related notes as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, where JPMorgan Chase is the seller of
protection. The maturity profile is based on the remaining contractual maturity of the credit derivative contracts. The
ratings profile is based on the rating of the reference entity on which the credit derivative contract is based. The ratings
and maturity profile of credit derivatives and credit-related notes where JPMorgan Chase is the purchaser of protection
are comparable to the profile reflected below.
Protection sold – credit derivatives and credit-related notes ratings/maturity profile
December 31, 2020
(in millions) <1 year 1–5 years >5 yearsTotal notional
amountFair value of
receivablesFair value of
payablesNet fair
value
Risk rating of reference
entity
Investment-grade $(93,905) $(307,648) $(35,326) $ (436,879) $ 5,521 $ (835) $4,686 
Noninvestment-grade (31,809) (97,337) (9,153) (138,299) 3,953 (2,542) 1,411 
Total $(125,714) $(404,985) $(44,479) $ (575,178) $ 9,474 $ (3,377) $6,097 
December 31, 2019
 (in millions) <1 year 1–5 years >5 yearsTotal notional
amountFair value of
receivablesFair value of
payablesNet fair
value
Risk rating of reference
entity
Investment-grade $(119,788) $(311,407) $(42,129) $ (473,324) $ 6,168 $ (901) $5,267 
Noninvestment-grade (41,799) (87,769) (9,841) (139,409) 4,287 (2,817) 1,470 
Total $(161,587) $(399,176) $(51,970) $ (612,733) $ 10,455 $ (3,718) $6,737 
(a)The ratings scale is primarily based on external credit ratings defined by S&P and Moody’s.
(b)Amounts are shown on a gross basis, before the benefit of legally enforceable master netting agreements including cash collateral netting.
(c)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.(b) (c) (d)
(a)
(b) (c) (d)
(a) (e) (e)
(a)
(b) (b)
(c) (b)(c) (b)(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 211
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 6 – Noninterest revenue and noninterest expense
Noninterest revenue
The Firm records noninterest revenue from certain
contracts with customers in investment banking fees,
deposit-related fees, asset management, administration,
and commissions, and components of card income. The
related contracts are often terminable on demand and
the Firm has no remaining obligation to deliver future
services. For arrangements with a fixed term, the Firm
may commit to deliver services in the future. Revenue
associated with these remaining performance
obligations typically depends on the occurrence of future
events or underlying asset values, and is not recognized
until the outcome of those events or values are known.
Investment banking fees
This revenue category includes debt and equity
underwriting and advisory fees. As an underwriter, the
Firm helps clients raise capital via public offering and
private placement of various types of debt and equity
instruments. Underwriting fees are primarily based on
the issuance price and quantity of the underlying
instruments, and are recognized as revenue typically
upon execution of the client’s transaction. The Firm also
manages and syndicates loan arrangements. Credit
arrangement and syndication fees, included within debt
underwriting fees, are recorded as revenue after
satisfying certain retention, timing and yield criteria.
The Firm also provides advisory services, by assisting
its clients with mergers and acquisitions, divestitures,
restructuring and other complex transactions. Advisory
fees are recognized as revenue typically upon execution
of the client’s transaction.
The following table presents the components of
investment banking fees.
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Underwriting
Equity $2,759 $ 1,648 $ 1,684 
Debt 4,362 3,513 3,347 
Total underwriting 7,121 5,161 5,031 
Advisory 2,365 2,340 2,519 
Total investment banking
fees $9,486 $ 7,501 $ 7,550 
Investment banking fees are earned primarily by CIB.
Refer to Note 32 for segment results.Principal transactions
Principal transactions revenue is driven by many factors,
including:
•the bid-offer spread, which is the difference between
the price at which a market participant is willing and
able to sell an instrument to the Firm and the price at
which another market participant is willing and able to
buy it from the Firm, and vice versa; and
•realized and unrealized gains and losses on financial
instruments and commodities transactions, including
those accounted for under the fair value option,
primarily used in client-driven market-making
activities, and on private equity investments.
–Realized gains and losses result from the sale of
instruments, closing out or termination of
transactions, or interim cash payments.
–Unrealized gains and losses result from changes in
valuation.
In connection with its client-driven market-making
activities, the Firm transacts in debt and equity
instruments, derivatives and commodities, including
physical commodities inventories and financial
instruments that reference commodities.
Principal transactions revenue also includes realized
and unrealized gains and losses related to:
•derivatives designated in qualifying hedge accounting
relationships, primarily fair value hedges of commodity
and foreign exchange risk;
•derivatives used for specific risk management
purposes, primarily to mitigate credit risk and foreign
exchange risk.
Refer to Note 5 for further information on the income
statement classification of gains and losses from
derivatives activities.
In the financial commodity markets, the Firm transacts in
OTC derivatives (e.g., swaps, forwards, options) and
ETD that reference a wide range of underlying
commodities. In the physical commodity markets, the
Firm primarily purchases and sells precious and base
metals and may hold other commodities inventories
under financing and other arrangements with clients.
The following table presents all realized and unrealized
gains and losses recorded in principal transactions
revenue. This table excludes interest income and
interest expense on trading assets and liabilities, which
are an integral part of the overall performance of the
Firm’s client-driven market-making activities in CIB and
cash deployment activities in Treasury and CIO. Refer
to Note 7 for further information on interest income and
interest expense.
Trading revenue is presented primarily by instrument
type. The Firm’s client-driven market-making businesses
generally utilize a variety of instrument types in
connection with their market-making and related risk-
management activities; accordingly, the trading revenue
presented in the table below is not representative of the
total revenue of any individual LOB.
212 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
g
Year ended December
31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Trading revenue by
instrument type
Interest rate $ 2,575 $ 2,739 $ 1,844 
Credit 2,753 1,628 1,625 
Foreign exchange 4,253 3,179 3,222 
Equity 6,171 5,589 4,822 
Commodity 2,088 1,133 895 
Total trading revenue 17,840 14,268 12,408 
Private equity gains/
(losses) 181 (250) (349)
Principal
transactions $18,021 $14,018 $12,059 
(a)Includes the impact of changes in funding valuation adjustments
on derivatives.
(b)Includes the impact of changes in credit valuation adjustments on
derivatives, net of the associated hedging activities.
(c)The prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
Principal transactions revenue is earned primarily by
CIB. Refer to Note 32 for segment results.
Lending- and deposit-related fees
Lending-related fees include fees earned from loan
commitments, standby letters of credit, financial
guarantees, and other loan-servicing activities. Deposit-
related fees include fees earned from providing
overdraft and other deposit account services, and from
performing cash management activities. Lending- and
deposit-related fees in this revenue category are
recognized over the period in which the related service
is provided.
The following table presents the components of lending-
and deposit-related fees.
Year ended December 31, (in
millions) 2020 2019 2018
Lending-related fees $1,271 $1,184 $1,117 
Deposit-related fees 5,240 5,442 5,260 
Total lending- and deposit-
related fees $6,511 $6,626 $6,377 
(a)In the first quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fees from
asset management, administration and commissions to lending-
and deposit-related fees. Prior-period amounts have been revised
to conform with the current presentation.
Lending- and deposit-related fees are earned by CCB,
CIB, CB, and AWM. Refer to Note 32 for segment
results.
Asset management, administration and
commissions
This revenue category includes fees from investment
management and related services, custody, brokerage
services and other products. The Firm manages assets
on behalf of its clients, including investors in Firm-
sponsored funds and owners of separately managed
investment accounts. Management fees are typically
based on the value of assets under management and
are collected and recognized at the end of each period
over which the management services are provided and
the value of the managed assets is known. The Firm
also receives performance-based management fees,
which are earned based on exceeding certain
benchmarks or other performance targets and are
accrued and recognized when the probability of reversal
is remote, typically at the end ofthe related billing period. The Firm has contractual
arrangements with third parties to provide distribution
and other services in connection with its asset
management activities. Amounts paid to these third-
party service providers are generally recorded in
professional and outside services expense.
The following table presents the components of
Firmwide asset management, administration and
commissions.
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Asset management fees
Investment management
fees $11,694 $10,865 $10,768 
All other asset management
fees 338 315 270 
Total asset management
fees 12,032 11,180 11,038 
Total administration fees 2,249 2,197 2,179 
Commissions and other
fees
Brokerage commissions 2,959 2,439 2,505 
All other commissions and
fees 937 1,092 1,071 
Total commissions and fees 3,896 3,531 3,576 
Total asset management,
administration and
commissions $18,177 $16,908 $16,793 
(a)Represents fees earned from managing assets on behalf of the
Firm’s clients, including investors in Firm-sponsored funds and
owners of separately managed investment accounts.
(b)Represents fees for services that are ancillary to investment
management services, such as commissions earned on the sales
or distribution of mutual funds to clients. These fees are recorded
as revenue at the time the service is rendered or, in the case of
certain distribution fees based on the underlying fund’s asset value
and/or investor redemption, recorded over time as the investor
remains in the fund or upon investor redemption.
(c)Predominantly includes fees for custody, securities lending, funds
services and securities clearance. These fees are recorded as
revenue over the period in which the related service is provided.
(d)Represents commissions earned when the Firm acts as a broker,
by facilitating its clients’ purchases and sales of securities and
other financial instruments. Brokerage commissions are collected
and recognized as revenue upon occurrence of the client
transaction. The Firm reports certain costs paid to third-party
clearing houses and exchanges net against commission revenue.
(e)In the first quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fees from
asset management, administration and commissions to lending-
and deposit-related fees. Prior-period amounts have been revised
to conform with the current presentation.
Asset management, administration and commissions
are earned primarily by AWM, CIB and CCB. Refer to
Note 32 for segment results.
Mortgage fees and related income
This revenue category reflects CCB’s Home Lending net
production and net mortgage servicing revenue.
Net production revenue includes fees and income
recognized as earned on mortgage loans originated with
the intent to sell, and the impact of risk management
activities associated with the mortgage pipeline and
warehouse loans. Net production revenue also includes
gains and losses on sales and lower of cost or fair value
adjustments on mortgage loans held-for-sale (excluding
certain repurchased loans insured by U.S. government
agencies), and changes in the fair value of financial
instruments measured under the fair value option. Net
mortgage(a) (c) (c)
(b) (c) (c)
(c) (c)
(c) (c)
(c) (c)
(a)(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 213
Notes to consolidated financial statements
servicing revenue includes operating revenue earned
from servicing third-party mortgage loans, which is
recognized over the period in which the service is
provided; changes in the fair value of MSRs; the impact
of risk management activities associated with MSRs;
and gains and losses on securitization of excess
mortgage servicing. Net mortgage servicing revenue
also includes gains and losses on sales and lower of
cost or fair value adjustments of certain repurchased
loans insured by U.S. government agencies.
Refer to Note 15 for further information on risk
management activities and MSRs.
Net interest income from mortgage loans is recorded in
interest income.
Card income
This revenue category includes interchange and other
income from credit and debit card transactions; and fees
earned from processing card transactions for
merchants, both of which are recognized when
purchases are made by a cardholder and presented net
of certain transaction-related costs. Card income also
includes account origination costs and annual fees,
which are deferred and recognized on a straight-line
basis over a 12-month period.
Certain credit card products offer the cardholder the
ability to earn points based on account activity, which
the cardholder can choose to redeem for cash and non-
cash rewards. The cost to the Firm related to these
proprietary rewards programs varies based on multiple
factors including the terms and conditions of the rewards
programs, cardholder activity, cardholder reward
redemption rates and cardholder reward selections. The
Firm maintains a liability for its obligations under its
rewards programs and reports the current-period cost as
a reduction of card income.
Credit card revenue sharing agreements
The Firm has contractual agreements with numerous
co-brand partners that grant the Firm exclusive rights to
issue co-branded credit card products and market them
to the customers of such partners. These partners
endorse the co-brand credit card programs and provide
their customer or member lists to the Firm. The partners
may also conduct marketing activities and provide
rewards redeemable under their own loyalty programs
that the Firm will grant to co-brand credit cardholders
based on account activity. The terms of these
agreements generally range from five to ten years.The Firm typically makes payments to the co-brand
credit card partners based on the cost of partners’
marketing activities and loyalty program rewards
provided to credit cardholders, new account originations
and sales volumes. Payments to partners based on
marketing efforts undertaken by the partners are
expensed by the Firm as incurred and reported as
marketing expense. Payments for partner loyalty
program rewards are reported as a reduction of card
income when incurred. Payments to partners based on
new credit card account originations are accounted for
as direct loan origination costs and are deferred and
recognized as a reduction of card income on a straight-
line basis over a 12-month period. Payments to partners
based on sales volumes are reported as a reduction of
card income when the related interchange income is
earned.
The following table presents the components of card
income:
Year ended December
31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Interchange and
merchant processing
income $18,563 $20,370 $18,808 
Reward costs and partner
payments (13,637) (14,540) (13,320)
Other card income (491) (754) (745)
Total card income $ 4,435 $ 5,076 $ 4,743 
(a)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain
spend-based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to
be a reduction of card income, with no effect on net income.
Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the
current presentation.
(b)Predominantly represents the amortization of account origination
costs and annual fees, which are deferred and recognized on a
straight-line basis over a 12-month period.
(c)Includes an adjustment to the credit card rewards liability of
approximately $330 million, recorded in the second quarter of
2018.
Card income is earned primarily by CCB, CIB and CB.
Refer to Note 32 for segment results.
Refer to Note 18 for information on operating lease
income included within other income.
Noninterest expense
Other expense
Other expense on the Firm’s Consolidated statements of
income included the following:
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Legal expense/(benefit) $ 1,115 $ 239 $ 72 
FDIC-related expense 717 457 1,239 
 
 (a) (c)
(b)
214 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 7 – Interest income and Interest expense
Interest income and interest expense are recorded in
the Consolidated statements of income and classified
based on the nature of the underlying asset or liability.
The following table presents the components of interest
income and interest expense:
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Interest income
Loans $43,758 $51,855 $49,032 
 Taxable securities 7,843 7,962 5,653 
 Non-taxable securities 1,184 1,329 1,595 
Total investment securities 9,027 9,291 7,248 
Trading assets - debt
instruments 7,832 9,141 7,146 
Federal funds sold and
securities purchased under
resale agreements 2,436 6,146 3,819 
Securities borrowed (302) 1,574 913 
Deposits with banks 749 3,887 5,907 
All other interest-earning
assets 1,023 2,146 2,035 
Total interest income $64,523 $84,040 $76,100 
Interest expense
Interest bearing deposits $ 2,357 $ 8,957 $ 5,973 
Federal funds purchased and
securities loaned or sold under
repurchase agreements 1,058 4,630 3,066 
Short-term borrowings 372 1,248 1,144 
Trading liabilities - debt and all
other interest-bearing
liabilities 195 2,585 2,387 
Long-term debt 5,764 8,807 7,978 
Beneficial interest issued by
consolidated VIEs 214 568 493 
Total interest expense $ 9,960 $26,795 $21,041 
Net interest income $54,563 $57,245 $55,059 
Provision for credit losses 17,480 5,585 4,871 
Net interest income after
provision for credit losses$37,083 $51,660 $50,188 
(a)Includes the amortization/accretion of unearned income (e.g.,
purchase premiums/discounts, net deferred fees/costs, and
others).
(b)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value
option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to
loans and other assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to
conform with the current presentation.
(c)Represents securities that are tax-exempt for U.S. federal income
tax purposes.
(d)Negative interest income is related to the impact of current interest
rates combined with the fees paid on client-driven securities
borrowed balances. The negative interest expense related to
prime brokerage customer payables is recognized in interest
expense and reported within trading liabilities - debt and all other
interest-bearing liabilities.
(e)Includes interest earned on brokerage-related held-for-investment
customer receivables, which are classified in accrued interest and
accounts receivable, and all other interest-earning assets, which
are classified in other assets on the Consolidated balance sheets.
(f)Includes commercial paper.
(g)All other interest-bearing liabilities includes interest expense on
brokerage-related customer payables.Interest income and interest expense includes the
current-period interest accruals for financial instruments
measured at fair value, except for derivatives and
financial instruments containing embedded derivatives
that would be separately accounted for in accordance
with U.S. GAAP, absent the fair value option election; for
those instruments, all changes in fair value including any
interest elements, are reported in principal transactions
revenue. For financial instruments that are not
measured at fair value, the related interest is included
within interest income or interest expense, as
applicable. Refer to Notes 12, 10, 11 and 20, for further
information on accounting for interest income and
interest expense related to loans, investment securities,
securities financing activities (i.e., securities purchased
or sold under resale or repurchase agreements;
securities borrowed; and securities loaned) and long-
term debt, respectively.
 (a)(b)
(c)
(a)
(b)
(d)
(b)(e)
(f)
(d)(g)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 215
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 8 – Pension and other postretirement
employee benefit plans
The Firm has various defined benefit pension plans and
OPEB plans that provide benefits to its employees in the
U.S. and certain non-U.S. locations. The Firm also
provides a qualified defined contribution plan in the U.S.
and maintains other similar arrangements in certain non-
U.S. locations.
The principal defined benefit pension plan in the U.S. is
a qualified noncontributory plan that provides benefits to
substantially all U.S. employees who were hired prior to
December 2, 2017. The Firm has frozen the U.S.
defined benefit pension plan (the “Plan Freeze”).
Effective as of January 1, 2020 (and January 1, 2019 for
new hires), new pay credits have been directed to the
U.S. defined contribution plan. Interest credits will
continue to accrue on the U.S. defined benefit pension
plan. As a result of the Plan Freeze, a curtailment was
triggered and a remeasurement of the U.S. defined
benefit pension obligation and plan assets occurred as
of November 30, 2018. The plan design change did not
have a material impact on the U.S. defined benefit
pension plan or the Firm’s Consolidated Financial
Statements.
The Firm also has defined benefit pension plans that are
offered in certain non-U.S. locations based on factors
such as eligible compensation, age and/or years of
service. It is the Firm’s policy to fund the pension plans
in amounts sufficient to meet the requirements under
applicable laws. The Firm does not anticipate at this
time making any contribution to the U.S. defined benefit
pension plan in 2021. The 2021 contributions to the non-
U.S. defined benefit pension plans are expected to be
$50 million, of which $35 million are contractually
required.
The Firm also has a number of nonqualified
noncontributory defined benefit pension plans that are
unfunded. These plans provide supplemental defined
pension benefits to certain employees. 
The Firm offers postretirement medical and life
insurance benefits to certain U.S. retirees and
postretirement medical benefits to certain qualifying U.S.
and U.K. employees.
The Firm partially defrays the cost of its U.S. OPEB
obligation through corporate-owned life insurance
(“COLI”) purchased on the lives of eligible employees
and retirees. While the Firm owns the COLI policies,
certain COLI proceeds (death benefits, withdrawals and
other distributions) may be used only to reimburse the
Firm for its net postretirement benefit claim payments
and related administrative expense. The Firm has
prefunded its U.S. postretirement benefit
obligations. The U.K. OPEB plan is unfunded.   
Pension and OPEB accounting guidance generally
requires that the difference between plan assets at fair
value and the benefit obligation be measured and
recorded on the balance sheet. Plans that are
overfunded (excess of plan assets over benefit
obligation) are recorded in other assets and plans that
are underfunded (excess benefit obligation over plan
assets) are recorded in other liabilities. Gains or losses
resulting from changes in the benefit obligation and the
fair value of plan assets are recorded in OCI and
recognized as part of the net periodic benefit cost over
subsequent periods as discussed in the Gains and
losses section of this Note. Additionally, benefits earned
during the year are reported in compensation expense;
all other components of net periodic defined benefit
costs are reported in other expense in the Consolidated
statements of income.
216 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The following table presents the pretax changes in benefit obligations, plan assets, the net funded status, and the
amounts recorded in AOCI on the Consolidated balance sheets for the Firm’s defined benefit pension and OPEB plans.
As of or for the year ended December 31,Defined benefit 
pension and OPEB plans
(in millions) 2020 2019
Change in projected and accumulated benefit obligations, U.S. defined benefit pension plans
Benefit obligation, beginning of year $ (13,277)$ (12,173)
Benefits earned during the year (2) (327)
Interest cost on benefit obligations (422) (518)
Plan amendments — (5)
Net gain/(loss) (1,086) (944)
Benefits paid 640 690 
Benefit obligations, end of year, U.S. defined benefit pension plans $ (14,147)$ (13,277)
Benefit obligations, other defined benefit pension and OPEB plans (4,990) (4,428)
Benefit obligations, end of year $ (19,137)$ (17,705)
Change in plan assets, U.S. defined benefit pension plans
Fair value of plan assets, beginning of year $ 16,329 $ 14,521 
Actual return on plan assets 1,901 2,465 
Firm contributions 29 33 
Benefits paid (640) (690)
Fair value of plan assets, end of year, U.S. defined benefit pension plans $ 17,619 $ 16,329 
Fair value of plan assets, other defined benefit pension and OPEB plans 7,798 7,037 
Fair value of plan assets, end of year $ 25,417 $ 23,366 
Net funded status, U.S. defined benefit pension plans $ 3,472 $ 3,052 
Net funded status, other defined benefit pension and OPEB plans 2,808 2,609 
Net funded status $ 6,280 $ 5,661 
Amounts recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss), U.S. defined benefit pension
plans
Net gain/(loss), U.S. defined benefit pension plans $ (1,558)$ (1,745)
Prior service credit/(cost), U.S. defined benefit pension plans (4) (5)
Accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss), end of year, U.S. defined benefit pension plans $ (1,562)$ (1,750)
Accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss), other defined benefit pension and OPEB plans (24) (66)
Accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss) $ (1,586)$ (1,816)
The following table presents the weighted-average actuarial assumptions used to value the benefit obligations for the
U.S. defined benefit pension plans.
U.S. defined benefit 
pension plans
As of December 31, 2020 2019
Discount rate  2.50%  3.30%
Rate of compensation increase  NA  NA
Interest crediting rate  4.65  4.65
Gains and losses
For the Firm’s defined benefit pension plans, fair value is used to determine the expected return on plan assets.
Amortization of net gains and losses is included in annual net periodic benefit cost if, as of the beginning of the year,
the net gain or loss exceeds 10% of the greater of the projected benefit obligation or the fair value of the plan assets.
Any excess is amortized over the average expected remaining lifetime of plan participants, which for the U.S. defined
benefit pension plans is currently 37 years and for the non-U.S. defined benefit pension plans is the period appropriate
for the affected plan. For the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, the net gain was primarily attributable to a
market-driven increase in the fair value of plan assets, predominantly offset by a decrease in the discount rate.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 217
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The following table presents the components of net periodic benefit costs reported in the Consolidated statements of
income for the Firm’s defined benefit pension, defined contribution and OPEB plans, and in other comprehensive
income for the defined benefit pension and OPEB plans.
Pension and OPEB plans
Year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Components of net periodic benefit cost, U.S. defined benefit pension plans
Benefits earned during the year $ 2 $ 327 $ 323 
Interest cost on benefit obligations 422 518 478 
Expected return on plan assets (634) (776) (836)
Amortization:
Net (gain)/loss 6 147 80 
Prior service (credit)/cost — — (21)
Curtailment (gain)/loss — — 21 
Net periodic defined benefit plan cost/(credit), U.S. defined benefit pension plans $ (204)$ 216 $ 45 
Other defined benefit pension and OPEB plans (81) (72) (72)
Total net periodic defined benefit plan cost/(credit) $ (285)$ 144 $ (27)
Total defined contribution plans 1,332  952 872 
Total pension and OPEB cost included in noninterest expense $ 1,047  $ 1,096  $ 845 
Changes recognized in other comprehensive income, U.S. defined benefit pension plans
Prior service (credit)/cost arising during the year — 5 — 
Net (gain)/loss arising during the year (181) (745) 453 
Amortization of net (loss)/gain (6) (147) (80)
Amortization of prior service (cost)/credit — — 21 
Curtailment (loss)/gain — — (21)
Total recognized in other comprehensive income, U.S. defined benefit pension plans $ (187)$ (887)$ 373 
Other defined benefit pension and OPEB plans (27) (270) 77 
Total recognized in other comprehensive income $ (214)$ (1,157 )$ 450 
Total recognized in net periodic defined benefit plan cost/(credit) and other comprehensive
income $ (499)$ (1,013 )$ 423 
The following table presents the weighted-average actuarial assumptions used to determine the net periodic benefit
costs for the U.S. defined benefit pension plans.
U.S. defined benefit pension plans
Year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Discount rate 3.30% 4.30% 3.70 / 4.50%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan assets 4.00 5.50 5.50
Rate of compensation increase NA 2.30 2.30
Interest crediting rate 4.65 4.90 4.90
Plan assumptions
The Firm’s expected long-term rate of return for defined
benefit pension plan assets is a blended weighted
average, by asset allocation of the projected long-term
returns for the various asset classes, taking into
consideration local market conditions and the specific
allocation of plan assets. Returns on asset classes are
developed using a forward-looking approach and are not
strictly based on historical returns. Consideration is also
given to current market conditions and the portfolio mix
of each plan.
The discount rate used in determining the benefit
obligation under the U.S. defined benefit pension plan
was provided by the Firm’s actuaries. This rate was
selected by reference to the yields on portfolios of bonds
with maturity dates and coupons that closely match
each of the plan’s projected cash flows.At December 31, 2020, the Firm decreased the discount
rates used to determine its benefit obligations for the
U.S. defined benefit pension plans in light of current
market interest rates, which is expected to decrease
expense by approximately $64 million in 2021. The 2021
expected long-term rate of return on U.S. defined benefit
pension plan assets is 3.00%.
The following table represents the effect of a 25-basis
point decline in the expected long-term rate of return of
3.00% and discount rate of 2.50%.
Effect on U.S. defined benefit pension plans
 
(in millions) Pension expenseBenefit
obligation
Expected long-term rate of
return $ 43 NA
Discount rate (20) 404 
 
 
 
 
218 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Investment strategy and asset allocation
The assets of the Firm’s defined benefit pension plans
are held in various trusts and are invested in well-
diversified portfolios of equity and fixed income
securities, cash and cash equivalents, and alternative
investments. The trust-owned assets of the Firm’s U.S.
OPEB plan are invested primarily in fixed income
securities. COLI policies used to partially defray the cost
of the Firm’s U.S. OPEB plan are invested in separate
accounts of an insurance company and are allocated to
investments intended to replicate equity and fixed
income indices.
The investment policies for the assets of the Firm’s
defined benefit pension plans are to optimize the risk-
return relationship as appropriate to the needs and
goals of each plan. Assets are managed by a
combination of internal and external investment
managers. The Firm regularly reviews the asset
allocations and asset managers, as well as other factors
that could impact the portfolios, which are rebalanced
when deemed necessary.Investments held by the Firm’s defined benefit pension
and OPEB plans include financial instruments which are
exposed to various risks such as interest rate, market
and credit risks. Exposure to a concentration of credit
risk is mitigated by the broad diversification of both U.S.
and non-U.S. investments. Additionally, the investments
in each of the collective investment funds and/or
registered investment companies are further diversified
into various financial instruments. As of December 31,
2020, assets held by the Firm’s defined benefit pension
and OPEB plans do not include securities issued by
JPMorgan Chase or its affiliates, except through indirect
exposures through investments in ETFs, mutual funds
and collective investment funds managed by third-
parties. The defined benefit pension and OPEB plans
hold investments that are sponsored or managed by
affiliates of JPMorgan Chase in the amount of $2.7
billion and $3.1 billion, as of December 31, 2020 and
2019, respectively.
The following table presents the weighted-average asset allocation of the fair values of total plan assets at
December 31 for the years indicated, as well as the respective approved asset allocation ranges by asset class.
U.S. defined benefit pension plan
Asset % of plan assets
December 31, Allocation 2020 2019
Asset class
Debt securities 42-100% 77 % 74 %
Equity securities 0-40 15 16 
Real estate 0-4 1 1 
Alternatives 0-15 7 9 
Total 100 % 100 % 100 %
(a)Debt securities primarily includes cash and cash equivalents, corporate debt, U.S. federal, state, local and non-U.S. government, asset-backed
and mortgage-backed securities.
(b)Alternatives primarily include limited partnerships.
(c)Represents the U.S. defined benefit pension plan only as it is the most significant plan. The other U.S. defined benefit pension plans are
unfunded. The weighted-average asset allocation for the U.S. OPEB plan was 59% debt securities and 41% equity securities and 60% debt
securities and 40% equity securities at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.(c)
(a)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 219
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Fair value measurement of the plans’ assets and liabilities
Refer to Note 2 for information on fair value measurements, including descriptions of level 1, 2, and 3 of the fair value
hierarchy and the valuation methods employed by the Firm.
Pension plan assets and liabilities measured at fair value
Defined benefit pension and OPEB plans
2020 2019
December 31,
(in millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total fair
value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total fair
value
Equity securities $2,353 $ — $ 2 $ 2,355 $2,259 $ 3 $ 2 $ 2,264 
Corporate debt securities — 7,414 11 7,425 — 6,474 2 6,476 
U.S. federal, state, local
and non-U.S. government
debt securities 1,395 360 — 1,755 1,616 401 — 2,017 
Mortgage-backed securities 461 1,184 31 1,676 312 681 4 997 
Other 788 861 201 1,850 718 49 250 1,017 
U.S. defined benefit
pension plans $4,997 $9,819 $ 245 $15,061 $4,905 $7,608 $ 258 $12,771 
Other defined benefit
pension and OPEB
plans 2,034 2,565 2,707 7,306 1,834 2,307 2,431 6,572 
Total assets measured at
fair value $7,031 $12,384 $2,952 $22,367 $6,739 $9,915 $2,689 $19,343 
(a)Other consists primarily of mutual funds, money market funds and participating annuity contracts.
(b)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, excludes $3.2 billion and $3.9 billion, respectively, of certain investments that are measured at fair value using
the net asset value per share (or its equivalent) as a practical expedient, and $606 million and $343 million, respectively, of net defined benefit
pension plan payables, primarily for investments sold and purchased, which are not required to be classified in the fair value hierarchy.
Investments in level 3 of the valuation hierarchy include $199 million and $250 million of participating annuity contracts at December 31, 2020
and 2019, respectively.
(c)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, excludes $487 million and $465 million, respectively, of certain investments that are measured at fair value
using the net asset value per share (or its equivalent) as a practical expedient. Investments in level 3 of the valuation hierarchy include
$2.7 billion and $2.4 billion of COLI policies at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Changes in level 3 fair value measurements using significant unobservable inputs
Investments classified in level 3 of the valuation hierarchy increased $263 million in 2020 from $2.7 billion to
$3.0 billion, consisting of $343 million in unrealized gains, partially offset by $113 million in settlements. In addition,
there were transfers into level 3 of $33 million. In 2019, there was an increase of $307 million from $2.4 billion to $2.7
billion, consisting of $401 million in unrealized gains, partially offset by $85 million in settlements.
Estimated future benefit payments
The following table presents benefit payments expected
to be paid for the U.S. defined benefit pension plans for
the years indicated.
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions)U.S. defined
benefit pension
plans
2021 $ 912 
2022 918 
2023 897 
2024 847 
2025 829 
Years 2026–2030 3,843 (a)
(b)
(c)
220 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 9 – Employee share-based incentives
Employee share-based awards
In 2020, 2019 and 2018, JPMorgan Chase granted long-
term share-based awards to certain employees under its
LTIP, as amended and restated effective May 15, 2018.
Under the terms of the LTIP, as of December 31, 2020,
67 million shares of common stock were available for
issuance through May 2022. The LTIP is the only active
plan under which the Firm is currently granting share-
based incentive awards. In the following discussion, the
LTIP, plus prior Firm plans and plans assumed as the
result of acquisitions, are referred to collectively as the
“LTI Plans,” and such plans constitute the Firm’s share-
based incentive plans.
RSUs are awarded at no cost to the recipient upon their
grant. Generally, RSUs are granted annually and vest at
a rate of 50% after two years and 50% after three years
and are converted into shares of common stock as of
the vesting date. In addition, RSUs typically include full-
career eligibility provisions, which allow employees to
continue to vest upon voluntary termination based on
age or service-related requirements, subject to post-
employment and other restrictions. All RSU awards are
subject to forfeiture until vested and contain clawback
provisions that may result in cancellation under certain
specified circumstances. Predominantly all RSUs entitle
the recipient to receive cash payments equivalent to any
dividends paid on the underlying common stock during
the period the RSUs are outstanding.
Performance share units (“PSUs”) are granted annually,
and approved by the Firm’s Board of Directors, to
members of the Firm’s Operating Committee under the
variable compensation program. PSUs are subject to
the Firm’s achievement of specified performance criteria
over a three-year period. The number of awards that
vest can range from zero to 150% of the grant amount.
In addition, dividends that accrue during the vesting
period are reinvested in dividend equivalent share units.
PSUs and the related dividend equivalent share units
are converted into shares of common stock after
vesting.Once the PSUs and dividend equivalent share units
have vested, the shares of common stock that are
delivered, after applicable tax withholding, must be held
for an additional two-year period, for a total combined
vesting and holding period of approximately five to eight
years from the grant date depending on regulations in
certain countries.
Under the LTI Plans, stock appreciation rights (“SARs”)
and stock options have generally been granted with an
exercise price equal to the fair value of JPMorgan
Chase’s common stock on the grant date. SARs and
stock options generally expire ten years after the grant
date. There were no material grants of SARs or stock
options in 2020, 2019 and 2018.
The Firm separately recognizes compensation expense
for each tranche of each award, net of estimated
forfeitures, as if it were a separate award with its own
vesting date. Generally, for each tranche granted,
compensation expense is recognized on a straight-line
basis from the grant date until the vesting date of the
respective tranche, provided that the employees will not
become full-career eligible during the vesting period. For
awards with full-career eligibility provisions and awards
granted with no future substantive service requirement,
the Firm accrues the estimated value of awards
expected to be awarded to employees as of the grant
date without giving consideration to the impact of post-
employment restrictions. For each tranche granted to
employees who will become full-career eligible during
the vesting period, compensation expense is recognized
on a straight-line basis from the grant date until the
earlier of the employee’s full-career eligibility date or the
vesting date of the respective tranche.
The Firm’s policy for issuing shares upon settlement of
employee share-based incentive awards is to issue
either new shares of common stock or treasury shares.
During 2020, 2019 and 2018, the Firm settled all of its
employee share-based awards by issuing treasury
shares.
Refer to Note 23 for further information on the
classification of share-based awards for purposes of
calculating earnings per share.
 
 
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 221
Notes to consolidated financial statements
RSUs, PSUs, SARs and stock options activity
Generally, compensation expense for RSUs and PSUs is measured based on the number of units granted multiplied by
the stock price at the grant date, and for SARs and stock options, is measured at the grant date using the Black-
Scholes valuation model. Compensation expense for these awards is recognized in net income as described
previously. The following table summarizes JPMorgan Chase’s RSUs, PSUs, SARs and stock options activity for 2020.
RSUs/PSUs SARs/Options
Year ended December 31, 2020
Number of 
 unitsWeighted-
average grant
 date fair valueNumber of
awardsWeighted-
average
exercise
priceWeighted-average
remaining
contractual life 
 (in years)Aggregate
intrinsic
value(in thousands, except weighted-average data,
and where otherwise stated)
Outstanding, January 1 52,239 $ 99.62 5,527 $ 41.36 
Granted 17,891 132.17 1 137.80 
Exercised or vested (21,502) 96.64 (2,389) 41.40 
Forfeited (1,118) 111.59 (4) 122.59 
Canceled NA NA (11) 39.33 
Outstanding, December 31 47,510 $ 112.85 3,124 $ 41.25 1.4$265,059 
Exercisable, December 31 NA NA 3,124 41.25 1.4 265,059 
The total fair value of RSUs that vested during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, was $2.8 billion,
$2.9 billion and $3.6 billion, respectively. The total intrinsic value of options exercised during the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, was $182 million, $503 million and $370 million, respectively.
Compensation expense
The Firm recognized the following noncash
compensation expense related to its various employee
share-based incentive plans in its Consolidated
statements of income.
Year ended December 31, (in
millions) 2020 2019 2018
Cost of prior grants of RSUs,
PSUs, SARs and stock options
that are amortized over their
applicable vesting periods $1,101 $1,141 $1,241 
Accrual of estimated costs of
share-based awards to be
granted in future periods
including those to full-career
eligible employees 1,350 1,115 1,081 
Total noncash compensation
expense related to employee
share-based incentive plans $2,451 $2,256 $2,322 
At December 31, 2020, approximately $664 million
(pretax) of compensation expense related to unvested
awards had not yet been charged to net income. That
cost is expected to be amortized into compensation
expense over a weighted-average period of 1.6 years.
The Firm does not capitalize any compensation expense
related to share-based compensation awards to
employees.Tax benefits
Income tax benefits (including tax benefits from
dividends or dividend equivalents) related to share-
based incentive arrangements recognized in the Firm’s
Consolidated statements of income for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, were $837 million,
$895 million and $1.1 billion, respectively.
222 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 10 – Investment securities
Investment securities consist of debt securities that are
classified as AFS or HTM. Debt securities classified as
trading assets are discussed in Note 2. Predominantly
all of the Firm’ s AFS and HTM securities are held by
Treasury and CIO in connection with its asset-liability
management activities.
AFS securities are carried at fair value on the
Consolidated balance sheets. Unrealized gains and
losses, after any applicable hedge accounting
adjustments or allowance for credit losses, are reported
in AOCI. The specific identification method is used to
determine realized gains and losses on AFS securities,
which are included in investment securities
gains/(losses) on the Consolidated statements of
income. HTM securities, which the Firm has the intent
and ability to hold until maturity , are carried at amortized
cost, net of allowance for credit losses, on the
Consolidated balance sheets.
For both AFS and HTM securities, purchase discounts
or premiums are generally amortized into interest
income on a level-yield basis over the contractual life of
the security . However , premiums on certain callable debt
securities are amortized to the earliest call date.Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL
accounting guidance, which also amended the AFS
securities impairment guidance. Refer to Note 1 for
further information.
During 2020, the Firm transferred $ 164.2  billion of
investment securities from AFS to HTM for capital
management purposes. AOCI included pretax
unrealized gains of $ 5.0 billion on the securities at the
dates of transfer .
Unrealized gains or losses at the date of transfer of
these securities continue to be reported in AOCI and are
amortized into interest income on a level-yield basis over
the remaining life of the securities. This amortization will
offset the ef fect on interest income of the amortization of
the premium or discount resulting from the transfer
recorded at fair value.
Transfers of securities from AFS to HTM are non-cash
transactions and are recorded at fair value.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 223
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The amortized costs and estimated fair values of the investment securities portfolio were as follows for the dates
indicated.
2020 2019
December 31, (in millions)Amortized
costGross
unrealized
gainsGross
unrealized
lossesFair 
 valueAmortized
costGross
unrealized
gainsGross
unrealized
lossesFair 
 value
Available-for-sale securities
Mortgage-backed securities:
U.S. GSEs and government
agencies $110,979 $ 2,372 $ 50 $113,301 $107,811 $ 2,395 $ 89 $110,117 
Residential:
U.S. 6,246 224 3 6,467 10,223 233 6 10,450 
Non-U.S. 3,751 20 5 3,766 2,477 64 1 2,540 
Commercial 2,819 71 34 2,856 5,137 64 13 5,188 
Total mortgage-backed securities 123,795 2,687 92 126,390 125,648 2,756 109 128,295 
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 199,910 2,141 100 201,951 139,162 449 175 139,436 
Obligations of U.S. states and
municipalities 18,993 1,404 1 20,396 27,693 2,118 1 29,810 
Certificates of deposit — — — — 77 — — 77 
Non-U.S. government debt securities 22,587 354 13 22,928 21,427 377 17 21,787 
Corporate debt securities 215 4 3 216 823 22 — 845 
Asset-backed securities:
Collateralized loan obligations 10,055 24 31 10,048 25,038 9 56 24,991 
Other 6,174 91 16 6,249 5,438 40 20 5,458 
Total available-for-sale securities 381,729 6,705 256 388,178 345,306 5,771 378 350,699 
Held-to-maturity securities
Mortgage-backed securities:
U.S. GSEs and government
agencies 107,889 2,968 29 110,828 36,523 1,165 62 37,626 
U.S. Residential 4,345 8 30 4,323 — — — — 
Commercial 2,602 77 — 2,679 — — — — 
Total mortgage-backed securities 114,836 3,053 59 117,830 36,523 1,165 62 37,626 
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 53,184 50 — 53,234 51 — 1 50 
Obligations of U.S. states and
municipalities 12,751 519 — 13,270 4,797 299 — 5,096 
Asset-backed securities:
Collateralized loan obligations 21,050 90 2 21,138 6,169 — — 6,169 
Total held-to-maturity securities, net
of allowance for credit losses 201,821 3,712 61 205,472 47,540 1,464 63 48,941 
Total investment securities, net of
allowance for credit losses $583,550 $10,417 $ 317 $593,650 $392,846 $ 7,235 $ 441 $399,640 
(a)Includes AFS U.S. GSE obligations with fair values of $65.8 billion and $78.5 billion, and HTM U.S. GSE obligations with amortized cost of
$86.3 billion and $31.6 billion, at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. As of December 31, 2020, mortgage-backed securities issued by
Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac each exceeded 10% of JPMorgan Chase’s total stockholders’ equity; the amortized cost and fair value of such
securities were $95.7 billion and $98.8 billion, and $54.7 billion and $55.8 billion, respectively.
(b)There was no allowance for credit losses on AFS securities at December 31, 2020.
(c)The Firm purchased $12.4 billion, $13.4 billion and $9.4 billion of HTM securities for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively.
(d)HTM securities measured at amortized cost are reported net of allowance for credit losses of $78 million at December 31, 2020.
(e)Excludes $2.1 billion and $1.9 billion of accrued interest receivables at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The Firm did not reverse
through interest income any accrued interest receivables for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
At December 31, 2020, the investment securities
portfolio consisted of debt securities with an average
credit rating of AA+ (based upon external ratings where
available, and where not available, based primarily upon
internal risk ratings). Risk ratings are used to identify the
credit quality of securities and dif ferentiate risk within the
portfolio.  The Firm’s internal risk ratings generally align
with the qualitative characteristics (e.g., borrower
capacity to meet financial commitments and vulnerability
to changes in the economic environment) defined by
S&P and Moody’s,however the quantitative characteristics (e.g., probability
of default (“PD”) and loss given default (“LGD”)) may
differ as they reflect internal historical experiences and
assumptions. Risk ratings are assigned at acquisition,
are reviewed on a regular and ongoing basis by Credit
Risk Management and are adjusted as necessary over
the life of the investment for updated information
affecting the issuer’s ability to fulfill its obligations.(e) (e)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(d)
(d)
224 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
AFS securities impairment
The following tables present the fair value and gross unrealized losses by aging category for AFS securities at
December 31, 2020 and 2019. The tables exclude U.S. Treasury and government agency securities and U.S. GSE and
government agency MBS with unrealized losses of $150 million and $264 million, at December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively; changes in the value of these securities are generally driven by changes in interest rates rather than
changes in their credit profile given the explicit or implicit guarantees provided by the U.S. government.
Available-for-sale securities with gross unrealized losses
Less than 12 months 12 months or more
December 31, 2020 (in millions)Fair valueGross 
 unrealized losses Fair valueGross 
 unrealized lossesTotal fair
valueTotal gross
unrealized losses
Available-for-sale securities
Mortgage-backed securities:
Residential:
U.S. $ 562 $ 3 $ 32 $ — $ 594 $ 3 
Non-U.S. 2,507 4 235 1 2,742 5 
Commercial 699 18 124 16 823 34 
Total mortgage-backed securities 3,768 25 391 17 4,159 42 
Obligations of U.S. states and
municipalities 49 1 — — 49 1 
Certificates of deposit — — — — — — 
Non-U.S. government debt securities 2,709 9 968 4 3,677 13 
Corporate debt securities 91 3 5 — 96 3 
Asset-backed securities:
Collateralized loan obligations 5,248 18 2,645 13 7,893 31 
Other 268 1 685 15 953 16 
Total available-for-sale securities with
gross unrealized losses $ 12,133 $ 57 $ 4,694 $ 49 $ 16,827 $ 106 
Available-for-sale securities with gross unrealized losses
Less than 12 months 12 months or more
December 31, 2019 (in millions) Fair valueGross 
 unrealized losses Fair valueGross 
 unrealized lossesTotal fair
valueTotal gross
unrealized losses
Available-for-sale securities
Mortgage-backed securities:
Residential:
U.S. $ 1,072 $ 3 $ 423 $ 3 $ 1,495 $ 6 
Non-U.S. 13 — 420 1 433 1 
Commercial 1,287 12 199 1 1,486 13 
Total mortgage-backed securities 2,372 15 1,042 5 3,414 20 
Obligations of U.S. states and
municipalities 186 1 — — 186 1 
Certificates of deposit 77 — — — 77 — 
Non-U.S. government debt securities 3,970 13 1,406 4 5,376 17 
Corporate debt securities — — — — — — 
Asset-backed securities:
Collateralized loan obligations 10,364 11 7,756 45 18,120 56 
Other 1,639 9 753 11 2,392 20 
Total available-for-sale securities with
gross unrealized losses $ 18,608 $ 49 $ 10,957 $ 65 $ 29,565 $ 114 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 225
Notes to consolidated financial statements
As a result of the adoption of the amended AFS
securities impairment guidance, an allowance for credit
losses on AFS securities is required for impaired
securities if a credit loss exists.
AFS securities are considered impaired if the fair value
is less than the amortized cost.
The Firm recognizes impairment losses in earnings if
the Firm has the intent to sell the debt security, or if it is
more likely than not that the Firm will be required to sell
the debt security before recovery of its amortized cost.
In these circumstances the impairment loss recognized
in investment securities gains/(losses)  is equal to the full
difference between the amortized cost (net of allowance
if applicable) and the fair value of the securities.
For impaired debt securities that the Firm has the intent
and ability to hold, the securities are evaluated to
determine if a credit loss exists. If it is determined that a
credit loss exists, that loss is recognized as an
allowance for credit losses through the provision for
credit losses in the Consolidated Statements of Income,
limited by the amount of impairment. Any impairment not
due to credit losses is recorded in OCI.
Factors considered in evaluating credit losses include
adverse conditions specifically related to the industry,
geographic area or financial condition of the issuer or
underlying collateral of a security; and payment
structure of the security.
When assessing securities issued in a securitization for
credit losses, the Firm estimates cash flows considering
relevant market and economic data, underlying loan-
level data, and structural features of the securitization,
such as subordination, excess spread,
overcollateralization or other forms of credit
enhancement, and compares the losses projected for
the underlying collateral (“pool losses”) against the level
of credit enhancement in the securitization structure to
determine whether these features are sufficient to
absorb the pool losses, or whether a credit loss exists.
For beneficial interests in securitizations that are rated
below “AA” at their acquisition, or that can be
contractually prepaid or otherwise settled in such a way
that the Firm would not recover substantially all of its
recorded investment, the Firm evaluates impairment for
credit losses when there is an adverse change in
expected cash flows.
Allowance for credit losses
Based on its assessment, the Firm did not recognize an
allowance for credit losses on impaired AFS securities
as of January 1, 2020 or December 31, 2020.
226 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
HTM securities – credit risk
The adoption of the CECL accounting guidance requires
management to estimate expected credit losses on HTM
securities over the remaining expected life and
recognize this estimate as an allowance for credit
losses. As a result of the adoption of this guidance, the
Firm recognized an allowance for credit losses on HTM
obligations of U.S. states and municipalities of
$10 million as a cumulative-effect adjustment to retained
earnings as of January 1, 2020.
Credit quality indicator
The primary credit quality indicator for HTM securities is
the risk rating assigned to each security. At
December 31, 2020, all HTM securities were rated
investment grade and were current and accruing, with
approximately 98% rated at least AA+.
Allowance for credit losses
The allowance for credit losses on HTM obligations of
U.S. states and municipalities and commercial
mortgage-backed securities is calculated by applying
statistical credit loss factors (estimated PD and LGD) to
the amortized cost. The credit loss factors are derived
using a weighted average of five internally developed
eight-quarter macroeconomic scenarios, followed by a
single year straight-line interpolation to revert to long run
historical information for periods beyond the forecast
period. Refer to Note 13 for further information on the
eight-quarter macroeconomic forecast.
The allowance for credit losses on HTM collateralized
loan obligations and U.S. residential mortgage-backed
securities
is calculated as the difference between the amortized
cost and the present value of the cash flows expected to
be collected, discounted at the security’s effective
interest rate. These cash flow estimates are developed
based on expectations of underlying collateral
performance derived using the eight-quarter
macroeconomic forecast and the single year straight-
line interpolation, as well as considering the structural
features of the security.
The application of different inputs and assumptions into
the calculation of the allowance for credit losses is
subject to significant management judgment, and
emphasizing one input or assumption over another, or
considering other inputs or assumptions, could affect the
estimate of the allowance for credit losses on HTM
securities.
The allowance for credit losses on HTM securities was
$78 million as of December 31, 2020, reflecting $68
million recognized in the provision for credit losses for
the year ended December 31, 2020.Selected impacts of investment securities on the
Consolidated statements of income
Year ended December 31, 
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Realized gains $3,080 $ 650 $ 211 
Realized losses (2,278) (392) (606)
Net investment securities
gains/(losses) $ 802 $ 258 $(395)
Provision for credit losses $ 68 NA NA
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 227
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Contractual maturities and yields
The following table presents the amortized cost and estimated fair value at December 31, 2020, of JPMorgan Chase’s
investment securities portfolio by contractual maturity.
By remaining maturity
 December 31, 2020 (in millions)Due in one 
 year or lessDue after one year
through five yearsDue after five years
through 10 yearsDue after
10 years Total
Available-for-sale securities
Mortgage-backed securities
Amortized cost $ — $ 741 $ 7,797  $ 115,257  $ 123,795  
Fair value — 756 8,139  117,495  126,390  
Average yield — % 1.66 % 1.67 % 2.57 % 2.51 %
U.S. T reasury and government agencies
Amortized cost $ 33,633  $ 110,033  $ 46,827  $ 9,417  $ 199,910  
Fair value 33,678  111,014  47,675  9,584  201,951  
Average yield 0.42 % 0.53 % 0.79 % 0.48 % 0.57 %
Obligations of U.S. states and municipalities
Amortized cost $ 33 $ 203 $ 1,047  $ 17,710  $ 18,993  
Fair value 33 211 1,111  19,041  20,396  
Average yield 4.11 % 4.59 % 4.84 % 4.80 % 4.80 %
Non-U.S. government debt securities
Amortized cost $ 8,282  $ 8,011  $ 5,615  $ 679 $ 22,587  
Fair value 8,297  8,225  5,726  680 22,928  
Average yield 1.25 % 1.70 % 0.68 % 0.17 % 1.24 %
Corporate debt securities
Amortized cost $ — $ 141 $ 74 $ — $ 215 
Fair value — 139 77 — 216 
Average yield — % 1.21 % 1.92 % — % 1.45 %
Asset-backed securities
Amortized cost $ 554 $ 2,569  $ 5,987  $ 7,119  $ 16,229  
Fair value 554 2,591  5,990  7,162  16,297  
Average yield 1.31 % 2.00 % 1.33 % 1.48 % 1.50 %
Total available-for-sale securities
Amortized cost $ 42,502  $ 121,698  $ 67,347  $ 150,182  $ 381,729  
Fair value 42,562  122,936  68,718  153,962  388,178  
Average yield 0.59 % 0.65 % 1.00 % 2.64 % 1.49 %
Held-to-maturity securities
Mortgage-backed securities
Amortized cost $ — $ 158 $ 11,908  $ 102,791  $ 114,857  
Fair value — 160 12,707  104,963  117,830  
Average yield — % 1.56 % 2.42 % 2.94 % 2.88 %
U.S. T reasury and government agencies
Amortized cost $ 501 $ 42,477  $ 10,206  $ — $ 53,184  
Fair value 501 42,511  10,222  — 53,234  
Average yield 1.86 % 0.60 % 0.94 % — % 0.67 %
Obligations of U.S. states and municipalities
Amortized cost $ — $ 65 $ 532 $ 12,211  $ 12,808  
Fair value — 67 565 12,638  13,270  
Average yield — % 3.09 % 3.57 % 3.62 % 3.62 %
Asset-backed securities
Amortized cost $ — $ — $ 11,617  $ 9,433  $ 21,050  
Fair value — — 11,658  9,480  21,138  
Average yield — % — % 1.40 % 1.33 % 1.37 %
Total held-to-maturity securities
Amortized cost $ 501 $ 42,700  $ 34,263  $ 124,435  $ 201,899  
Fair value 501 42,738  35,152  127,081  205,472  
Average yield 1.86 % 0.60 % 1.65 % 2.88 % 2.19 %
(a)Average yield is computed using the effective yield of each security owned at the end of the period, weighted based on the amortized cost of
each security. The effective yield considers the contractual coupon, amortization of premiums and accretion of discounts, and the effect of related
hedging derivatives. Taxable-equivalent amounts are used where applicable. The effective yield excludes unscheduled principal prepayments;
and accordingly, actual maturities of securities may differ from their contractual or expected maturities as certain securities may be prepaid.
However, for certain callable debt securities, the average yield is calculated to the earliest call date.
(b)Substantially all of the Firm’s U.S. residential MBS and collateralized mortgage obligations are due in 10 years or more, based on contractual
maturity. The estimated weighted-average life, which reflects anticipated future prepayments, is approximately 5 years for agency residential
MBS, 4 years for agency residential collateralized mortgage obligations and 3 years for nonagency residential collateralized mortgage obligations.(b)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
228 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 11 – Securities financing activities
JPMorgan Chase enters into resale, repurchase,
securities borrowed and securities loaned agreements
(collectively, “securities financing agreements”) primarily
to finance the Firm’s inventory positions, acquire
securities to cover short sales, accommodate
customers’ financing needs, settle other securities
obligations and to deploy the Firm’s excess cash.
Securities financing agreements are treated as
collateralized financings on the Firm’s Consolidated
balance sheets. Where appropriate under applicable
accounting guidance, securities financing agreements
with the same counterparty are reported on a net basis.
Refer to Note 1 for further discussion of the offsetting of
assets and liabilities. Fees received and paid in
connection with securities financing agreements are
recorded over the life of the agreement in interest
income and interest expense on the Consolidated
statements of income.
The Firm has elected the fair value option for certain
securities financing agreements. Refer to Note 3 for
further information regarding the fair value option. The
securities financing agreements for which the fair value
option has been elected are reported within securities
purchased under resale agreements, securities loaned
or sold under repurchase agreements, and securities
borrowed on the Consolidated balance sheets.
Generally, for agreements carried at fair value, current-
period interest accruals are recorded within interest
income and interest expense, with changes in fair value
reported in principal transactions revenue. However, for
financial instruments containing embedded derivatives
that would be separately accounted for in accordance
with accounting guidance for hybrid instruments, all
changes in fair value, including any interest elements,
are reported in principal transactions revenue.
Securities financing agreements not elected under the
fair value option are measured at amortized cost. As a
result of the Firm’s credit risk mitigation practices
described below, the Firm did not hold any allowance for
credit losses with respect to resale and securities
borrowed arrangements as of December 31, 2020 and
2019.Credit risk mitigation practices
Securities financing agreements expose the Firm
primarily to credit and liquidity risk. To manage these
risks, the Firm monitors the value of the underlying
securities (predominantly high-quality securities
collateral, including government-issued debt and U.S.
GSEs and government agencies MBS) that it has
received from or provided to its counterparties
compared to the value of cash proceeds and exchanged
collateral, and either requests additional collateral or
returns securities or collateral when appropriate. Margin
levels are initially established based upon the
counterparty, the type of underlying securities, and the
permissible collateral, and are monitored on an ongoing
basis.
In resale and securities borrowed agreements, the Firm
is exposed to credit risk to the extent that the value of
the securities received is less than initial cash principal
advanced and any collateral amounts exchanged. In
repurchase and securities loaned agreements, credit
risk exposure arises to the extent that the value of
underlying securities advanced exceeds the value of the
initial cash principal received, and any collateral
amounts exchanged.
Additionally, the Firm typically enters into master netting
agreements and other similar arrangements with its
counterparties, which provide for the right to liquidate
the underlying securities and any collateral amounts
exchanged in the event of a counterparty default. It is
also the Firm’s policy to take possession, where
possible, of the securities underlying resale and
securities borrowed agreements. Refer to Note 29 for
further information regarding assets pledged and
collateral received in securities financing agreements.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 229
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The table below summarizes the gross and net amounts
of the Firm’s securities financing agreements, as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019. When the Firm has
obtained an appropriate legal opinion with respect to a
master netting agreement with a counterparty and
where other relevant netting criteria under U.S. GAAP
are met, the Firm nets, on the Consolidated balance
sheets, the balances outstanding under its securities
financing agreements with the same counterparty. In
addition, the Firm exchanges securities and/or cash
collateral with its counterparty to reduce the economic
exposure with the counterparty, but such collateral is not
eligible for net Consolidated balance sheetpresentation. Where the Firm has obtained an
appropriate legal opinion with respect to the
counterparty master netting agreement, such collateral,
along with securities financing balances that do not
meet all these relevant netting criteria under U.S. GAAP,
is presented in the table below as “Amounts not nettable
on the Consolidated balance sheets,” and reduces the
“Net amounts” presented. Where a legal opinion has not
been either sought or obtained, the securities financing
balances are presented gross in the “Net amounts”
below.
2020
December 31, (in millions) Gross amountsAmounts netted
on the
Consolidated
balance sheetsAmounts
presented on the
Consolidated
balance sheetsAmounts not
nettable on the
Consolidated
balance sheets Net amounts
Assets
Securities purchased under resale agreements$ 666,467 $ (370,183)$ 296,284 $ (273,206) $ 23,078 
Securities borrowed 193,700 (33,065) 160,635 (115,219) 45,416 
Liabilities
Securities sold under repurchase agreements$ 578,060 $ (370,183)$ 207,877 $ (191,980) $ 15,897 
Securities loaned and other 41,366 (33,065) 8,301 (8,257) 44 
2019
December 31, (in millions) Gross amountsAmounts netted
on the
Consolidated
balance sheetsAmounts
presented on the
Consolidated
balance sheetsAmounts not
nettable on the
Consolidated
balance sheets Net amounts
Assets
Securities purchased under resale agreements$ 628,609 $ (379,463)$ 249,146 $ (231,147) $ 17,999 
Securities borrowed 166,718 (26,960) 139,758 (104,990) 34,768 
Liabilities
Securities sold under repurchase agreements$ 555,172 $ (379,463)$ 175,709 $ (151,566) $ 24,143 
Securities loaned and other 36,649 (26,960) 9,689 (9,654) 35 
(a)Includes securities-for-securities lending agreements of $3.4 billion and $3.7 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, accounted for
at fair value, where the Firm is acting as lender. In the Consolidated balance sheets, the Firm recognizes the securities received at fair value
within other assets and the obligation to return those securities within accounts payable and other liabilities.
(b)In some cases, collateral exchanged with a counterparty exceeds the net asset or liability balance with that counterparty. In such cases, the
amounts reported in this column are limited to the related net asset or liability with that counterparty.
(c)Includes securities financing agreements that provide collateral rights, but where an appropriate legal opinion with respect to the master netting
agreement has not been either sought or obtained. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, included $17.0 billion and $11.0 billion, respectively, of
securities purchased under resale agreements; $42.1 billion and $31.9 billion, respectively, of securities borrowed; $14.5 billion and $22.7 billion,
respectively, of securities sold under repurchase agreements; and $8 million and $7 million, respectively, of securities loaned and other.
(d)The prior period amounts have been revised to conform with the current period presentation.(b) (c)
(a)
(b) (c)
(d) (d)
(a)
230 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The tables below present as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 the types of financial assets pledged in securities
financing agreements and the remaining contractual maturity of the securities financing agreements.
Gross liability balance
2020 2019
December 31, (in millions)Securities sold
under repurchase
agreementsSecurities loaned
and otherSecurities sold
under repurchase
agreementsSecurities loaned
and other
Mortgage-backed securities:
U.S. GSEs and government agencies $ 56,744 $ — $ 34,119 $ — 
Residential - nonagency 1,016 — 1,239 — 
Commercial - nonagency 855 — 1,612 — 
U.S. Treasury, GSEs and government agencies 315,834 143 334,398 29 
Obligations of U.S. states and municipalities 1,525 2 1,181 — 
Non-U.S. government debt 157,563 1,730 145,548 1,528 
Corporate debt securities 22,849 1,864 13,826 1,580 
Asset-backed securities 694 — 1,794 — 
Equity securities 20,980 37,627 21,455 33,512 
Total $ 578,060 $ 41,366 $ 555,172 $ 36,649 
Remaining contractual maturity of the agreements
Overnight and
continuousGreater than 
 90 days 2020 (in millions) Up to 30 days 30 – 90 days Total
Total securities sold under repurchase
agreements $ 238,667 $ 230,980 $ 70,777 $ 37,636 $ 578,060 
Total securities loaned and other 37,887 1,647 500 1,332 41,366 
Remaining contractual maturity of the agreements
Overnight and
continuousGreater than 
 90 days 2019 (in millions) Up to 30 days 30 – 90 days Total
Total securities sold under repurchase
agreements $ 225,134 $ 195,816 $ 56,020 $ 78,202 $ 555,172 
Total securities loaned and other 32,028 1,706 937 1,978 36,649 
(a)The prior period amounts have been revised to conform with the current period presentation.
Transfers not qualifying for sale accounting
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Firm held $598 million and $743 million, respectively, of financial assets for which
the rights have been transferred to third parties; however, the transfers did not qualify as a sale in accordance with U.S.
GAAP. These transfers have been recognized as collateralized financing transactions. The transferred assets are
recorded in trading assets and loans, and the corresponding liabilities are recorded predominantly in short-term
borrowings on the Consolidated balance sheets.(a) (a) (a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 231
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 12 – Loans
Loan accounting framework
The accounting for a loan depends on management’s
strategy for the loan. The Firm accounts for loans based
on the following categories:
•Originated or purchased loans held-for-investment
(i.e., “retained”)
•Loans held-for-sale
•Loans at fair value
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL
accounting guidance. Refer to Note 1 for further
information.
The following provides a detailed accounting discussion
of the Firm’s loans by category:
Loans held-for-investment
Originated or purchased loans held-for-investment are
recorded at the principal amount outstanding, net of the
following: charge-offs; interest applied to principal (for
loans accounted for on the cost recovery method);
unamortized discounts and premiums; and net deferred
loan fees or costs. Credit card loans also include billed
finance charges and fees.
Interest income
Interest income on performing loans held-for-investment
is accrued and recognized as interest income at the
contractual rate of interest. Purchase price discounts or
premiums, as well as net deferred loan fees or costs,
are amortized into interest income over the contractual
life of the loan as an adjustment of yield.
The Firm classifies accrued interest on loans, including
accrued but unbilled interest on credit card loans, in
accrued interest and accounts receivables on the
Consolidated balance sheets. For credit card loans,
accrued interest once billed is then recognized in the
loan balances, with the related allowance recorded in
the allowance for credit losses. Changes in the
allowance for credit losses on accrued interest on credit
card loans are recognized in the provision for credit
losses and charge-offs are recognized by reversing
interest income. Expected losses related to accrued
interest on certain performing, modified loans to
borrowers impacted by COVID-19 are considered in the
Firm’s allowance for loan losses. For other loans, the
Firm generally does not recognize an allowance for
credit losses on accrued interest receivables, consistent
with its policy to write them off no later than 90 days
past due by reversing interest income.
Nonaccrual loans
Nonaccrual loans are those on which the accrual of
interest has been suspended. Loans (other than credit
card loans and certain consumer loans insured by U.S.
government agencies) are placed on nonaccrual status
and considered nonperforming when full payment of
principal and interest is not expected, regardless of
delinquency status, or when principal and interest has
been in default for a period of 90days or more, unless the loan is both well-secured and
in the process of collection. A loan is determined to be
past due when the minimum payment is not received
from the borrower by the contractually specified due
date or for certain loans (e.g., residential real estate
loans), when a monthly payment is due and unpaid for
30 days or more. Finally, collateral-dependent loans are
typically maintained on nonaccrual status.
On the date a loan is placed on nonaccrual status, all
interest accrued but not collected is reversed against
interest income. In addition, the amortization of deferred
amounts is suspended. Interest income on nonaccrual
loans may be recognized as cash interest payments are
received (i.e., on a cash basis) if the recorded loan
balance is deemed fully collectible; however, if there is
doubt regarding the ultimate collectibility of the recorded
loan balance, all interest cash receipts are applied to
reduce the carrying value of the loan (the cost recovery
method). For consumer loans, application of this policy
typically results in the Firm recognizing interest income
on nonaccrual consumer loans on a cash basis.
A loan may be returned to accrual status when
repayment is reasonably assured and there has been
demonstrated performance under the terms of the loan
or, if applicable, the terms of the restructured loan.
As permitted by regulatory guidance, credit card loans
are generally exempt from being placed on nonaccrual
status; accordingly, interest and fees related to credit
card loans continue to accrue until the loan is charged
off or paid in full.
Allowance for loan losses
The allowance for loan losses represents the estimated
expected credit losses in the held-for-investment loan
portfolio at the balance sheet date and is recognized on
the balance sheet as a contra asset, which brings the
amortized cost to the net carrying value. Changes in the
allowance for loan losses are recorded in the provision
for credit losses on the Firm’s Consolidated statements
of income. Refer to Note 13 for further information on
the Firm’s accounting policies for the allowance for loan
losses.
Charge-offs
Consumer loans are generally charged off or charged
down to the lower of the amortized cost or the net
realizable value of the underlying collateral (i.e., fair
value less estimated costs to sell), with an offset to the
allowance for loan losses, upon reaching specified
stages of delinquency in accordance with standards
established by the FFIEC. Residential real estate loans,
unmodified credit card loans and scored business
banking loans are generally charged off no later than
180 days past due. Scored auto and modified credit
card loans are charged off no later than 120 days past
due.
232 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Certain consumer loans are charged off or charged
down to their net realizable value earlier than the FFIEC
charge-off standards in certain circumstances as
follows:
•Loans modified in a TDR that are determined to be
collateral-dependent.
•Loans to borrowers who have experienced an event
that suggests a loss is either known or highly certain
are subject to accelerated charge-off standards (e.g.,
residential real estate and auto loans are charged off
or charged down within 60 days of receiving
notification of a bankruptcy filing).
•Auto loans upon repossession of the automobile.
Other than in certain limited circumstances, the Firm
typically does not recognize charge-offs on the
government-guaranteed portion of loans.
Wholesale loans are charged off when it is highly certain
that a loss has been realized. The determination of
whether to recognize a charge-off includes many
factors, including the prioritization of the Firm’s claim in
bankruptcy, expectations of the workout/restructuring of
the loan and valuation of the borrower’s equity or the
loan collateral.
When a loan is charged down to the lower of its
amortized cost or the estimated net realizable value of
the underlying collateral, the determination of the fair
value of the collateral depends on the type of collateral
(e.g., securities, real estate). In cases where the
collateral is in the form of liquid securities, the fair value
is based on quoted market prices or broker quotes. For
illiquid securities or other financial assets, the fair value
of the collateral is generally estimated using a
discounted cash flow model.
For residential real estate loans, collateral values are
based upon external valuation sources. When it
becomes likely that a borrower is either unable or
unwilling to pay, the Firm utilizes a broker’s price
opinion, appraisal and/or an automated valuation model
of the home based on an exterior-only valuation
(“exterior opinions”), which is then updated at least
every twelve months, or more frequently depending on
various market factors. As soon as practicable after the
Firm receives the property in satisfaction of a debt (e.g.,
by taking legal title or physical possession), the Firm
generally obtains an appraisal based on an inspection
that includes the interior of the home (“interior
appraisals”). Exterior opinions and interior appraisals
are discounted based upon the Firm’s experience with
actual liquidation values as compared with the estimated
values provided by exterior opinions and interior
appraisals, considering state-specific factors.
For commercial real estate loans, collateral values are
generally based on appraisals from internal and external
valuation sources. Collateral values are typically
updated every six to twelve months, either by obtaining
a new appraisal or by performing an internal analysis, in
accordance with the Firm’s policies. The Firm also
considers both borrower- and market-specific factors,
which mayresult in obtaining appraisal updates or broker price
opinions at more frequent intervals.
Loans held-for-sale
Loans held-for-sale are measured at the lower of cost or
fair value, with valuation changes recorded in
noninterest revenue. For consumer loans, the valuation
is performed on a portfolio basis. For wholesale loans,
the valuation is performed on an individual loan basis.
Interest income on loans held-for-sale is accrued and
recognized based on the contractual rate of interest.
Loan origination fees or costs and purchase price
discounts or premiums are deferred in a contra loan
account until the related loan is sold. The deferred fees
or costs and discounts or premiums are an adjustment
to the basis of the loan and therefore are included in the
periodic determination of the lower of cost or fair value
adjustments and/or the gain or loss recognized at the
time of sale.
Because these loans are recognized at the lower of cost
or fair value, the Firm’s allowance for loan losses and
charge-off policies do not apply to these loans.
However, loans held-for-sale are subject to the
nonaccrual policies described above.
Loans at fair value
Loans for which the fair value option has been elected
are measured at fair value, with changes in fair value
recorded in noninterest revenue.
Interest income on these loans is accrued and
recognized based on the contractual rate of interest.
Changes in fair value are recognized in noninterest
revenue. Loan origination fees are recognized upfront in
noninterest revenue. Loan origination costs are
recognized in the associated expense category as
incurred.
Because these loans are recognized at fair value, the
Firm’s allowance for loan losses and charge-off policies
do not apply to these loans. However, loans at fair value
are subject to the nonaccrual policies described above.
Refer to Note 3 for further information on the Firm’s
elections of fair value accounting under the fair value
option. Refer to Note 2 and Note 3 for further
information on loans carried at fair value and classified
as trading assets.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 233
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Loan classification changes
Loans in the held-for-investment portfolio that
management decides to sell are transferred to the held-
for-sale portfolio at the lower of cost or fair value on the
date of transfer. Credit-related losses are charged
against the allowance for loan losses; non-credit related
losses such as those due to changes in interest rates or
foreign currency exchange rates are recognized in
noninterest revenue.
In the event that management decides to retain a loan in
the held-for-sale portfolio, the loan is transferred to the
held-for-investment portfolio at amortized cost on the
date of transfer. These loans are subsequently
assessed for impairment based on the Firm’s allowance
methodology. Refer to Note 13 for a further discussion
of the methodologies used in establishing the Firm’s
allowance for loan losses.
Loan modifications
The Firm seeks to modify certain loans in conjunction
with its loss mitigation activities. Through the
modification, JPMorgan Chase grants one or more
concessions to a borrower who is experiencing financial
difficulty in order to minimize the Firm’s economic loss
and avoid foreclosure or repossession of the collateral,
and to ultimately maximize payments received by the
Firm from the borrower. The concessions granted vary
by program and by borrower-specific characteristics,
and may include interest rate reductions, term
extensions, payment delays, principal forgiveness, or
the acceptance of equity or other assets in lieu of
payments. Such modifications are accounted for and
reported as TDRs. Loans with short-term and other
insignificant modifications that are not considered
concessions are not TDRs.
Loans, except for credit card loans, modified in a TDR
are generally placed on nonaccrual status, although in
many cases such loans were already on nonaccrual
status prior to modification. These loans may be
returned to performing status (the accrual of interest is
resumed) if the following criteria are met: (i) the
borrower has performed under the modified terms for a
minimum of six months and/or six payments, and (ii) the
Firm has an expectation that repayment of the modified
loan is reasonably assured based on, for example, the
borrower’s debt capacity and level of future earnings,
collateral values, LTV ratios, and other current market
considerations. In certain limited and well-defined
circumstances in which the loan is current at the
modification date, such loans are not placed on
nonaccrual status at the time of modification.
Loans modified in TDRs are generally measured for
impairment using the Firm’s established asset-specific
allowance methodology, which considers the expected
re-default rates for the modified loans. A loan modified
in a TDR generally remains subject to the asset-specific
component of the allowance throughout its remaining
life, regardless of whether the loan is performing and
has been returned to accrual status. Refer to Note 13 for
furtherdiscussion of the methodology used to estimate the
Firm’s asset-specific allowance.
The Firm has granted various forms of assistance to
customers and clients impacted by the COVID-19
pandemic, including payment deferrals and covenant
modifications. The majority of the Firm’s COVID-19
related loan modifications have not been considered
TDRs because:
•they represent short-term or other insignificant
modifications, whether under the Firm’s regular loan
modification assessments or as permitted by
regulatory guidance, or
•the Firm has elected to apply the option to suspend
the application of accounting guidance for TDRs as
provided by the CARES Act and extended by the
Consolidated Appropriations Act.
To the extent that certain modifications do not meet any
of the above criteria, the Firm accounts for them as
TDRs.
As permitted by regulatory guidance, the Firm does not
place loans with deferrals granted due to COVID-19 on
nonaccrual status where such loans are not otherwise
reportable as nonaccrual. The Firm considers expected
losses of principal and accrued interest associated with
all COVID-19 related loan modifications in its allowance
for credit losses.
Assistance provided in response to the COVID-19
pandemic could delay the recognition of delinquencies,
nonaccrual status, and net charge-offs for those
customers who would have otherwise moved into past
due or nonaccrual status.
Foreclosed property
The Firm acquires property from borrowers through loan
restructurings, workouts, and foreclosures. Property
acquired may include real property (e.g., residential real
estate, land, and buildings) and commercial and
personal property (e.g., automobiles, aircraft, railcars,
and ships).
The Firm recognizes foreclosed property upon receiving
assets in satisfaction of a loan (e.g., by taking legal title
or physical possession). For loans collateralized by real
property, the Firm generally recognizes the asset
received at foreclosure sale or upon the execution of a
deed in lieu of foreclosure transaction with the borrower.
Foreclosed assets are reported in other assets on the
Consolidated balance sheets and initially recognized at
fair value less estimated costs to sell. Each quarter the
fair value of the acquired property is reviewed and
adjusted, if necessary, to the lower of cost or fair value.
Subsequent adjustments to fair value are
charged/credited to noninterest revenue. Operating
expense, such as real estate taxes and maintenance,
are charged to other expense.
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the Firm has
temporarily suspended certain foreclosure activities.
This could delay recognition of foreclosed properties
until the foreclosure moratoriums are lifted.
234 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Loan portfolio
The Firm’s loan portfolio is divided into three portfolio segments, which are the same segments used by the Firm to
determine the allowance for loan losses: Consumer, excluding credit card; Credit card; and Wholesale. Within each
portfolio segment the Firm monitors and assesses the credit risk in the following classes of loans, based on the risk
characteristics of each loan class.
In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the Firm revised its loan classes. Prior-period amounts have been revised to
conform with the current presentation:
•The consumer, excluding credit card portfolio segment’s residential mortgage and home equity loans and lending-
related commitments have been combined into a residential real estate class.
•Upon adoption of CECL, the Firm elected to discontinue the pool-level accounting for PCI loans and to account for
these loans on an individual loan basis. PCI loans are considered PCD loans under CECL and are subject to the
Firm’s nonaccrual and charge-off policies. PCD loans are now reported in the consumer, excluding credit card
portfolio segment’s residential real estate class.
•Risk-rated business banking and auto dealer loans and lending-related commitments held in CCB were reclassified
from the consumer, excluding credit card portfolio segment, to the wholesale portfolio segment, to align with the
methodology applied when determining the allowance. The remaining scored auto and business banking loans and
lending-related commitments have been combined into an auto and other class.
•The wholesale portfolio segment’s classes, previously based on the borrower’s primary business activity, have been
revised to align with the loan classifications as defined by the bank regulatory agencies, based on the loan’s
collateral, purpose, and type of borrower.
Consumer, excluding
credit cardCredit cardWholesale
    • Residential real estate
• Auto and other
 • Credit card loans • Secured by real estate
• Commercial and industrial
• Other
(a)Includes scored mortgage and home equity loans held in CCB and AWM, and scored mortgage loans held in CIB and Corporate.
(b)Includes scored auto and business banking loans and overdrafts.
(c)Includes loans held in CIB, CB, AWM, Corporate as well as risk-rated business banking and auto dealer loans held in CCB for which the
wholesale methodology is applied when determining the allowance for loan losses.
(d)Includes loans to financial institutions, states and political subdivisions, SPEs, nonprofits, personal investment companies and trusts, as well as
loans to individuals and individual entities (predominantly Wealth Management clients within AWM). Refer to Note 14 for more information on
SPEs.(c)
(a)
(b)
(d)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 235
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The following tables summarize the Firm’s loan balances by portfolio segment.
December 31, 2020Consumer, excluding
credit card Credit card Wholesale Total (in millions)
Retained $302,127 $ 143,432 $514,947 $ 960,506 
Held-for-sale 1,305 784 5,784 7,873 
At fair value 15,147 — 29,327 44,474 
Total $318,579 $ 144,216 $550,058 $1,012,853 
December 31, 2019Consumer, excluding
credit card Credit card Wholesale Total (in millions)
Retained $294,999 $ 168,924 $481,678 $ 945,601 
Held-for-sale 3,002 — 4,062 7,064 
At fair value 19,816 — 25,139 44,955 
Total $317,817 $ 168,924 $510,879 $ 997,620 
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans. Prior-
period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)Excludes $2.9 billion of accrued interest receivables at both December 31, 2020 and 2019. The Firm wrote off accrued interest receivables of
$121 million and $50 million for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
(c)Loans (other than those for which the fair value option has been elected) are presented net of unamortized discounts and premiums and net
deferred loan     fees or costs. These amounts were not material as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
The following tables provide information about the carrying value of retained loans purchased, sold and reclassified to
held-for-sale during the periods indicated. Loans that were reclassified to held-for-sale and sold in a subsequent period
are excluded from the sales line of this table.
2020
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions)Consumer, excluding 
 credit card Credit card Wholesale Total
Purchases $ 3,474 $ — $ 1,159 $ 4,633 
Sales 352 — 17,916 18,268 
Retained loans reclassified to held-for-sale 2,084 787 1,580 4,451 
2019
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions)Consumer, excluding 
 credit card Credit card Wholesale Total
Purchases $ 1,282 $ — $ 1,291 $ 2,573 
Sales 30,474 — 23,445 53,919 
Retained loans reclassified to held-for-sale 9,188 — 2,371 11,559 
2018
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions)Consumer, excluding 
 credit card Credit card Wholesale Total
Purchases $ 2,543 $ — $ 2,354 $ 4,897 
Sales 9,984 — 16,741 26,725 
Retained loans reclassified to held-for-sale 36  — 2,276 2,312 
(a)Reclassifications of loans to held-for-sale are non-cash transactions.
(b)Predominantly includes purchases of residential real estate loans, including the Firm’s voluntary repurchases of certain delinquent loans from
loan pools as permitted by Government National Mortgage Association (“Ginnie Mae”) guidelines for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019
and 2018. The Firm typically elects to repurchase these delinquent loans as it continues to service them and/or manage the foreclosure process
in accordance with applicable requirements of Ginnie Mae, FHA, RHS, and/or VA.
(c)Excludes purchases of retained loans sourced through the correspondent origination channel and underwritten in accordance with the Firm’s
standards. Such purchases were $15.3 billion, $16.6 billion and $18.6 billion for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively.
Gains and losses on sales of loans
Net gains/(losses) on sales of loans and lending-related commitments (including adjustments to record loans and
lending-related commitments held-for-sale at the lower of cost or fair value) recognized in noninterest revenue was
$(43) million for the year ended December 31, 2020 of which $(36) million was related to loans. Net gains on sales of
loans was $394 million for the year ended December 31, 2019. Gains and losses on sales of loans was not material for
the year ended December 31, 2018. In addition, the sale of loans may also result in write downs, recoveries or changes
in the allowance recognized in the provision for credit losses.(b)(c)
(a)
(b)(c)
(a)
(b)(c)
(a)
(b)(c)
(a)
(b)(c)
(a)
236 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Consumer , excluding credit card loan portfolio
Consumer loans, excluding credit card loans, consist
primarily of scored residential mortgages, home equity
loans and lines of credit, auto and business banking
loans, with a focus on serving the prime consumer credit
market. The portfolio also includes home equity loans
secured by junior liens, prime mortgage loans with an
interest-only payment period, and certain payment-
option loans that may result in negative amortization.
The following table provides information about retained
consumer loans, excluding credit card, by class.
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Residential real estate $225,302 $243,317 
Auto and other 76,825 51,682 
Total retained loans $302,127 $294,999 
(a)At December 31, 2020, included $19.2 billion of loans in Business
Banking under the PPP.Delinquency rates are the primary credit quality indicator
for consumer loans. Loans that are more than 30 days
past due provide an early warning of borrowers who
may be experiencing financial difficulties and/or who
may be unable or unwilling to repay the loan. As the
loan continues to age, it becomes more clear whether
the borrower is likely to be unable or unwilling to pay. In
the case of residential real estate loans, late-stage
delinquencies (greater than 150 days past due) are a
strong indicator of loans that will ultimately result in a
foreclosure or similar liquidation transaction. In addition
to delinquency rates, other credit quality indicators for
consumer loans vary based on the class of loan, as
follows:
•For residential real estate loans, the current
estimated LTV ratio, or the combined LTV ratio in the
case of junior lien loans, is an indicator of the
potential loss severity in the event of default.
Additionally, LTV or combined LTV ratios can provide
insight into a borrower’s continued willingness to pay,
as the delinquency rate of high-LTV loans tends to be
greater than that for loans where the borrower has
equity in the collateral. The geographic distribution of
the loan collateral also provides insight as to the
credit quality of the portfolio, as factors such as the
regional economy, home price changes and specific
events such as natural disasters, will affect credit
quality. The borrower’s current or “refreshed” FICO
score is a secondary credit quality indicator for
certain loans, as FICO scores are an indication of the
borrower’s credit payment history. Thus, a loan to a
borrower with a low FICO score (less than 660) is
considered to be of higher risk than a loan to a
borrower with a higher FICO score. Further, a loan to
a borrower with a high LTV ratio and a low FICO
score is at greater risk of default than a loan to a
borrower that has both a high LTV ratio and a high
FICO score.
•For scored auto and business banking loans,
geographic distribution is an indicator of the credit
performance of the portfolio. Similar to residential
real estate loans, geographic distribution provides
insights into the portfolio performance based on
regional economic activity and events.(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 237
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Residential real estate
The following table provides information on delinquency, which is the primary credit quality indicator for retained
residential real estate loans.
(in millions, except
ratios)December 31, 2020December
31, 2019
Term loans by origination year Revolving loans
Total Total 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016Prior to
2016Within the
revolving
periodConverted
to term
loans
Loan
delinquency
Current $55,562  $31,820  $13,900  $20,410  $27,978  $50,232  $7,370  $15,792  $223,064  $239,979  
30–149 days past
due9 25 20 22 29 674 21 245 1,045  1,910  
150 or more days
past due3 14 10 18 18 844 22 264 1,193  1,428  
Total retained
loans $55,574  $31,859  $13,930  $20,450  $28,025  $51,750  $7,413  $16,301  $225,302  $243,317  
% of 30+ days past
due to total
retained loans 0.02 % 0.12 % 0.22 % 0.20 % 0.17 % 2.86 % 0.58 % 3.12 % 0.98 % 1.35 %
(a)Individual delinquency classifications include mortgage loans insured by U.S. government agencies as follows: current included $36 million and
$17 million; 30–149 days past due included $16 million and $20 million; and 150 or more days past due included $24 million and $26 million at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
(b)At December 31, 2020, loans under payment deferral programs offered in response to the COVID-19 pandemic which are still within their deferral
period and performing according to their modified terms are generally not considered delinquent.
(c)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, residential real estate loans excluded mortgage loans insured by U.S. government agencies of $40 million and
$46 million, respectively, that are 30 or more days past due. These amounts have been excluded based upon the government guarantee.
Approximately 35% of the total revolving loans are senior lien loans; the remaining balance are junior lien loans. The
lien position the Firm holds is considered in the Firm’s allowance for credit losses. Revolving loans that have been
converted to term loans have higher delinquency rates than those that are still within the revolving period. That is
primarily because the fully-amortizing payment that is generally required for those products is higher than the minimum
payment options available for revolving loans within the revolving period.(a)(b)
(c)
238 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Nonaccrual loans and other credit quality indicators
The following table provides information on nonaccrual and other credit quality indicators for retained residential real
estate loans.
(in millions, except weighted-average data) December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Nonaccrual loans $ 5,313 $ 2,780 
90 or more days past due and government guaranteed 33 38 
Current estimated LTV ratios
Greater than 125% and refreshed FICO scores:
Equal to or greater than 660 $ 10 $ 31 
Less than 660 18 38 
101% to 125% and refreshed FICO scores:
Equal to or greater than 660 72 134 
Less than 660 65 132 
80% to 100% and refreshed FICO scores:
Equal to or greater than 660 2,365 5,953 
Less than 660 435 764 
Less than 80% and refreshed FICO scores:
Equal to or greater than 660 208,457 219,469 
Less than 660 12,072 14,681 
No FICO/LTV available 1,732 2,052 
U.S. government-guaranteed 76 63 
Total retained loans $ 225,302 $ 243,317 
Weighted average LTV ratio 54 % 55 %
Weighted average FICO 763 758 
Geographic region
California $ 73,444 $ 82,147 
New York 32,287 31,996 
Florida 13,981 13,668 
Texas 13,773 14,474 
Illinois 13,130 15,587 
Colorado 8,235 8,447 
Washington 7,917 8,990 
New Jersey 7,227 7,752 
Massachusetts 5,784 6,210 
Connecticut 5,024 4,954 
All other 44,500 49,092 
Total retained loans $ 225,302 $ 243,317 
(a)Includes collateral-dependent residential real estate loans that are charged down to the lower of amortized cost or the fair value of the underlying collateral
less costs to sell. The Firm reports, in accordance with regulatory guidance, residential real estate loans that have been discharged under Chapter 7
bankruptcy and not reaffirmed by the borrower (“Chapter 7 loans”) as collateral-dependent nonaccrual TDRs, regardless of their delinquency status. At
December 31, 2020, approximately 7% of Chapter 7 residential real estate loans were 30 days or more past due, respectively.
(b)At December 31, 2020, nonaccrual loans included $1.6 billion of PCD loans. Prior to the adoption of CECL, nonaccrual loans excluded PCI loans as the Firm
recognized interest income on each pool of PCI loans as each of the pools was performing.
(c)Generally, all consumer nonaccrual loans have an allowance. In accordance with regulatory guidance, certain nonaccrual loans that are considered
collateral-dependent have been charged down to the lower of amortized cost or the fair value of their underlying collateral less costs to sell. If the value of the
underlying collateral improves subsequent to the charge down, the related allowance may be negative.
(d)Interest income on nonaccrual loans recognized on a cash basis was $161 million and $166 million for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
(e)Generally excludes loans under payment deferral programs offered in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Includes loans to customers that have exited
COVID-19 payment deferral programs and are 90 or more days past due, predominantly all of which were also at least 150 days past due and therefore
considered collateral-dependent. Collateral-dependent loans are charged down to the lower of amortized cost or fair value of the underlying collateral less
costs to sell.
(f)These balances are excluded from nonaccrual loans as the loans are guaranteed by U.S government agencies. Typically the principal balance of the loans is
insured and interest is guaranteed at a specified reimbursement rate subject to meeting agreed-upon servicing guidelines. At December 31, 2020 and 2019,
these balances included $33 million and $34 million, respectively, of loans that are no longer accruing interest based on the agreed-upon servicing
guidelines. For the remaining balance, interest is being accrued at the guaranteed reimbursement rate. There were no loans that were not guaranteed by
U.S. government agencies that are 90 or more days past due and still accruing interest at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
(g)Represents the aggregate unpaid principal balance of loans divided by the estimated current property value. Current property values are estimated, at a
minimum, quarterly, based on home valuation models using nationally recognized home price index valuation estimates incorporating actual data to the
extent available and forecasted data where actual data is not available. Current estimated combined LTV for junior lien home equity loans considers all
available lien positions, as well as unused lines, related to the property.
(h)Refreshed FICO scores represent each borrower’s most recent credit score, which is obtained by the Firm on at least a quarterly basis.
(i)Excludes loans with no FICO and/or LTV data available.
(j)The geographic regions presented in the table are ordered based on the magnitude of the corresponding loan balances at December 31, 2020.
(k)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, included mortgage loans insured by U.S. government agencies of $76 million and $63 million, respectively. These amounts
have been excluded from the geographic regions presented based upon the government guarantee.(a)(b)(c)(d)(e)
(f)
(g)(h)
(g)(i)
(h)(i)
(j)
(k)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 239
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Loan modifications
Modifications of residential real estate loans, where the
Firm grants concessions to borrowers who are
experiencing financial difficulty are generally accounted
for and reported as TDRs. Loans with short-term or
other insignificant modifications that are not considered
concessions are not TDRs nor are loans for which the
Firm has elected to apply the option to suspend the
application of accounting guidance for TDRs as
provided by the CARES Act and extended by the
Consolidated Appropriations Act. The carrying value of
new TDRs was $819 million, $490 million and
$736 million for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018, respectively. There were no additional
commitments to lend to borrowers whose residential real
estate loans have been modified in TDRs.Nature and extent of modifications
The Firm’s proprietary modification programs as well as
government programs, including U.S. GSE programs,
generally provide various concessions to financially
troubled borrowers including, but not limited to, interest
rate reductions, term or payment extensions and delays
of principal and/or interest payments that would
otherwise have been required under the terms of the
original agreement.
The following table provides information about how residential real estate loans were modified in TDRs under the
Firm’s loss mitigation programs described above during the periods presented. This table excludes Chapter 7 loans
where the sole concession granted is the discharge of debt, loans with short-term or other insignificant modifications
that are not considered concessions, and loans for which the Firm has elected to apply the option to suspend the
application of accounting guidance for TDRs as provided by the CARES Act and extended by the Consolidated
Appropriations Act.
Year ended December 31, 2020 2019 2018
Number of loans approved for a trial modification 5,522  5,872  7,175  
Number of loans permanently modified 6,850  4,918  7,853  
Concession granted:
Interest rate reduction 50 % 77 % 54 %
Term or payment extension 49 71 62 
Principal and/or interest deferred 14 13 29 
Principal forgiveness 2 5 7 
Other 66 63 51 
(a)Represents concessions granted in permanent modifications as a percentage of the number of loans permanently modified. The sum of the
percentages exceeds 100% because predominantly all of the modifications include more than one type of concession. Concessions offered on
trial modifications are generally consistent with those granted on permanent modifications.
(b)Includes variable interest rate to fixed interest rate modifications and payment delays that meet the definition of a TDR for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.(a)
(b)
240 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Financial effects of modifications and redefaults
The following table provides information about the financial effects of the various concessions granted in modifications
of residential real estate loans under the loss mitigation programs described above and about redefaults of certain
loans modified in TDRs for the periods presented. The following table presents only the financial effects of permanent
modifications and do not include temporary concessions offered through trial modifications. This table also excludes
Chapter 7 loans where the sole concession granted is the discharge of debt, loans with short-term or other insignificant
modifications that are not considered concessions, and loans for which the Firm has elected to apply the option to
suspend the application of accounting guidance for TDRs as provided by the CARES Act and extended by the
Consolidated Appropriations Act.
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions, except weighted - average data) 2020 2019 2018
Weighted-average interest rate of loans with interest rate reductions – before TDR 5.09 % 5.68 % 5.50 %
Weighted-average interest rate of loans with interest rate reductions – after TDR 3.28 3.81 3.60 
Weighted-average remaining contractual term (in years) of loans with term or payment extensions –
before TDR 22 20 21
Weighted-average remaining contractual term (in years) of loans with term or payment extensions –
after TDR 39 39 38
Charge-of fs recognized upon permanent modification $ 5 $ 1 $ 2 
Principal deferred 16 19 30 
Principal forgiven 5 7 17 
Balance of loans that redefaulted within one year of permanent modification $ 199 $ 166 $ 161 
(a)Represents loans permanently modified in TDRs that experienced a payment default in the periods presented, and for which the payment default
occurred within one year of the modification. The dollar amounts presented represent the balance of such loans at the end of the reporting period
in which such loans defaulted. For residential real estate loans modified in TDRs, payment default is deemed to occur when the loan becomes
two contractual payments past due. In the event that a modified loan redefaults, it will generally be liquidated through foreclosure or another
similar type of liquidation transaction. Redefaults of loans modified within the last twelve months may not be representative of ultimate redefault
levels.
At December 31, 2020, the weighted-average estimated remaining lives of residential real estate loans permanently
modified in TDRs were 6 years. The estimated remaining lives of these loans reflect estimated prepayments, both
voluntary and involuntary (i.e., foreclosures and other forced liquidations).
Active and suspended foreclosure
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Firm had residential real estate loans, excluding those insured by U.S.
government agencies, with a carrying value of $846 million and $1.2 billion, respectively, that were not included in
REO, but were in the process of active or suspended foreclosure.(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 241
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Auto and other
The following table provides information on delinquency, which is the primary credit quality indicator for retained auto
and other consumer loans.
December 31, 2020December
31, 2019
 
(in millions, except
ratios)Term Loans by origination year Revolving loans
2020 2019 2018 2017 2016Prior to
2016Within the
revolving
periodConverted to
term loans Total Total
Loan delinquency
Current $46,169  $12,829  $7,367  $4,521  $2,058  $742 $2,517  $ 158 $76,361  $51,005  
30–119 days past
due 97 107 77 53 42 23 30 17 446 667 
120 or more days
past due — — — 1 — 1 8 8 18 10 
Total retained
loans $46,266  $12,936  $7,444  $4,575  $2,100  $766 $2,555  $ 183 $76,825  $51,682  
% of 30+ days past
due to total
retained loans 0.21 % 0.83 % 1.03 % 1.18 % 2.00 % 3.13 % 1.49 % 13.66  % 0.60 % 1.31 %
(a)At December 31, 2020, loans under payment deferral programs offered in response to the COVID-19 pandemic which are still within their deferral
period and performing according to their modified terms are generally not considered delinquent.
(b)At December 31, 2020, included $19.2 billion of loans in Business Banking under the PPP. PPP loans are guaranteed by the SBA. Other than in
certain limited circumstances, the Firm typically does not recognize charge-offs, classify as nonaccrual nor record an allowance for loan losses on
these loans.
Nonaccrual and other credit quality indicators
The following table provides information on nonaccrual and other credit quality indicators for retained auto and other
consumer loans.
(in millions, except ratios)Total Auto and other
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Nonaccrual loans 151 146 
Geographic region
California $ 12,302 $ 7,795 
New York 8,824 3,706 
Texas 8,235 5,457 
Florida 4,668 3,025 
Illinois 3,768 2,443 
New Jersey 2,646 1,798 
Arizona 2,465 1,347 
Ohio 2,163 1,490 
Pennsylvania 1,924 1,721 
Colorado 1,910 1,247 
All other 27,920 21,653 
Total retained loans $ 76,825 $ 51,682 
(a)There were no loans that were 90 or more days past due and still accruing interest at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
(b)All nonaccrual auto and other consumer loans generally have an allowance. Certain nonaccrual loans that are considered collateral-dependent
have been charged down to the lower of amortized cost or the fair value of their underlying collateral less costs to sell. If the value of the
underlying collateral improves subsequent to the charge down, the related allowance may be negative.
(c)Interest income on nonaccrual loans recognized on a cash basis was not material for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
(d)The geographic regions presented in this table are ordered based on the magnitude of the corresponding loan balances at December 31, 2020.
Loan modifications
Certain other consumer loan modifications are considered to be TDRs as they provide various concessions to
borrowers who are experiencing financial difficulty. Loans with short-term or other insignificant modifications that are
not considered concessions are not TDRs.
The impact of these modifications, as well as new TDRs, were not material to the Firm for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. Additional commitments to lend to borrowers whose loans have been modified in
TDRs as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 were not material.(a)
(b)
(a)(b)(c)
(d)
242 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Credit card loan portfolio
The credit card portfolio segment includes credit card
loans originated and purchased by the Firm.
Delinquency rates are the primary credit quality indicator
for credit card loans as they provide an early warning
that borrowers may be experiencing difficulties (30 days
past due); information on those borrowers that have
been delinquent for a longer period of time (90 days
past due) is also considered. In addition to delinquency
rates, the geographic distribution of the loans provides
insight as to the credit quality of the portfolio based on
the regional economy.
While the borrower’s credit score is another general
indicator of credit quality, the Firm does not view credit
scores as a primary indicator of credit quality because
the borrower’s credit score tends to be a lagging
indicator. Thedistribution of such scores provides a general indicator
of credit quality trends within the portfolio; however, the
score does not capture all factors that would be
predictive of future credit performance. Refreshed FICO
score information, which is obtained at least quarterly,
for a statistically significant random sample of the credit
card portfolio is indicated in the following table. FICO is
considered to be the industry benchmark for credit
scores.
The Firm generally originates new card accounts to
prime consumer borrowers. However, certain
cardholders’ FICO scores may decrease over time,
depending on the performance of the cardholder and
changes in the credit score calculation.
The following table provides information on delinquency, which is the primary credit quality indicator for retained credit
card loans.
 
(in millions, except ratios)December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Within the revolving period Converted to term loans Total Total
Loan delinquency
Current and less than 30 days past due
 and still accruing $ 139,783  $ 1,239  $ 141,022  $ 165,767  
30–89 days past due and still accruing 997 94 1,091  1,550  
90 or more days past due and still
accruing 1,277  42 1,319  1,607  
Total retained loans $ 142,057  $ 1,375  $ 143,432  $ 168,924  
Loan delinquency ratios
% of 30+ days past due to total retained
loans 1.60 % 9.89 % 1.68 % 1.87 %
% of 90+ days past due to total retained
loans 0.90 3.05 0.92 0.95 
(a)At December 31, 2020, loans under payment deferral programs offered in response to the COVID-19 pandemic which are still within their deferral
period and performing according to their modified terms are generally not considered delinquent.
(b)Represents TDRs.
Other credit quality indicators
The following table provides information on other credit quality indicators for retained credit card loans.
(in millions, except ratios) December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Geographic region
California $ 20,921 $ 25,783 
Texas 14,544 16,728 
New York 11,919 14,544 
Florida 9,562 10,830 
Illinois 8,006 9,579 
New Jersey 5,927 7,165 
Ohio 4,673 5,406 
Pennsylvania 4,476 5,245 
Colorado 4,092 4,763 
Michigan 3,553 4,164 
All other 55,759 64,717 
Total retained loans $ 143,432 $ 168,924 
Percentage of portfolio based on carrying value with estimated refreshed FICO scores
Equal to or greater than 660 85.9 % 84.0 %
Less than 660 13.9 15.4 
No FICO available 0.2 0.6 
(a)The geographic regions presented in the table are ordered based on the magnitude of the corresponding loan balances at December 31, 2020.(b)
(a)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 243
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Loan modifications
The Firm may offer one of a number of loan modification
programs granting concessions to credit card borrowers
who are experiencing financial difficulty. The Firm grants
concessions for most of the credit card loans under
long-term programs. These modifications involve placing
the customer on a fixed payment plan, generally for 60
months, and typically include reducing the interest rate
on the credit card. Substantially all modifications under
the Firm’s long-term programs are considered to be
TDRs. Loans with short-term or other insignificant
modifications that are not considered concessions are
not TDRs.
If the cardholder does not comply with the modified
payment terms, then the credit card loan continues to
age and will ultimately be charged-off in accordance
with the Firm’s standard charge-off policy. In most
cases, the Firm does not reinstate the borrower’s line of
credit.Financial effects of modifications and redefaults
The following table provides information about the
financial effects of the concessions granted on credit
card loans modified in TDRs and redefaults for the
periods presented. For all periods disclosed, new
enrollments were less than 1% of total retained credit
card loans.
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions, except
 weighted-average data) 2020 2019 2018
Balance of new TDRs $ 818 $ 961 $ 866 
Weighted-average interest
rate of loans – before
TDR 18.04 % 19.07 % 17.98 %
Weighted-average interest
rate of loans – after TDR 4.64 4.70 5.16 
Balance of loans that
redefaulted within one
year of modification $ 110 $ 148 $ 116 
(a)Represents the outstanding balance prior to modification.
(b)Represents loans modified in TDRs that experienced a payment
default in the periods presented, and for which the payment default
occurred within one year of the modification. The amounts
presented represent the balance of such loans as of the end of the
quarter in which they defaulted.
For credit card loans modified in TDRs, payment default
is deemed to have occurred when the borrower misses
two consecutive contractual payments. Defaulted
modified credit card loans remain in the modification
program and continue to be charged off in accordance
with the Firm’s standard charge-off policy.(a)
(b)
244 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Wholesale loan portfolio
Wholesale loans include loans made to a variety of
clients, ranging from large corporate and institutional
clients to high-net-worth individuals.
The primary credit quality indicator for wholesale loans
is the internal risk rating assigned to each loan. Risk
ratings are used to identify the credit quality of loans and
differentiate risk within the portfolio. Risk ratings on
loans consider the PD and the LGD. The PD is the
likelihood that a loan will default. The LGD is the
estimated loss on the loan that would be realized upon
the default of the borrower and takes into consideration
collateral and structural support for each credit facility.
Management considers several factors to determine an
appropriate internal risk rating, including the obligor’s
debt capacity and financial flexibility, the level of the
obligor’s earnings, the amount and sources for
repayment, the level and nature of contingencies,
management strength, and the industry and geography
in which the obligor operates. The Firm’s internal risk
ratings generally align with the qualitative characteristics
(e.g., borrower capacity to meet financial commitments
and vulnerability to changes in the economic
environment) defined by S&P and Moody’s, however the
quantitative characteristics (e.g., PD and LGD) may
differ as they reflect internal historical experiences and
assumptions. The Firm generally considers internal
ratings with qualitative characteristics equivalent to
BBB-/Baa3 or higher as investment grade, and these
ratings have a lower PD and/or lower LGD than non-
investment grade ratings.Noninvestment-grade ratings are further classified as
noncriticized and criticized, and the criticized portion is
further subdivided into performing and nonaccrual loans,
representing management’s assessment of the
collectibility of principal and interest. Criticized loans
have a higher PD than noncriticized loans. The Firm’s
definition of criticized aligns with the U.S. banking
regulatory definition of criticized exposures, which
consist of special mention, substandard and doubtful
categories.
Risk ratings are reviewed on a regular and ongoing
basis by Credit Risk Management and are adjusted as
necessary for updated information affecting the obligor’s
ability to fulfill its obligations.
As noted above, the risk rating of a loan considers the
industry in which the obligor conducts its operations. As
part of the overall credit risk management framework,
the Firm focuses on the management and diversification
of its industry and client exposures, with particular
attention paid to industries with actual or potential credit
concern. Refer to Note 4 for further detail on industry
concentrations.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 245
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The following tables provide information on internal risk rating, which is the primary credit quality indicator for retained
wholesale loans.
December 31,
 (in millions, except
ratios)Secured by real estate Commercial and industrial Other Total retained loans
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
Loans by risk ratings
Investment-grade $ 90,147 $ 96,611 $ 71,917 $ 80,489 $ 217,209 $ 186,344 $ 379,273 $ 363,444 
Noninvestment- grade:
Noncriticized 26,129 22,493 57,870 60,437 33,053 27,591 117,052 110,521 
Criticized performing 3,234 1,131 10,991 4,399 1,079 1,126 15,304 6,656 
Criticized nonaccrual 483 183 1,931 844 904 30 3,318 1,057 
Total noninvestment-
grade 29,846 23,807 70,792 65,680 35,036 28,747 135,674 118,234 
Total retained loans$ 119,993 $ 120,418 $ 142,709 $ 146,169 $ 252,245 $ 215,091 $ 514,947 $ 481,678 
% of investment-grade
to total retained loans 75.13 % 80.23 % 50.39 % 55.07 % 86.11 % 86.63 % 73.65 % 75.45 %
% of total criticized to
total retained loans 3.10 1.09 9.05 3.59 0.79 0.54 3.62 1.60 
% of criticized
nonaccrual to total
retained loans 0.40 0.15 1.35 0.58 0.36 0.01 0.64 0.22 
Secured by real estate
 
(in millions)December 31, 2020December
31, 2019
Term loans by origination year Revolving loans
2020 2019 2018 2017 2016 Prior to 2016Within the
revolving
periodConverted to
term loans Total Total
Loans by risk
ratings
Investment-grade $ 16,560 $ 19,575 $ 12,192 $ 11,017 $ 13,439 $ 16,266 $ 1,098 $ — $ 90,147 $ 96,611 
Noninvestment-
grade 3,327 4,339 4,205 2,916 2,575 11,994 489 1 29,846 23,807 
Total retained
loans $ 19,887 $ 23,914 $ 16,397 $ 13,933 $ 16,014 $ 28,260 $ 1,587 $ 1 $119,993 $120,418 
Commercial and industrial
 
(in millions)December 31, 2020December
31, 2019
Term loans by origination year Revolving loans
2020 2019 2018 2017 2016Prior to
2016Within the
revolving
periodConverted to
term loans Total Total
Loans by risk
ratings
Investment-grade $ 21,211 $ 7,304 $ 2,934 $ 1,748 $ 1,032 $ 1,263 $ 36,424 $ 1 $ 71,917 $ 80,489 
Noninvestment-
grade 15,060 8,636 5,131 2,104 497 2,439 36,852 73 70,792 65,680 
Total retained loans$ 36,271 $ 15,940 $ 8,065 $ 3,852 $ 1,529 $ 3,702 $ 73,276 $ 74 $142,709 $146,169 
Other
 
(in millions)December 31, 2020December
31, 2019
Term loans by origination year Revolving loans
2020 2019 2018 2017 2016 Prior to 2016Within the
revolving
periodConverted to
term loans Total Total
Loans by risk
ratings
Investment-grade $ 31,389 $ 10,169 $ 6,994 $ 6,206 $ 3,553 $ 12,595 $145,524 $ 779 $217,209 $186,344 
Noninvestment-
grade 5,009 2,220 1,641 550 146 636 24,710 124 35,036 28,747 
Total retained loans$ 36,398 $ 12,389 $ 8,635 $ 6,756 $ 3,699 $ 13,231 $170,234 $ 903 $252,245 $215,091 
(a)At December 31, 2020, included $8.0 billion of loans under the PPP, of which $7.4 billion is included in commercial and industrial. PPP loans are
guaranteed by the SBA and considered investment-grade. Other than in certain limited circumstances, the Firm typically does not recognize
charge-offs, classify as nonaccrual nor record an allowance for loan losses on these loans.
(b)Includes loans to financial institutions, states and political subdivisions, SPEs, nonprofits, personal investment companies and trusts, as well as
loans to individuals and individual entities (predominantly Wealth Management clients within AWM). Refer to Note 14 for more information on
SPEs.(b)
(a) (a)
(a)
(b)
246 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The following table presents additional information on retained loans secured by real estate within the Wholesale
portfolio, which consists of loans secured wholly or substantially by a lien or liens on real property at origination.
Multifamily lending includes financing for acquisition, leasing and construction of apartment buildings. Other commercial
lending largely includes financing for acquisition, leasing and construction, largely for office, retail and industrial real
estate. Included in secured by real estate loans is $6.4 billion and $6.3 billion as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively, of construction and development loans made to finance land development and on-site construction of
commercial, industrial, residential, or farm buildings.
December 31,
 (in millions, except ratios)Multifamily Other CommercialTotal retained loans secured by
real estate
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
Retained loans secured by real estate $ 73,078 $ 73,840 $ 46,915 $ 46,578 $ 119,993 $ 120,418 
Criticized 1,144 340 2,573 974 3,717 1,314 
% of total criticized to total retained loans secured by real estate 1.57 % 0.46 % 5.48 % 2.09 % 3.10 % 1.09 %
Criticized nonaccrual $ 56 $ 28 $ 427 $ 155 $ 483 $ 183 
% of criticized nonaccrual loans to total retained loans secured by
real estate 0.08 % 0.04 % 0.91 % 0.33 % 0.40 % 0.15 %
The following table provides additional information about retained wholesale loans, including geographic distribution,
delinquency and net charge-offs.
Secured by real estateCommercial
 and industrial OtherTotal
 retained loans
December 31,
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
Loans by geographic distribution
Total U.S. $116,990 $117,836 $109,273 $111,954 $180,583 $150,512 $406,846 $380,302 
Total non-U.S. 3,003 2,582 33,436 34,215 71,662 64,579 108,101 101,376 
Total retained loans $119,993 $120,418 $142,709 $146,169 $252,245 $215,091  $514,947 $481,678 
Loan delinquency
Current and less than 30 days past due
and still accruing $118,894 $120,119 $140,100 $144,839 $249,713 $214,641  $508,707 $479,599 
30–89 days past due and still accruing 601 115 658 449 1,606 415 2,865 979 
90 or more days past due and still
accruing 15 1 20 37 22 5 57 43 
Criticized nonaccrual 483 183 1,931 844 904 30 3,318 1,057 
Total retained loans $119,993 $120,418 $142,709 $146,169 $252,245 $215,091  $514,947 $481,678 
Net charge-offs/(recoveries) $ 10 $ 44 $ 737 $ 335 $ 52 $ 36 $ 799 $ 415 
% of net charge-offs/(recoveries) to end-
of-period retained loans 0.01 % 0.04 % 0.52 % 0.23 % 0.02 % 0.02 % 0.16 % 0.09 %
(a)The U.S. and non-U.S. distribution is determined based predominantly on the domicile of the borrower .
(b)The credit quality of wholesale loans is assessed primarily through ongoing review and monitoring of an obligor ’s ability to meet contractual obligations
rather than relying on the past due status, which is generally a lagging indicator of credit quality . Generally excludes loans under payment deferral
programs of fered in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
(c)Represents loans that are considered well-collateralized and therefore still accruing interest.
Nonaccrual loans
The following table provides information on retained wholesale nonaccrual loans.
December 31, 
 (in millions)Secured by real estateCommercial
 and industrial OtherTotal 
 retained loans
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
Nonaccrual loans
With an allowance $ 351 $ 169 $ 1,667 $ 688 $ 800 $ 28 $ 2,818 $ 885 
Without an allowance 132 14 264 156 104 2 500 172 
Total nonaccrual
loans $ 483 $ 183 $ 1,931 $ 844 $ 904 $ 30 $ 3,318 $ 1,057 
(a)Loans that were modified in response to the COVID-19 pandemic continue to be risk-rated in accordance with the Firm’ s overall credit risk management
framework. As of December 31, 2020, predominantly all of these loans were considered performing.
(b)When the discounted cash flows, collateral value or market price equals or exceeds the amortized cost of the loan, the loan does not require an allowance.
This typically occurs when the loans have been partially charged of f and/or there have been interest payments received and applied to the loan balance.
(c)Interest income on nonaccrual loans recognized on a cash basis were not material for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Loan modifications
Certain loan modifications are considered to be TDRs as they provide various concessions to borrowers who are
experiencing financial difficulty. Loans with short-term or other insignificant modifications that are not considered
concessions are not TDRs nor are loans for which the Firm has elected to apply the option to suspend the application of
accounting guidance for TDRs as provided by the CARES Act and extended by the Consolidated Appropriations Act. The
carrying value of TDRs was $954 million and $501 million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The carrying
value of new TDRs was $734 million, $407 million and $718 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively. The impact of these modifications, as well as new TDRs, were not material to the Firm for the years
ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(b)
(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 247
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 13 – Allowance for credit losses
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL
accounting guidance. The adoption of this guidance
established a single allowance framework for all financial
assets measured at amortized cost and certain off-
balance sheet credit exposures. This framework requires
that management’s estimate reflects credit losses over
the instrument’s remaining expected life and considers
expected future changes in macroeconomic conditions.
Refer to Note 1 for further information.
JPMorgan Chase’s allowance for credit losses
comprises:
•the allowance for loan losses, which covers the Firm’s
retained loan portfolios (scored and risk-rated) and is
presented separately on the Consolidated balance
sheets,
•the allowance for lending-related commitments, which
is presented on the Consolidated balance sheets in
accounts payable and other liabilities, and
•the allowance for credit losses on investment
securities, which covers the Firm’s HTM and AFS
securities and is recognized within Investment
Securities on the Consolidated balance sheets.
The income statement effect of all changes in the
allowance for credit losses is recognized in the provision
for credit losses.
Determining the appropriateness of the allowance for
credit losses is complex and requires significant
judgment by management about the effect of matters
that are inherently uncertain. At least quarterly, the
allowance for credit losses is reviewed by the CRO, the
CFO and the Controller of the Firm. Subsequent
evaluations of credit exposures, considering the
macroeconomic conditions, forecasts and other factors
then prevailing, may result in significant changes in the
allowance for credit losses in future periods.
The Firm’s policies used to determine its allowance for
loan losses and its allowance for lending-related
commitments are described in the following paragraphs.
Refer to Note 10 for a description of the policies used to
determine the allowance for credit losses on investment
securities.
Methodology for allowances for loan losses and
lending-related commitments
The allowance for loan losses and allowance for lending-
related commitments represents expected credit losses
over the remaining expected life of retained loans and
lending-related commitments that are not unconditionally
cancellable. The Firm does not record an allowance for
future draws on unconditionally cancellable lending-
related commitments (e.g., credit cards). Expected
losses related to accrued interest on credit card loans
and certain performing, modified loans to borrowers
impacted by COVID-19 are considered in the Firm’s
allowance for loan losses. However, the Firm does not
record an allowance on other accrued interest
receivables, due to its policy to write these receivables
off no later than 90 days past due by reversing interest
income.
The expected life of each instrument is determined by
considering its contractual term, expected prepayments,
cancellation features, and certain extension and call
options.The expected life of funded credit card loans is generally
estimated by considering expected future payments on
the credit card account, and determining how much of
those amounts should be allocated to repayments of the
funded loan balance (as of the balance sheet date)
versus other account activity. This allocation is made
using an approach that incorporates the payment
application requirements of the Credit Card
Accountability Responsibility and Disclosure Act of 2009,
generally paying down the highest interest rate balances
first.
The estimate of expected credit losses includes
expected recoveries of amounts previously charged off
or expected to be charged off, even if such recoveries
result in a negative allowance.
Collective and Individual Assessments
When calculating the allowance for loan losses and the
allowance for lending-related commitments, the Firm
assesses whether exposures share similar risk
characteristics. If similar risk characteristics exist, the
Firm estimates expected credit losses collectively,
considering the risk associated with a particular pool and
the probability that the exposures within the pool will
deteriorate or default. The assessment of risk
characteristics is subject to significant management
judgment. Emphasizing one characteristic over another
or considering additional characteristics could affect the
allowance.
•Relevant risk characteristics for the consumer portfolio
include product type, delinquency status, current FICO
scores, geographic distribution, and, for collateralized
loans, current LTV ratios.
•Relevant risk characteristics for the wholesale portfolio
include LOB, geography, risk rating, delinquency
status, level and type of collateral, industry, credit
enhancement, product type, facility purpose, tenor, and
payment terms.
The majority of the Firm’s credit exposures share risk
characteristics with other similar exposures, and as a
result are collectively assessed for impairment (“portfolio-
based component”). The portfolio-based component
covers consumer loans, performing risk-rated loans and
certain lending-related commitments.
If an exposure does not share risk characteristics with
other exposures, the Firm generally estimates expected
credit losses on an individual basis, considering
expected repayment and conditions impacting that
individual exposure (“asset-specific component”). The
asset-specific component covers modified PCD loans,
loans modified or reasonably expected to be modified in
a TDR, collateral-dependent loans, as well as, risk-rated
loans that have been placed on nonaccrual status.
Portfolio-based component
The portfolio-based component begins with a
quantitative calculation that considers the likelihood of
the borrower changing delinquency status or moving
from one risk rating to another. The quantitative
calculation covers expected credit losses over an
instrument’s expected life and is estimated by applying
credit loss factors to the Firm’s
248 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
estimated exposure at default. The credit loss factors
incorporate the probability of borrower default as well as
loss severity in the event of default. They are derived
using a weighted average of five internally developed
macroeconomic scenarios over an eight-quarter forecast
period, followed by a single year straight-line
interpolation to revert to long run historical information
for periods beyond the eight-quarter forecast period. The
five
macroeconomic scenarios consist of a central, relative
adverse, extreme adverse, relative upside and extreme
upside scenario, and are updated by the Firm’s central
forecasting team. The scenarios take into consideration
the Firm’s overarching economic outlook, internal
perspectives from subject matter experts across the
Firm, and market consensus and involve a governed
process that incorporates feedback from senior
management across LOBs, Corporate Finance and Risk
Management.
The COVID-19 pandemic has stressed many MEVs to
degrees not experienced in recent history, which has
created additional challenges in the use of modeled
credit loss estimates and increased the reliance on
management judgment. In periods where certain MEVs
are outside the range of historical experience on which
the Firm’s models have been trained, the Firm makes
adjustments to appropriately address these economic
circumstances. The Firm also considers the impact of
other events, such as government unemployment
benefits or other stimulus programs, when determining
whether adjustments are necessary.
The quantitative calculation is adjusted to take into
consideration model imprecision, emerging risk
assessments, trends and other subjective factors that
are not yet reflected in the calculation. These
adjustments are accomplished in part by analyzing the
historical loss experience, including during stressed
periods, for each major product or model. Management
applies judgment in making this adjustment, including
taking into account uncertainties associated with the
economic and political conditions, quality of underwriting
standards, borrower behavior, credit concentrations or
deterioration within an industry, product or portfolio, as
well as other relevant internal and external factors
affecting the credit quality of the portfolio. In certain
instances, the interrelationships between these factors
create further uncertainties.
Throughout 2020, the Firm made adjustments to its
quantitative calculation which placed significant
weighting on its adverse scenarios, as a result of
continued uncertainty related to the COVID-19
pandemic.
The application of different inputs into the quantitative
calculation, and the assumptions used by management
to adjust the quantitative calculation, are subject to
significant management judgment, and emphasizing one
input or assumption over another, or considering other
inputs or assumptions, could affect the estimate of the
allowance for loan losses and the allowance for lending-
related commitments.Asset-specific component
To determine the asset-specific component of the
allowance, collateral-dependent loans (including those
loans for which foreclosure is probable) and larger,
nonaccrual risk-rated loans in the wholesale portfolio
segment are generally evaluated individually, while
smaller loans (both scored and risk-rated) are
aggregated for evaluation using factors relevant for the
respective class of assets.
The Firm generally measures the asset-specific
allowance as the difference between the amortized cost
of the loan and the present value of the cash flows
expected to be collected, discounted at the loan’s
original effective interest rate. Subsequent changes in
impairment are generally recognized as an adjustment to
the allowance for loan losses. For collateral-dependent
loans, the fair value of collateral less estimated costs to
sell is used to determine the charge-off amount for
declines in value (to reduce the amortized cost of the
loan to the fair value of collateral) or the amount of
negative allowance that should be recognized (for
recoveries of prior charge-offs associated with
improvements in the fair value of collateral).
The asset-specific component of the allowance for loan
losses for loans that have been or are expected to be
modified in TDRs incorporates the effect of the
modification on the loan’s expected cash flows (including
forgone interest, principal forgiveness, as well as other
concessions), and also the potential for redefault. For
residential real estate loans modified in or expected to
be modified in TDRs, the Firm develops product-specific
probability of default estimates, which are applied at a
loan level to compute expected losses. In developing
these probabilities of default, the Firm considers the
relationship between the credit quality characteristics of
the underlying loans and certain assumptions about
housing prices and unemployment, based upon industry-
wide data. The Firm also considers its own historical loss
experience to-date based on actual redefaulted modified
loans. For credit card loans modified in or expected to be
modified in TDRs, expected losses incorporate projected
delinquencies and charge-offs based on the Firm’s
historical experience by type of modification program.
For wholesale loans modified or expected to be modified
in TDRs, expected losses incorporate management’s
expectation of the borrower’s ability to repay under the
modified terms.
Estimating the timing and amounts of future cash flows is
highly judgmental as these cash flow projections rely
upon estimates such as loss severities, asset valuations,
default rates (including redefault rates on modified
loans), the amounts and timing of interest or principal
payments (including any expected prepayments) or other
factors that are reflective of current and expected market
conditions. These estimates are, in turn, dependent on
factors such as the duration of current overall economic
conditions, industry-, portfolio-, or borrower-specific
factors, the expected outcome of insolvency proceedings
as well as, in certain circumstances, other economic
factors. All of these estimates and assumptions require
significant management judgment and certain
assumptions are highly subjective.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 249
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Allowance for credit losses and related information
The table below summarizes information about the allowances for loan losses and lending-related commitments, and
includes a breakdown of loans and lending-related commitments by impairment methodology. Refer to Note 10 for
further information on the allowance for credit losses on investment securities.
The adoption of the CECL accounting guidance resulted in a change in the accounting for PCI loans, which are
considered PCD loans. In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the Firm reclassified risk-rated loans and lending-
related commitments from the consumer, excluding credit card portfolio segment to the wholesale portfolio segment, to
align with the methodology applied when determining the allowance. Prior-period amounts have been revised to
conform with the current presentation. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
(Table continued on next page)
2020
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions)Consumer,
 excluding 
 credit card Credit card Wholesale Total
Allowance for loan losses
Beginning balance at January 1, $ 2,538 $ 5,683 $ 4,902 $ 13,123 
Cumulative effect of a change in accounting principle 297 5,517 (1,642) 4,172 
Gross charge-offs 805  5,077 954 6,836 
Gross recoveries collected (631) (791) (155) (1,577)
Net charge-offs 174  4,286 799 5,259 
Write-offs of PCI loans NA NA NA NA
Provision for loan losses 974 10,886 4,431 16,291 
Other 1  — — 1 
Ending balance at December 31, $ 3,636 $ 17,800 $ 6,892 $ 28,328 
Allowance for lending-related commitments
Beginning balance at January 1, $ 12 $ — $ 1,179 $ 1,191 
Cumulative effect of a change in accounting principle 133 — (35) 98 
Provision for lending-related commitments 42 — 1,079 1,121 
Other — — (1) (1)
Ending balance at December 31, $ 187 $ — $ 2,222 $ 2,409 
Total allowance for credit losses $ 3,823 $ 17,800 $ 9,114 $ 30,737 
Allowance for loan losses by impairment methodology
Asset-specific $ (7) $ 633 $ 682 $ 1,308 
Portfolio-based 3,643 17,167 6,210 27,020 
PCI NA NA NA NA
Total allowance for loan losses $ 3,636 $ 17,800 $ 6,892 $ 28,328 
Loans by impairment methodology
Asset-specific $ 16,648 $ 1,375 $ 3,606 $ 21,629 
Portfolio-based 285,479 142,057 511,341 938,877 
PCI NA NA NA NA
Total retained loans $ 302,127 $ 143,432 $ 514,947 $ 960,506 
Collateral-dependent loans
Net charge-offs $ 133  $ — $ 76 $ 209 
Loans measured at fair value of collateral less cost to sell 4,956 — 188 5,144 
Allowance for lending-related commitments by impairment
methodology
Asset-specific $ — $ — $ 114 $ 114 
Portfolio-based 187 — 2,108 2,295 
Total allowance for lending-related commitments $ 187 $ — $ 2,222 $ 2,409 
Lending-related commitments by impairment methodology
Asset-specific $ — $ — $ 577 $ 577 
Portfolio-based 37,783 — 426,871 464,654 
Total lending-related commitments $ 37,783 $ — $ 427,448 $ 465,231 (e)
(a)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(d)
250 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
(a)Prior to the adoption of CECL, write-offs of PCI loans were recorded against the allowance for loan losses when actual losses for a pool
exceeded estimated losses that were recorded as purchase accounting adjustments at the time of acquisition. A write-off of a PCI loan was
recognized when the underlying loan was removed from a pool.
(b)Includes modified PCD loans and loans that have been modified or are reasonably expected to be modified in a TDR. Also includes risk-rated
loans that have been placed on nonaccrual status for the wholesale portfolio segment. The asset-specific credit card allowance for loans
modified, or reasonably expected to be modified, in a TDR is calculated based on the loans’ original contractual interest rates and does not
consider any incremental penalty rates.
(c)The allowance for lending-related commitments is reported in accounts payable and other liabilities on the Consolidated balance sheets.
(d)At December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, lending-related commitments excluded $19.5 billion, $9.8 billion and $8.7 billion, respectively, for the
consumer, excluding credit card portfolio segment; $658.5 billion, $650.7 billion and $605.4 billion, respectively, for the credit card portfolio
segment; and $22.4 billion, $24.1 billion and $24.8 billion, respectively, for the wholesale portfolio segment, which were not subject to the
allowance for lending-related commitments.
(e)Excludes HTM securities, which had an allowance for credit losses of $78 million and a provision for credit losses of $68 million as of and for the
year ended December 31, 2020.
(table continued from previous page)
2019 2018
Consumer,
 excluding 
 credit card Credit card Wholesale TotalConsumer,
 excluding 
 credit card Credit card Wholesale Total
$ 3,434 $ 5,184 $ 4,827 $ 13,445 $ 3,892 $ 4,884 $ 4,828 $ 13,604 
NA NA NA NA NA NA NA NA
902 5,436 472 6,810 977 5,011 361 6,349 
(536) (588) (57) (1,181) (827) (493) (173) (1,493)
366 4,848 415 5,629 150 4,518 188 4,856 
151 — — 151 187 — — 187 
(378) 5,348 479 5,449 (121) 4,818 188 4,885 
(1) (1) 11 9 — — (1) (1)
$ 2,538 $ 5,683 $ 4,902 $ 13,123 $ 3,434 $ 5,184 $ 4,827 $ 13,445 
$ 12 $ — $ 1,043 $ 1,055 $ 12 $ — $ 1,056 $ 1,068 
NA NA NA NA NA NA NA NA
— — 136 136 — — (14) (14)
— — — — — — 1 1 
$ 12 $ — $ 1,179 $ 1,191 $ 12 $ — $ 1,043 $ 1,055 
$ 2,550 $ 5,683 $ 6,081 $ 14,314 $ 3,446 $ 5,184 $ 5,870 $ 14,500 
$ 75 $ 477 $ 295 $ 847 $ 143 $ 440 $ 350 $ 933 
1,476 5,206 4,607 11,289 1,503 4,744 4,477 10,724 
987 — — 987 1,788 — — 1,788 
$ 2,538 $ 5,683 $ 4,902 $ 13,123 $ 3,434 $ 5,184 $ 4,827 $ 13,445 
$ 5,961 $ 1,452 $ 1,123 $ 8,536 $ 6,665 $ 1,319 $ 1,459 $ 9,443 
268,675 167,472 480,555 916,702 305,077 155,297 475,561 935,935 
20,363 — — 20,363 24,034 — 3 24,037 
$294,999 $ 168,924 $ 481,678 $ 945,601 $ 335,776 $ 156,616 $ 477,023 $ 969,415 
$ 46 $ — $ 36 $ 82 $ 16 $ — $ 29 $ 45 
2,053 — 87 2,140 2,076 — 206 2,282 
$ — $ — $ 102 $ 102 $ — $ — $ 99 $ 99 
12 — 1,077 1,089 12 — 944 956 
$ 12 $ — $ 1,179 $ 1,191 $ 12 $ — $ 1,043 $ 1,055 
$ — $ — $ 474 $ 474 $ — $ — $ 469 $ 469 
30,417 — 392,967 423,384 26,502 — 374,996 401,498 
$ 30,417 $ — $ 393,441 $ 423,858 $ 26,502 $ — $ 375,465 $ 401,967 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 251
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Discussion of changes in the allowance during 2020
The increase in the allowance for loan losses and
lending-related commitments was primarily driven by an
increase in the provision for credit losses, reflecting the
deterioration in and uncertainty around the future
macroeconomic environment as a result of the impact of
the COVID-19 pandemic.
As of December 31, 2020, the Firm’s central case
reflected U.S. unemployment rates of approximately 7%
through the second quarter of 2021 and remaining
above 5% until the second half of 2022. This compared
with relatively low levels of unemployment of
approximately 4% throughout 2020 and 2021 in the
Firm’s January 1, 2020 central case.
Further, while the Firm’s January 1, 2020 central case
U.S. GDP forecast reflected a 1.7% expansion in 2020,
actual U.S. GDP contracted approximately 2.5% in
2020. As of December 31, 2020, the Firm’s central case
assumptions reflect a return to pre-pandemic GDP
levels in the fourth quarter of 2021.
Due to elevated uncertainty in the near term outlook,
driven by the potential for increased infection rates and
related lock downs resulting from the pandemic, as well
as the prospect that government and other consumer
relief measures set to expire may not be extended, the
Firm has placed significant weighting on its adverse
scenarios. These scenarios incorporate more punitive
macroeconomic factors than the central case
assumptions, resulting in weighted average U.S.
unemployment rates remaining elevated throughout
2021 and 2022, ending the fourth quarter of 2022 at
approximately 6%, and in U.S. GDP ending 2022
approximately 0.9% higher than fourth quarter 2019
actual pre-pandemic levels.The Firm’s central case assumptions reflected U.S.
unemployment rates and U.S. real GDP as follows:
Assumptions at January 1, 2020
2Q20 4Q20 2Q21
U.S. unemployment
rate 3.7% 3.8% 4.0%
Cumulative change in
U.S. real GDP from
12/31/2019 0.9% 1.7% 2.4%
Assumptions at December 31, 2020
2Q21 4Q21 2Q22
U.S. unemployment
rate 6.8% 5.7% 5.1%
Cumulative change in
U.S. real GDP from
12/31/2019 (1.9)% 0.6% 2.0%
(a)Reflects quarterly average of forecasted U.S. unemployment rate.
(b)4Q20 actual U.S. unemployment rate (quarterly average) was
6.8%. 4Q20 actual cumulative change in U.S. real GDP from 4Q19
was (2.5%).
Subsequent changes to this forecast and related
estimates
will be reflected in the provision for credit losses in
future
periods.(b)
(a)
(a)
252 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 14 – Variable interest entities
Refer to Note 1 on page 167 for a further description of JPMorgan Chase’s accounting policies regarding consolidation
of VIEs.
The following table summarizes the most significant types of Firm-sponsored VIEs by business segment. The Firm
considers a “sponsored” VIE to include any entity where: (1) JPMorgan Chase is the primary beneficiary of the
structure; (2) the VIE is used by JPMorgan Chase to securitize Firm assets; (3) the VIE issues financial instruments
with the JPMorgan Chase name; or (4) the entity is a JPMorgan Chase–administered asset-backed commercial paper
conduit.
Line of
Business Transaction Type Activity2020 Form 10-K
 page references
CCBCredit card securitization trustsSecuritization of originated credit card receivables253-254
Mortgage securitization trusts Servicing and securitization of both originated and
purchased residential mortgages254-256
CIBMortgage and other securitization trusts Securitization of both originated and purchased
residential and commercial mortgages, and other
consumer loans254-256
Multi-seller conduits Assist clients in accessing the financial markets in
a cost-efficient manner and structures transactions
to meet investor needs256
Municipal bond vehicles Financing of municipal bond investments 256-257
The Firm’s other business segments are also involved with VIEs (both third-party and Firm-sponsored), but to a lesser
extent, as follows:
•Asset & Wealth Management: AWM sponsors and manages certain funds that are deemed VIEs. As asset manager
of the funds, AWM earns a fee based on assets managed; the fee varies with each fund’s investment objective and
is competitively priced. For fund entities that qualify as VIEs, AWM’s interests are, in certain cases, considered to be
significant variable interests that result in consolidation of the financial results of these entities.
•Commercial Banking: CB provides financing and lending-related services to a wide spectrum of clients, including
certain third-party-sponsored entities that may meet the definition of a VIE. CB does not control the activities of
these entities and does not consolidate these entities. CB’s maximum loss exposure, regardless of whether the
entity is a VIE, is generally limited to loans and lending-related commitments which are reported and disclosed in the
same manner as any other third-party transaction.
•Corporate: Corporate is involved with entities that may meet the definition of VIEs; however these entities are
generally subject to specialized investment company accounting, which does not require the consolidation of
investments, including VIEs. In addition, Treasury and CIO invest in securities generally issued by third parties
which may meet the definition of VIEs (e.g., issuers of asset-backed securities). In general, the Firm does not have
the power to direct the significant activities of these entities and therefore does not consolidate these entities. Refer
to Note 10 for further information on the Firm’s investment securities portfolio.
In addition, CIB also invests in and provides financing and other services to VIEs sponsored by third parties. Refer to
page 258 of this Note for more information on the VIEs sponsored by third parties.
Significant Firm-sponsored variable interest entities
Credit card securitizations
CCB’s Card business may securitize originated credit
card loans, primarily through the Chase Issuance Trust
(the “Trust”). The Firm’s continuing involvement in credit
card securitizations includes servicing the receivables,
retaining an undivided seller’s interest in the
receivables, retaining certain senior and subordinated
securities and maintaining escrow accounts.
The Firm consolidates the assets and liabilities of its
sponsored credit card trusts as it is considered to be the
primary beneficiary of these securitization trusts based
on the Firm’s ability to direct the activities of these VIEs
through its servicing responsibilities and other duties,
including making decisions as to the receivables that are
transferred into those trusts and as to any related
modifications and workouts. Additionally, the nature and
extent of the Firm’s other continuing involvement with
the trusts, as indicated above, obligates the Firm to
absorblosses and gives the Firm the right to receive certain
benefits from these VIEs that could potentially be
significant.
The underlying securitized credit card receivables and
other assets of the securitization trusts are available
only for payment of the beneficial interests issued by the
securitization trusts; they are not available to pay the
Firm’s other obligations or the claims of the Firm’s
creditors.
The agreements with the credit card securitization trusts
require the Firm to maintain a minimum undivided
interest in the credit card trusts (generally 5%). As of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Firm held undivided
interests in Firm-sponsored credit card securitization
trusts of $5.4 billion and $5.3 billion, respectively. The
Firm maintained an average undivided interest in
principal receivables owned by those trusts of
approximately 39% and 50% for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 253
Notes to consolidated financial statements
2019. The Firm did not retain any senior securities and
retained $1.5 billion and $3.0 billion of subordinated
securities in certain of its credit card securitization trusts
as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The
Firm’s undivided interests in the credit card trusts and
securities retained are eliminated in consolidation.Firm-sponsored mortgage and other securitization
trusts
The Firm securitizes (or has securitized) originated and
purchased residential mortgages, commercial
mortgages and other consumer loans primarily in its
CCB and CIB businesses. Depending on the particular
transaction, as well as the respective business involved,
the Firm may act as the servicer of the loans and/or
retain certain beneficial interests in the securitization
trusts.
The following table presents the total unpaid principal amount of assets held in Firm-sponsored private-label
securitization entities, including those in which the Firm has continuing involvement, and those that are consolidated by
the Firm. Continuing involvement includes servicing the loans, holding senior interests or subordinated interests
(including amounts required to be held pursuant to credit risk retention rules), recourse or guarantee arrangements,
and derivative contracts. In certain instances, the Firm’s only continuing involvement is servicing the loans. The Firm’s
maximum loss exposure from retained and purchased interests is the carrying value of these interests. Refer to
Securitization activity on page 259 of this Note for further information regarding the Firm’s cash flows associated with
and interests retained in nonconsolidated VIEs, and pages 259-260 of this Note for information on the Firm’s loan sales
and securitization activity related to U.S. GSEs and government agencies.
Principal amount outstandingJPMorgan Chase interest in securitized assets in
nonconsolidated VIEs
December 31, 2020
 (in millions)Total assets
held by
securitization
VIEsAssets 
 held in
consolidated
securitization
VIEsAssets held in
nonconsolidated
securitization
VIEs with
continuing
involvementTrading
assets Investment
securitiesOther
financial
assetsTotal
interests
held by
JPMorgan
Chase
Securitization-related
Residential mortgage:
Prime/Alt-A and option ARMs $ 49,644 $ 1,693 $ 41,265 $ 574 $ 724 $ — $ 1,298 
Subprime 12,896 46 12,154 9 — — 9 
Commercial and other 119,732 — 92,351 955 1,549 262 2,766 
Total $ 182,272 $ 1,739 $ 145,770 $ 1,538 $ 2,273 $ 262 $ 4,073 
Principal amount outstandingJPMorgan Chase interest in securitized assets in
nonconsolidated VIEs
December 31, 2019
 (in millions)Total assets
held by
securitization
VIEsAssets 
 held in
consolidated
securitization
VIEsAssets held in
nonconsolidated
securitization
VIEs with
continuing
involvementTrading
assets Investment
securitiesOther
financial
assetsTotal
interests
held by
JPMorgan
Chase
Securitization-related
Residential mortgage:
Prime/Alt-A and option ARMs $ 60,348 $ 2,796 $ 48,734 $ 535 $ 625 $ — $ 1,160 
Subprime 14,661 — 13,490 7 — — 7 
Commercial and other 111,903 — 80,878 785 773 241 1,799 
Total $ 186,912 $ 2,796 $ 143,102 $ 1,327 $ 1,398 $ 241 $ 2,966 
(a)Excludes U.S. GSEs and government agency securitizations and re-securitizations, which are not Firm-sponsored. Refer to pages 259-260 of this Note for
information on the Firm’s loan sales and securitization activity related to U.S. GSEs and government agencies.
(b)Consists of securities backed by commercial real estate loans and non-mortgage-related consumer receivables purchased from third parties.
(c)Excludes the following: retained servicing (refer to Note 15 for a discussion of MSRs); securities retained from loan sales and securitization activity related to
U.S. GSEs and government agencies; interest rate and foreign exchange derivatives primarily used to manage interest rate and foreign exchange risks of
securitization entities (refer to Note 5 for further information on derivatives); senior and subordinated securities of $105 million and $40 million, respectively, at
December 31, 2020, and $106 million and $94 million, respectively, at December 31, 2019, which the Firm purchased in connection with CIB’s secondary
market-making activities.
(d)Includes interests held in re-securitization transactions.
(e)As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, 73% and 63%, respectively, of the Firm’s retained securitization interests, which are predominantly carried at fair value
and include amounts required to be held pursuant to credit risk retention rules, were risk-rated “A” or better, on an S&P-equivalent basis. The retained
interests in prime residential mortgages consisted of $1.3 billion and $1.1 billion of investment-grade retained interests, and $41 million and $72 million of
noninvestment-grade retained interests at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The retained interests in commercial and other securitization trusts
consisted of $2.0 billion and $1.2 billion of investment-grade retained interests, and $753 million and $575 million of noninvestment-grade retained interests
at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.    (c)(d)(e)
(a)
(b)
(c)(d)(e)
(a)
(b)
254 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Residential mortgage
The Firm securitizes residential mortgage loans
originated by CCB, as well as residential mortgage
loans purchased from third parties by either CCB or CIB.
CCB generally retains servicing for all residential
mortgage loans it originated or purchased, and for
certain mortgage loans purchased by CIB. For
securitizations of loans serviced by CCB, the Firm has
the power to direct the significant activities of the VIE
because it is responsible for decisions related to loan
modifications and workouts. CCB may also retain an
interest upon securitization.
In addition, CIB engages in underwriting and trading
activities involving securities issued by Firm-sponsored
securitization trusts. As a result, CIB at times retains
senior and/or subordinated interests (including residual
interests and amounts required to be held pursuant to
credit risk retention rules) in residential mortgage
securitizations at the time of securitization, and/or
reacquires positions in the secondary market in the
normal course of business. In certain instances, as a
result of the positions retained or reacquired by CIB or
held by Treasury and CIO or CCB, when considered
together with the servicing arrangements entered into by
CCB, the Firm is deemed to be the primary beneficiary
of certain securitization trusts. Refer to the table on
page 257 of this Note for more information on
consolidated residential mortgage securitizations.
The Firm does not consolidate residential mortgage
securitizations (Firm-sponsored or third-party-
sponsored) when it is not the servicer (and therefore
does not have the power to direct the most significant
activities of the trust) or does not hold a beneficial
interest in the trust that could potentially be significant to
the trust. Refer to the table on page 257 of this Note for
more information on the consolidated residential
mortgage securitizations, and the table on the previous
page of this Note for further information on interests held
in nonconsolidated residential mortgage securitizations.
Commercial mortgages and other consumer
securitizations
CIB originates and securitizes commercial mortgage
loans, and engages in underwriting and trading activities
involving the securities issued by securitization trusts.
CIB may retain unsold senior and/or subordinated
interests (including amounts required to be held
pursuant to credit risk retention rules) in commercial
mortgage securitizations at the time of securitization but,
generally, the Firm does not service commercial loan
securitizations. Treasury and CIO may choose to invest
in these securitizations as well. For commercial
mortgage securitizations the power to direct the
significant activities of the VIE generally is held by the
servicer or investors in a specified class of securities
(“controlling class”). The Firm generally does not retain
an interest in the controlling class in its sponsored
commercial mortgage securitization transactions. Refer
to the table on page 257 of this Note for more
information on the consolidated commercial mortgage
securitizations, and the table on the previous page of
this Note for furtherinformation on interests held in nonconsolidated
securitizations.
Re-securitizations
The Firm engages in certain re-securitization
transactions in which debt securities are transferred to a
VIE in exchange for new beneficial interests. These
transfers occur in connection with both U.S. GSEs and
government agency sponsored VIEs, which are backed
by residential mortgages. The Firm’s consolidation
analysis is largely dependent on the Firm’s role and
interest in the re-securitization trusts.
The following table presents the principal amount of
securities transferred to re-securitization VIEs.
Year ended December 31, 
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Transfers of securities to
VIEs
U.S. GSEs and
government agencies $46,123 $ 25,852 $ 15,532 
Most re-securitizations with which the Firm is involved
are client-driven transactions in which a specific client or
group of clients is seeking a specific return or risk
profile. For these transactions, the Firm has concluded
that the decision-making power of the entity is shared
between the Firm and its clients, considering the joint
effort and decisions in establishing the re-securitization
trust and its assets, as well as the significant economic
interest the client holds in the re-securitization trust;
therefore the Firm does not consolidate the re-
securitization VIE.
The Firm did not transfer any private label securities to
re-securitization VIEs during 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively, and retained interests in any such Firm-
sponsored VIEs as of December 31, 2020 and 2019
were immaterial.
Additionally, the Firm may invest in beneficial interests
of third-party-sponsored re-securitizations and generally
purchases these interests in the secondary market. In
these circumstances, the Firm does not have the
unilateral ability to direct the most significant activities of
the re-securitization trust, either because it was not
involved in the initial design of the trust, or the Firm is
involved with an independent third-party sponsor and
demonstrates shared power over the creation of the
trust; therefore, the Firm does not consolidate the re-
securitization VIE.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 255
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The following table presents information on the Firm's
interests in nonconsolidated re-securitization VIEs.
Nonconsolidated 
 re-securitization VIEs
December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019
U.S. GSEs and government
agencies
Interest in VIEs $ 2,631 $ 2,928 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Firm did not
consolidate any U.S. GSE and government agency re-
securitization VIEs or any Firm-sponsored private-label
re-securitization VIEs.
Multi-seller conduits
Multi-seller conduit entities are separate bankruptcy
remote entities that provide secured financing,
collateralized by pools of receivables and other financial
assets, to customers of the Firm. The conduits fund their
financing facilities through the issuance of highly rated
commercial paper. The primary source of repayment of
the commercial paper is the cash flows from the pools of
assets. In most instances, the assets are structured with
deal-specific credit enhancements provided to the
conduits by the customers (i.e., sellers) or other third
parties. Deal-specific credit enhancements are generally
structured to cover a multiple of historical losses
expected on the pool of assets, and are typically in the
form of overcollateralization provided by the seller. The
deal-specific credit enhancements mitigate the Firm’s
potential losses on its agreements with the conduits.
To ensure timely repayment of the commercial paper,
and to provide the conduits with funding to provide
financing to customers in the event that the conduits do
not obtain funding in the commercial paper market, each
asset pool financed by the conduits has a minimum
100% deal-specific liquidity facility associated with it
provided by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A. also provides the multi-seller conduit
vehicles with uncommitted program-wide liquidity
facilities and program-wide credit enhancement in the
form of standby letters of credit. The amount of
program-wide credit enhancement required is based
upon commercial paper issuance and approximates
10% of the outstanding balance of commercial paper.
The Firm consolidates its Firm-administered multi-seller
conduits, as the Firm has both the power to direct the
significant activities of the conduits and a potentially
significant economic interest in the conduits. As
administrative agent and in its role in structuring
transactions, the Firm makes decisions regarding asset
types and credit quality, and manages the commercial
paper funding needs of the conduits. The Firm’s
interests that could potentially be significant to the VIEs
include the fees received as administrative agent and
liquidity and program-wide credit enhancement provider,
as well as the potential exposure created by the liquidity
and credit enhancement facilities provided to the
conduits. Refer to page 257 of this Note for further
information on consolidated VIE assets and liabilities.In the normal course of business, JPMorgan Chase
makes markets in and invests in commercial paper
issued by the Firm-administered multi-seller conduits.
The Firm held $13.5 billion and $16.3 billion of the
commercial paper issued by the Firm-administered
multi-seller conduits at December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively, which have been eliminated in
consolidation. The Firm’s investments reflect the Firm’s
funding needs and capacity and were not driven by
market illiquidity. Other than the amounts required to be
held pursuant to credit risk retention rules, the Firm is
not obligated under any agreement to purchase the
commercial paper issued by the Firm-administered
multi-seller conduits.
Deal-specific liquidity facilities, program-wide liquidity
and credit enhancement provided by the Firm have
been eliminated in consolidation. The Firm or the Firm-
administered multi-seller conduits provide lending-
related commitments to certain clients of the Firm-
administered multi-seller conduits. The unfunded
commitments were $12.2 billion and $8.9 billion at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, and are
reported as off-balance sheet lending-related
commitments in other unfunded commitments to extend
credit. Refer to Note 28 for more information on off-
balance sheet lending-related commitments.
Municipal bond vehicles
Municipal bond vehicles or tender option bond (“TOB”)
trusts allow institutions to finance their municipal bond
investments at short-term rates. In a typical TOB
transaction, the trust purchases highly rated municipal
bond(s) of a single issuer and funds the purchase by
issuing two types of securities: (1) puttable floating-rate
certificates (“floaters”) and (2) inverse floating-rate
residual interests (“residuals”). The floaters are typically
purchased by money market funds or other short-term
investors and may be tendered, with requisite notice, to
the TOB trust. The residuals are retained by the investor
seeking to finance its municipal bond investment. TOB
transactions where the residual is held by a third-party
investor are typically known as customer TOB trusts,
and non-customer TOB trusts are transactions where
the Residual is retained by the Firm. Customer TOB
trusts are sponsored by a third party; refer to page 258
of this Note for further information. The Firm serves as
sponsor for all non-customer TOB transactions. The
Firm may provide various services to a TOB trust,
including remarketing agent, liquidity or tender option
provider, and/or sponsor.
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC may serve as a remarketing
agent on the floaters for TOB trusts. The remarketing
agent is responsible for establishing the periodic
variable rate on the floaters, conducting the initial
placement and remarketing tendered floaters. The
remarketing agent may, but is not obligated to, make
markets in floaters. Floaters held by the Firm were not
material during 2020 and 2019.
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. or J.P. Morgan Securities
LLC often serves as the sole liquidity or tender option
provider for the TOB trusts. The liquidity provider’s
obligation to
256 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
perform is conditional and is limited by certain events
(“Termination Events”), which include bankruptcy or
failure to pay by the municipal bond issuer or credit
enhancement provider, an event of taxability on the
municipal bonds or the immediate downgrade of the
municipal bond to below investment grade. In addition,
the liquidity provider’s exposure is typically further
limited by the high credit quality of the underlying
municipal bonds, the excess collateralization in the
vehicle, or, in certain transactions, the reimbursement
agreements with the Residual holders.Holders of the floaters may “put,” or tender, their floaters
to the TOB trust. If the remarketing agent cannot
successfully remarket the floaters to another investor,
the liquidity provider either provides a loan to the TOB
trust for the TOB trust’s purchase of the floaters, or it
directly purchases the tendered floaters.
TOB trusts are considered to be variable interest
entities. The Firm consolidates non-customer TOB trusts
because as the Residual holder, the Firm has the right
to make decisions that significantly impact the economic
performance of the municipal bond vehicle, and it has
the right to receive benefits and bear losses that could
potentially be significant to the municipal bond vehicle.
Consolidated VIE assets and liabilities
The following table presents information on assets and liabilities related to VIEs consolidated by the Firm as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Assets Liabilities
December 31, 2020
 (in millions)Trading
assets Loans Other Total
assetsBeneficial
interests in
VIE assets OtherTotal 
 liabilities
VIE program type
Firm-sponsored credit card trusts $ — $ 11,962 $ 148 $ 12,110 $ 4,943 $ 3 $ 4,946 
Firm-administered multi-seller
conduits 2 23,787 188 23,977 10,523 33 10,556 
Municipal bond vehicles 1,930 — 2 1,932 1,902 — 1,902 
Mortgage securitization entities — 1,694 94 1,788 210 108 318 
Other 2 176 249 427 — 89 89 
Total $ 1,934 $ 37,619 $ 681 $ 40,234 $ 17,578 $ 233 $ 17,811 
Assets Liabilities
December 31, 2019
 (in millions)Trading
assets Loans Other Total
assetsBeneficial
interests in
VIE assets OtherTotal 
 liabilities
VIE program type
Firm-sponsored credit card trusts $ — $ 14,986 $ 266 $ 15,252 $ 6,461 $ 6 $ 6,467 
Firm-administered multi-seller
conduits 1 25,183 355 25,539 9,223 36 9,259 
Municipal bond vehicles 1,903 — 4 1,907 1,881 3 1,884 
Mortgage securitization entities 66 2,762 64 2,892 276 130 406 
Other 663 — 192 855 — 272 272 
Total $ 2,633 $ 42,931 $ 881 $ 46,445 $ 17,841 $ 447 $ 18,288 
(a)Includes residential and commercial mortgage securitizations.
(b)Includes assets classified as cash and other assets on the Consolidated balance sheets.
(c)The assets of the consolidated VIEs included in the program types above are used to settle the liabilities of those entities. The assets and
liabilities include third-party assets and liabilities of consolidated VIEs and exclude intercompany balances that eliminate in consolidation.
(d)The interest-bearing beneficial interest liabilities issued by consolidated VIEs are classified in the line item on the Consolidated balance sheets
titled, “Beneficial interests issued by consolidated variable interest entities.” The holders of these beneficial interests generally do not have
recourse to the general credit of JPMorgan Chase. Included in beneficial interests in VIE assets are long-term beneficial interests of $5.2 billion
and $6.7 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Refer to Note 20 for additional information on interest-bearing long-term beneficial
interests.
(e)Includes liabilities classified as accounts payable and other liabilities on the Consolidated balance sheets.(b) (c) (d) (e)
(a)
(b) (c) (d) (e)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 257
Notes to consolidated financial statements
VIEs sponsored by third parties
The Firm enters into transactions with VIEs structured
by other parties. These include, for example, acting as a
derivative counterparty, liquidity provider, investor,
underwriter, placement agent, remarketing agent,
trustee or custodian. These transactions are conducted
at arm’s-length, and individual credit decisions are
based on the analysis of the specific VIE, taking into
consideration the quality of the underlying assets.
Where the Firm does not have the power to direct the
activities of the VIE that most significantly impact the
VIE’s economic performance, or a variable interest that
could potentially be significant, the Firm generally does
not consolidate the VIE, but it records and reports these
positions on its Consolidated balance sheets in the
same manner it would record and report positions in
respect of any other third-party transaction.
Tax credit vehicles
The Firm holds investments in unconsolidated tax credit
vehicles, which are limited partnerships and similar
entities that own and operate affordable housing,
energy, and other projects. These entities are primarily
considered VIEs. A third party is typically the general
partner or managing member and has control over the
significant activities of the tax credit vehicles, and
accordingly the Firm does not consolidate tax credit
vehicles. The Firm generally invests in these
partnerships as a limited partner and earns a return
primarily through the receipt of tax credits allocated to
the projects. The maximum loss exposure, represented
by equity investments and funding commitments, was
$24.9 billion and $19.1 billion, of which $8.7 billion and
$5.5 billion was unfunded at December 31, 2020 and
2019, respectively. In order to reduce the risk of loss,
the Firm assesses each project and withholds varying
amounts of its capital investment until the project
qualifies for tax credits. Refer to Note 25 for further
information on affordable housing tax credits. Refer to
Note 28 for more information on off-balance sheet
lending-related commitments.
Customer municipal bond vehicles (TOB trusts)
The Firm may provide various services to customer TOB
trusts, including remarketing agent, liquidity or tender
option provider. In certain customer TOB transactions,
the Firm, as liquidity provider, has entered into a
reimbursement agreement with the Residual holder. In
those transactions, upon the termination of the vehicle,
the Firm has recourse to the third-party Residual holders
for any shortfall. The Firm does not have any intent to
protect Residual holders from potential losses on any of
the underlying municipal bonds. The Firm does not
consolidate customer TOB trusts, since the Firm does
not have the power to make decisions that significantly
impact the economic performance of the municipal bond
vehicle. The Firm’s maximum exposure as a liquidity
provider to customer TOB trusts at December 31, 2020
and 2019, was $6.7 billion and $5.5 billion, respectively.
The fair value of assets held by such VIEs at
December 31, 2020 and 2019 was $10.5 billion and
$8.6 billion, respectively. Refer to Note 28 for more
information on off-balance sheet lending-related
commitments.Loan securitizations
The Firm has securitized and sold a variety of loans,
including residential mortgage, credit card, and
commercial mortgage. The purposes of these
securitization transactions were to satisfy investor
demand and to generate liquidity for the Firm.
For loan securitizations in which the Firm is not required
to consolidate the trust, the Firm records the transfer of
the loan receivable to the trust as a sale when all of the
following accounting criteria for a sale are met: (1) the
transferred financial assets are legally isolated from the
Firm’s creditors; (2) the transferee or beneficial interest
holder can pledge or exchange the transferred financial
assets; and (3) the Firm does not maintain effective
control over the transferred financial assets (e.g., the
Firm cannot repurchase the transferred assets before
their maturity and it does not have the ability to
unilaterally cause the holder to return the transferred
assets).
For loan securitizations accounted for as a sale, the
Firm recognizes a gain or loss based on the difference
between the value of proceeds received (including cash,
beneficial interests, or servicing assets received) and
the carrying value of the assets sold. Gains and losses
on securitizations are reported in noninterest revenue.
258 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Securitization activity
The following table provides information related to the Firm’s securitization activities for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018, related to assets held in Firm-sponsored securitization entities that were not consolidated by the
Firm, and where sale accounting was achieved at the time of the securitization.
2020 2019 2018
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions)Residential
mortgageCommercial
and otherResidential
mortgageCommercial
and otherResidential
mortgageCommercial
and other
Principal securitized $ 7,103 $ 6,624 $ 9,957 $ 9,390 $ 6,431 $ 10,159 
All cash flows during the period:
Proceeds received from loan sales as financial
instruments $ 7,321 $ 6,865 $ 10,238 $ 9,544 $ 6,449 $ 10,218 
Servicing fees collected 211 1 287 2 319 2 
Cash flows received on interests 801 239 507 237 411 301 
(a)Excludes re-securitization transactions.
(b)Predominantly includes Level 2 assets.
(c)The carrying value of the loans accounted for at fair value approximated the proceeds received upon loan sale.
(d)Represents prime mortgages. Excludes loan securitization activity related to U.S. GSEs and government agencies.
(e)Includes commercial mortgage and other consumer loans.
Key assumptions used to value retained interests
originated during the year are shown in the table below.
Year ended December 31, 2020 2019 2018
Residential mortgage retained interest:
Weighted-average life (in years) 4.7 4.8 7.6
Weighted-average discount rate 8.2 % 7.4 % 3.6 %
Commercial mortgage retained interest:
Weighted-average life (in years) 6.9 6.4 5.3
Weighted-average discount rate 3.0 % 4.1 % 4.0 %Loans and excess MSRs sold to U.S. government-
sponsored enterprises and loans in securitization
transactions pursuant to Ginnie Mae guidelines
In addition to the amounts reported in the securitization
activity tables above, the Firm, in the normal course of
business, sells originated and purchased mortgage
loans and certain originated excess MSRs on a
nonrecourse basis, predominantly to U.S. GSEs. These
loans and excess MSRs are sold primarily for the
purpose of securitization by the U.S. GSEs, who provide
certain guarantee provisions (e.g., credit enhancement
of the loans). The Firm also sells loans into
securitization transactions pursuant to Ginnie Mae
guidelines; these loans are typically insured or
guaranteed by another U.S. government agency. The
Firm does not consolidate the securitization vehicles
underlying these transactions as it is not the primary
beneficiary. For a limited number of loan sales, the Firm
is obligated to share a portion of the credit risk
associated with the sold loans with the purchaser. Refer
to Note 28 for additional information about the Firm’s
loan sales- and securitization-related indemnifications.
Refer to Note 15 for additional information about the
impact of the Firm’s sale of certain excess MSRs.(d) (e) (d) (e) (d) (e)
(a)
(b)(c)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 259
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The following table summarizes the activities related to
loans sold to the U.S. GSEs, and loans in securitization
transactions pursuant to Ginnie Mae guidelines.
Year ended December 31,
(in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Carrying value of loans sold$ 81,153 $ 92,349 $ 44,609 
Proceeds received from
loan sales as cash $ 45 $ 73 $ 9 
Proceeds from loan sales as
securities 80,186 91,422 43,671 
Total proceeds received
from loan sales $ 80,231 $ 91,495 $ 43,680 
Gains/(losses) on loan
sales $ 6 $ 499 $ (93)
(a)Includes securities from U.S. GSEs and Ginnie Mae that are
generally sold shortly after receipt or retained as part of the Firm’s
investment securities portfolio.
(b)Included in level 2 assets.
(c)Excludes the value of MSRs retained upon the sale of loans.
(d)Gains/(losses) on loan sales include the value of MSRs.
(e)The carrying value of the loans accounted for at fair value
approximated the proceeds received upon loan sale.
Options to repurchase delinquent loans
In addition to the Firm’s obligation to repurchase certain
loans due to material breaches of representations and
warranties as discussed in Note 28, the Firm also has
the option to repurchase delinquent loans that it services
for Ginnie Mae loan pools, as well as for other U.S.
government agencies under certain arrangements. The
Firm typically elects to repurchase delinquent loans from
Ginnie Mae loanpools as it continues to service them and/or manage the
foreclosure process in accordance with the applicable
requirements, and such loans continue to be insured or
guaranteed. When the Firm’s repurchase option
becomes exercisable, such loans must be reported on
the Consolidated balance sheets as a loan with a
corresponding liability. Refer to Note 12 for additional
information.
The following table presents loans the Firm repurchased
or had an option to repurchase, real estate owned, and
foreclosed government-guaranteed residential mortgage
loans recognized on the Firm’s Consolidated balance
sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Substantially all of these loans and real estate are
insured or guaranteed by U.S. government agencies.
December 31,
 (in millions) 2020 2019
Loans repurchased or option to
repurchase$ 1,413 $ 2,941 
Real estate owned9 41 
Foreclosed government-guaranteed
residential mortgage loans64 198 
(a)Predominantly all of these amounts relate to loans that have been
repurchased from Ginnie Mae loan pools.
(b)Relates to voluntary repurchases of loans, which are included in
accrued interest and accounts receivable.
 
 
 
 
Loan delinquencies and liquidation losses
The table below includes information about components of and delinquencies related to nonconsolidated securitized
financial assets held in Firm-sponsored private-label securitization entities, in which the Firm has continuing
involvement as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Securitized assets 90 days past due Net liquidation losses
As of or for the year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
Securitized loans
Residential mortgage:
Prime/ Alt-A & option ARMs $ 41,265 $ 48,734 $ 4,988 $ 2,449 $ 212 $ 579 
Subprime 12,154 13,490 2,406 1,813 179 532 
Commercial and other 92,351 80,878 5,958 187 30 445 
Total loans securitized $145,770 $143,102 $ 13,352 $ 4,449 $ 421 $ 1,556 (a)(b)
(c)
(d)(e)
(a)
(b)
260 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 15 – Goodwill and Mortgage servicing rights
Goodwill
Goodwill is recorded upon completion of a business
combination as the difference between the purchase
price and the fair value of the net assets acquired, and
can be adjusted up to one year from the acquisition date
as more information is obtained about the fair value of
assets acquired and liabilities assumed. Subsequent to
initial recognition, goodwill is not amortized but is tested
for impairment during the fourth quarter of each fiscal
year, or more often if events or circumstances, such as
adverse changes in the business climate, indicate that
there may be an impairment.
The goodwill associated with each business
combination is allocated to the related reporting units,
which are determined based on how the Firm’s
businesses are managed and how they are reviewed.
The following table presents goodwill attributed to the
business segments.
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Consumer & Community
Banking $31,311 $30,133 $30,084 
Corporate & Investment Bank 7,913 7,901 7,721 
Commercial Banking 2,985 2,982 2,860 
Asset & Wealth Management 7,039 6,807 6,806 
Total goodwill $49,248 $47,823 $47,471 
(a)In 2020, goodwill of $959 million was transferred from CCB to CIB
and $51 million from AWM to CCB related to business
realignments. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform
with the current presentation. Refer to Note 32 for additional
information on these realignments.
The following table presents changes in the carrying
amount of goodwill.
Year ended December 31, (in
millions) 2020 2019 2018
Balance at beginning of period$47,823 $47,471 $47,507 
Changes during the period
from:
Business combinations 1,412 349 — 
Other 13 3 (36)
Balance at December 31, $49,248 $47,823 $47,471 
(a)For 2020, represents estimated goodwill associated with the
acquisitions of cxLoyalty in CCB and 55ip in AWM. For 2019,
represents goodwill associated with the acquisition of InstaMed.
This goodwill was allocated to CIB, CB and CCB.
(b)Primarily relates to foreign currency adjustments.
Goodwill impairment testing
The Firm’s goodwill was not impaired at December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018.
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted new
accounting guidance related to goodwill impairment
testing. The adoption of the guidance requires
recognition of an impairment loss when the estimated
fair value of a reporting unit falls below its carrying
value. It eliminated the requirement that an impairment
loss be recognized only if the estimated implied fair
value of the goodwill is below its carrying value.
The goodwill impairment test is performed by comparing
the current fair value of each reporting unit with itscarrying value. If the fair value is in excess of the
carrying value, then the reporting unit’s goodwill is
considered not to be impaired. If the fair value is less
than the carrying value, then an impairment charge is
recognized for the amount by which the reporting unit’s
carrying value exceeds its fair value, up to the amount of
goodwill allocated to that reporting unit.
The Firm uses the reporting units’ allocated capital plus
goodwill and other intangible assets as a proxy for the
carrying values of equity for the reporting units in the
goodwill impairment testing. Reporting unit equity is
determined on a similar basis as the allocation of capital
to the LOBs which takes into consideration a variety of
factors including capital levels of similarly rated peers
and applicable regulatory capital requirements.
Proposed LOB capital levels are incorporated into the
Firm’s annual budget process, which is reviewed by the
Firm’s Board of Directors. Allocated capital is further
reviewed periodically and updated as needed.
The primary method the Firm uses to estimate the fair
value of its reporting units is the income approach. This
approach projects cash flows for the forecast period and
uses the perpetuity growth method to calculate terminal
values. These cash flows and terminal values are then
discounted using an appropriate discount rate.
Projections of cash flows are based on the reporting
units’ earnings forecasts which are reviewed with senior
management of the Firm. The discount rate used for
each reporting unit represents an estimate of the cost of
equity for that reporting unit and is determined
considering the Firm’s overall estimated cost of equity
(estimated using the Capital Asset Pricing Model), as
adjusted for the risk characteristics specific to each
reporting unit (for example, for higher levels of risk or
uncertainty associated with the business or
management’s forecasts and assumptions). To assess
the reasonableness of the discount rates used for each
reporting unit, management compares the discount rate
to the estimated cost of equity for publicly traded
institutions with similar businesses and risk
characteristics. In addition, the weighted average cost of
equity (aggregating the various reporting units) is
compared with the Firm’s overall estimated cost of
equity to ensure reasonableness. The valuations
derived from the discounted cash flow analysis are then
compared with market-based trading and transaction
multiples for relevant competitors. Trading and
transaction comparables are used as general indicators
to assess the overall reasonableness of the estimated
fair values, although precise conclusions generally
cannot be drawn due to the differences that naturally
exist between the Firm’s businesses and competitor
institutions.
Management also takes into consideration a comparison
between the aggregate fair values of the Firm’s
reporting units and JPMorgan Chase’s market
capitalization. In evaluating this comparison,
management considers several factors, including (i) a
control premium that would exist in a market transaction,
(ii) factors related to the level of(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 261
Notes to consolidated financial statements
execution risk that would exist at the Firmwide level that
do not exist at the reporting unit level and (iii) short-term
market volatility and other factors that do not directly
affect the value of individual reporting units.
Unanticipated declines in business performance,
increases in credit losses, increases in capital
requirements, as well as deterioration in economic or
market conditions, adverse regulatory or legislative
changes or increases in the estimated market cost of
equity, could cause the estimated fair values of the
Firm’s reporting units to decline in the future, which
could result in a material impairment charge to earnings
in a future period related to some portion of the
associated goodwill.Mortgage servicing rights
MSRs represent the fair value of expected future cash
flows for performing servicing activities for others. The
fair value considers estimated future servicing fees and
ancillary revenue, offset by estimated costs to service
the loans, and generally declines over time as net
servicing cash flows are received, effectively amortizing
the MSR asset against contractual servicing and
ancillary fee income. MSRs are either purchased from
third parties or recognized upon sale or securitization of
mortgage loans if servicing is retained.
As permitted by U.S. GAAP, the Firm has elected to
account for its MSRs at fair value. The Firm treats its
MSRs as a single class of servicing assets based on the
availability of market inputs used to measure the fair
value of its MSR asset and its treatment of MSRs as
one aggregate pool for risk management purposes. The
Firm estimates the fair value of MSRs using an option-
adjusted spread (“OAS”) model, which projects MSR
cash flows over multiple interest rate scenarios in
conjunction with the Firm’s prepayment model, and then
discounts these cash flows at risk-adjusted rates. The
model considers portfolio characteristics, contractually
specified servicing fees, prepayment assumptions,
delinquency rates, costs to service, late charges and
other ancillary revenue, and other economic factors. The
Firm compares fair value estimates and assumptions to
observable market data where available, and also
considers recent market activity and actual portfolio
experience.
262 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
The fair value of MSRs is sensitive to changes in
interest rates, including their effect on prepayment
speeds. MSRs typically decrease in value when interest
rates decline because declining interest rates tend to
increase prepayments and therefore reduce the
expected life of the net servicing cash flows that
comprise the MSR asset. Conversely, securities (e.g.,
mortgage-backed securities), and certain derivatives
(e.g., those for which the Firmreceives fixed-rate interest payments) increase in value
when interest rates decline. JPMorgan Chase uses
combinations of derivatives and securities to manage
the risk of changes in the fair value of MSRs. The intent
is to offset any interest-rate related changes in the fair
value of MSRs with changes in the fair value of the
related risk management instruments.
The following table summarizes MSR activity for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
As of or for the year ended December 31, (in millions, except where otherwise noted) 2020 2019 2018
Fair value at beginning of period $ 4,699 $ 6,130 $ 6,030 
MSR activity:
Originations of MSRs 944 1,384 931 
Purchase of MSRs 248 105 315 
Disposition of MSRs (176) (789) (636)
Net additions/(Dispositions) 1,016 700 610 
Changes due to collection/realization of expected cash flows (899) (951) (740)
Changes in valuation due to inputs and assumptions:
Changes due to market interest rates and other (1,568) (893) 300 
Changes in valuation due to other inputs and assumptions:
Projected cash flows (e.g., cost to service) (54) (333) 15 
Discount rates 199 153 24 
Prepayment model changes and other (117) (107) (109)
Total changes in valuation due to other inputs and assumptions 28 (287) (70)
Total changes in valuation due to inputs and assumptions (1,540) (1,180) 230 
Fair value at December 31, $ 3,276 $ 4,699 $ 6,130 
Change in unrealized gains/(losses) included in income related to MSRs held at December 31, $ (1,540) $ (1,180) $ 230 
Contractual service fees, late fees and other ancillary fees included in income 1,325 1,639 1,778 
Third-party mortgage loans serviced at December 31, (in billions) 448.0 522.0 521.0 
Servicer advances, net of an allowance for uncollectible amounts, at December 31, (in billions) 1.8 2.0 3.0 
(a)Includes excess MSRs transferred to agency-sponsored trusts in exchange for stripped mortgage backed securities (“SMBS”). In each
transaction, a portion of the SMBS was acquired by third parties at the transaction date; the Firm acquired the remaining balance of those SMBS
as trading securities.
(b)Represents both the impact of changes in estimated future prepayments due to changes in market interest rates, and the difference between
actual and expected prepayments.
(c)Represents changes in prepayments other than those attributable to changes in market interest rates.
(d)Represents amounts the Firm pays as the servicer (e.g., scheduled principal and interest, taxes and insurance), which will generally be
reimbursed within a short period of time after the advance from future cash flows from the trust or the underlying loans. The Firm’s credit risk
associated with these servicer advances is minimal because reimbursement of the advances is typically senior to all cash payments to investors.
In addition, the Firm maintains the right to stop payment to investors if the collateral is insufficient to cover the advance. However, certain of these
servicer advances may not be recoverable if they were not made in accordance with applicable rules and agreements.
(e)The decrease in projected cash flows was largely related to default servicing assumption updates.(a)
(b)
(e)
(c)
(d)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 263
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The following table presents the components of
mortgage fees and related income (including the impact
of MSR risk management activities) for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
CCB mortgage fees and related
income
Net production revenue $2,629 $1,618 $ 268 
Net mortgage servicing
revenue:  
Operating revenue:  
Loan servicing revenue 1,367 1,533 1,835 
Changes in MSR asset fair
value due to
collection/realization of
expected cash flows (899) (951) (740)
Total operating revenue 468 582 1,095 
Risk management:  
Changes in MSR asset fair
value due to market interest
rates and other (1,568) (893) 300 
Other changes in MSR asset
fair value due to other
inputs and assumptions in
model 28 (287) (70)
Change in derivative fair
value and other 1,522 1,015 (341)
Total risk management (18) (165) (111)
Total net mortgage servicing
revenue 450 417 984 
Total CCB mortgage fees and
related income 3,079 2,035 1,252 
All other 12 1 2 
Mortgage fees and related
income $3,091 $2,036 $1,254 
(a)Represents both the impact of changes in estimated future
prepayments due to changes in market interest rates, and the
difference between actual and expected prepayments.
(b)Represents the aggregate impact of changes in model inputs and
assumptions such as projected cash flows (e.g., cost to service),
discount rates and changes in prepayments other than those
attributable to changes in market interest rates (e.g., changes in
prepayments due to changes in home prices).The table below outlines the key economic assumptions
used to determine the fair value of the Firm’s MSRs at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, and outlines the
sensitivities of those fair values to immediate adverse
changes in those assumptions, as defined below.
December 31,
 (in millions, except rates) 2020 2019
Weighted-average prepayment speed
assumption (constant prepayment
rate) 14.90 % 11.67 %
Impact on fair value of 10% adverse
change $ (206) $ (200)
Impact on fair value of 20% adverse
change (392) (384)
Weighted-average option adjusted
spread 7.19 % 7.93 %
Impact on fair value of 100 basis
points adverse change $ (134) $ (169)
Impact on fair value of 200 basis
points adverse change (258) (326)
(a)Includes the impact of operational risk and regulatory capital.
Changes in fair value based on variations in
assumptions generally cannot be easily extrapolated,
because the relationship of the change in the
assumptions to the change in fair value are often highly
interrelated and may not be linear. In this table, the
effect that a change in a particular assumption may
have on the fair value is calculated without changing any
other assumption. In reality, changes in one factor may
result in changes in another, which would either magnify
or counteract the impact of the initial change.(a)
(b)(a)
264 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 16 – Premises and equipment
Premises and equipment, including leasehold
improvements, are carried at cost less accumulated
depreciation and amortization. JPMorgan Chase
computes depreciation using the straight-line method
over the estimated useful life of an asset. For leasehold
improvements, the Firm uses the straight-line method
computed over the lesser of the remainder of the lease
term, or estimated useful life of the improvements.
JPMorgan Chase capitalizes certain costs associated
with the acquisition or development of internal-use
software. Once the software is ready for its intended
use, these costs are amortized on a straight-line basis
over the software’s expected useful life and reviewed for
impairment on an ongoing basis.Note 17 – Deposits
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, noninterest-bearing
and interest-bearing deposits were as follows.
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
U.S. offices
Noninterest-bearing (included
$9,873 and $22,637 at fair value)$ 572,711 $395,667 
Interest-bearing (included $2,567
and $2,534 at fair value) 1,197,032 876,156 
Total deposits in U.S. offices 1,769,743 1,271,823 
Non-U.S. offices
Noninterest-bearing (included
$1,486 and $1,980 at fair value) 23,435 20,087 
Interest-bearing (included $558 and
$1,438 at fair value) 351,079 270,521 
Total deposits in non-U.S. offices 374,514 290,608 
Total deposits $2,144,257 $1,562,431 
(a)Includes structured notes classified as deposits for which the fair
value option has been elected. Refer to Note 3 for further
discussion.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, time deposits in
denominations of $250,000 or more were as follows.
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
U.S. offices $33,812 $ 44,127 
Non-U.S. offices 50,523 50,840 
Total $84,335 $ 94,967 
At December 31, 2020, the maturities of interest-bearing
time deposits were as follows.
December 31, 2020
 (in millions)   
U.S. Non-U.S. Total
2021 $44,785 $48,142 $ 92,927 
2022 1,451 175 1,626 
2023 259 7 266 
2024 210 36 246 
2025 197 633 830 
After 5 years 451 298 749 
Total $47,353 $49,291 $ 96,644 
 (a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 265
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 18 - Leases
Firm as lessee
At December 31, 2020, JPMorgan Chase and its
subsidiaries were obligated under a number of
noncancelable leases, predominantly operating leases
for premises and equipment used primarily for business
purposes. These leases generally have terms of 20
years or less, determined based on the contractual
maturity of the lease, and include periods covered by
options to extend or terminate the lease when the Firm
is reasonably certain that it will exercise those options.
All leases with lease terms greater than twelve months
are reported as a lease liability with a corresponding
right-of-use (“ROU”) asset. None of these lease
agreements impose restrictions on the Firm’s ability to
pay dividends, engage in debt or equity financing
transactions or enter into further lease agreements.
Certain of these leases contain escalation clauses that
will increase rental payments based on maintenance,
utility and tax increases, which are non-lease
components. The Firm elected not to separate lease
and non-lease components of a contract for its real
estate leases. As such, real estate lease payments
represent payments on both lease and non-lease
components.
Operating lease liabilities and ROU assets are
recognized at the lease commencement date based on
the present value of the future minimum lease payments
over the lease term. The future lease payments are
discounted at a rate that represents the Firm’s
collateralized borrowing rate for financing instruments of
a similar term and are included in accounts payable and
other liabilities. The operating lease ROU asset,
included in premises and equipment, also includes any
lease prepayments made, plus initial direct costs
incurred, less any lease incentives received. Rental
expense associated with operating leases is recognized
on a straight-line basis over the lease term, and
generally included in occupancy expense in the
Consolidated statements of income.The following tables provide information related to the
Firm’s operating leases:
December 31,
 (in millions, except where otherwise
noted) 2020 2019
Right-of-use assets $ 8,006 $ 8,190 
Lease liabilities 8,508 8,505 
Weighted average remaining lease
term (in years) 8.7 8.8
Weighted average discount rate 3.48 % 3.68 %
Supplemental cash flow
information
Cash paid for amounts included in
the measurement of lease liabilities
- operating cash flows $ 1,626 $ 1,572 
Supplemental non-cash
information
Right-of-use assets obtained in
exchange for operating lease
obligations $ 1,350 $ 1,413 
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019
Rental expense
Gross rental expense $ 2,094 $ 2,057 
Sublease rental income (166) (184)
Net rental expense $ 1,928 $ 1,873 
The following table presents future payments under
operating leases as of December 31, 2020:
Year ended December 31, (in millions)
2021 $ 1,606 
2022 1,435 
2023 1,270 
2024 1,123 
2025 947 
After 2025 3,602 
Total future minimum lease payments 9,983 
Less: Imputed interest (1,475)
Total $ 8,508 
In addition to the table above, as of December 31, 2020,
the Firm had additional future operating lease
commitments of $1.2 billion that were signed but had not
yet commenced. These operating leases will commence
between 2021 and 2023 with lease terms up to 25
years.
 
266 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Firm as lessor
The Firm provides auto and equipment lease financing
to its customers through lease arrangements with lease
terms that may contain renewal, termination and/or
purchase options. Generally, the Firm’s lease financings
are operating leases. These assets subject to operating
leases are recognized in other assets on the Firm’s
Consolidated balance sheets and are depreciated on a
straight-line basis over the lease term to reduce the
asset to its estimated residual value. Depreciation
expense is included in technology, communications and
equipment expense in the Consolidated statements of
income. The Firm’s lease income is generally
recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term
and is included in other income in the Consolidated
statements of income.
On a periodic basis, the Firm assesses leased assets
for impairment, and if the carrying amount of the leased
asset exceeds the undiscounted cash flows from the
lease payments and the estimated residual value upon
disposition of the leased asset, an impairment loss is
recognized.
The risk of loss on auto and equipment leased assets
relating to the residual value of the leased assets is
monitored through projections of the asset residual
values at lease origination and periodic review of
residual values, and is mitigated through arrangements
with certain manufacturers or lessees. 
The following table presents the carrying value of assets
subject to leases reported on the Consolidated balance
sheets:
December 31,
 (in millions) 2020 2019
Carrying value of assets subject to
operating leases, net of
accumulated depreciation $ 21,155 $ 23,587 
Accumulated depreciation 6,388 6,121 
The following table presents the Firm’s operating lease
income and the related depreciation expense on the
Consolidated statements of income:
 
Year ended December
31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Operating lease
income $ 5,539 $ 5,455 $ 4,540 
Depreciation expense 4,257 4,157 3,522 
The following table presents future receipts under
operating leases as of December 31, 2020:
Year ended December 31, (in millions)
2021 $ 3,686 
2022 2,084 
2023 613 
2024 52 
2025 24 
After 2025 34 
Total future minimum lease receipts $ 6,493 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 267
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 19 – Accounts payable and other
liabilities
Accounts payable and other liabilities consist of
brokerage payables, which include payables to
customers and payables related to security purchases
that did not settle, as well as other accrued expenses,
such as income tax payables, operating lease liabilities,
credit card rewards liability, and litigation reserves.
The following table details the components of accounts
payable and other liabilities.
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Brokerage payables $140,291 $118,375 
Other payables and liabilities 92,308 92,032 
Total accounts payable and other
liabilities $232,599 $210,407 
(a)    Includes credit card rewards liability of $7.7 billion and $6.4
billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.(a)
268 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 20 – Long-term debt
JPMorgan Chase issues long-term debt denominated in various currencies, predominantly U.S. dollars, with both fixed
and variable interest rates. Included in senior and subordinated debt below are various equity-linked or other indexed
instruments, which the Firm has elected to measure at fair value. Changes in fair value are recorded in principal
transactions revenue in the Consolidated statements of income, except for unrealized gains/(losses) due to DVA which
are recorded in OCI. The following table is a summary of long-term debt carrying values (including unamortized
premiums and discounts, issuance costs, valuation adjustments and fair value adjustments, where applicable) by
remaining contractual maturity as of December 31, 2020.
By remaining maturity at
 December 31,
 (in millions, except
rates)2020 2019
Under 1 year 1-5 years After 5 years Total Total
Parent company
Senior debt: Fixed rate $ 9,225 $ 49,987 $ 114,296 $ 173,508 $ 161,198 
Variable rate 1,580 8,644 8,353 18,577 18,615 
Interest rates 1.33-4.63% 0.50-4.50% 0.17-6.40% 0.17-6.40% 0.15-6.40%
Subordinated debt: Fixed rate $ — $ 5,678 $ 13,577 $ 19,255 $ 15,155 
Variable rate — — 9 9 9 
Interest rates —% 3.38-7.75% 2.96-8.00% 2.96-8.00% 3.38-8.00%
Subtotal$ 10,805 $ 64,309 $ 136,235 $ 211,349 $ 194,977 
Subsidiaries
Federal Home Loan
Banks advances: Fixed rate $ 7 $ 45 $ 71 $ 123 $ 135 
Variable rate 3,000 11,000 — 14,000 28,500 
Interest rates 0.57-0.60% 0.19-0.24% 4.66-7.73% 0.19-7.73% 1.67-8.31%
Senior debt: Fixed rate $ 1,067 $ 3,157 $ 11,534 $ 15,758 $ 19,597 
Variable rate 12,055 18,448 7,608 38,111 45,861 
Interest rates —% 7.28% 1.00-1.30% 1.00-7.28% 1.00-9.43%
Subordinated debt: Fixed rate $ — $ 309 $ — $ 309 $ 305 
Variable rate — — — — — 
Interest rates — % 8.25 % — % 8.25 % 8.25 %
Subtotal$ 16,129 $ 32,959 $ 19,213 $ 68,301 $ 94,398 
Junior subordinated
debt: Fixed rate $ — $ — $ 738 $ 738 $ 693 
Variable rate — — 1,297 1,297 1,430 
Interest rates —% —% 0.71-8.75% 0.71-8.75% 2.41-8.75%
Subtotal$ — $ — $ 2,035 $ 2,035 $ 2,123 
Total long-term debt$ 26,934 $ 97,268 $ 157,483 $ 281,685 $ 291,498 
Long-term beneficial
interests: Fixed rate $ 625 $ 1,744 $ — $ 2,369 $ 2,990 
Variable rate 1,924 650 210 2,784 3,748 
Interest rates 0.36-2.77% 0.00-2.39% 0.00-3.75% 0.00-3.75% 0.00-4.06%
Total long-term
beneficial interests $ 2,549 $ 2,394 $ 210 $ 5,153 $ 6,738 
(a)The interest rates shown are the range of contractual rates in effect at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, including non-U.S. dollar fixed-
and variable-rate issuances, which excludes the effects of the associated derivative instruments used in hedge accounting relationships, if
applicable. The use of these derivative instruments modifies the Firm’s exposure to the contractual interest rates disclosed in the table above.
Including the effects of the hedge accounting derivatives, the range of modified rates in effect at December 31, 2020, for total long-term debt was
(0.40)% to 7.28%, versus the contractual range of 0.17% to 8.75% presented in the table above. The interest rate ranges shown exclude structured
notes accounted for at fair value.
(b)Included long-term debt of $17.2 billion and $32.0 billion secured by assets totaling $166.4 billion and $186.1 billion at December 31, 2020 and
2019, respectively. The amount of long-term debt secured by assets does not include amounts related to hybrid instruments.
(c)Included $76.8 billion and $75.7 billion of long-term debt accounted for at fair value at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
(d)Included $16.1 billion and $14.0 billion of outstanding zero-coupon notes at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The aggregate principal
amount of these notes at their respective maturities is $45.3 billion and $39.7 billion, respectively. The aggregate principal amount reflects the
contractual principal payment at maturity, which may exceed the contractual principal payment at the Firm’s next call date, if applicable.
(e)Included on the Consolidated balance sheets in beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs. Also included $41 million and $36 million
accounted for at fair value at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Excluded short-term commercial paper and other short-term beneficial
interests of $12.4 billion and $11.1 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
(f)At December 31, 2020, long-term debt in the aggregate of $151.3 billion was redeemable at the option of JPMorgan Chase, in whole or in part,
prior to maturity, based on the terms specified in the respective instruments.
(g)The aggregate carrying values of debt that matures in each of the five years subsequent to 2020 is $26.9 billion in 2021, $18.4 billion in 2022,
$32.2 billion in 2023, $29.6 billion in 2024 and $17.1 billion in 2025.
(h)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.(a)
(a)
(a) (h)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)(d) (f)(g)
(e)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 269
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The weighted-average contractual interest rates for total
long-term debt excluding structured notes accounted for
at fair value were 2.89% and 3.13% as of December 31,
2020 and 2019, respectively. In order to modify
exposure to interest rate and currency exchange rate
movements, JPMorgan Chase utilizes derivative
instruments, primarily interest rate and cross-currency
interest rate swaps, in conjunction with some of its debt
issuances. The use of these instruments modifies the
Firm’s interest expense on the associated debt. The
modified weighted-average interest rates for total long-
term debt, including the effects of related derivative
instruments, were 1.58% and 3.19% as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. has guaranteed certain long-
term debt of its subsidiaries, including structured notes.
These guarantees rank on parity with the Firm’s other
unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness. The
amount of such guaranteed long-term debt and
structured notes was $13.8 billion and $14.4 billion at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
The Firm’s unsecured debt does not contain
requirements that would call for an acceleration of
payments, maturities or changes in the structure of the
existing debt, provide any limitations on future
borrowings or require additional collateral, based on
unfavorable changes in the Firm’s credit ratings,
financial ratios, earnings or stock price.
270 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 21 – Preferred stock
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, JPMorgan Chase was authorized to issue 200 million shares of preferred stock, in
one or more series, with a par value of $1 per share. In the event of a liquidation or dissolution of the Firm, JPMorgan
Chase’s preferred stock then outstanding takes precedence over the Firm’s common stock with respect to the payment
of dividends and the distribution of assets.
The following is a summary of JPMorgan Chase’s non-cumulative preferred stock outstanding as of December 31,
2020 and 2019.
SharesCarrying value
 (in millions)
Issue dateContractual rate
 in effect at
 December 31,
2020Earliest
redemption
dateFloating
annualized
rate of
three-month
LIBOR/Term
SOFR plus:Dividend declared per share
December 31, December 31, Year ended December 31,
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2018
Fixed-rate:
Series P — — $ — $ — 2/5/2013 — %3/1/2018 NA $— $545.00 $545.00
Series T — — — — 1/30/2014 — 3/1/2019 NA — 167.50 670.00
Series W — — — — 6/23/2014 — 9/1/2019 NA — 472.50 630.00
Series Y — 143,000 — 1,430 2/12/2015 — 3/1/2020 NA 153.13 612.52 612.52
Series
AA 142,500 142,500 1,425 1,425 6/4/2015 6.100 9/1/2020 NA 610.00 610.00 610.00
Series
BB 115,000 115,000 1,150 1,150 7/29/2015 6.150 9/1/2020 NA 615.00 615.00 615.00
Series
DD 169,625 169,625 1,696 1,696 9/21/2018 5.750 12/1/2023 NA 575.00 575.00 111.81
Series
EE 185,000 185,000 1,850 1,850 1/24/2019 6.000 3/1/2024 NA 600.00 511.67 NA
Series
GG 90,000 90,000 900 900 11/7/2019 4.750 12/1/2024 NA 506.67 NA NA
Fixed-to-floating-rate:
Series I 293,375 293,375 $2,934 $2,934 4/23/2008 LIBOR + 3.47%4/30/2018LIBOR + 3.47%$428.03 $593.23 $646.38
Series Q 150,000 150,000 1,500 1,500 4/23/2013 5.150 5/1/2023 LIBOR + 3.25 515.00 515.00 515.00
Series R 150,000 150,000 1,500 1,500 7/29/2013 6.000 8/1/2023 LIBOR + 3.30 600.00 600.00 600.00
Series S 200,000 200,000 2,000 2,000 1/22/2014 6.750 2/1/2024 LIBOR + 3.78 675.00 675.00 675.00
Series U 100,000 100,000 1,000 1,000 3/10/2014 6.125 4/30/2024LIBOR + 3.33 612.50 612.50 612.50
Series V 250,000 250,000 2,500 2,500 6/9/2014 LIBOR + 3.32%7/1/2019 LIBOR + 3.32 436.85 534.09 500.00
Series X 160,000 160,000 1,600 1,600 9/23/2014 6.100 10/1/2024LIBOR + 3.33 610.00 610.00 610.00
Series Z 200,000 200,000 2,000 2,000 4/21/2015 LIBOR + 3.80%5/1/2020 LIBOR + 3.80 453.52 530.00 530.00
Series
CC 125,750 125,750 1,258 1,258 10/20/2017 4.625 11/1/2022LIBOR + 2.58 462.50 462.50 462.50
Series FF 225,000 225,000 2,250 2,250 7/31/2019 5.000 8/1/2024 SOFR + 3.38 500.00 251.39 NA
Series
HH 300,000 — 3,000 — 1/23/2020 4.600 2/1/2025SOFR + 3.125 470.22 NA NA
Series II 150,000 — 1,500 — 2/24/2020 4.000 4/1/2025SOFR + 2.745 341.11 NA NA
Total
preferred
stock 3,006,250 2,699,250 $30,063 $26,993 
(a)Represented by depositary shares.
(b)Fixed-to-floating rate notes convert to a floating rate at the earliest redemption date.
(c)Dividends are declared quarterly. Dividends are payable quarterly on fixed-rate preferred stock. Dividends are payable semiannually on fixed-to-
floating-rate preferred stock while at a fixed rate, and payable quarterly after converting to a floating rate.
(d)Dividends in the amount of $111.81 per share were declared on December 1, 2018 and include dividends from the original issue date of
September 21, 2018 through November 30, 2018.
(e)Dividends in the amount of $211.67 per share were declared on April 12,2019 and include dividends from the original issue date of January 24,
2019 through May 31, 2019. Dividends in the amount of $150.00 per share were declared thereafter on July 10, 2019 and October 9, 2019.
(f)No dividends were declared for Series GG from the original issue date of November 7, 2019 through December 31, 2019.
(g)The dividend rate for Series I preferred stock became floating and payable quarterly starting on April 30, 2018; prior to which the dividend rate
was fixed at 7.90% or $395.00 per share payable semi annually.
(h)The dividend rate for Series V preferred stock became floating and payable quarterly starting on July 1, 2019; prior to which the dividend rate was
fixed at 5% or $250.00 per share payable semi annually. The Firm declared a dividend of $144.11 and $139.98 per share on outstanding Series V
preferred stock on August 15, 2019 and November 15, 2019, respectively.
(i)Prior to May 1, 2020, the dividend rate was fixed at 5.3%.
(j)Dividends in the amount of $126.39 per share were declared on September 9, 2019 and include dividends from the original issue date of July 31,
2019 through October 31, 2019. Dividends in the amount of $125.00 per share were declared thereafter on December 10, 2019.
(k)Dividends in the amount of $125.22 per share were declared on March 13, 2020 and include dividends from the original issue date of January 23,
2020 through April 30, 2020. Dividends in the amount of $115.00 per share were declared quarterly thereafter.
(l)Dividends in the amount of $141.11 per share were declared on May 15, 2020 and include dividends from the original issue date of February 24,
2020 through June 30, 2020. Dividends in the amount of $100.00 per share were declared quarterly thereafter.(a)
(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
(h)
(i)
(j)
(k)
(l)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 271
Joga Case & Co/00 o 0
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Each series of preferred stock has a liquidation value and redemption price per share of $10,000, plus accrued but
unpaid dividends. The aggregate liquidation value was $30.5 billion at December 31, 2020.
On March 1, 2020, the Firm redeemed all $1.43 billion of its 6.125% non-cumulative preferred stock, Series Y.
On December 1, 2019, the Firm redeemed all $900 million of its 5.45% non-cumulative preferred stock, Series P.
On October 30, 2019, the Firm redeemed $1.37 billion of its fixed-to-floating rate non-cumulative perpetual preferred
stock, Series I.
On September 1, 2019, the Firm redeemed all $880 million of its 6.30% non-cumulative preferred stock, Series W.
On March 1, 2019, the Firm redeemed all $925 million of its 6.70% non-cumulative preferred stock, Series T.
Redemption rights
Each series of the Firm’s preferred stock may be redeemed on any dividend payment date on or after the earliest
redemption date for that series. All outstanding preferred stock series except Series I may also be redeemed following
a “capital treatment event,” as described in the terms of each series. Any redemption of the Firm’s preferred stock is
subject to non-objection from the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (the “Federal Reserve”).
272 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 22 – Common stock
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, JPMorgan Chase was
authorized to issue 9.0 billion shares of common stock
with a par value of $1 per share.
Common shares issued (reissuances from treasury) by
JPMorgan Chase during the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018 were as follows.
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Total issued – balance at
January 1 4,104.9 4,104.9 4,104.9 
Treasury – balance at January
1 (1,020.9) (829.1) (679.6)
Repurchase (50.0) (213.0) (181.5)
Reissuance:
Employee benefits and
compensation plans 14.2 20.4 21.7 
Warrant exercise — — 9.4 
Employee stock purchase
plans 1.2 0.8 0.9 
Total reissuance 15.4 21.2 32.0 
Total treasury – balance at
December 31 (1,055.5)(1,020.9) (829.1)
Outstanding at December 31 3,049.4 3,084.0 3,275.8 
There were no warrants to purchase shares of common
stock (“Warrants”) outstanding at December 31, 2020
and December 31, 2019 as any Warrants that were not
exercised on or before October 29, 2018 have expired.
On March 15, 2020, in response to the economic
disruptions caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the
Firm temporarily suspended repurchases of its common
stock. Subsequently, the Federal Reserve directed all
large banks, including the Firm, to discontinue net share
repurchases through the end of 2020. On December 18,
2020, the Federal Reserve announced that all large
banks, including the Firm, could resume share
repurchases commencing in the first quarter of 2021,
subject to certain restrictions. The Firm's Board of
Directors has authorized a new common share
repurchase program for up to $30 billion.The following table sets forth the Firm’s repurchases of
common stock for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018. There were no Warrants repurchased
during 2018.
Year ended December 31, (in
millions) 2020 2019 2018
Total number of shares of common
stock repurchased 50.0 213.0  181.5  
Aggregate purchase price of
common stock repurchases $6,397  $24,121  $19,983  
The authorization to repurchase common shares is
utilized at management’s discretion, and the timing of
purchases and the exact amount of common shares that
may be repurchased is subject to various factors,
including market conditions; legal and regulatory
considerations affecting the amount and timing of
repurchase activity; the Firm’s capital position (taking
into account goodwill and intangibles); internal capital
generation; and alternative investment opportunities.
The repurchase program does not include specific price
targets or timetables; may be suspended by
management at any time; and may be executed through
open market purchases or privately negotiated
transactions, or utilizing Rule 10b5-1 plans, which are
written trading plans that the Firm may enter into from
time to time under Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 and which allow the Firm to
repurchase its common shares during periods when it
may otherwise not be repurchasing common shares —
for example, during internal trading blackout periods.
As of December 31, 2020, approximately 62.1 million
shares of common stock were reserved for issuance
under various employee incentive, compensation, option
and stock purchase plans, and directors’ compensation
plans.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 273
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 23 – Earnings per share
Basic earnings per share (“EPS”) is calculated using the
two-class method. Under the two-class method, all
earnings (distributed and undistributed) are allocated to
common stock and participating securities. JPMorgan
Chase grants RSUs under its share-based
compensation programs, predominantly all of which
entitle recipients to receive nonforfeitable dividends
during the vesting period on a basis equivalent to
dividends paid to holders of the Firm’s common stock.
These unvested RSUs meet the definition of
participating securities based on their respective rights
to receive nonforfeitable dividends, and they are treated
as a separate class of securities in computing basic
EPS. Participating securities are not included as
incremental shares in computing diluted EPS; refer to
Note 9 for additional information.
Diluted EPS incorporates the potential impact of
contingently issuable shares, including awards which
require future service as a condition of delivery of the
underlying common stock. Diluted EPS is calculated
under both the two-class and treasury stock methods,
and the more dilutive amount is reported. For each of
the periods presented in the table below, diluted EPS
calculated under the two-class method was more
dilutive.
The following table presents the calculation of net
income applicable to common stockholders and basic
and diluted EPS for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018.
Year ended December 31,
 (in millions, 
 except per share amounts) 2020 2019 2018
Basic earnings per share
Net income $29,131 $36,431 $32,474 
Less: Preferred stock dividends 1,583 1,587 1,551 
Net income applicable to
common equity 27,548 34,844 30,923 
Less: Dividends and
undistributed earnings
allocated to participating
securities 138 202 214 
Net income applicable to
common stockholders $27,410 $34,642 $30,709 
Total weighted-average basic
shares outstanding 3,082.4 3,221.5 3,396.4 
Net income per share $ 8.89 $ 10.75 $ 9.04 
Diluted earnings per share
Net income applicable to
common stockholders $27,410 $34,642 $30,709 
Total weighted-average basic
shares outstanding 3,082.4 3,221.5 3,396.4 
Add: Dilutive impact of SARs
and employee stock options,
unvested PSUs and
nondividend-earning RSUs,
and warrants 5.0 8.9 17.6 
Total weighted-average
diluted shares outstanding 3,087.4 3,230.4 3,414.0 
Net income per share $ 8.88 $ 10.72 $ 9.00 
274 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 24 – Accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss)
AOCI includes the after-tax change in unrealized gains and losses on investment securities, foreign currency
translation adjustments (including the impact of related derivatives), fair value changes of excluded components on fair
value hedges, cash flow hedging activities, net loss and prior service costs/(credit) related to the Firm’s defined benefit
pension and OPEB plans, and fair value option-elected liabilities arising from changes in the Firm’s own credit risk
(DVA).
Year ended
December 31, 
 (in millions)Unrealized 
 gains/(losses) 
 on investment
securitiesTranslation
adjustments, net
of hedgesFair value
 hedgesCash flow
hedgesDefined benefit
pension and OPEB
plansDVA on fair value
option elected
liabilitiesAccumulated
other
comprehensive
income/(loss)
Balance at
December 31, 2017 $2,164  $ (470) $ — $ 76 $ (1,521) $ (368) $ (119)
Cumulative effect of
changes in
accounting
principles 896 (277) (54) 16 (414) (79) 88 
Net change (1,858) 20 (107) (201) (373) 1,043 (1,476)
Balance at
December 31, 2018 $1,202 $ (727) $ (161)$ (109) $ (2,308) $ 596 $ (1,507)
Net change 2,855 20 30 172 964 (965) 3,076 
Balance at December
31, 2019 $4,057 $ (707) $ (131)$ 63 $ (1,344) $ (369) $ 1,569 
Net change 4,123 234 19 2,320 212 (491) 6,417 
Balance at
December 31, 2020 $8,180 $ (473) $ (112)$2,383 $ (1,132) $ (860) $ 7,986 
(a)Represents the adjustment to AOCI as a result of the accounting standards adopted in the first quarter of 2018. Refer to Note 1 for additional
information.
(b)Includes after-tax net unamortized unrealized gains of $3.3 billion related to AFS securities that have been transferred to HTM. Refer to Note 10
for further information.(a)
(b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 275
Notes to consolidated financial statements
The following table presents the pre-tax and after-tax changes in the components of OCI.
2020 2019 2018
Year ended December 31, (in millions) Pre-tax Tax ef fect After-tax Pre-taxTax
effect After-tax Pre-tax Tax ef fect After-tax
Unrealized gains/(losses) on investment
securities:
Net unrealized gains/(losses) arising during the
period $6,228  $(1,495 )$4,733  $4,025  $(974)$3,051  $(2,825 )$ 665 $(2,160 )
Reclassification adjustment for realized
(gains)/losses included in net income (802) 192 (610) (258) 62 (196) 395 (93) 302 
Net change 5,426  (1,303 ) 4,123  3,767  (912) 2,855  (2,430 ) 572 (1,858 )
Translation adjustments :
Translation 1,407  (103) 1,304  (49) 33 (16) (1,078 ) 156 (922)
Hedges (1,411 ) 341 (1,070 ) 46 (10) 36 1,236  (294) 942 
Net change (4) 238 234 (3) 23 20 158 (138) 20 
Fair value hedges, net change : 25 (6) 19 39 (9) 30 (140) 33 (107)
Cash flow hedges:
Net unrealized gains/(losses) arising during the
period 3,623  (870) 2,753  122 (28) 94 (245) 58 (187)
Reclassification adjustment for realized
(gains)/losses included in net income (570) 137 (433) 103 (25) 78 (18) 4 (14)
Net change 3,053  (733) 2,320  225 (53) 172 (263) 62 (201)
Defined benefit pension and OPEB plans, net
change: 214 (2) 212 1,157  (193) 964 (450) 77 (373)
DVA on fair value option elected liabilities, net
change: $(648)$ 157 $(491)$(1,264 )$ 299 $(965)$1,364  $(321)$1,043  
Total other comprehensive income/(loss) $8,066  $(1,649 )$6,417  $3,921  $(845)$3,076  $(1,761 )$ 285 $(1,476 )
(a)The pre-tax amount is reported in Investment securities gains/(losses) in the Consolidated statements of income.
(b)Reclassifications of pre-tax realized gains/(losses) on translation adjustments and related hedges are reported in other income/expense in the
Consolidated statements of income. During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Firm reclassified a net pre-tax gain of $ 6 million to other income
related to the liquidation of legal entities, $ 3 million related to net investment hedge gains and $ 3 million related to cumulative translation adjustments.
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the Firm reclassified net pre-tax gains of $ 7 million to other income and $ 1 million to other expense,
respectively . These amounts, which related to the liquidation of certain legal entities, are comprised of $ 18 million related to net investment hedge gains
and $ 10 million related to cumulative translation adjustments. During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Firm reclassified a net pre-tax loss of $ 168
million to other expense related to the liquidation of certain legal entities, $ 17 million related to net investment hedge losses and $ 151 million related to
cumulative translation adjustments.
(c)Represents changes in fair value of cross-currency swaps attributable to changes in cross-currency basis spreads, which are excluded from the
assessment of hedge ef fectiveness and recorded in other comprehensive income. The initial cost of cross-currency basis spreads is recognized in
earnings as part of the accrual of interest on the cross-currency swap.
(d)The pre-tax amounts are primarily recorded in noninterest revenue, net interest income and compensation expense in the Consolidated statements of
income.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
276 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 25 – Income taxes
JPMorgan Chase and its eligible subsidiaries file a
consolidated U.S. federal income tax return. JPMorgan
Chase uses the asset and liability method to provide
income taxes on all transactions recorded in the
Consolidated Financial Statements. This method
requires that income taxes reflect the expected future
tax consequences of temporary differences between the
carrying amounts of assets or liabilities for book and tax
purposes. Accordingly, a deferred tax asset or liability
for each temporary difference is determined based on
the tax rates that the Firm expects to be in effect when
the underlying items of income and expense are
realized. JPMorgan Chase’s expense for income taxes
includes the current and deferred portions of that
expense. A valuation allowance is established to reduce
deferred tax assets to the amount the Firm expects to
realize.
Due to the inherent complexities arising from the nature
of the Firm’s businesses, and from conducting business
and being taxed in a substantial number of jurisdictions,
significant judgments and estimates are required to be
made. Agreement of tax liabilities between JPMorgan
Chase and the many tax jurisdictions in which the Firm
files tax returns may not be finalized for several years.
Thus, the Firm’s final tax-related assets and liabilities
may ultimately be different from those currently
reported.
Effective tax rate and expense
The following table presents a reconciliation of the
applicable statutory U.S. federal income tax rate to the
effective tax rate.
Effective tax rate
Year ended December 31, 2020 2019 2018
Statutory U.S. federal tax
rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 %
Increase/(decrease) in tax
rate resulting from:
U.S. state and local
income taxes, net of
U.S. federal income
tax benefit 2.5 3.5 4.0 
Tax-exempt income (1.6) (1.4) (1.5)
Non-U.S. earnings 1.4 1.8 0.6 
Business tax credits (6.3) (4.4) (3.5)
Tax audit resolutions — (2.3) (0.1)
Impact of the TCJA — — (0.7)
Other, net 0.7 — 0.5 
Effective tax rate 17.7 % 18.2 % 20.3 %
(a)Represents changes in the estimates related to the
remeasurement of certain deferred taxes and the deemed
repatriation tax on non-U.S. earnings under SEC Staff Accounting
Bulletin No. 118 which was completed in 2018.The following table reflects the components of income
tax expense/(benefit) included in the Consolidated
statements of income.
Income tax expense/(benefit)
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Current income tax
expense/(benefit)
U.S. federal $5,759  $3,284  $2,854  
Non-U.S. 2,705  2,103  2,077  
U.S. state and local 1,793  1,778  1,638  
Total current income tax
expense/(benefit) 10,257  7,165  6,569  
Deferred income tax
expense/(benefit)
U.S. federal (3,184 ) 709 1,359  
Non-U.S. (126) 20 (93)
U.S. state and local (671) 220 455 
Total deferred income tax 
 expense/(benefit) (3,981 ) 949 1,721  
Total income tax expense $6,276  $8,114  $8,290  
Total income tax expense includes $72 million, $1.1
billion and $54 million of tax benefits recorded in 2020,
2019, and 2018, respectively, resulting from the
resolution of tax audits.
Tax effect of items recorded in stockholders’ equity
The preceding table does not reflect the tax effect of
certain items that are recorded each period directly in
stockholders’ equity. The tax effect of all items recorded
directly to stockholders’ equity resulted in a decrease of
$827 million and $862 million in 2020 and 2019,
respectively, and an increase of $172 million in 2018.
Results from Non-U.S. earnings
The following table presents the U.S. and non-U.S.
components of income before income tax expense.
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
U.S. $26,904 $36,670 $33,052 
Non-U.S. 8,503 7,875 7,712 
Income before income tax
expense $35,407 $44,545 $40,764 
(a)For purposes of this table, non-U.S. income is defined as income
generated from operations located outside the U.S.
The Firm will recognize any U.S. income tax expense it
may incur on global intangible low tax income as income
tax expense in the period in which the tax is incurred.
 (a)(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 277
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Affordable housing tax credits
The Firm recognized $1.5 billion of tax credits and other
tax benefits associated with investments in affordable
housing projects within income tax expense for each of
the three years ended 2020, 2019 and 2018. The
amount of amortization of such investments reported in
income tax expense was $1.2 billion, $1.1 billion and
$1.2 billion, respectively. The carrying value of these
investments, which are reported in other assets on the
Firm’s Consolidated balance sheets, was $9.7 billion
and $8.6 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively. The amount of commitments related to
these investments, which are reported in accounts
payable and other liabilities on the Firm’s Consolidated
balance sheets, was $3.8 billion and $2.8 billion at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Deferred taxes
Deferred income tax expense/(benefit) results from
differences between assets and liabilities measured for
financial reporting purposes versus income tax return
purposes. Deferred tax assets are recognized if, in
management’s judgment, their realizability is determined
to be more likely than not. If a deferred tax asset is
determined to be unrealizable, a valuation allowance is
established. The significant components of deferred tax
assets and liabilities are reflected in the following table.
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Deferred tax assets
Allowance for loan losses $ 7,270 $ 3,400 
Employee benefits 1,104 1,039 
Accrued expenses and other 3,332 2,767 
Non-U.S. operations 849 949 
Tax attribute carryforwards 757 605 
Gross deferred tax assets 13,312 8,760 
Valuation allowance (560) (557)
Deferred tax assets, net of
valuation allowance $ 12,752 $ 8,203 
Deferred tax liabilities
Depreciation and amortization $ 3,329 $ 2,852 
Mortgage servicing rights, net of
hedges 2,184 2,354 
Leasing transactions 5,124 5,598 
Other, net 6,025 4,683 
Gross deferred tax liabilities 16,662 15,487 
Net deferred tax
(liabilities)/assets $ (3,910)$ (7,284)
JPMorgan Chase has recorded deferred tax assets of
$757 million at December 31, 2020, in connection with
U.S. federal and non-U.S. NOL carryforwards, FTC
carryforwards, and state and local capital loss
carryforwards. At December 31, 2020, total U.S. federal
NOL carryforwards were $799 million, non-U.S. NOL
carryforwards were $139 million, FTC carryforwards
were $444 million, state and local capital loss
carryforwards were $1.1 billion, and other federal tax
attributes were $393 million. If not utilized, a portion of
the U.S. federal NOL carryforwards and other U.S.
federal tax attributes will expire between 2022 and 2037
whereas others have an unlimited carryforward period.Similarly, certain non-U.S. NOL carryforwards will expire
between 2026 and 2036 whereas others have an
unlimited carryforward period. The FTC carryforwards
will expire between 2029 and 2030, and the state and
local capital loss carryforwards will expire between 2021
and 2022. 
The valuation allowance at December 31, 2020, was due
to the state and local capital loss carryforwards, FTC
carryforwards, and certain non-U.S. deferred tax assets,
including NOL carryforwards.
Unrecognized tax benefits
At December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, JPMorgan
Chase’s unrecognized tax benefits, excluding related
interest expense and penalties, were $4.3 billion, $4.0
billion and $4.9 billion, respectively, of which $3.1 billion,
$2.8 billion and $3.8 billion, respectively, if recognized,
would reduce the annual effective tax rate. Included in
the amount of unrecognized tax benefits are certain
items that would not affect the effective tax rate if they
were recognized in the Consolidated statements of
income. These unrecognized items include the tax effect
of certain temporary differences, the portion of gross
state and local unrecognized tax benefits that would be
offset by the benefit from associated U.S. federal income
tax deductions, and the portion of gross non-U.S.
unrecognized tax benefits that would have offsets in
other jurisdictions. JPMorgan Chase is presently under
audit by a number of taxing authorities, most notably by
the Internal Revenue Service as summarized in the Tax
examination status table below. As JPMorgan Chase is
presently under audit by a number of taxing authorities, it
is reasonably possible that over the next 12 months the
resolution of these examinations may increase or
decrease the gross balance of unrecognized tax benefits
by as much as approximately $300 million. Upon
settlement of an audit, the change in the unrecognized
tax benefit would result from payment or income
statement recognition.
The following table presents a reconciliation of the
beginning and ending amount of unrecognized tax
benefits.
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Balance at January 1, $4,024 $4,861 $4,747 
Increases based on tax
positions related to the current
period 685 871 980 
Increases based on tax
positions related to prior
periods 362 10 649 
Decreases based on tax
positions related to prior
periods (705) (706) (1,249)
Decreases related to cash
settlements with taxing
authorities (116) (1,012) (266)
Balance at December 31, $4,250 $4,024 $4,861 
After-tax interest expense/(benefit) and penalties related
to income tax liabilities recognized in income tax
expense were $147 million, $(52) million and $192
million in 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, in addition to the
liability for unrecognized tax benefits, the Firm had
accrued $966 million and $817 million, respectively, for
income tax-related interest and penalties.
278 JPMorganChase&Co/2020Form10K
278 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Tax examination status
JPMorgan Chase is continually under examination by
the Internal Revenue Service, by taxing authorities
throughout the world, and by many state and local
jurisdictions throughout the U.S. The following table
summarizes the status of significant income tax
examinations of JPMorgan Chase and its consolidated
subsidiaries as of December 31, 2020.
Periods under
examination Status
JPMorgan Chase –
U.S.2009 – 2013 Field examination of
amended returns
JPMorgan Chase –
U.S.2014 - 2016 Field Examination
JPMorgan Chase –
New York State2012 - 2014 Field Examination
JPMorgan Chase –
New York City2012 - 2014 Field Examination
JPMorgan Chase –
California2011 – 2012 Field Examination
JPMorgan Chase –
U.K.2006 – 2018 Field examination of
certain select entities
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 279
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 26 – Restricted cash, other restricted
assets and intercompany funds transfers
Restricted cash and other restricted assets
Certain of the Firm’s cash and other assets are
restricted as to withdrawal or usage. These restrictions
are imposed by various regulatory authorities based on
the particular activities of the Firm’s subsidiaries.
The business of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. is subject
to examination and regulation by the OCC. The Bank is
a member of the U.S. Federal Reserve System, and its
deposits in the U.S. are insured by the FDIC, subject to
applicable limits.
The Firm is required to maintain cash reserves at
certain non-US central banks.
The Firm is also subject to rules and regulations
established by other U.S. and non U.S. regulators. As
part of its compliance with the respective regulatory
requirements, the Firm’s broker-dealers (principally J.P.
Morgan Securities LLC in the U.S and J.P. Morgan
Securities plc in the U.K.) are subject to certain
restrictions on cash and other assets.
The following table presents the components of the
Firm’s restricted cash:
December 31, (in billions) 2020 2019
Cash reserves – Federal
Reserve Banks $ — $ 26.6 
Segregated for the benefit of
securities and cleared
derivative customers 19.3 16.0 
Cash reserves at non-U.S.
central banks and held for other
general purposes 5.1 3.9 
Total restricted cash $ 24.4 $ 46.5 
(a)Effective March 26, 2020, the Federal Reserve eliminated reserve
requirements for depository institutions
(b)Comprises $22.7 billion and $45.3 billion in deposits with banks,
and $1.7 billion and $1.2 billion in cash and due from banks on the
Consolidated balance sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
Also, as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Firm had
the following other restricted assets:
•Cash and securities pledged with clearing
organizations for the benefit of customers of $37.2
billion and $24.7 billion, respectively.
•Securities with a fair value of $1.3 billion and $8.8
billion, respectively, were also restricted in relation to
customer activity.Intercompany funds transfers
Restrictions imposed by U.S. federal law prohibit
JPMorgan Chase & Co. (“Parent Company”) and certain
of its affiliates from borrowing from banking subsidiaries
unless the loans are secured in specified amounts. Such
secured loans provided by any banking subsidiary to the
Parent Company or to any particular affiliate, together
with certain other transactions with such affiliate
(collectively referred to as “covered transactions”), are
generally limited to 10% of the banking subsidiary’s total
capital, as determined by the risk-based capital
guidelines; the aggregate amount of covered
transactions between any banking subsidiary and all of
its affiliates is limited to 20% of the banking subsidiary’s
total capital.
The Parent Company’s two principal subsidiaries are
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and JPMorgan Chase
Holdings LLC, an intermediate holding company (the
“IHC”). The IHC holds the stock of substantially all of
JPMorgan Chase’s subsidiaries other than JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A. and its subsidiaries. The IHC also
owns other assets and owes intercompany
indebtedness to the holding company. The Parent
Company is obligated to contribute to the IHC
substantially all the net proceeds received from
securities issuances (including issuances of senior and
subordinated debt securities and of preferred and
common stock).
The principal sources of income and funding for the
Parent Company are dividends from JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. and dividends and extensions of credit from
the IHC. In addition to dividend restrictions set forth in
statutes and regulations, the Federal Reserve, the OCC
and the FDIC have authority under the Financial
Institutions Supervisory Act to prohibit or to limit the
payment of dividends by the banking organizations they
supervise, including the Parent Company and its
subsidiaries that are banks or bank holding companies,
if, in the banking regulator’s opinion, payment of a
dividend would constitute an unsafe or unsound practice
in light of the financial condition of the banking
organization. The IHC is prohibited from paying
dividends or extending credit to the Parent Company if
certain capital or liquidity “thresholds” are breached or if
limits are otherwise imposed by the Parent Company’s
management or Board of Directors.
At January 1, 2021, the Parent Company’s banking
subsidiaries could pay, in the aggregate, approximately
$13 billion in dividends to their respective bank holding
companies without the prior approval of their relevant
banking regulators. The capacity to pay dividends in
2021 will be supplemented by the banking subsidiaries’
earnings during the year.(a)
(b)
280 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 27 – Regulatory capital
The Federal Reserve establishes capital requirements,
including well-capitalized standards, for the consolidated
financial holding company. The OCC establishes similar
minimum capital requirements and standards for the
Firm’s principal IDI subsidiary, JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A.
The capital rules under Basel III establish minimum
capital ratios and overall capital adequacy standards for
large and internationally active U.S. bank holding
companies and banks, including the Firm and its IDI
subsidiaries, including JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. Two
comprehensive approaches are prescribed for
calculating RWA: a standardized approach (“Basel III
Standardized”), and an advanced approach (“Basel III
Advanced”). For each of the risk-based capital ratios,
the capital adequacy of the Firm and JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. is evaluated against the lower of the
Standardized or Advanced approaches compared to
their respective minimum capital ratios.
The three components of regulatory capital under the
Basel III rules are as illustrated below:
Under the risk-based capital and leverage-based
guidelines of the Federal Reserve, JPMorgan Chase is
required to maintain minimum ratios for CET1 capital,
Tier 1 capital, Total capital, Tier 1 leverage and the SLR.
Failure to meet these minimum requirements could
cause the Federal Reserve to take action. IDI
subsidiaries are also subject to these capital
requirements established by their respective primary
regulators.The following table presents the minimum and well-
capitalized ratios to which the Firm and its IDI
subsidiaries were subject as of December 31, 2020 and
2019.
Standardized
Minimum capital
ratiosAdvanced
Minimum capital
ratiosWell-capitalized
ratios
BHC IDI BHC IDI BHC IDI
Capital
ratios   
CET1
capital 11.3 % 7.0 % 10.5 % 7.0 % NA 6.5 %
Tier 1
capital 12.8 8.5 12.0 8.5 6.0 8.0 
Total
capital 14.8 10.5 14.0 10.5 10.0 10.0 
Tier 1
leverage 4.0 4.0 4.0 4.0 NA 5.0 
SLR NA NA 5.0 6.0 NA 6.0 
Note: The table above is as defined by the regulations issued by the
Federal Reserve, OCC and FDIC and to which the Firm and its IDI
subsidiaries are subject.
(a)Represents the minimum capital ratios applicable to the Firm. The
CET1, Tier 1 and Total capital minimum capital ratios each include
a respective minimum requirement plus a GSIB surcharge of 3.5%
as calculated under Method 2; plus a 3.3% SCB for Basel III
Standardized ratios and a fixed 2.5% capital conservation buffer
for Basel III Advanced ratios. The countercyclical buffer is currently
set to 0% by the federal banking agencies.
(b)For the period ended December 31, 2019, the CET1, Tier 1, Total,
Tier 1 leverage and SLR minimum capital ratios under Basel III
Standardized applicable to the Firm were 10.5%, 12.0%, 14.0%,
4.0%, and 5.0%, respectively.
(c)Represents minimum SLR requirement of 3.0%, as well as
supplementary leverage buffer requirements of 2.0% and 3.0% for
BHC and IDI, respectively.
(d)Represents requirements for JPMorgan Chase’s IDI subsidiaries.
The CET1, Tier 1 and Total capital minimum capital ratios include
a fixed capital conservation buffer requirement of 2.5% that is
applicable to the IDI subsidiaries. The IDI subsidiaries are not
subject to the GSIB surcharge.
(e)Represents requirements for bank holding companies pursuant to
regulations issued by the Federal Reserve.
(f)Represents requirements for IDI subsidiaries pursuant to
regulations issued under the FDIC Improvement Act.
 
Current Expected Credit Losses
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the
Financial Instruments – Credit Losses guidance under
U.S. GAAP. As permitted under the U.S. capital rules
issued by the federal banking agencies in 2019, the
Firm initially elected to phase-in the January 1, 2020
(“day 1”) CECL adoption impact to retained earnings of
$2.7 billion to CET1 capital, at 25% per year in each of
2020 to 2023. As part of their response to the impact of
the COVID-19 pandemic, on March 31, 2020, the
federal banking agencies issued an interim final rule
(issued as final on August 26, 2020) that provided the
option to delay the effects of CECL on regulatory capital
for two years, followed by a three-year transition period.
The final rule provides a uniform approach for estimating
the effects of CECL compared to the legacy incurred
loss model during the first two years of the transition
period (the “day 2” transition amount), whereby the Firm
may exclude from CET1 capital 25% of the change in
the(a)(b)(c) (c)(d) (a)(c) (c)(d) (e) (f)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 281
Notes to consolidated financial statements
allowance for credit losses (excluding allowances on
PCD loans). The cumulative day 2 transition amount as
at December 31, 2021 that is not recognized in CET1
capital, as well as the $2.7 billion day 1 impact, will be
phased into CET1 capital at 25% per year beginning
January 1, 2022. The Firm has elected to apply the
CECL capital transition provisions, and accordingly, for
the year ended December 31, 2020, the capital metrics
of the Firm exclude $5.7 billion, which is the $2.7 billion
day 1 impact toretained earnings and 25% of the $12.2 billion increase
in the allowance for credit losses (excluding allowances
on PCD loans).
The impacts of the CECL capital transition provisions
have also been incorporated into Tier 2 capital, adjusted
average assets, and total leverage exposure. Refer to
Note 1 for further information on the CECL accounting
guidance.
The following tables present the risk-based and leverage-based capital metrics for JPMorgan Chase and JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A. under both the Basel III Standardized and Basel III Advanced Approaches. As of December 31,
2020, the capital metrics are presented applying the CECL capital transition provisions. As of December 31, 2020 and
2019, JPMorgan Chase and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. were well-capitalized and met all capital requirements to
which each was subject.
December 31, 2020
(in millions, except ratios)Basel III Standardized Basel III Advanced
JPMorgan
Chase & Co.JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A.JPMorgan
Chase & Co.JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A.
Risk-based capital metrics:
CET1 capital $ 205,078 $ 234,235 $ 205,078 $ 234,235 
Tier 1 capital 234,844 234,237 234,844 234,237 
Total capital 269,923 252,045 257,228 239,673 
Risk-weighted assets 1,560,609 1,492,138 1,484,431 1,343,185 
CET1 capital ratio 13.1 % 15.7 % 13.8 % 17.4 %
Tier 1 capital ratio 15.0 15.7 15.8 17.4 
Total capital ratio 17.3 16.9 17.3 17.8 
Leverage-based capital metrics:
Adjusted average assets $ 3,353,319 $ 2,970,285 $ 3,353,319 $ 2,970,285 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 7.0 % 7.9 % 7.0 % 7.9 %
Total leverage exposure NA NA$ 3,401,542 $ 3,688,797 
SLR NA NA 6.9 % 6.3 %
December 31, 2019
 (in millions, except ratios)Basel III Standardized Basel III Advanced
JPMorgan 
 Chase & Co.JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A.JPMorgan 
 Chase & Co.JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A.
Risk-based capital metrics:
CET1 capital $ 187,753 $ 206,848 $ 187,753 $ 206,848 
Tier 1 capital 214,432 206,851 214,432 206,851 
Total capital 242,589 224,390 232,112 214,091 
Risk-weighted assets 1,515,869 1,457,689 1,397,878 1,269,991 
CET1 capital ratio 12.4 % 14.2 % 13.4 % 16.3 %
Tier 1 capital ratio 14.1 14.2 15.3 16.3 
Total capital ratio 16.0 15.4 16.6 16.9 
Leverage-based capital metrics:
Adjusted average assets $ 2,730,239 $ 2,353,432 $ 2,730,239 $ 2,353,432 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 7.9 % 8.8 % 7.9 % 8.8 %
Total leverage exposure NA NA$ 3,423,431 $ 3,044,509 
SLR NA NA 6.3 % 6.8 %
(a)Adjusted average assets, for purposes of calculating the leverage ratio, includes total quarterly average assets adjusted for on-balance sheet
assets that are subject to deduction from Tier 1 capital, predominantly goodwill and other intangible assets.
(b)As of December 31, 2020, JPMorgan Chase’s total leverage exposure for purposes of calculating the SLR, excludes on-balance sheet amounts
of U.S. Treasury securities and deposits at Federal Reserve Banks, as provided by the interim final rule issued by the Federal Reserve on April 1,
2020. On June 1, 2020, the Federal Reserve, OCC and FDIC issued an interim final rule that provides IDI subsidiaries with an option to apply this
temporary exclusion subject to certain restrictions. As of December 31, 2020, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. has not elected to apply this
exclusion.
(c)As of December 31, 2020, the capital metrics for the Firm reflect the exclusion of assets purchased from money market mutual fund clients
pursuant to nonrecourse advances provided under the MMLF. Additionally, loans originated under the PPP for the Firm and JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. receive a zero percent risk weight.(c) (c) (c) (c)
(a)
(b)
(b)
(a)
282 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 28 – Off–balance sheet lending-related
financial instruments, guarantees, and
other commitments
JPMorgan Chase provides lending-related financial
instruments (e.g., commitments and guarantees) to
address the financing needs of its customers and
clients. The contractual amount of these financial
instruments represents the maximum possible credit risk
to the Firm should the customer or client draw upon the
commitment or the Firm be required to fulfill its
obligation under the guarantee, and should the
customer or client subsequently fail to perform
according to the terms of the contract. Most of these
commitments and guarantees have historically been
refinanced, extended, cancelled, or expired without
being drawn or a default occurring. As a result, the total
contractual amount of these instruments is not, in the
Firm’s view, representative of its expected future credit
exposure or funding requirements.To provide for expected credit losses in wholesale and
certain consumer lending-related commitments, an
allowance for credit losses on lending-related
commitments is maintained. Refer to Note 13 for further
information regarding the allowance for credit losses on
lending-related commitments, including the impact of the
Firm’s adoption of CECL accounting guidance on
January 1, 2020. The following table summarizes the
contractual amounts and carrying values of off-balance
sheet lending-related financial instruments, guarantees
and other commitments at December 31, 2020 and
2019. The amounts in the table below for credit card and
home equity lending-related commitments represent the
total available credit for these products. The Firm has
not experienced, and does not anticipate, that all
available lines of credit for these products will be utilized
at the same time. The Firm can reduce or cancel credit
card lines of credit by providing the borrower notice or,
in some cases as permitted by law, without notice. In
addition, the Firm typically closes credit card lines when
the borrower is 60 days or more past due. The Firm may
reduce or close HELOCs when there are significant
decreases in the value of the underlying property, or
when there has been a demonstrable decline in the
creditworthiness of the borrower.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 283
Notes to consolidated financial statements
In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the Firm reclassified risk-rated loans and lending-related commitments from
the consumer, excluding credit card portfolio segment to the wholesale portfolio segment, to align with the methodology
applied in determining the allowance. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
Refer to Note 1 for further information.
Off–balance sheet lending-related financial instruments, guarantees and other commitments
Contractual amount Carrying value
2020 2019 2020 2019
By remaining maturity at December 31, 
(in millions)Expires in
1 year or
lessExpires
after 
 1 year
through 
 3 yearsExpires
after 
 3 years
through 
 5 yearsExpires
after 5
years Total Total
Lending-related
Consumer, excluding credit card:
Residential Real Estate $26,788 $ 1,597 $ 3,962 $13,700 $ 46,047 $ 30,217 148 12 
Auto and other 10,471 1 8 792 11,272 9,952 — — 
Total consumer, excluding credit card 37,259 1,598 3,970 14,492 57,319 40,169 148 12 
Credit card 658,506 — — — 658,506 650,720 — — 
Total consumer 695,765 1,598 3,970 14,492 715,825 690,889 148 12 
Wholesale:
Other unfunded commitments to extend
credit 96,490 174,335 128,736 16,267 415,828 380,307 2,148 952 
Standby letters of credit and other financial
guarantees 17,478 7,986 4,051 1,467 30,982 34,242 443 618 
Other letters of credit 2,982 45 26 — 3,053 2,961 14 4 
Total wholesale 116,950 182,366 132,813 17,734 449,863 417,510 2,605 1,574 
Total lending-related $812,715 $183,964 $136,783 $32,226 $1,165,688 $1,108,399 $2,753 $1,586 
Other guarantees and commitments
Securities lending indemnification agreements
and guarantees $250,418 $ — $ — $ — $ 250,418 $204,827 $ — $ — 
Derivatives qualifying as guarantees 2,489 541 12,182 39,203 54,415 53,089 322 159 
Unsettled resale and securities borrowed
agreements 95,084 1,764 — — 96,848 117,951 2 — 
Unsettled repurchase and securities loaned
agreements 104,289 612 — — 104,901 73,351 (1) — 
Loan sale and securitization-related
indemnifications:
Mortgage repurchase liability NA NA NA NA NA NA 84 59 
Loans sold with recourse NA NA NA NA 889 944 23 27 
Exchange & clearing house guarantees and
commitments 142,003 — — — 142,003 206,432 — — 
Other guarantees and commitments 2,457 574 758 2,541 6,330 6,334 52 (66)
(a)Includes certain commitments to purchase loans from correspondents.
(b)Also includes commercial card lending-related commitments primarily in CB and CIB.
(c)Predominantly all consumer and wholesale lending-related commitments are in the U.S.
(d)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, reflected the contractual amount net of risk participations totaling $72 million and $76 million, respectively, for
other unfunded commitments to extend credit; $8.5 billion and $9.8 billion, respectively, for standby letters of credit and other financial
guarantees; and $357 million and $546 million, respectively, for other letters of credit. In regulatory filings with the Federal Reserve these
commitments are shown gross of risk participations.
(e)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans, which
resulted in a corresponding reclassification of commitments from Other guarantees and commitments to Wholesale other unfunded commitments
to extend credit. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(f)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, collateral held by the Firm in support of securities lending indemnification agreements was $264.3 billion and
$216.2 billion, respectively. Securities lending collateral primarily consists of cash, G7 government securities, and securities issued by U.S. GSEs
and government agencies.
(g)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, includes guarantees to the Fixed Income Clearing Corporation under the sponsored member repo program and
commitments and guarantees associated with the Firm’s membership in certain clearing houses.
(h)At December 31, 2020 and 2019, primarily includes letters of credit hedged by derivative transactions and managed on a market risk basis, and
unfunded commitments related to certain tax-oriented equity investments.
(i)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(j)For lending-related products, the carrying value represents the allowance for lending-related commitments and the guarantee liability; for
derivative-related products, and lending-related commitments for which the fair value option was elected, the carrying value represents the fair
value.(j)
(a)
(b)
(b)(c)
(d)(e)
(d)
(d)
(c)
(f)
(g)
 (e)(h) (i)
284 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Other unfunded commitments to extend credit
Other unfunded commitments to extend credit generally
consist of commitments for working capital and general
corporate purposes, extensions of credit to support
commercial paper facilities and bond financings in the
event that those obligations cannot be remarketed to
new investors, as well as committed liquidity facilities to
clearing organizations. The Firm also issues
commitments under multipurpose facilities which could
be drawn upon in several forms, including the issuance
of a standby letter of credit.
Guarantees
U.S. GAAP requires that a guarantor recognize, at the
inception of a guarantee, a liability in an amount equal to
the fair value of the obligation undertaken in issuing the
guarantee. U.S. GAAP defines a guarantee as a
contract that contingently requires the guarantor to pay
a guaranteed party based upon: (a) changes in an
underlying asset, liability or equity security of the
guaranteed party; or (b) a third party’s failure to perform
under a specified agreement. The Firm considers the
following off–balance sheet arrangements to be
guarantees under U.S. GAAP: standby letters of credit
and other financial guarantees, securities lending
indemnifications, certain indemnification agreements
included within third-party contractual arrangements,
certain derivative contracts and the guarantees under
the sponsored member repo program.
As required by U.S. GAAP, the Firm initially records
guarantees at the inception date fair value of the non-
contingent obligation assumed (e.g., the amount of
consideration received or the net present value of the
premium receivable). For these obligations, the Firm
records this fair value amount in other liabilities with an
offsetting entry recorded in cash (for premiums
received),or other assets (for premiums receivable). Any premium
receivable recorded in other assets is reduced as cash
is received under the contract, and the fair value of the
liability recorded at inception is amortized into income as
lending and deposit-related fees over the life of the
guarantee contract. The lending-related contingent
obligation is recognized based on expected credit losses
in addition to, and separate from, any non-contingent
obligation.
Non-lending-related contingent obligations are
recognized when the liability becomes probable and
reasonably estimable. These obligations are not
recognized if the estimated amount is less than the
carrying amount of any non-contingent liability
recognized at inception (adjusted for any amortization).
Examples of non-lending-related contingent obligations
include indemnifications provided in sales agreements,
where a portion of the sale proceeds is allocated to the
guarantee, which adjusts the gain or loss that would
otherwise result from the transaction. For these
indemnifications, the initial liability is amortized to
income as the Firm’s risk is reduced (i.e., over time or
when the indemnification expires).
The contractual amount and carrying value of
guarantees and indemnifications are included in the
table on page 284.
For additional information on the guarantees, see below.
Standby letters of credit and other financial guarantees
Standby letters of credit and other financial guarantees
are conditional lending commitments issued by the Firm
to guarantee the performance of a client or customer to
a third party under certain arrangements, such as
commercial paper facilities, bond financings, acquisition
financings, trade and similar transactions.
The following table summarizes the contractual amount and carrying value of standby letters of credit and other
financial guarantees and other letters of credit arrangements as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Standby letters of credit, other financial guarantees and other letters of credit
2020 2019
December 31,
 (in millions)Standby letters of credit and 
 other financial guaranteesOther letters 
 of creditStandby letters of credit and 
 other financial guaranteesOther letters 
 of credit
Investment-grade $ 22,850 $ 2,263 $ 26,880 $ 2,137 
Noninvestment-grade 8,132 790 7,362 824 
Total contractual amount $ 30,982 $ 3,053 $ 34,242 $ 2,961 
Allowance for lending-related commitments $ 80 $ 14 $ 216 $ 4 
Guarantee liability 363 — 402 — 
Total carrying value $ 443 $ 14 $ 618 $ 4 
Commitments with collateral $ 17,238 $ 498 $ 17,853 $ 728 
(a)The ratings scale is based on the Firm’s internal risk ratings. Refer to Note 12 for further information on internal risk ratings.(a)
(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 285
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Securities lending indemnifications
Through the Firm’s securities lending program,
counterparties’ securities, via custodial and non-
custodial arrangements, may be lent to third parties. As
part of this program, the Firm provides an
indemnification in the lending agreements which
protects the lender against the failure of the borrower to
return the lent securities. To minimize its liability under
these indemnification agreements, the Firm obtains
cash or other highly liquid collateral with a market value
exceeding 100% of the value of the securities on loan
from the borrower. Collateral is marked to market daily
to help assure that collateralization is adequate.
Additional collateral is called from the borrower if a
shortfall exists, or collateral may be released to the
borrower in the event of overcollateralization. If a
borrower defaults, the Firm would use the collateral held
to purchase replacement securities in the market or to
credit the lending client or counterparty with the cash
equivalent thereof.
The cash collateral held by the Firm may be invested on
behalf of the client in indemnified resale agreements,
whereby the Firm indemnifies the client against the loss
of principal invested. To minimize its liability under these
agreements, the Firm obtains collateral with a market
value exceeding 100% of the principal invested.
Derivatives qualifying as guarantees
The Firm transacts in certain derivative contracts that
have the characteristics of a guarantee under U.S.
GAAP. These contracts include written put options that
require the Firm to purchase assets upon exercise by
the option holder at a specified price by a specified date
in the future. The Firm may enter into written put option
contracts in order to meet client needs, or for other
trading purposes. The terms of written put options are
typically five years or less.
Derivatives deemed to be guarantees also includes
stable value contracts, commonly referred to as “stable
value products”, that require the Firm to make a
payment of the difference between the market value and
the book value of a counterparty’s reference portfolio of
assets in the event that market value is less than book
value and certain other conditions have been met.
Stable value products are transacted in order to allow
investors to realize investment returns with less volatility
than an unprotected portfolio. These contracts are
typically longer-term or may have no stated maturity, but
allow the Firm to elect to terminate the contract under
certain conditions.
The notional value of derivatives guarantees generally
represents the Firm’s maximum exposure. However,
exposure to certain stable value products is
contractually limited to a substantially lower percentage
of the notional amount.
The fair value of derivative guarantees reflects the
probability, in the Firm’s view, of whether the Firm will be
required to perform under the contract. The Firm
reduces exposures to these contracts by entering into
offsetting transactions, or by entering into contracts that
hedge the market risk related to the derivative
guarantees.The following table summarizes the derivatives
qualifying as guarantees as of December 31, 2020 and
2019.
(in millions)December 31,
2020December 31,
2019
Notional amounts
Derivative guarantees $ 54,415 $ 53,089 
Stable value contracts with
contractually limited exposure 27,752 28,877 
Maximum exposure of stable
value contracts with
contractually limited exposure 2,803 2,967 
Fair value
Derivative payables 322 159 
In addition to derivative contracts that meet the
characteristics of a guarantee, the Firm is both a
purchaser and seller of credit protection in the credit
derivatives market. Refer to Note 5 for a further
discussion of credit derivatives.
Unsettled securities financing agreements
In the normal course of business, the Firm enters into
resale and securities borrowed agreements. At
settlement, these commitments result in the Firm
advancing cash to and receiving securities collateral
from the counterparty. The Firm also enters into
repurchase and securities loaned agreements. At
settlement, these commitments result in the Firm
receiving cash from and providing securities collateral to
the counterparty. Such agreements settle at a future
date. These agreements generally do not meet the
definition of a derivative, and therefore, are not recorded
on the Consolidated balance sheets until settlement
date. These agreements predominantly have regular-
way settlement terms. Refer to Note 11 for a further
discussion of securities financing agreements.
Loan sales- and securitization-related
indemnifications
Mortgage repurchase liability
In connection with the Firm’ s mortgage loan sale and
securitization activities with U.S. GSEs the Firm has
made representations and warranties that the loans sold
meet certain requirements, and that may require the
Firm to repurchase mortgage loans and/or indemnify the
loan purchaser if such representations and warranties
are breached by the Firm.
Private label securitizations
The liability related to repurchase demands associated
with private label securitizations is separately evaluated
by the Firm in establishing its litigation reserves.
Refer to Note 30 for additional information regarding
litigation.
Loans sold with recourse
The Firm provides servicing for mortgages and certain
commercial lending products on both a recourse and
nonrecourse basis. In nonrecourse servicing, the
principal credit risk to the Firm is the cost of temporary
servicing advances of funds (i.e., normal servicing
advances). In recourse servicing, the servicer agrees to
share credit risk
286 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
with the owner of the mortgage loans, such as Fannie
Mae or Freddie Mac or a private investor, insurer or
guarantor. Losses on recourse servicing predominantly
occur when foreclosure sales proceeds of the property
underlying a defaulted loan are less than the sum of the
outstanding principal balance, plus accrued interest on
the loan and the cost of holding and disposing of the
underlying property. The Firm’s securitizations are
predominantly nonrecourse, thereby effectively
transferring the risk of future credit losses to the
purchaser of the mortgage-backed securities issued by
the trust. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the unpaid
principal balance of loans sold with recourse totaled
$889 million and $944 million, respectively. The carrying
value of the related liability that the Firm has recorded in
accounts payable and other liabilities on the
Consolidated balance sheets, which is representative of
the Firm’s view of the likelihood it will have to perform
under its recourse obligations, was $23 million and $27
million at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Other off-balance sheet arrangements
Indemnification agreements – general
In connection with issuing securities to investors outside
the U.S., the Firm may agree to pay additional amounts
to the holders of the securities in the event that, due to a
change in tax law, certain types of withholding taxes are
imposed on payments on the securities. The terms of
the securities may also give the Firm the right to redeem
the securities if such additional amounts are payable.
The Firm may also enter into indemnification clauses in
connection with the licensing of software to clients
(“software licensees”) or when it sells a business or
assets to a third party (“third-party purchasers”),
pursuant to which it indemnifies software licensees for
claims of liability or damages that may occur
subsequent to the licensing of the software, or third-
party purchasers for losses they may incur due to
actions taken by the Firm prior to the sale of the
business or assets. It is difficult to estimate the Firm’s
maximum exposure under these indemnification
arrangements, since this would require an assessment
of future changes in tax law and future claims that may
be made against the Firm that have not yet occurred.
However, based on historical experience, management
expects the risk of loss to be remote.
Merchant charge-backs
Under the rules of payment networks, the Firm, in its
role as a merchant acquirer, retains a contingent liability
for disputed processed credit and debit card
transactions that result in a charge-back to the
merchant. If a dispute is resolved in the cardholder’s
favor, Merchant Services will (through the cardholder’s
issuing bank) credit or refund the amount to the
cardholder and will charge back the transaction to the
merchant. If Merchant Services is unable to collect the
amount from the merchant, Merchant Services will bear
the loss for the amount credited or refunded to the
cardholder. Merchant Services mitigates this risk by
withholding future settlements, retaining cash reserve
accounts or obtaining other collateral. In addition,
MerchantServices recognizes a valuation allowance that covers
the payment or performance risk to the Firm related to
charge-backs. The carrying value of the valuation
allowance was $12 million and $11 million at December
31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
For the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, Merchant Services processed an aggregate
volume of $1,597.3 billion, $1,511.5 billion, and $1,366.1
billion, respectively.
Clearing Services – Client Credit Risk
The Firm provides clearing services for clients by
entering into securities purchases and sales and
derivative contracts with CCPs, including ETDs such as
futures and options, as well as OTC-cleared derivative
contracts. As a clearing member, the Firm stands behind
the performance of its clients, collects cash and
securities collateral (margin) as well as any settlement
amounts due from or to clients, and remits them to the
relevant CCP or client in whole or part. There are two
types of margin: variation margin is posted on a daily
basis based on the value of clients’ derivative contracts
and initial margin is posted at inception of a derivative
contract, generally on the basis of the potential changes
in the variation margin requirement for the contract.
As a clearing member, the Firm is exposed to the risk of
nonperformance by its clients, but is not liable to clients
for the performance of the CCPs. Where possible, the
Firm seeks to mitigate its risk to the client through the
collection of appropriate amounts of margin at inception
and throughout the life of the transactions. The Firm can
also cease providing clearing services if clients do not
adhere to their obligations under the clearing
agreement. In the event of nonperformance by a client,
the Firm would close out the client’s positions and
access available margin. The CCP would utilize any
margin it holds to make itself whole, with any remaining
shortfalls required to be paid by the Firm as a clearing
member.
The Firm reflects its exposure to nonperformance risk of
the client through the recognition of margin receivables
from clients and margin payables to CCPs; the clients’
underlying securities or derivative contracts are not
reflected in the Firm’s Consolidated Financial
Statements.
It is difficult to estimate the Firm’s maximum possible
exposure through its role as a clearing member, as this
would require an assessment of transactions that clients
may execute in the future. However, based upon
historical experience, and the credit risk mitigants
available to the Firm, management believes it is unlikely
that the Firm will have to make any material payments
under these arrangements and the risk of loss is
expected to be remote.
Refer to Note 5 for information on the derivatives that
the Firm executes for its own account and records in its
Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 287
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Exchange & Clearing House Memberships
The Firm is a member of several securities and
derivative exchanges and clearing houses, both in the
U.S. and other countries, and it provides clearing
services to its clients. Membership in some of these
organizations requires the Firm to pay a pro rata share
of the losses incurred by the organization as a result of
the default of another member. Such obligations vary
with different organizations. These obligations may be
limited to the amount (or a multiple of the amount) of the
Firm’s contribution to the guarantee fund maintained by
a clearing house or exchange as part of the resources
available to cover any losses in the event of a member
default. Alternatively, these obligations may also include
a pro rata share of the residual losses after applying the
guarantee fund. Additionally, certain clearing houses
require the Firm as a member to pay a pro rata share of
losses that may result from the clearing house’s
investment of guarantee fund contributions and initial
margin, unrelated to and independent of the default of
another member. Generally a payment would only be
required should such losses exceed the resources of the
clearing house or exchange that are contractually
required to absorb the losses in the first instance. In
certain cases, it is difficult to estimate the Firm’s
maximum possible exposure under these membership
agreements, since this would require an assessment of
future claims that may be made against the Firm that
have not yet occurred. However, based on historical
experience, management expects the risk of loss to the
Firm to be remote. Where the Firm’s maximum possible
exposure can be estimated, the amount is disclosed in
the table on page 284, in the Exchange & clearing
house guarantees and commitments line.
Sponsored member repo program
The Firm acts as a sponsoring member to clear eligible
overnight resale and repurchase agreements through
the Government Securities Division of the Fixed Income
Clearing Corporation (“FICC”) on behalf of clients that
become sponsored members under the FICC’s rules.
The Firm also guarantees to the FICC the prompt and
full payment and performance of its sponsored member
clients’ respective obligations under the FICC’s rules.
The Firm minimizes its liability under these overnight
guarantees by obtaining a security interest in the cash
or high-quality securities collateral that the clients place
with the clearing house; therefore, the Firm expects the
risk of loss to be remote. The Firm’s maximum possible
exposure, without taking into consideration the
associated collateral, is included in the Exchange &
clearing house guarantees and commitments line on
page 284. Refer to Note 11 for additional information on
credit risk mitigation practices on resale agreements and
the types of collateral pledged under repurchase
agreements.
Guarantees of subsidiaries
In the normal course of business, the Parent Company
may provide counterparties with guarantees of certain of
the trading and other obligations of its subsidiaries on a
contract-by-contract basis, as negotiated with the Firm’scounterparties. The obligations of the subsidiaries are
included on the Firm’s Consolidated balance sheets or
are reflected as off-balance sheet commitments;
therefore, the Parent Company has not recognized a
separate liability for these guarantees. The Firm
believes that the occurrence of any event that would
trigger payments by the Parent Company under these
guarantees is remote.
The Parent Company has guaranteed certain long-term
debt and structured notes of its subsidiaries, including
JPMorgan Chase Financial Company LLC (“JPMFC”), a
100%-owned and consolidated finance subsidiary. All
securities issued by JPMFC are fully and unconditionally
guaranteed by the Parent Company and no other
subsidiary of the parent company guarantees these
securities. These guarantees, which rank on a parity
with the Firm’s unsecured and unsubordinated
indebtedness, are not included in the table on page 284
of this Note. Refer to Note 20 for additional information.
288 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 29 – Pledged assets and collateral
Pledged assets
The Firm pledges financial assets that it owns to
maintain potential borrowing capacity at discount
windows with Federal Reserve banks, various other
central banks and FHLBs. Additionally, the Firm pledges
assets for other purposes, including to collateralize
repurchase and other securities financing agreements,
to cover short sales and to collateralize derivative
contracts and deposits. Certain of these pledged assets
may be sold or repledged or otherwise used by the
secured parties and are parenthetically identified on the
Consolidated balance sheets as assets pledged.
The following table presents the Firm’s pledged assets.
December 31, (in billions) 2020 2019
Assets that may be sold or repledged or
otherwise used by secured parties $ 166.6 $ 125.2 
Assets that may not be sold or repledged
or otherwise used by secured parties 113.9 80.2 
Assets pledged at Federal Reserve banks
and FHLBs 455.3 478.9 
Total pledged assets $ 735.8 $ 684.3 
Total pledged assets do not include assets of
consolidated VIEs; these assets are used to settle the
liabilities of those entities. Refer to Note 14 for additional
information on assets and liabilities of consolidated
VIEs. Refer to Note 11 for additional information on the
Firm’s securities financing activities. Refer to Note 20 for
additional information on the Firm’s long-term debt. The
significant components of the Firm’s pledged assets
were as follows.
December 31, (in billions) 2020 2019
Investment securities $ 80.2 $ 35.9 
Loans 420.5 460.4 
Trading assets and other 235.1 188.0 
Total pledged assets $ 735.8 $ 684.3 Collateral
The Firm accepts financial assets as collateral that it is
permitted to sell or repledge, deliver or otherwise use.
This collateral is generally obtained under resale and
other securities financing agreements, prime brokerage-
related held-for-investment customer receivables and
derivative contracts. Collateral is generally used under
repurchase and other securities financing agreements,
to cover short sales, and to collateralize derivative
contracts and deposits.
The following table presents the fair value of collateral
accepted.
December 31, (in billions) 2020 2019
Collateral permitted to be sold or
repledged, delivered, or otherwise
used $1,451.7 $1,282.5 
Collateral sold, repledged, delivered or
otherwise used 1,038.9 1,000.5 
(a)Includes collateral repledged to the Federal Reserve under the
Federal Reserve’s open market operations.(a)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 289
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 30 – Litigation
Contingencies
As of December 31, 2020, the Firm and its subsidiaries
and affiliates are defendants, putative defendants or
respondents in numerous legal proceedings, including
private, civil litigations and regulatory/government
investigations. The litigations range from individual
actions involving a single plaintiff to class action lawsuits
with potentially millions of class members. Investigations
involve both formal and informal proceedings, by both
governmental agencies and self-regulatory
organizations. These legal proceedings are at varying
stages of adjudication, arbitration or investigation, and
involve each of the Firm’s lines of business and several
geographies and a wide variety of claims (including
common law tort and contract claims and statutory
antitrust, securities and consumer protection claims),
some of which present novel legal theories.
The Firm believes the estimate of the aggregate range
of reasonably possible losses, in excess of reserves
established, for its legal proceedings is from $0 to
approximately $1.5 billion at December 31, 2020. This
estimated aggregate range of reasonably possible
losses was based upon information available as of that
date for those proceedings in which the Firm believes
that an estimate of reasonably possible loss can be
made. For certain matters, the Firm does not believe
that such an estimate can be made, as of that date. The
Firm’s estimate of the aggregate range of reasonably
possible losses involves significant judgment, given:
•the number, variety and varying stages of the
proceedings, including the fact that many are in
preliminary stages,
•the existence in many such proceedings of multiple
defendants, including the Firm, whose share of
liability (if any) has yet to be determined,
•the numerous yet-unresolved issues in many of the
proceedings, including issues regarding class
certification and the scope of many of the claims, and
•the attendant uncertainty of the various potential
outcomes of such proceedings, including where the
Firm has made assumptions concerning future
rulings by the court or other adjudicator, or about the
behavior or incentives of adverse parties or
regulatory authorities, and those assumptions prove
to be incorrect.
In addition, the outcome of a particular proceeding may
be a result which the Firm did not take into account in its
estimate because the Firm had deemed the likelihood of
that outcome to be remote. Accordingly, the Firm’s
estimate of the aggregate range of reasonably possible
losses will change from time to time, and actual losses
may vary significantly.Set forth below are descriptions of the Firm’s material
legal proceedings.
Advisory and Other Activities. In November 2020,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. entered into a resolution
with the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency
(“OCC”) regarding historical deficiencies in internal
controls and internal audit for certain fiduciary activities.
In connection with the resolution, JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. paid a $250 million Civil Money Penalty. The
OCC found that JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. has
remediated the deficiencies that led to the penalty.
Amrapali. India’s Enforcement Directorate (“ED”) is
investigating JPMorgan India Private Limited in
connection with investments made in 2010 and 2012 by
two offshore funds formerly managed by JPMorgan
Chase entities into residential housing projects
developed by the Amrapali Group (“Amrapali”). In 2017,
numerous creditors filed civil claims against Amrapali
including petitions brought by home buyers relating to
delays in delivering or failure to deliver residential units.
The home buyers’ petitions have been overseen by the
Supreme Court of India since 2017 pursuant to its
jurisdiction over public interest litigation. In July 2019,
the Supreme Court of India issued an order making
preliminary findings that Amrapali and other parties,
including unspecified JPMorgan Chase entities and the
offshore funds that had invested in the projects, violated
certain currency control and money laundering
provisions, and ordering the ED to conduct a further
inquiry under India’s Prevention of Money Laundering
Act (“PMLA”) and Foreign Exchange Management Act
(“FEMA”). In May 2020, the Enforcement Directorate
issued a provisional attachment order as part of the
criminal PMLA proceedings freezing approximately
$25 million held by JPMorgan India Private Limited. In
June 2020, the funds were transferred to an account
held by the Supreme Court of India. A separate civil
proceeding relating to alleged FEMA violations is
ongoing. The Firm is responding to and cooperating with
the investigation.    
Federal Republic of Nigeria Litigation. JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. operated an escrow and depository account
for the Federal Government of Nigeria (“FGN”) and two
major international oil companies. The account held
approximately $1.1 billion in connection with a dispute
among the clients over rights to an oil field. Following
the settlement of the dispute, JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A. paid out the monies in the account in 2011 and
2013 in accordance with directions received from its
clients. In November 2017, the Federal Republic of
Nigeria (“FRN”) commenced a claim in the English High
Court for approximately $875 million in payments made
out of the accounts. The FRN, claiming to be the same
entity as the FGN, alleges that the payments were
instructed as part of a complex fraud not involving
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., but that JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. was or should have been on
290 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
notice that the payments may be fraudulent. JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A. applied for summary judgment and
was unsuccessful. The claim is ongoing and a trial has
been scheduled to commence in February 2022.
Foreign Exchange Investigations and Litigation. The
Firm previously reported settlements with certain
government authorities relating to its foreign exchange
(“FX”) sales and trading activities and controls related to
those activities. Among those resolutions, in May 2015,
the Firm pleaded guilty to a single violation of federal
antitrust law. In January 2017, the Firm was sentenced,
with judgment entered thereafter and a term of probation
ending in January 2020. The term of probation has
concluded, with the Firm remaining in good standing
throughout the probation period. The Department of
Labor granted the Firm a five-year exemption of
disqualification that allows the Firm and its affiliates to
continue to rely on the Qualified Professional Asset
Manager exemption under the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act (“ERISA”) until January 2023. The
Firm will need to reapply in due course for a further
exemption to cover the remainder of the ten-year
disqualification period. A South Africa Competition
Commission matter is the remaining FX-related
governmental inquiry, and is currently pending before
the South Africa Competition Tribunal.
In August 2018, the United States District Court for the
Southern District of New York granted final approval to
the Firm’s settlement of a consolidated class action
brought by U.S.-based plaintiffs, which principally
alleged violations of federal antitrust laws based on an
alleged conspiracy to manipulate foreign exchange rates
and also sought damages on behalf of persons who
transacted in FX futures and options on futures. Certain
members of the settlement class filed requests to the
Court to be excluded from the class, and certain of them
filed a complaint against the Firm and a number of other
foreign exchange dealers in November 2018. A number
of these actions remain pending. Further, putative class
actions have been filed against the Firm and a number
of other foreign exchange dealers on behalf of certain
consumers who purchased foreign currencies at
allegedly inflated rates and purported indirect
purchasers of FX instruments; these actions also remain
pending in the District Court. In 2020, the Court
approved a settlement by the Firm and 11 other
defendants of a class action filed by purported indirect
purchasers for a total of $10 million. In addition, some
FX-related individual and putative class actions based
on similar alleged underlying conduct have been filed
outside the U.S., including in the U.K., Israel and
Australia.
Interchange Litigation. Groups of merchants and retail
associations filed a series of class action complaints
alleging that Visa and Mastercard, as well as certain
banks, conspired to set the price of credit and debit card
interchange fees and enacted related rules in violation
of antitrust laws. In 2012, the parties initially settled the
cases for a cash payment, a temporary reduction of
credit card interchange, and modifications to certain
credit cardnetwork rules. In 2017, after the approval of that
settlement was reversed on appeal, the case was
remanded to the United States District Court for the
Eastern District of New York for further proceedings
consistent with the appellate decision.
The original class action was divided into two separate
actions, one seeking primarily monetary relief and the
other seeking primarily injunctive relief. In September
2018, the parties to the class action seeking monetary
relief finalized an agreement which amends and
supersedes the prior settlement agreement. Pursuant to
this settlement, the defendants collectively contributed
an additional $900 million to the approximately $5.3
billion previously held in escrow from the original
settlement. In December 2019, the amended agreement
was approved by the District Court. Certain merchants
appealed the District Court’s approval order, and those
appeals are pending. Based on the percentage of
merchants that opted out of the amended class
settlement, $700 million has been returned to the
defendants from the settlement escrow in accordance
with the settlement agreement. The class action seeking
primarily injunctive relief continues separately.
In addition, certain merchants have filed individual
actions raising similar allegations against Visa and
Mastercard, as well as against the Firm and other
banks, and some of those actions remain pending.
LIBOR and Other Benchmark Rate Investigations and
Litigation. JPMorgan Chase has responded to inquiries
from various governmental agencies and entities around
the world relating primarily to the British Bankers
Association’s London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”)
for various currencies and the European Banking
Federation’s Euro Interbank Offered Rate (“EURIBOR”).
The Swiss Competition Commission’s investigation
relating to EURIBOR, to which the Firm and other banks
are subject, continues. In December 2016, the
European Commission issued a decision against the
Firm and other banks finding an infringement of
European antitrust rules relating to EURIBOR. The Firm
has filed an appeal of that decision with the European
General Court, and that appeal is pending.
In addition, the Firm has been named as a defendant
along with other banks in a series of individual and
putative class actions related to benchmarks, including
U.S. dollar LIBOR during the period that it was
administered by the BBA and, in a separate
consolidated putative class action, during the period that
it was administered by ICE Benchmark Administration.
These actions have been filed, or consolidated for pre-
trial purposes, in the United States District Court for the
Southern District of New York. In these actions, plaintiffs
make varying allegations that in various periods, starting
in 2000 or later, defendants either individually or
collectively manipulated various benchmark rates by
submitting rates that were artificially low or high.
Plaintiffs allege that they transacted in loans, derivatives
or other financial instruments whose values are affected
by
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 291
Notes to consolidated financial statements
changes in these rates and assert a variety of claims
including antitrust claims seeking treble damages.
In actions related to U.S. dollar LIBOR during the period
that it was administered by the BBA, the Firm has
resolved certain of these actions, and others are in
various stages of litigation. The District Court dismissed
certain claims, including antitrust claims brought by
some plaintiffs whom the District Court found did not
have standing to assert such claims, and permitted
certain claims to proceed, including antitrust,
Commodity Exchange Act, Section 10(b) of the
Securities Exchange Act and common law claims. The
plaintiffs whose antitrust claims were dismissed for lack
of standing have filed an appeal. The District Court
granted class certification of antitrust claims related to
bonds and interest rate swaps sold directly by the
defendants and denied class certification motions filed
by other plaintiffs. In the consolidated putative class
action related to the time period that U.S. dollar LIBOR
was administered by ICE Benchmark Administration, the
District Court granted defendants’ motion to dismiss
plaintiffs’ complaint, and the plaintiffs have appealed.
The Firm’s settlements of putative class actions related
to Swiss franc LIBOR, the Singapore Interbank Offered
Rate and the Singapore Swap Offer Rate (“SIBOR”),
and the Australian Bank Bill Swap Reference Rate, and
one of the putative class actions related to U.S. dollar
LIBOR remain subject to court approval. In the class
actions related to SIBOR and Swiss franc LIBOR, the
District Court concluded that the Court lacked subject
matter jurisdiction, and plaintiffs’ appeals of those
decisions are pending.
In addition to the actions pending or consolidated in the
Southern District of New York, in August 2020, a group
of individual plaintiffs filed a lawsuit asserting antitrust
claims in the United States District Court for the
Northern District of California, alleging that the Firm and
other defendants were engaged in an unlawful
agreement to set LIBOR and conspired to monopolize
the market for LIBOR-based consumer loans and credit
cards. The complaint seeks injunctive relief and
monetary damages.
Metals and U.S. Treasuries Investigations and Litigation
and Related Inquiries. The Firm previously reported that
it and/or certain of its subsidiaries had entered into
resolutions with the U.S. Department of Justice (“DOJ”),
the U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission
(“CFTC”) and the U.S. Securities and Exchange
Commission (“SEC”), which, collectively, resolved those
agencies’ respective investigations relating to historical
trading practices by former employees in the precious
metals and U.S. treasuries markets and related conduct
from 2008 to 2016.
The Firm entered into a Deferred Prosecution
Agreement (“DPA”) with the DOJ in which it agreed to
the filing of a criminal information charging JPMorgan
Chase & Co. with two counts of wire fraud and agreed,
along with JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and J.P.
Morgan Securities LLC, to certain terms and obligations
as set forth therein. Under the termsof the DPA, the criminal information will be dismissed
after three years, provided that JPMorgan Chase & Co.,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and J.P. Morgan Securities
LLC fully comply with all of their obligations.
Across the three resolutions with the DOJ, CFTC and
SEC, JPMorgan Chase & Co., JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A. and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC agreed to pay a
total monetary amount of approximately $920 million. A
portion of the total monetary amount includes victim
compensation payments.
Several putative class action complaints have been filed
in the United States District Court for the Southern
District of New York against the Firm and certain former
employees, alleging a precious metals futures and
options price manipulation scheme in violation of the
Commodity Exchange Act. Some of the complaints also
allege unjust enrichment and deceptive acts or practices
under the General Business Law of the State of New
York. The Court consolidated these putative class
actions in February 2019, and the consolidated action is
stayed through May 2021. In addition, several putative
class actions have been filed in the United States
District Courts for the Northern District of Illinois and
Southern District of New York against the Firm, alleging
manipulation of U.S. Treasury futures and options, and
bringing claims under the Commodity Exchange Act.
Some of the complaints also allege unjust enrichment.
The actions in the Northern District of Illinois have been
transferred to the Southern District of New York. The
Court consolidated these putative class actions in
October 2020 and set a deadline of February 2021 for
the filing of a consolidated complaint. Two putative class
action complaints have also been filed under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934 in the United States
District Court for the Eastern District of New York
against the Firm and certain individual defendants on
behalf of shareholders who acquired shares during the
putative class period alleging that certain SEC filings of
the Firm were materially false or misleading in that they
did not disclose certain information relating to the
above-referenced investigations. Plaintiffs have filed a
stipulation seeking consolidation of the actions and the
appointment of co-lead plaintiffs and counsel, which is
pending Court approval.
Wendel. Since 2012, the French criminal authorities
have been investigating a series of transactions entered
into by senior managers of Wendel Investissement
(“Wendel”) during the period from 2004 through 2007 to
restructure their shareholdings in Wendel. JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A., Paris branch provided financing for
the transactions to a number of managers of Wendel in
2007. JPMorgan Chase has cooperated with the
investigation. The investigating judges issued an
ordonnance de renvoi in November 2016, referring
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. to the French tribunal
correctionnel for alleged complicity in tax fraud. In
January 2018, the Paris Court of Appeal issued a
decision cancelling the mise en examen of JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A. The Court of Cassation, France’s
highest court, ruled in September 2018 that a mise en
examen is a prerequisite for an
292 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
ordonnance de renvoi and in January 2020 ordered the
annulment of the ordonnance de renvoi referring
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. to the French tribunal
correctionnel. The Court of Appeal found in January
2021 that it had no power to take further action against
JPMorgan Chase following the Court of Cassation’s
ruling. At the opening of a trial of the managers of
Wendel in January 2021, the tribunal correctionnel
directed the criminal authorities to clarify whether a
further investigation should be opened against
JPMorgan Chase, pending which the trial was
postponed. In addition, a number of the managers have
commenced civil proceedings against JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A. The claims are separate, involve different
allegations and are at various stages of proceedings.
* * *
In addition to the various legal proceedings discussed
above, JPMorgan Chase and its subsidiaries are named
as defendants or are otherwise involved in a substantial
number of other legal proceedings. The Firm believes it
has meritorious defenses to the claims asserted against
it in its currently outstanding legal proceedings and it
intends to defend itself vigorously. Additional legal
proceedings may be initiated from time to time in the
future.
The Firm has established reserves for several hundred
of its currently outstanding legal proceedings. In
accordance with the provisions of U.S. GAAP for
contingencies, the Firm accrues for a litigation-related
liability when it is probable that such a liability has been
incurred and the amount of the loss can be reasonably
estimated. The Firm evaluates its outstanding legal
proceedings each quarter to assess its litigation
reserves, and makes adjustments in such reserves,
upward or downward, as appropriate, based on
management’s best judgment after consultation with
counsel. The Firm’s legal expense was $1.1 billion,
$239 million and $72 million for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. There
is no assurance that the Firm’s litigation reserves will not
need to be adjusted in the future.
In view of the inherent difficulty of predicting the
outcome of legal proceedings, particularly where the
claimants seek very large or indeterminate damages, or
where the matters present novel legal theories, involve a
large number of parties or are in early stages of
discovery, the Firm cannot state with confidence what
will be the eventual outcomes of the currently pending
matters, the timing of their ultimate resolution or the
eventual losses, fines, penalties or consequences
related to those matters. JPMorgan Chase believes,
based upon its current knowledge and after consultation
with counsel, consideration of the material legal
proceedings described above and after taking into
account its current litigation reserves and its estimated
aggregate range of possible losses, that the other legal
proceedings currently pending against it should not have
a material adverse effect on the Firm’s consolidated
financial condition. The Firm notes, however, that in light
of the uncertainties involved in such proceedings, there
is no assurance that the ultimate resolution of these
matters willnot significantly exceed the reserves it has currently
accrued or that a matter will not have material
reputational consequences. As a result, the outcome of
a particular matter may be material to JPMorgan
Chase’s operating results for a particular period,
depending on, among other factors, the size of the loss
or liability imposed and the level of JPMorgan Chase’s
income for that period.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 293
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 31 – International operations
The following table presents income statement and
balance sheet-related information for JPMorgan Chase
by major international geographic area. The Firm
defines international activities for purposes of this
footnote presentation as business transactions that
involve clients residing outside of the U.S., and the
information presented below is based predominantly on
the domicile of the client, the location from which the
client relationship is managed, booking location or the
location of the trading desk. However, many of the
Firm’s U.S. operations serve international businesses.As the Firm’s operations are highly integrated, estimates
and subjective assumptions have been made to
apportion revenue and expense between U.S. and
international operations. These estimates and
assumptions are consistent with the allocations used for
the Firm’s segment reporting as set forth in Note 32.
The Firm’s long-lived assets for the periods presented
are not considered by management to be significant in
relation to total assets. The majority of the Firm’s long-
lived assets are located in the U.S.
As of or for the year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) Revenue ExpenseIncome before
income tax 
 expense Net income Total assets
2020
Europe/Middle East/Africa $ 16,566 $ 10,987 $ 5,579 $ 3,868 $ 530,687 
Asia-Pacific 9,289 5,558 3,731 2,630 252,553 
Latin America/Caribbean 2,740 1,590 1,150 837 61,980 
Total international 28,595 18,135 10,460 7,335 845,220 
North America 90,948 66,001 24,947 21,796 2,540,851 
Total $ 119,543 $ 84,136 $ 35,407 $ 29,131 $3,386,071 
2019
Europe/Middle East/Africa $ 15,887 $ 9,860 $ 6,027 $ 4,158 $ 391,369 
Asia-Pacific 7,254 5,060 2,194 1,467 183,023 
Latin America/Caribbean 2,405 1,561 844 609 47,820 
Total international 25,546 16,481 9,065 6,234 622,212 
North America 89,853 54,373 35,480 30,197 2,065,167 
Total $ 115,399 $ 70,854 $ 44,545 $ 36,431 $2,687,379 
2018
Europe/Middle East/Africa $ 16,459 $ 10,032 $ 6,427 $ 4,569 $ 424,935 
Asia-Pacific 6,991 4,884 2,107 1,481 171,547 
Latin America/Caribbean 2,365 1,301 1,064 744 43,871 
Total international 25,815 16,217 9,598 6,794 640,353 
North America 82,968 51,802 31,166 25,680 1,982,179 
Total $ 108,783 $ 68,019 $ 40,764 $ 32,474 $2,622,532 
(a)Substantially reflects the U.S.
(b)Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(c)Revenue is composed of net interest income and noninterest revenue.
(d)Expense is composed of noninterest expense and the provision for credit losses.
(e)Total assets for the U.K. were approximately $353 billion, $309 billion and $299 billion at December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.(c) (d)
(e)
(a)
(b)
(e)
(a)
(b)
(e)
(a)
294 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Note 32 – Business segments
The Firm is managed on an LOB basis. There are four
major reportable business segments – Consumer &
Community Banking, Corporate & Investment Bank,
Commercial Banking and Asset & Wealth Management.
In addition, there is a Corporate segment.The business
segments are determined based on the products and
services provided, or the type of customer served, and
they reflect the manner in which financial information is
currently evaluated by the Firm’s Operating Committee.
Segment results are presented on a managed basis.
Refer to Segment results of this footnote for a further
discussion of JPMorgan Chase’s business segments.
The following is a description of each of the Firm’s
business segments, and the products and services they
provide to their respective client bases.
Consumer & Community Banking
Consumer & Community Banking offers services to
consumers and businesses through bank branches,
ATMs, digital (including mobile and online) and
telephone banking. CCB is organized into Consumer &
Business Banking (including Consumer Banking, J.P.
Morgan Wealth Management and Business Banking),
Home Lending (including Home Lending Production,
Home Lending Servicing and Real Estate Portfolios) and
Card & Auto. Consumer & Business Banking offers
deposit and investment products, payments and
services to consumers, and lending, deposit, and cash
management and payment solutions to small
businesses. Home Lending includes mortgage
origination and servicing activities, as well as portfolios
consisting of residential mortgages and home equity
loans. Card & Auto issues credit cards to consumers
and small businesses and originates and services auto
loans and leases.
Corporate & Investment Bank
The Corporate & Investment Bank, which consists of
Banking and Markets & Securities Services, offers a
broad suite of investment banking, market-making,
prime brokerage, and treasury and securities products
and services to a global client base of corporations,
investors, financial institutions, merchants, government
and municipal entities. Banking offers a full range of
investment banking products and services in all major
capital markets, including advising on corporate strategy
and structure, capital-raising in equity and debt markets,
as well as loan origination and syndication. Banking also
includes Wholesale Payments, which provides
payments services enabling clients to manage
payments and receipts globally, and cross-border
financing. Markets & Securities Services includes
Markets, a global market-maker across products,
including cash and derivative instruments, which also
offers sophisticated risk management solutions, prime
brokerage, andresearch. Markets & Securities Services also includes
Securities Services, a leading global custodian which
provides custody, fund accounting and administration,
and securities lending products principally for asset
managers, insurance companies and public and private
investment funds.
Commercial Banking
Commercial Banking provides comprehensive financial
solutions, including lending, wholesale payments,
investment banking and asset management products
across three primary client segments: Middle Market
Banking, Corporate Client Banking and Commercial
Real Estate Banking. Other includes amounts not
aligned with a primary client segment.
Middle Market Banking covers small and midsized
companies, local governments and nonprofit clients.
Corporate Client Banking covers large corporations.
Commercial Real Estate Banking covers investors,
developers, and owners of multifamily, office, retail,
industrial and affordable housing properties.
Asset & Wealth Management
Asset & Wealth Management, with client assets of $3.7
trillion, is a global leader in investment and wealth
management.
Asset Management
Offers multi-asset investment management solutions
across equities, fixed income, alternatives and money
market funds to institutional and retail investors
providing for a broad range of clients’ investment needs.
Wealth Management
Provides retirement products and services, brokerage,
custody, trusts and estates, loans, mortgages, deposits
and investment management to high net worth clients.
The majority of AWM’s client assets are in actively
managed portfolios.
Corporate
The Corporate segment consists of Treasury and Chief
Investment Office and Other Corporate, which includes
corporate staff functions and expense that is centrally
managed. Treasury and CIO is predominantly
responsible for measuring, monitoring, reporting and
managing the Firm’s liquidity, funding, capital, structural
interest rate and foreign exchange risks. The major
Other Corporate functions include Real Estate,
Technology, Legal, Corporate Finance, Human
Resources, Internal Audit, Risk Management,
Compliance, Control Management, Corporate
Responsibility and various Other Corporate groups.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 295
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Segment results
The following table provides a summary of the Firm’s
segment results as of or for the years ended December
31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, on a managed basis. The
Firm’s definition of managed basis starts with the
reported U.S. GAAP results and includes certain
reclassifications to present total net revenue for the Firm
(and each of the reportable business segments) on an
FTE basis. Accordingly, revenue from investments that
receive tax credits and tax-exempt securities is
presented in the managed results on a basis
comparable to taxable investments and securities. This
allows management to assess the comparability of
revenue from year-to-year arising from both taxable and
tax-exempt sources. The corresponding income tax
impact related to tax-exempt items is recorded within
income tax expense/(benefit). These adjustments have
no impact on net income as reported by the Firm as a
whole or by the LOBs.
Business segment capital allocation
Each business segment is allocated capital by taking
into consideration a variety of factors including capital
levels of similarly rated peers and applicable regulatory
capital requirements. ROE is measured and internal
targets for expected returns are established as key
measures of a business segment’s performance.
The Firm’s allocation methodology incorporates Basel III
Standardized RWA, Basel III Advanced RWA, the GSIB
surcharge, and a simulation of capital in a severe stress
environment. The assumptions and methodologies used
to allocate capital are periodically assessed and as a
result, the capital allocated to the LOBs may change
from time to time. Business segment changes
In the fourth quarter of 2020, the Firm transferred certain
assets, liabilities, revenue, expense and headcount
associated with certain wealth management clients from
AWM to the J.P. Morgan Wealth Management business
unit within CCB. Prior-period amounts have been revised
to conform with the current presentation, including the
transfer of approximately 1,650 technology and support
staff during the second and third quarters of 2020. Ultra-
high-net-worth and certain high-net-worth client
relationships remained in AWM.
In the first quarter of 2020, the Firm began reporting a
Wholesale Payments business unit within CIB following a
realignment of the Firm’s wholesale payments
businesses. The Wholesale Payments business
comprises:
•Merchant Services, which was realigned from CCB to
CIB
•Treasury Services and Trade Finance in CIB. Trade
Finance was previously reported in Lending in CIB.
In connection with the alignment of Wholesale Payments,
the assets, liabilities and headcount associated with the
Merchant Services business were realigned to CIB from
CCB, and the revenue and expenses of the Merchant
Services business are reported across CCB, CIB and CB
based primarily on client relationships. In the fourth
quarter of 2020, payment processing-only clients along
with the associated revenue and expenses were realigned
to CIB’s Wholesale Payments business from CCB and
CB. Payment processing-only clients are those that only
use payment services offered by Merchant Services, and
in general do not currently utilize other services offered by
the Firm. Prior-period amounts have been revised to
reflect this realignment and revised allocation
methodology.
Segment results and reconciliation
(Table continued on next page)
As of or for the year
ended 
 December 31, 
 (in millions, except
ratios)Consumer & Community
Banking Corporate & Investment Bank Commercial Banking Asset & Wealth Management
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Noninterest revenue $17,740  $17,796  $15,338  $35,120  $30,060  $27,854  $3,067  $2,710  $2,620  $10,822  $10,236  $10,052  
Net interest income 33,528  37,337  35,933  14,164  9,205  9,528  6,246  6,554  6,716  3,418  3,355  3,375  
Total net revenue 51,268  55,133  51,271  49,284  39,265  37,382  9,313  9,264  9,336  14,240  13,591  13,427  
Provision for credit
losses 12,312  4,954  4,754  2,726  277 (60) 2,113  296 129 263 59 52 
Noninterest expense 27,990  28,276  27,168  23,538  22,444  21,876  3,798  3,735  3,627  9,957  9,747  9,575  
Income/(loss) before
income tax
expense/(benefit) 10,966  21,903  19,349  23,020  16,544  15,566  3,402  5,233  5,580  4,020  3,785  3,800  
Income tax
expense/(benefit) 2,749  5,362  4,642  5,926  4,590  3,767  824 1,275  1,316  1,028  918 855 
Net income/(loss) $8,217  $16,541  $14,707  $17,094  $11,954  $11,799  $2,578  $3,958  $4,264  $2,992  $2,867  $2,945  
Average equity $52,000  $52,000  $51,000  $80,000  $80,000  $70,000  $22,000  $22,000  $20,000  $10,500  $10,500  $9,000  
Total assets 496,705  541,367  560,177  1,097,219  914,705  909,292  228,932  220,514  220,229  203,384  173,175  161,047  
Return on equity 15 % 31 % 28 % 20 % 14 % 16 % 11 % 17 % 20 % 28 % 26 % 32 %
Overhead ratio 55 51 53 48 57 59 41 40 39 70 72 71 (a)
(b)
296 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
(Table continued from previous page)
As of or for the year ended 
 December 31, 
 (in millions, except ratios)Corporate Reconciling Items Total
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Noninterest revenue $ 1,199  $ (114)$ (263)$ (2,968 )$ (2,534 )$ (1,877 ) $ 64,980  $ 58,154  $ 53,724  
Net interest income (2,375 ) 1,325  135 (418) (531) (628) 54,563  57,245  55,059  
Total net revenue (1,176 ) 1,211  (128) (3,386 ) (3,065 ) (2,505 ) 119,543  115,399  108,783  
Provision for credit losses 66 (1) (4) — — — 17,480  5,585  4,871  
Noninterest expense 1,373  1,067  902 — — — 66,656  65,269  63,148  
Income/(loss) before income
tax expense/(benefit) (2,615 ) 145 (1,026 ) (3,386 ) (3,065 ) (2,505 ) 35,407  44,545  40,764  
Income tax expense/(benefit) (865) (966) 215 (3,386 ) (3,065 ) (2,505 ) 6,276  8,114  8,290  
Net income/(loss) $ (1,750 )$ 1,111  $ (1,241 )$ — $ — $ — $ 29,131  $ 36,431  $ 32,474  
Average equity $ 72,365  $ 68,407  $ 79,222  $ — $ — $ — $ 236,865  $ 232,907  $ 229,222  
Total assets 1,359,831  837,618  771,787  NA NA NA 3,386,071  2,687,379  2,622,532  
Return on equity NM NM NM NM NM NM 12 % 15 % 13 %
Overhead ratio NM NM NM NM NM NM 56 57 58 
(a)Segment results on a managed basis reflect revenue on a FTE basis with the corresponding income tax impact recorded within income tax
expense/(benefit). These adjustments are eliminated in reconciling items to arrive at the Firm’s reported U.S. GAAP results.
(b)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a reduction of
card income, with no effect on net income. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.(a) (b)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 297
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 33 – Parent Company
The following tables present Parent Company-only financial
statements.
Statements of income and comprehensive income
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Income
Dividends from subsidiaries
and af filiates:
Bank and bank holding
company $ 6,000  $26,000  $32,501  
Non-bank — — 2 
Interest income from
subsidiaries 63 223 216 
Other income from
subsidiaries:
Bank and bank holding
company 2,019  2,738  515 
Non-bank (569) 197 (444)
Other income 205 (1,731 ) 888 
Total income 7,718  27,427  33,678  
Expense
Interest expense/(income) to
subsidiaries and af filiates (8,830 ) (5,303 ) 2,291  
Other interest expense 14,150  13,246  4,581  
Noninterest expense 2,222  1,992  1,793  
Total expense 7,542  9,935  8,665  
Income before income tax
benefit and undistributed net
income of subsidiaries 176 17,492  25,013  
Income tax benefit 1,324  2,033  1,838  
Equity in undistributed net
income of subsidiaries 27,631  16,906  5,623  
Net income $29,131  $36,431  $32,474  
Other comprehensive income,
net 6,417  3,076  (1,476 )
Comprehensive income $35,548  $39,507  $30,998  
Balance sheets
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019
Assets
Cash and due from banks $ 54 $ 32 
Deposits with banking subsidiaries 6,811  5,309  
Trading assets 1,775  3,011  
Advances to, and receivables from,
subsidiaries:
Bank and bank holding company 27 2,358  
Non-bank 86 84 
Investments (at equity) in subsidiaries and
affiliates:
Bank and bank holding company 508,602  471,207  
Non-bank 1,011  1,044  
Other assets 10,058  10,699  
Total assets $528,424  $493,744  
Liabilities and stockholders’ equity
Borrowings from, and payables to,
subsidiaries and af filiates $ 25,150  $ 23,410  
Short-term borrowings 924 2,616  
Other liabilities 9,612  9,288  
Long-term debt 213,384  197,100  
Total liabilities 249,070  232,414  
Total stockholders’ equity 279,354  261,330  
Total liabilities and stockholders’ equity $528,424  $493,744  Statements of cash flows
Year ended December 31, 
 (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Operating activities
Net income $29,131  $36,431  $32,474  
Less: Net income of
subsidiaries and af filiates 33,631  42,906  38,125  
Parent company net loss (4,500 ) (6,475 ) (5,651 )
Cash dividends from
subsidiaries and af filiates 6,000  26,000  32,501  
Other operating adjustments 15,357  9,862  (4,400 )
Net cash provided by/(used
in) operating activities 16,857  29,387  22,450  
Investing activities
Net change in:
Advances to and investments
in subsidiaries and af filiates,
net (2,663 ) (6) 8,036  
All other investing activities,
net 24 71 63 
Net cash provided by/(used
in) investing activities (2,639 ) 65 8,099  
Financing activities
Net change in:
Borrowings from
subsidiaries and
affiliates 1,425  2,941  (2,273 )
Short-term borrowings (20) (56) (678)
Proceeds from long-term
borrowings 37,312  25,569  25,845  
Payments of long-term
borrowings (34,194 ) (21,226 ) (21,956 )
Proceeds from issuance of
preferred stock 4,500  5,000  1,696  
Redemption of preferred
stock (1,430 ) (4,075 ) (1,696 )
Treasury stock repurchased (6,517 ) (24,001 ) (19,983 )
Dividends paid (12,690 ) (12,343 ) (10,109 )
All other financing activities,
net (1,080 ) (1,290 ) (1,526 )
Net cash used in financing
activities (12,694 ) (29,481 ) (30,680 )
Net decrease in cash and due
from banks and deposits
with banking subsidiaries 1,524  (29) (131)
Cash and due from banks
and deposits with banking
subsidiaries at the beginning
of the year 5,341  5,370  5,501  
Cash and due from banks
and deposits with banking
subsidiaries at the end of
the year $ 6,865  $ 5,341  $ 5,370  
Cash interest paid $ 5,445  $ 7,957  $ 6,911  
Cash income taxes paid,
net 5,366  3,910  1,782  
(a)Affiliates include trusts that issued guaranteed capital debt
securities (“issuer trusts”).
(b)At December 31, 2020, long-term debt that contractually matures
in 2021 through 2025 totaled $10.8 billion, $10.0 billion, $19.1
billion, $21.8 billion, and $13.5 billion, respectively.
(c)Refer to Notes 20 and 28 for information regarding the Parent
Company’s guarantees of its subsidiaries’ obligations.
(d)Represents payments, net of refunds, made by the Parent
Company to various taxing authorities and includes taxes paid on
behalf of certain of its subsidiaries that are subsequently
reimbursed. The reimbursements were $8.3 billion, $6.4 billion,
and $1.2 billion for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019,
and 2018, respectively.
(e)As a result of the merger of Chase Bank USA, N.A. with and into
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
distributed $13.5 billion to the Parent company as a return of
capital, which the Parent company contributed to the IHC.
 (a)
(a)
(a)
(b)(c)
(c)(a)
(a)
(e)
(a)
(d)
298 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Supplementary information
Selected quarterly financial data (unaudited)
As of or for the period ended 2020 2019
(in millions, except per share, ratio,
headcount data and where otherwise
noted) 4th quarter 3rd quarter 2nd quarter 1st quarter 4th quarter 3rd quarter 2nd quarter 1st quarter
Selected income statement data
Total net revenue $ 29,224 $ 29,147 $ 32,980 $ 28,192 $ 28,285 $ 29,291 $ 28,747 $ 29,076 
Total noninterest expense 16,048 16,875 16,942 16,791 16,293 16,372 16,256 16,348 
Pre-provision profit 13,176 12,272 16,038 11,401 11,992 12,919 12,491 12,728 
Provision for credit losses (1,889) 611 10,473 8,285 1,427 1,514 1,149 1,495 
Income before income tax expense 15,065 11,661 5,565 3,116 10,565 11,405 11,342 11,233 
Income tax expense 2,929 2,218 878 251 2,045 2,325 1,690 2,054 
Net income $ 12,136 $ 9,443 $ 4,687 $ 2,865 $ 8,520 $ 9,080 $ 9,652 $ 9,179 
Earnings per share data
Net income: Basic $ 3.80 $ 2.93 $ 1.39 $ 0.79 $ 2.58 $ 2.69 $ 2.83 $ 2.65 
  Diluted 3.79 2.92 1.38 0.78 2.57 2.68 2.82 2.65 
Average shares: Basic 3,079.7 3,077.8 3,076.3 3,095.8 3,140.7 3,198.5 3,250.6 3,298.0 
Diluted 3,085.1 3,082.8 3,081.0 3,100.7 3,148.5 3,207.2 3,259.7 3,308.2 
Market and per common share data
Market capitalization $ 387,492 $ 293,451 $ 286,658 $ 274,323 $ 429,913 $ 369,133 $ 357,479 $ 328,387 
Common shares at period-end 3,049.4 3,048.2 3,047.6 3,047.0 3,084.0 3,136.5 3,197.5 3,244.0 
Book value per share 81.75 79.08 76.91 75.88 75.98 75.24 73.88 71.78 
TBVPS 66.11 63.93 61.76 60.71 60.98 60.48 59.52 57.62 
Cash dividends declared per share 0.90 0.90 0.90 0.90 0.90 0.90 0.80 0.80 
Selected ratios and metrics
ROE 19 % 15 % 7 % 4 % 14 % 15 % 16 % 16 %
ROTCE 24 19 9 5 17 18 20 19 
ROA 1.42 1.14 0.58 0.40 1.22 1.30 1.41 1.39 
Overhead ratio 55 58 51 60 58 56 57 56 
Loans-to-deposits ratio 47 49 52 57 64 64 65 66 
Firm LCR (average) 110 114 117 114 116 115 113 111 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. LCR
(average) 160 157 140 117 116 112 112 109 
CET1 capital ratio 13.1 13.1 12.4 11.5 12.4 12.3 12.2 12.1 
Tier 1 capital ratio 15.0 15.0 14.3 13.3 14.1 14.1 14.0 13.8 
Total capital ratio 17.3 17.3 16.7 15.5 16.0 15.9 15.8 15.7 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 7.0 7.0 6.9 7.5 7.9 7.9 8.0 8.1 
SLR 6.9 7.0 6.8 6.0 6.3 6.3 6.4 6.4 
Selected balance sheet data (period-end)
Trading assets $ 503,126 $ 505,822 $ 491,716 $ 510,923 $ 369,687 $ 457,274 $ 485,567 $ 495,021 
Investment Securities 589,999 531,136 558,791 471,144 398,239 394,251 307,264 267,365 
Loans 1,012,853 989,740 1,009,382 1,049,610 997,620 980,019 990,775 990,515 
Total assets 3,386,071 3,246,076 3,213,616 3,139,431 2,687,379 2,764,661 2,727,379 2,737,188 
Deposits 2,144,257 2,001,416 1,931,029 1,836,009 1,562,431 1,525,261 1,524,361 1,493,441 
Long-term debt 281,685 279,175 317,003 299,344 291,498 296,472 288,869 290,893 
Common stockholders’ equity 249,291 241,050 234,403 231,199 234,337 235,985 236,222 232,844 
Total stockholders’ equity 279,354 271,113 264,466 261,262 261,330 264,348 263,215 259,837 
Headcount 255,351 256,358 256,710 256,720 256,981 257,444 254,983 255,998 
Credit quality metrics
Allowance for loan losses and lending-
related commitments $ 30,737 $ 33,637 $ 34,301 $ 25,391 $ 14,314 $ 14,400 $ 14,295 $ 14,591 
Allowance for loan losses to total
retained loans 2.95 % 3.26 % 3.27 % 2.32 % 1.39 % 1.42 % 1.39 % 1.43 %
Nonperforming assets $ 10,906 $ 11,462 $ 9,715 $ 7,062 $ 5,054 $ 5,993 $ 5,260 $ 5,616 
Net charge-offs 1,050 1,180 1,560 1,469 1,494 1,371 1,403 1,361 
Net charge-off rate 0.44 % 0.49 % 0.64 % 0.62 % 0.63 % 0.58 % 0.60 % 0.58 %
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the Financial Instruments – Credit Losses (“CECL”) accounting guidance. Refer to Note 1 for further
information.
(a)In the second quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain spend-based credit card reward costs from marketing expense to be a reduction of
card income, with no effect on net income. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)Pre-provision profit, TBVPS and ROTCE are each non-GAAP financial measures. Tangible common equity (“TCE”) is also a non-GAAP financial
measure. Refer to Explanation and Reconciliation of the Firm’s Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures on pages 62–64 for a further discussion of
these measures.
(c)Quarterly ratios are based on annualized amounts.
(d)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other
assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(e)The capital metrics reflect the relief provided by the Federal Reserve Board in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, including the CECL capital
transition provisions that became effective in the first quarter of 2020. The SLR reflects the temporary exclusions of U.S. Treasury securities and
deposits at Federal Reserve Banks that became effective in the second quarter of 2020. Refer to Regulatory Developments Relating to the
COVID-19 Pandemic on pages 52-53 and Capital Risk Management on pages 91-101 for additional information.(a)
(a)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(b)(c)
(b)
(d)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(d)
(d)
(d)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 299
Distribution of assets, liabilities and stockholders’ equity; interest rates and interest
differentials
Consolidated average balance sheets, interest and
rates
Provided below is a summary of JPMorgan Chase’s
consolidated average balances, interest and rates on a
taxable-equivalent basis for the years 2018 through
2020. Income computed on a taxable-equivalent basis is
the income reported in the Consolidated statements of
income, adjusted to present interest income and rates
earned onassets exempt from income taxes (i.e., federal taxes) on
a basis comparable with other taxable investments. The
incremental tax rate used for calculating the taxable-
equivalent adjustment was approximately 24% in 2020,
2019 and 2018.
(Table continued on next page)
(Unaudited) 2020
Year ended December 31,
 (Taxable-equivalent interest and rates; in millions, except rates)Average
 balance Interest Rate
Assets
Deposits with banks $ 444,058  $ 749 0.17 %
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under resale agreements 275,926  2,436  0.88 
Securities borrowed 143,472  (302) (0.21)
Trading assets – debt instruments 322,936  7,869  2.44 
  Taxable securities 476,650  7,843  1.65 
  Non-taxable securities 33,287  1,437  4.32 
Total investment securities 509,937  9,280  1.82 
Loans 1,004,597  43,886  4.37 
All other interest-earning assets 78,784  1,023  1.30 
Total interest-earning assets 2,779,710  64,941  2.34 
Allowance for loan losses (25,775)
Cash and due from banks 22,241  
Trading assets – equity and other instruments 118,055  
Trading assets – derivative receivables 76,572  
Goodwill, MSRs and other intangible assets 51,934  
All other noninterest-earning assets 180,411  
Total assets $ 3,203,148  
Liabilities
Interest-bearing deposits $ 1,389,224  $ 2,357  0.17 %
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under repurchase
agreements 255,421  1,058  0.41 
Short-term borrowings 38,853  372 0.96 
Trading liabilities – debt and all other interest-bearing liabilities 205,255  195 0.10 
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs 19,216  214 1.12 
Long-term debt 254,400  5,764  2.27 
Total interest-bearing liabilities 2,162,369  9,960  0.46 
Noninterest-bearing deposits 517,527  
Trading liabilities – equity and other instruments 32,628  
Trading liabilities – derivative payables 61,593  
All other liabilities, including the allowance for lending-related commitments 162,267  
Total liabilities 2,936,384  
Stockholders’ equity
Preferred stock 29,899  
Common stockholders’ equity 236,865  
Total stockholders’ equity 266,764  
Total liabilities and stockholders’ equity $ 3,203,148  
Interest rate spread 1.88 %
Net interest income and net yield on interest-earning assets $ 54,981  1.98 
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other
assets. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)Represents securities that are tax-exempt for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
(c)Includes brokerage-related held-for-investment customer receivables, which are classified in accrued interest and accounts receivable, and all
other interest-earning assets, which are classified in other assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(d)Includes commercial paper.
(e)All other interest-bearing liabilities include brokerage-related customer payables.
Within the Consolidated average balance sheets, interest and rates summary, the principal amounts of nonaccrual
loans have been included in the average loan balances used to determine the average interest rate earned on loans.
Refer to Note 12 for additional information on nonaccrual loans, including interest accrued.(h)
(j)
(a)
(b)
(k)
(a) (i)
(a)(c)
(a)
(a)
(d)
(e)(f) (j)
(f)
(g)
300 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
(Table continued from previous page)
2019 2018
Average
 balance Interest RateAverage
 balance Interest Rate
$ 280,004 $ 3,887 1.39 % $ 405,514 $ 5,907 1.46 %
275,429 6,146 2.23 217,150 3,819 1.76 
131,291 1,574 1.20 115,082 913 0.79 
294,958 9,189 3.12 208,266 7,206 3.46 
284,127 7,962 2.80 194,232 5,653 2.91 
35,748 1,655 4.63 42,456 1,987 4.68 
319,875 9,617 3.01 236,688 7,640 3.23 
989,943 52,012 5.25 977,406 49,208 5.03 
53,779 2,146 3.99 52,551 2,035 3.87 
2,345,279 84,571 3.61 2,212,657 76,728 3.47 
(13,331) (13,269)
20,645 21,694 
114,323 118,152 
53,786 60,734 
53,683 54,669 
167,456 154,261 
$ 2,741,841 $ 2,608,898 
$ 1,115,848 $ 8,957 0.80 % $ 1,045,037 $ 5,973 0.57 %
227,994 4,630 2.03 189,282 3,066 1.62 
52,426 1,248 2.38 54,993 1,144 2.08 
182,105 2,585 1.42 177,788 2,387 1.34 
22,501 568 2.52 21,079 493 2.34 
247,968 8,807 3.55 243,246 7,978 3.28 
1,848,842 26,795 1.45 1,731,425 21,041 1.22 
407,219 411,424 
31,085 34,667 
42,560 43,075 
151,717 132,836 
2,481,423 2,353,427 
27,511 26,249 
232,907 229,222 
260,418 255,471 
$ 2,741,841 $ 2,608,898 
2.16 % 2.25 %
$ 57,776 2.46 $ 55,687 2.52 
(f) The combined balance of trading liabilities – debt and equity instruments was $106.5 billion, $101.0 billion and $107.0 billion for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
(g) The ratio of average stockholders’ equity to average assets was 8.3%, 9.5% and 9.8% for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively. The return on average stockholders’ equity, based on net income, was 10.9%, 14.0% and 12.7% for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
(h) Interest includes the effect of related hedging derivatives. Taxable-equivalent amounts are used where applicable.
(i) Fees and commissions on loans included in loan interest amounted to $1.0 billion for the year ended December 31, 2020, and $1.2 billion each for
the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018.
(j) Negative interest income and yield are related to the impact of current interest rates combined with the fees paid on client-driven securities
borrowed balances. The negative interest expense related to prime brokerage customer payables is recognized in interest expense and reported
within trading liabilities - debt and all other interest-bearing liabilities.
(k) The annualized rate for securities based on amortized cost was 1.85%, 3.05% and 3.25% for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively, and does not give effect to changes in fair value that are reflected in AOCI.(h) (h)
(k) (k)
(i) (i)
(g) (g)
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 301
Interest rates and interest differential analysis of net interest income – U.S. and non-U.S.
Presented below is a summary of interest and rates segregated between U.S. and non-U.S. operations for the years
2018 through 2020. The segregation of U.S. and non-U.S. components is based on the location of the office recording
the transaction. Intercompany funding generally consists of dollar-denominated deposits originated in various locations
that are centrally managed by Treasury and CIO.
(Table continued on next page)
2020
(Unaudited)
Year ended December 31,
 (Taxable-equivalent interest and rates; in millions, except rates) Average balance Interest Rate
Interest-earning assets
Deposits with banks:
U.S. $ 294,669 $ 768 0.26 %
Non-U.S. 149,389 (19) (0.01)
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under resale agreements:
U.S. 141,409 1,341 0.95 
Non-U.S. 134,517 1,095 0.81 
Securities borrowed:
U.S. 100,026 (305) (0.30)
Non-U.S. 43,446 3 0.01 
Trading assets – debt instruments: 
U.S. 216,025 5,056 2.34 
Non-U.S. 106,911 2,813 2.63 
Investment securities:
U.S. 475,832 8,703 1.83 
Non-U.S. 34,105 577 1.69 
Loans:
U.S. 909,850 41,708 4.58 
Non-U.S. 94,747 2,178 2.30 
All other interest-earning assets, predominantly U.S. 78,784 1,023 1.30 
Total interest-earning assets 2,779,710 64,941 2.34 
Interest-bearing liabilities
Interest-bearing deposits:
U.S. 1,068,857 2,288 0.21 
Non-U.S. 320,367 69 0.02 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under repurchase
agreements:
U.S. 204,958 863 0.42 
Non-U.S. 50,463 195 0.39 
Trading liabilities – debt, short-term and all other interest-bearing liabilities
U.S. 151,120 (30) (0.02)
Non-U.S. 92,988 597 0.64 
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs, predominantly U.S. 19,216 214 1.12 
Long-term debt:
U.S. 247,623 5,704 2.30 
Non-U.S. 6,777 60 0.89 
Intercompany funding:
U.S. (46,327) (1,254) — 
Non-U.S. 46,327 1,254 — 
Total interest-bearing liabilities 2,162,369 9,960 0.46 
Noninterest-bearing liabilities 617,341 
Total investable funds $ 2,779,710 $ 9,960 0.36 %
Net interest income and net yield: $ 54,981 1.98 %
U.S. 49,242 2.25 
Non-U.S. 5,739 0.97 
Percentage of total assets and liabilities attributable to non-U.S. operations:
Assets 23.5 
Liabilities 20.9 
(a)Negative interest income and yield are related to the impact of current interest rates combined with the fees paid on client-driven securities borrowed
balances. The negative interest expense related to prime brokerage customer payables is recognized in interest expense and reported within trading
liabilities - debt and all other interest-bearing liabilities.
(b)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other assets.
Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(c)Includes commercial paper.
(d)Represents the amount of noninterest-bearing liabilities funding interest-earning assets.(a)
(b)
(b)
(b)
:(a)(c)
(d)
302 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Refer to the “Net interest income” discussion in Consolidated Results of Operations on pages 54-56 for further
information.
(Table continued from previous page)
2019 2018
Average balance Interest Rate Average balance Interest Rate
$ 165,066 $ 3,588 2.17 % $ 305,117 $ 5,703 1.87 %
114,938 299 0.26 100,397 204 0.20 
150,205 4,068 2.71 102,144 2,427 2.38 
125,224 2,078 1.66 115,006 1,392 1.21 
92,625 1,423 1.54 77,027 825 1.07 
38,666 151 0.39 38,055 88 0.23 
 
200,811 6,157 3.07 121,967 4,229 3.47 
94,147 3,032 3.22 86,299 2,977 3.45 
287,961 8,963 3.11 200,883 6,943 3.46 
31,914 654 2.05 35,805 697 1.95 
898,570 49,058 5.46 882,314 46,227 5.24 
91,373 2,954 3.23 95,092 2,981 3.13 
53,779 2,146 3.99 52,551 2,035 3.87 
2,345,279 84,571 3.61 2,212,657 76,728 3.47 
 
 
850,493 6,896 0.81 802,786 4,562 0.57 
265,355 2,061 0.78 242,251 1,411 0.58 
164,284 3,989 2.43 117,754 2,562 2.18 
63,710 641 1.01 71,528 504 0.70 
 
147,247 2,574 1.75 147,512 2,225 1.51 
87,284 1,259 1.44 85,269 1,306 1.53 
22,501 568 2.52 21,079 493 2.34 
241,914 8,766 3.62 239,718 7,954 3.32 
6,054 41 0.68 3,528 24 0.68 
 
(42,947) (1,414) — (51,933) (746) — 
42,947 1,414 — 51,933 746 — 
1,848,842 26,795 1.45 1,731,425 21,041 1.22 
496,437 481,232 
$ 2,345,279 $ 26,795 1.14 % $ 2,212,657 $ 21,041 0.95 %
$ 57,776 2.46 % $ 55,687 2.52 %
52,217 2.86 50,236 2.95 
5,559 1.07 5,451 1.05 
24.5 24.7 
22.1 22.3 
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 303
Changes in net interest income, volume and rate analysis
The table below presents an attribution of net interest income between volume and rate. The attribution between volume
and rate is calculated using annual average balances for each category of assets and liabilities shown in the table and the
corresponding annual rates (refer to pages 300–304 for more information on average balances and rates). In this analysis,
when the change cannot be isolated to either volume or rate, it has been allocated to volume. The annual rates include the
impact of changes in market rates, as well as the impact of any change in composition of the various products within each
category of asset or liability. This analysis is calculated separately for each category without consideration of the
relationship between categories (for example, the net spread between the rates earned on assets and the rates paid on
liabilities that fund those assets). As a result, changes in the granularity or groupings considered in this analysis would
produce a different attribution result, and due to the complexities involved, precise allocation of changes in interest rates
between volume and rates is inherently complex and judgmental.
2020 versus 2019 2019 versus 2018
(Unaudited)Increase/(decrease) due
to change in:Increase/(decrease) due to
change in:
Year ended December 31,
 (On a taxable-equivalent basis; in millions) Volume RateNet
 change Volume RateNet
 change
Interest-earning assets
Deposits with banks:
U.S. $ 333 $ (3,153)$ (2,820) $ (3,030)$ 915 $ (2,115)
Non-U.S. (8) (310) (318) 35 60 95 
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under resale
agreements:
U.S. (83) (2,644) (2,727) 1,304 337 1,641 
Non-U.S. 81 (1,064) (983) 168 518 686 
Securities borrowed:
U.S. (24) (1,704) (1,728) 236 362 598 
Non-U.S. (1) (147) (148) 2 61 63 
Trading assets – debt instruments:
U.S. 365 (1,466) (1,101) 2,416 (488) 1,928 
Non-U.S. 336 (555) (219) 253 (198) 55 
Investment securities:
U.S. 3,426 (3,686) (260) 2,723 (703) 2,020 
Non-U.S. 38 (115) (77) (79) 36 (43)
Loans:  
U.S. 557 (7,907) (7,350) 890 1,941 2,831 
Non-U.S. 74 (850) (776) (122) 95 (27)
All other interest-earning assets, predominantly U.S. 324 (1,447) (1,123) 48 63 111 
Change in interest income 5,418 (25,048) (19,630) 4,844 2,999 7,843 
Interest-bearing liabilities
Interest-bearing deposits:
U.S. 495 (5,103) (4,608) 407 1,927 2,334 
Non-U.S. 25 (2,017) (1,992) 165 485 650 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold
under repurchase agreements:
U.S. 176 (3,302) (3,126) 1,133 294 1,427 
Non-U.S. (51) (395) (446) (85) 222 137 
Trading liabilities – debt, short-term and all other interest-
bearing liabilities: 
U.S. 2 (2,606) (2,604) (5) 354 349 
Non-U.S. 36 (698) (662) 30 (77) (47)
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs,
predominantly U.S. (37) (317) (354) 37 38 75 
Long-term debt:
U.S. 131 (3,193) (3,062) 93 719 812 
Non-U.S. 6 13 19 17 — 17 
Intercompany funding:
U.S. (89) 249 160 293 (961) (668)
Non-U.S. 89 (249) (160) (293) 961 668 
Change in interest expense 783 (17,618) (16,835) 1,792 3,962 5,754 
Change in net interest income $ 4,635 $ (7,430)$ (2,795) $ 3,052 $ (963)$ 2,089 
(a)Negative interest income and yield are related to the impact of current interest rates combined with the fees paid on client-driven securities borrowed balances. The negative
interest expense related to prime brokerage customer payables is recognized in interest expense and reported within trading liabilities - debt and all other interest-bearing liabilities.
(b)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans and other assets. Prior-period amounts have
been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(c)Includes commercial paper.(a)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(a)(c)
304 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Glossary of T erms and Acronyms
2020 Form 10-K: Annual report on Form 10-K for year
ended December 31, 2020, filed with the U.S. Securities
and Exchange Commission.
ABS: Asset-backed securities
AFS: Available-for-sale
ALCO: Asset Liability Committee
Amortized cost: Amount at which a financing
receivable or investment is originated or acquired,
adjusted for accretion or amortization of premium,
discount, and net deferred fees or costs, collection of
cash, charge-offs, foreign exchange, and fair value
hedge accounting adjustments. For AFS securities,
amortized cost is also reduced by any impairment
losses recognized in earnings. Amortized cost is not
reduced by the allowance for credit losses, except
where explicitly presented net.
AOCI: Accumulated other comprehensive income/(loss)
ARM: Adjustable rate mortgage(s)
AUC: Assets under custody
AUM: “Assets under management”: Represent
assets managed by AWM on behalf of its Private
Banking, Institutional and Retail clients. Includes
“Committed capital not Called.”
Auto loan and lease origination volume: Dollar
amount of auto loans and leases originated.
AWM: Asset & Wealth Management
Beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs:
Represents the interest of third-party holders of debt,
equity securities, or other obligations, issued by VIEs
that JPMorgan Chase consolidates.
Benefit obligation: Refers to the projected benefit
obligation for pension plans and the accumulated
postretirement benefit obligation for OPEB plans.
BHC: Bank holding company
CB: Commercial Banking
CBB: Consumer & Business Banking
CCAR: Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review
CCB: Consumer & Community Banking
CCO: Chief Compliance Officer
CCP: “Central counterparty” is a clearing house that
interposes itself between counterparties to contracts
traded in one or more financial markets, becoming the
buyer to every seller and the seller to every buyer and
thereby ensuring the future performance of open
contracts. A CCP becomes a counterparty to trades with
market participants through novation, an open offer
system, or another legally binding arrangement.
CDS: Credit default swaps
CECL: Current Expected Credit LossesCEO: Chief Executive Officer
CET1 Capital: Common equity Tier 1 capital
CFTC: Commodity Futures Trading Commission
CFO: Chief Financial Officer
CFP: Contingency funding plan
Chase Bank USA, N.A.: Chase Bank USA, National
Association
CIB: Corporate & Investment Bank
CIO: Chief Investment Office
Client assets: Represent assets under management as
well as custody, brokerage, administration and deposit
accounts.
Client deposits and other third-party liabilities:
Deposits, as well as deposits that are swept to on-
balance sheet liabilities (e.g., commercial paper, federal
funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under
repurchase agreements) as part of client cash
management programs.
CLO: Collateralized loan obligations
CLTV: Combined loan-to-value
Collateral-dependent: A loan is considered to be
collateral-dependent when repayment of the loan is
expected to be provided substantially through the
operation or sale of the collateral when the borrower is
experiencing financial difficulty, including when
foreclosure is deemed probable based on borrower
delinquency.
Commercial Card: provides a wide range of payment
services to corporate and public sector clients worldwide
through the commercial card products. Services include
procurement, corporate travel and entertainment,
expense management services, and business-to-
business payment solutions.
Credit cycle: A period of time over which credit quality
improves, deteriorates and then improves again (or vice
versa). The duration of a credit cycle can vary from a
couple of years to several years.
Credit derivatives: Financial instruments whose value
is derived from the credit risk associated with the debt of
a third-party issuer (the reference entity) which allow
one party (the protection purchaser) to transfer that risk
to another party (the protection seller). Upon the
occurrence of a credit event by the reference entity,
which may include, among other events, the bankruptcy
or failure to pay its obligations, or certain restructurings
of the debt of the reference entity, neither party has
recourse to the reference entity. The protection
purchaser has recourse to the protection seller for the
difference between the face value of the CDS contract
and the fair value at the time of settling the credit
derivative contract. The determination as to whether a
credit event has occurred is generally made by the
relevant International Swaps and Derivatives
Association (“ISDA”) Determinations Committee.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 305
Glossary of T erms and Acronyms
Criticized: Criticized loans, lending-related
commitments and derivative receivables that are
classified as special mention, substandard and doubtful
categories for regulatory purposes.
CRO: Chief Risk Officer
CTC: CIO, Treasury and Corporate
CVA: Credit valuation adjustment
Debit and credit card sales volume: Dollar amount of
card member purchases, net of returns.
Deposit margin/deposit spread: Represents net
interest income expressed as a percentage of average
deposits.
Distributed denial-of-service attack: The use of a
large number of remote computer systems to
electronically send a high volume of traffic to a target
website to create a service outage at the target. This is
a form of cyberattack.
Dodd-Frank Act: Wall Street Reform and Consumer
Protection Act
DVA: Debit valuation adjustment
EC: European Commission
Eligible HQLA: Eligible high-quality liquid assets, for
purposes of calculating the LCR, is the amount of
unencumbered HQLA that satisfy certain operational
considerations as defined in the LCR rule.
Eligible LTD: Long-term debt satisfying certain eligibility
criteria
Embedded derivatives: are implicit or explicit terms or
features of a financial instrument that affect some or all
of the cash flows or the value of the instrument in a
manner similar to a derivative. An instrument containing
such terms or features is referred to as a “hybrid.” The
component of the hybrid that is the non-derivative
instrument is referred to as the “host.” For example,
callable debt is a hybrid instrument that contains a plain
vanilla debt instrument (i.e., the host) and an embedded
option that allows the issuer to redeem the debt issue at
a specified date for a specified amount (i.e., the
embedded derivative). However, a floating rate
instrument is not a hybrid composed of a fixed-rate
instrument and an interest rate swap.
ERISA: Employee Retirement Income Security Act of
1974
EPS: Earnings per share
ETD: “Exchange-traded derivatives”: Derivative
contracts that are executed on an exchange and settled
via a central clearing house.
Expense categories:
•Volume- and revenue-related expenses generally
correlate with changes in the related
business/transaction volume or revenue. Examples of
volume- and revenue-related expenses include
commissions and incentive compensation,
depreciation expense related tooperating lease assets, and brokerage expense
related to equities trading transaction volume.
•Investments include expenses associated with
supporting medium- to longer-term strategic plans of
the Firm. Examples of investments include initiatives
in technology (including related compensation),
marketing, and compensation for new bankers and
client advisors.
•Structural expenses are those associated with the
day-today cost of running the bank and are expenses
not covered by the above two categories. Examples of
structural expenses include employee salaries and
benefits, as well as noncompensation costs such as
real estate and all other expenses.
EU: European Union
Fannie Mae: Federal National Mortgage Association
FASB: Financial Accounting Standards Board
FCA: Financial Conduct Authority
FCC: Firmwide Control Committee
FDIA: Federal Depository Insurance Act
FDIC: Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Federal Reserve: The Board of the Governors of the
Federal Reserve System
FFIEC: Federal Financial Institutions Examination
Council
FHA: Federal Housing Administration
FHLB: Federal Home Loan Bank
FICC: The Fixed Income Clearing Corporation
FICO score: A measure of consumer credit risk
provided by credit bureaus, typically produced from
statistical models by Fair Isaac Corporation utilizing data
collected by the credit bureaus.
FINRA: Financial Industry Regulatory Authority
Firm: JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Forward points: Represents the interest rate
differential between two currencies, which is either
added to or subtracted from the current exchange rate
(i.e., “spot rate”) to determine the forward exchange
rate.
FRBB: Federal Reserve Bank of Boston
FRBNY: Federal Reserve Bank of New York
FRC: Firmwide Risk Committee
Freddie Mac: Federal Home Loan Mortgage
Corporation
Free standing derivatives: a derivative contract
entered into either separate and apart from any of the
Firm’s other financial instruments or equity transactions.
Or, in conjunction with some other transaction and is
legally detachable and separately exercisable.
FSB: Financial Stability Board
306 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Glossary of T erms and Acronyms
FTE: Fully taxable equivalent
FVA: Funding valuation adjustment
FX: Foreign exchange
G7: Group of Seven nations: Countries in the G7 are
Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the U.K. and
the U.S.
G7 government bonds: Bonds issued by the
government of one of the G7 nations.
Ginnie Mae: Government National Mortgage
Association
GSIB: Global systemically important banks
Headcount-related expense: Includes salary and
benefits (excluding performance-based incentives), and
other noncompensation costs related to employees.
HELOC: Home equity line of credit
Home equity – senior lien: Represents loans and
commitments where JPMorgan Chase holds the first
security interest on the property.
Home equity – junior lien: Represents loans and
commitments where JPMorgan Chase holds a security
interest that is subordinate in rank to other liens.
Households: A household is a collection of individuals
or entities aggregated together by name, address, tax
identifier and phone number.
HQLA: “High-quality liquid assets” consist of cash
and certain high-quality liquid securities as defined in
the LCR rule.
HTM: Held-to-maturity
IBOR: Interbank Offered Rate
ICAAP: Internal capital adequacy assessment process
IDI: Insured depository institutions
IHC: JPMorgan Chase Holdings LLC, an intermediate
holding company
Investment-grade: An indication of credit quality based
on JPMorgan Chase’s internal risk assessment. The
Firm considers ratings of BBB-/Baa3 or higher as
investment-grade.
IPO: Initial public offering
ISDA: International Swaps and Derivatives Association
JPMorgan Chase: JPMorgan Chase & Co.
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.: JPMorgan Chase Bank,
National Association
JPMorgan Securities: J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
Loan-equivalent: Represents the portion of the unused
commitment or other contingent exposure that is
expected, based on historical portfolio experience, to
become drawn prior to an event of a default by an
obligor.
LCR: Liquidity coverage ratioLDA: Loss Distribution Approach
LGD: Loss given default
LIBOR: London Interbank Offered Rate
LLC: Limited Liability Company
LOB: Line of business
LOB CROs: Line of Business and CTC Chief Risk
Officers
Loss emergence period: Represents the time period
between the date at which the loss is estimated to have
been incurred and the ultimate realization of that loss.
LTIP: Long-term incentive plan
LTV: “Loan-to-value”: For residential real estate loans,
the relationship, expressed as a percentage, between
the principal amount of a loan and the appraised value
of the collateral (i.e., residential real estate) securing the
loan.
Origination date LTV ratio
The LTV ratio at the origination date of the loan.
Origination date LTV ratios are calculated based on the
actual appraised values of collateral (i.e., loan-level
data) at the origination date.
Current estimated LTV ratio
An estimate of the LTV as of a certain date. The current
estimated LTV ratios are calculated using estimated
collateral values derived from a nationally recognized
home price index measured at the metropolitan
statistical area (“MSA”) level. These MSA-level home
price indices consist of actual data to the extent
available and forecasted data where actual data is not
available. As a result, the estimated collateral values
used to calculate these ratios do not represent actual
appraised loan-level collateral values; as such, the
resulting LTV ratios are necessarily imprecise and
should therefore be viewed as estimates.
Combined LTV ratio
The LTV ratio considering all available lien positions, as
well as unused lines, related to the property. Combined
LTV ratios are used for junior lien home equity products.
Managed basis: A non-GAAP presentation of Firmwide
financial results that includes reclassifications to present
revenue on a fully taxable-equivalent basis.
Management also uses this financial measure at the
segment level, because it believes this provides
information to enable investors to understand the
underlying operational performance and trends of the
particular business segment and facilitates a
comparison of the business segment with the
performance of competitors.
Master netting agreement: A single agreement with a
counterparty that permits multiple transactions governed
by that agreement to be terminated or accelerated and
settled through a single payment in a single currency in
the event of a default (e.g., bankruptcy, failure to make a
required payment or securities transfer or deliver
collateral or margin when due).
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 307
Glossary of T erms and Acronyms
MBS: Mortgage-backed securities
MD&A: Management’s discussion and analysis
Measurement alternative: Measures equity securities
without readily determinable fair values at cost less
impairment (if any), plus or minus observable price
changes from an identical or similar investment of the
same issuer.
Merchant Services: offers merchants payment
processing capabilities, fraud and risk management,
data and analytics, and other payments services.
Through Merchant Services, merchants of all sizes can
accept payments via credit and debit cards and
payments in multiple currencies.
MEV: Macroeconomic variable
MMLF: Money Market Mutual Fund Liquidity Facility
Moody’s: Moody’s Investor Services
Mortgage origination channels:
Retail – Borrowers who buy or refinance a home
through direct contact with a mortgage banker employed
by the Firm using a branch office, the Internet or by
phone. Borrowers are frequently referred to a mortgage
banker by a banker in a Chase branch, real estate
brokers, home builders or other third parties.
Correspondent – Banks, thrifts, other mortgage banks
and other financial institutions that sell closed loans to
the Firm.
Mortgage product types:
Alt-A
Alt-A loans are generally higher in credit quality than
subprime loans but have characteristics that would
disqualify the borrower from a traditional prime loan. Alt-
A lending characteristics may include one or more of the
following: (i) limited documentation; (ii) a high CLTV
ratio; (iii) loans secured by non-owner occupied
properties; or (iv) a debt-to-income ratio above normal
limits. A substantial proportion of the Firm’s Alt-A loans
are those where a borrower does not provide complete
documentation of his or her assets or the amount or
source of his or her income.
Option ARMs
The option ARM real estate loan product is an
adjustable-rate mortgage loan that provides the
borrower with the option each month to make a fully
amortizing, interest-only or minimum payment. The
minimum payment on an option ARM loan is based on
the interest rate charged during the introductory period.
This introductory rate is usually significantly below the
fully indexed rate. The fully indexed rate is calculated
using an index rate plus a margin. Once the introductory
period ends, the contractual interest rate charged on the
loan increases to the fully indexed rate and adjusts
monthly to reflect movements in the index. The
minimum payment is typically insufficient to cover
interest accrued in the prior month, and any unpaid
interest is deferred and added to the principal balance of
the loan. Option ARM loans are subject to payment
recast, which converts the loan to a variable-rate fully
amortizing loan upon meeting specified loan balance
and anniversary datetriggers.
Prime
Prime mortgage loans are made to borrowers with good
credit records who meet specific underwriting
requirements, including prescriptive requirements
related to income and overall debt levels. New prime
mortgage borrowers provide full documentation and
generally have reliable payment histories.
Subprime
Subprime loans are loans that, prior to mid-2008, were
offered to certain customers with one or more high risk
characteristics, including but not limited to: (i) unreliable
or poor payment histories; (ii) a high LTV ratio of greater
than 80% (without borrower-paid mortgage insurance);
(iii) a high debt-to-income ratio; (iv) an occupancy type
for the loan is other than the borrower’s primary
residence; or (v) a history of delinquencies or late
payments on the loan.
MSA: Metropolitan statistical areas
MSR: Mortgage servicing rights
Multi-asset: Any fund or account that allocates assets
under management to more than one asset class.
NA: Data is not applicable or available for the period
presented.
NAV: Net Asset Value
Net Capital Rule: Rule 15c3-1 under the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934.
Net charge-off/(recovery) rate: Represents net
charge-offs/(recoveries) (annualized) divided by average
retained loans for the reporting period.
Net interchange income includes the following
components:
•Interchange income: Fees earned by credit and debit
card issuers on sales transactions.
•Reward costs: The cost to the Firm for points earned
by cardholders enrolled in credit card rewards
programs generally tied to sales transactions.
•Partner payments: Payments to co-brand credit card
partners based on the cost of loyalty program rewards
earned by cardholders on credit card transactions.
Net mortgage servicing revenue: Includes operating
revenue earned from servicing third-party mortgage
loans, which is recognized over the period in which the
service is provided; changes in the fair value of MSRs;
the impact of risk management activities associated with
MSRs; and gains and losses on securitization of excess
mortgage servicing. Net mortgage servicing revenue
also includes gains and losses on sales and lower of
cost or fair value adjustments of certain repurchased
loans insured by U.S. government agencies.
Net production revenue: Includes fees and income
recognized as earned on mortgage loans originated with
the
308 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K
Glossary of T erms and Acronyms
intent to sell, and the impact of risk management
activities associated with the mortgage pipeline and
warehouse loans. Net production revenue also includes
gains and losses on sales and lower of cost or fair value
adjustments on mortgage loans held-for-sale (excluding
certain repurchased loans insured by U.S. government
agencies), and changes in the fair value of financial
instruments measured under the fair value option.
Net revenue rate: Represents Credit Card net revenue
(annualized) expressed as a percentage of average
loans for the period.
Net yield on interest-earning assets: The average
rate for interest-earning assets less the average rate
paid for all sources of funds.
NFA: National Futures Association
NM: Not meaningful
NOL: Net operating loss
Nonaccrual loans: Loans for which interest income is
not recognized on an accrual basis. Loans (other than
credit card loans and certain consumer loans insured by
U.S. government agencies) are placed on nonaccrual
status when full payment of principal and interest is not
expected, regardless of delinquency status, or when
principal and interest have been in default for a period of
90 days or more unless the loan is both well-secured
and in the process of collection. Collateral-dependent
loans are typically maintained on nonaccrual status.
Nonperforming assets: Nonperforming assets include
nonaccrual loans, nonperforming derivatives and certain
assets acquired in loan satisfaction, predominantly real
estate owned and other commercial and personal
property.
NOW: Negotiable Order of Withdrawal
NSFR: Net Stable Funding Ratio
OAS: Option-adjusted spread
OCC: Office of the Comptroller of the Currency
OCI: Other comprehensive income/(loss)
OPEB: Other postretirement employee benefit
OTTI: Other-than-temporary impairment
Over-the-counter (“OTC”) derivatives: Derivative
contracts that are negotiated, executed and settled
bilaterally between two derivative counterparties, where
one or both counterparties is a derivatives dealer.
Over-the-counter cleared (“OTC-cleared”)
derivatives: Derivative contracts that are negotiated
and executed bilaterally, but subsequently settled via a
central clearing house, such that each derivative
counterparty is only exposed to the default of that
clearing house.
Overhead ratio: Noninterest expense as a percentage
of total net revenue.Parent Company: JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Participating securities: Represents unvested share-
based compensation awards containing nonforfeitable
rights to dividends or dividend equivalents (collectively,
“dividends”), which are included in the earnings per
share calculation using the two-class method. JPMorgan
Chase grants RSUs to certain employees under its
share-based compensation programs, which entitle the
recipients to receive nonforfeitable dividends during the
vesting period on a basis equivalent to the dividends
paid to holders of common stock. These unvested
awards meet the definition of participating securities.
Under the two-class method, all earnings (distributed
and undistributed) are allocated to each class of
common stock and participating securities, based on
their respective rights to receive dividends.
PCA: Prompt corrective action
PCD: “Purchased credit deteriorated” assets
represent acquired financial assets that as of the date of
acquisition have experienced a more-than-insignificant
deterioration in credit quality since origination, as
determined by the Firm.
PCI: “Purchased credit-impaired” loans represented
certain loans that were acquired and deemed to be
credit-impaired on the acquisition date. The superseded
FASB guidance allowed purchasers to aggregate credit-
impaired loans acquired in the same fiscal quarter into
one or more pools, provided that the loans had common
risk characteristics (e.g., product type, LTV ratios, FICO
scores, past due status, geographic location). A pool
was then accounted for as a single asset with a single
composite interest rate and an aggregate expectation of
cash flows.
PD: Probability of default
PDCF: Primary Dealer Credit Facility
PPP: Paycheck Protection Program
PPPL Facility: Paycheck Protection Program Lending
Facility
PRA: Prudential Regulation Authority
Pre-provision profit/(loss): Represents total net
revenue less noninterest expense. The Firm believes
that this financial measure is useful in assessing the
ability of a lending institution to generate income in
excess of its provision for credit losses.
Pretax margin: Represents income before income tax
expense divided by total net revenue, which is, in
management’s view, a comprehensive measure of
pretax performance derived by measuring earnings after
all costs are taken into consideration. It is one basis
upon which management evaluates the performance of
AWM against the performance of their respective
competitors.
Principal transactions revenue: Principal transactions
revenue is driven by many factors, including:
•the bid-offer spread, which is the difference between
the price at which a market participant is willing and
able to
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 309
Glossary of T erms and Acronyms
sell an instrument to the Firm and the price at which
another market participant is willing and able to buy it
from the Firm, and vice versa; and
•realized and unrealized gains and losses on financial
instruments and commodities transactions, including
those accounted for under the fair value option,
primarily used in client-driven market-making
activities, and on private equity investments.
–Realized gains and losses result from the sale of
instruments, closing out or termination of
transactions, or interim cash payments.
–Unrealized gains and losses result from changes in
valuation.
In connection with its client-driven market-making
activities, the Firm transacts in debt and equity
instruments, derivatives and commodities, including
physical commodities inventories and financial
instruments that reference commodities.
Principal transactions revenue also includes realized
and unrealized gains and losses related to:
•derivatives designated in qualifying hedge accounting
relationships, primarily fair value hedges of commodity
and foreign exchange risk;
•derivatives used for specific risk management
purposes, primarily to mitigate credit risk and foreign
exchange risk.
PSUs: Performance share units
REIT: “Real estate investment trust”: A special
purpose investment vehicle that provides investors with
the ability to participate directly in the ownership or
financing of real-estate related assets by pooling their
capital to purchase and manage income property (i.e.,
equity REIT) and/or mortgage loans (i.e., mortgage
REIT). REITs can be publicly or privately held and they
also qualify for certain favorable tax considerations.
Regulatory VaR: Daily aggregated VaR calculated in
accordance with regulatory rules.
REO: Real estate owned
Reported basis: Financial statements prepared under
U.S. GAAP, which excludes the impact of taxable-
equivalent adjustments.
Retained loans: Loans that are held-for-investment
(i.e., excludes loans held-for-sale and loans at fair
value).
Revenue wallet: Proportion of fee revenue based on
estimates of investment banking fees generated across
the industry (i.e., the revenue wallet) from investment
banking transactions in M&A, equity and debt
underwriting, and loan syndications. Source: Dealogic, a
third-party provider of investment banking competitive
analysis and volume-based league tables for the above
noted industry products.
RHS: Rural Housing Service of the U.S. Department of
AgricultureRisk-rated portfolio: Credit loss estimates are based
on estimates of the probability of default (“PD”) and loss
severity given a default. The probability of default is the
likelihood that a borrower will default on its obligation;
the loss given default (“LGD”) is the estimated loss on
the loan that would be realized upon the default and
takes into consideration collateral and structural support
for each credit facility.
ROA: Return on assets
ROE: Return on equity
ROTCE: Return on tangible common equity
ROU assets: Right-of-use assets
RSU(s): Restricted stock units
RWA: “Risk-weighted assets”: Basel III establishes
two comprehensive approaches for calculating RWA (a
Standardized approach and an Advanced approach)
which include capital requirements for credit risk, market
risk, and in the case of Basel III Advanced, also
operational risk. Key differences in the calculation of
credit risk RWA between the Standardized and
Advanced approaches are that for Basel III Advanced,
credit risk RWA is based on risk-sensitive approaches
which largely rely on the use of internal credit models
and parameters, whereas for Basel III Standardized,
credit risk RWA is generally based on supervisory risk-
weightings which vary primarily by counterparty type
and asset class. Market risk RWA is calculated on a
generally consistent basis between Basel III
Standardized and Basel III Advanced.
S&P: Standard and Poor’s 500 Index
SAR(s): Stock appreciation rights
SCB: Stress Capital Buffer
Scored portfolios: Consumer loan portfolios that
predominantly include residential real estate loans,
credit card loans, auto loans to individuals and certain
small business loans.
SEC: Securities and Exchange Commission
Securities financing agreements: Include resale,
repurchase, securities borrowed and securities loaned
agreements
Seed capital: Initial JPMorgan capital invested in
products, such as mutual funds, with the intention of
ensuring the fund is of sufficient size to represent a
viable offering to clients, enabling pricing of its shares,
and allowing the manager to develop a track record.
After these goals are achieved, the intent is to remove
the Firm’s capital from the investment.
Shelf securities: Securities registered with the SEC
under a shelf registration statement that have not been
issued, offered or sold. These securities are not
included in league tables until they have actually been
issued.
Single-name: Single reference-entities
310 JPMorganChase&Co./2020Form10-K
310 JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10K
Glossary of T erms and Acronyms
SLR: Supplementary leverage ratio
SMBS: Stripped mortgage-backed securities
SOFR: Secured Overnight Financing Rate
SPEs: Special purpose entities
Structural interest rate risk: Represents interest rate
risk of the non-trading assets and liabilities of the Firm.
Structured notes: Structured notes are financial
instruments whose cash flows are linked to the
movement in one or more indexes, interest rates,
foreign exchange rates, commodities prices,
prepayment rates, or other market variables. The notes
typically contain embedded (but not separable or
detachable) derivatives. Contractual cash flows for
principal, interest, or both can vary in amount and timing
throughout the life of the note based on non-traditional
indexes or non-traditional uses of traditional interest
rates or indexes.
Taxable-equivalent basis: In presenting results on a
managed basis, the total net revenue for each of the
business segments and the Firm is presented on a tax-
equivalent basis. Accordingly, revenue from investments
that receive tax credits and tax-exempt securities is
presented in managed basis results on a level
comparable to taxable investments and securities; the
corresponding income tax impact related to tax-exempt
items is recorded within income tax expense.
TBVPS: Tangible book value per share
TCE: Tangible common equity
TDR: “Troubled debt restructuring” is deemed to
occur when the Firm modifies the original terms of a
loan agreement by granting a concession to a borrower
that is experiencing financial difficulty. Loans with short-
term and other insignificant modifications that are not
considered concessions are not TDRs.
TLAC: Total loss-absorbing capacity
U.K.: United Kingdom
Unaudited: Financial statements and information that
have not been subjected to auditing procedures
sufficient to permit an independent certified public
accountant to express an opinion.
U.S.: United States of America
U.S. government agencies: U.S. government agencies
include, but are not limited to, agencies such as Ginnie
Mae and FHA, and do not include Fannie Mae and
Freddie Mac which are U.S. government-sponsored
enterprises (“U.S. GSEs”). In general, obligations of
U.S. government agencies are fully and explicitly
guaranteed as to the timely payment of principal and
interest by the full faith and credit of the U.S.
government in the event of a default.
U.S. GAAP: Accounting principles generally accepted in
the U.S.U.S. GSE(s): “U.S. government-sponsored enterprises”
are quasi-governmental, privately-held entities
established or chartered by the U.S. government to
serve public purposes as specified by the U.S.
Congress to improve the flow of credit to specific sectors
of the economy and provide certain essential services to
the public. U.S. GSEs include Fannie Mae and Freddie
Mac, but do not include Ginnie Mae or FHA. U.S. GSE
obligations are not explicitly guaranteed as to the timely
payment of principal and interest by the full faith and
credit of the U.S. government.
U.S. LCR: Liquidity coverage ratio under the final U.S.
rule.
U.S. Treasury: U.S. Department of the Treasury
VA: U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs
VaR: “Value-at-risk” is a measure of the dollar amount
of potential loss from adverse market moves in an
ordinary market environment.
VCG: Valuation Control Group
VGF: Valuation Governance Forum
VIEs: Variable interest entities
Warehouse loans: Consist of prime mortgages
originated with the intent to sell that are accounted for at
fair value and classified as loans.
JPMorgan Chase & Co./2020 Form 10-K 311
Investment securities portfolio
Refer to Note 10 for information regarding the investment securities portfolio as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, and
for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
2018
(Unaudited)
December 31, (in millions)Amortized
 costFair 
 value
Available-for-sale securities
Mortgage-backed securities: U.S. GSEs and government agencies $ 69,026 $ 68,646 
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 55,771 56,059 
All other AFS securities 103,972 105,689 
Total available-for-sale securities $ 228,769  $ 230,394  
Held-to-maturity securities
Mortgage-backed securities: U.S. GSEs and government agencies 26,610 26,544 
All other HTM securities 4,824 4,914 
Total held-to-maturity securities $ 31,434  $ 31,458  
Total investment securities $ 260,203  $ 261,852  
312
Loan portfolio
Effective January 1, 2020, the Firm adopted the CECL accounting guidance. The adoption resulted in a change in the
accounting for PCI loans, which are considered PCD loans under CECL. In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the
Firm reclassified risk-rated loans and lending-related commitments from the consumer, excluding credit card portfolio
segment to the wholesale portfolio segment, to align with the methodology applied when determining the allowance.
Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation. Refer to Note 1 for further
information.
Additionally, in the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions
from trading assets to loans. Prior-period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
The table below presents loans by portfolio segment and loan class that are presented in Note 12.
(Unaudited)
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
U.S. consumer, excluding credit card loans
Residential real estate $ 241,578 $ 266,135 $ 296,677 $ 291,054 $ 281,774 
Auto and other 76,825 51,682 52,324 55,296 63,380 
Total U.S. consumer, excluding credit card loans 318,403 317,817 349,001 346,350 345,154 
Non-U.S. consumer, excluding credit card loans
Residential real estate 176 — — 836 1,976 
Auto and other — — — — — 
Total Non-U.S. consumer, excluding credit card loans 176 — — 836 1,976 
Total consumer, excluding credit card loans
Residential real estate 241,754 266,135 296,677 291,890 283,750 
Auto and other 76,825 51,682 52,324 55,296 63,380 
Total consumer, excluding credit card loans 318,579 317,817 349,001 347,186 347,130 
Credit card Loans
U.S. credit card loans 144,103 168,787 156,312 149,107 141,447 
Non-U.S. credit card loans 113 137 320 404 369 
Total credit card loans 144,216 168,924 156,632 149,511 141,816 
Total consumer loans 462,795 486,741 505,633 496,697 488,946 
U.S. wholesale loans
Secured by real estate 124,887 126,735 121,169 120,078 112,134 
Commercial and industrial 112,911 115,389 138,374 115,537 110,555 
Other 185,945 154,633 136,609 120,608 111,509 
Total U.S. wholesale loans 423,743 396,757 396,152 356,223 334,198 
Non-U.S. wholesale loans
Secured by real estate 3,090 2,837 2,709 2,625 2,905 
Commercial and industrial 44,076 38,214 37,035 36,438 35,673 
Other 79,149 73,071 74,231 67,446 61,109 
Total non-U.S. wholesale loans 126,315 114,122 113,975 106,509 99,687 
Total wholesale loans
Secured by real estate 127,977 129,572 123,878 122,703 115,039 
Commercial and industrial 156,987 153,603 175,409 151,975 146,228 
Other 265,094 227,704 210,840 188,054 172,618 
Total wholesale loans 550,058 510,879 510,127 462,732 433,885 
Total loans $ 1,012,853 $ 997,620 $ 1,015,760 $ 959,429 $ 922,831 
Memo:
Loans held-for-sale $ 7,873 $ 7,064 $ 11,988 $ 3,351 $ 2,628 
Loans at fair value 44,474 44,955 34,357 31,240 30,296 
Total loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value $ 52,347 $ 52,019 $ 46,345 $ 34,591 $ 32,924 
(a)Loans (other than those for which the fair value option has been elected) are presented net of unamortized discounts and premiums and net
deferred loan fees or costs. These amounts were not material as of December 31, 2020, 2019, 2018, 2017 and 2016.(a)
313
Maturities and sensitivity to changes in interest rates
The table below sets forth wholesale loan maturities and the distribution between fixed and floating interest rates based
on the stated terms of the loan agreements. The table below also presents loans by loan class that are presented in
Note 12. The table does not include the impact of derivative instruments.
(Unaudited)
December 31, 2020
 (in millions)Within
1 year 1-5
 yearsAfter 5
 years Total
U.S.
Secured by real estate $ 4,847 $25,575 $94,465 $124,887 
Commercial and industrial 35,318 72,084 5,509 112,911 
Other 81,462 73,964 30,519 185,945 
Total U.S. 121,627 171,623 130,493 423,743 
Non-U.S.
Secured by real estate 907 1,797 386 3,090 
Commercial and industrial 13,307 26,460 4,309 44,076 
Other 55,249 20,142 3,758 79,149 
Total non-U.S. 69,463 48,399 8,453 126,315 
Total wholesale loans $191,090 $220,022 $138,946 $550,058 
Loans at fixed interest rates $36,693 $31,548 
Loans at variable interest rates 183,329 107,398 
Total wholesale loans $220,022 $138,946 
(a)Includes demand loans and overdrafts.
Risk elements
The following tables set forth nonperforming assets, contractually past-due assets, and accruing restructured loans by
portfolio segment and loan class that are presented in Note 12.
(Unaudited)
 December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Nonperforming assets
U.S. nonaccrual loans:
Consumer, excluding credit card loans $ 6,467 $ 3,366 $ 3,853 $ 4,463 $ 4,662 
Credit card loans NA NA NA NA NA
Total U.S. nonaccrual consumer loans 6,467 3,366 3,853 4,463 4,662 
Wholesale:
Secured by real estate 966 267 483 251 253 
Commercial and industrial 1,249 759 700 887 1,487 
Other 897 33 35 126 127 
Total U.S. wholesale nonaccrual loans 3,112 1,059 1,218 1,264 1,867 
Total U.S. nonaccrual loans 9,579 4,425 5,071 5,727 6,529 
Non-U.S. nonaccrual loans:
Consumer, excluding credit card loans — — — — — 
Credit card loans NA NA NA NA NA
Total non-U.S. nonaccrual consumer loans — — — — — 
Wholesale:
Secured by real estate 18 — 67 81 35 
Commercial and industrial 856 209 395 807 459 
Other 120 3 9 21 79 
Total non-U.S. wholesale nonaccrual loans 994 212 471 909 573 
Total non-U.S. nonaccrual loans 994 212 471 909 573 
Total nonaccrual loans 10,573 4,637 5,542 6,636 7,102 
Derivative receivables 56 30 60 130 223 
Assets acquired in loan satisfactions 277 387 299 353 429 
Nonperforming assets $ 10,906 $ 5,054 $ 5,901 $ 7,119 $ 7,754 
Memo:
Loans held-for-sale $ 284 $ 7 $ — $ — $ 162 
Loans at fair value 1,507 647 931 693 219 
Total loans held-for-sale and loans at fair value $ 1,791 $ 654 $ 931 $ 693 $ 381 (a)
314
(Unaudited)
December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Contractually past-due loans
U.S. loans:
Consumer, excluding credit card loans $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Credit card loans 1,317 1,605 1,442 1,378 1,143 
Total U.S. consumer loans 1,317 1,605 1,442 1,378 1,143 
Wholesale:
Secured by real estate 15 1 11 10 9 
Commercial and industrial 20 36 166 67 90 
Other 19 5 7 62 24 
Total U.S. wholesale loans 54 42 184 139 123 
Total U.S. loans 1,371 1,647 1,626 1,517 1,266 
Non-U.S. loans:
Consumer, excluding credit card loans — — — — — 
Credit card loans 2 2 3 1 2 
Total non-U.S. consumer loans 2 2 3 1 2 
Wholesale:      
Secured by real estate — — — — — 
Commercial and industrial — 1 2 1 9 
Other 3 — 2 1 — 
Total non-U.S. wholesale loans 3 1 4 2 9 
Total non-U.S. loans 5 3 7 3 11 
Total contractually past due loans $ 1,376 $ 1,650 $ 1,633 $ 1,520 $ 1,277 
(a)Represents accruing loans past-due 90 days or more as to principal and interest, which are not characterized as nonaccrual loans. Prior to the
adoption of CECL, excluded PCI loans which were accounted for on a pool basis. Since each pool was accounted for as a single asset with a
single composite interest rate and an aggregate expectation of cash flows, the past-due status of the pools, or that of individual loans within the
pools, was not meaningful. The Firm recognized interest income on each pool of loans as each of the pools was performing.
(b)At December 31, 2020, 2019, 2018, 2017 and 2016, excluded mortgage loans 90 or more days past due and insured by U.S. government
agencies of $364 million, $193 million, $1.6 billion, $2.7 billion and $2.7 billion, respectively. At December 31, 2016, student loans insured by U.S.
government agencies under the Federal Family Education Loan Program of $263 million were also excluded prior to sale of the student loan
portfolio in 2017. These amounts have been excluded from nonaccrual loans based upon the government guarantee.
(Unaudited)
 December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Accruing restructured loans
U.S.:
Consumer, excluding credit card loans $ 3,007 $ 3,600 $ 4,171 $ 4,972 $ 5,528 
Credit card loans 1,375 1,452 1,319 1,215 1,240 
Total U.S. consumer loans 4,382 5,052 5,490 6,187 6,768 
Wholesale:
Secured by real estate 16 14 9 6 18 
Commercial and industrial 202 34 59 129 64 
Other 61 2 4 2 — 
Total U.S. wholesale loans 279 50 72 137 82 
Total U.S. 4,661 5,102 5,562 6,324 6,850 
Non-U.S.:
Consumer, excluding credit card loans — — — — — 
Credit card loans — — — — — 
Total non-U.S. consumer loans — — — — — 
Wholesale:
Secured by real estate — 30 — — — 
Commercial and industrial 75 2 45 21 17 
Other 4 3 — — — 
Total non-U.S. wholesale loans 79 35 45 21 17 
Total non-U.S. 79 35 45 21 17 
Total accruing restructured notes $ 4,740 $ 5,137 $ 5,607 $ 6,345 $ 6,867 
(a)Represents performing loans modified in TDRs in which an economic concession was granted by the Firm and the borrower has demonstrated its
ability to repay the loans according to the terms of the restructuring. As defined in U.S. GAAP, concessions include the reduction of interest rates
or the deferral of interest or principal payments, resulting from deterioration in the borrowers’ financial condition. Excludes nonaccrual assets and
contractually past-due assets, which are included in the sections above.
(b)Includes credit card loans that have been modified in a TDR.
Refer to Credit and Investment Risk Management on pages 110–134, and Note 12 for a discussion of nonaccrual
loans, past-due loan accounting policies, and accruing restructured loans.(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(b)
315
Impact of nonaccrual loans and accruing restructured loans on interest income
The negative impact on interest income from nonaccrual loans represents the difference between the amount of
interest income that would have been recorded on such nonaccrual loans according to their original contractual terms
had they been performing and the amount of interest that actually was recognized on a cash basis. The negative
impact on interest income from accruing restructured loans represents the difference between the amount of interest
income that would have been recorded on such loans according to their original contractual terms and the amount of
interest that actually was recognized under the modified terms. The following table sets forth this data for the years
specified. The change in forgone interest income from 2018 through 2020 was primarily driven by the change in the
levels of nonaccrual loans.
(Unaudited)
Year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Nonaccrual loans
U.S.:
Consumer, excluding credit card:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms $ 330 $ 242 $ 296 
Interest that was recognized in income (174) (160) (171)
Total U.S. consumer, excluding credit card 156 82 125 
Credit card:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms NA NA NA
Interest that was recognized in income NA NA NA
Total U.S. credit card NA NA NA
Total U.S. consumer 156 82 125 
Wholesale:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms 104 77 73 
Interest that was recognized in income (60) (40) (32)
Total U.S. wholesale 44 37 41 
Negative impact — U.S. 200 119 166 
Non-U.S.:
Consumer, excluding credit card:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms — — — 
Interest that was recognized in income — — — 
Total non-U.S. consumer, excluding credit card — — — 
Credit card:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms NA NA NA
Interest that was recognized in income NA NA NA
Total non-U.S. credit card NA NA NA
Total non-U.S. consumer — — — 
Wholesale:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms 59 12 13 
Interest that was recognized in income (23) (5) (3)
Total non-U.S. wholesale 36 7 10 
Negative impact — non-U.S. 36 7 10 
Total negative impact on interest income $ 236 $ 126 $ 176 
316
(Unaudited)
Year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018
Accruing restructured loans
U.S.:
Consumer, excluding credit card:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms $ 241 $ 279 $ 326 
Interest that was recognized in income (151) (192) (215)
Total U.S. consumer, excluding credit card 90 87 111 
Credit card:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms 255 265 227 
Interest that was recognized in income (69) (72) (65)
Total U.S. credit card 186 193 162 
Total U.S. consumer 276 280 273 
Wholesale:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms 3 5 7 
Interest that was recognized in income (2) (3) (6)
Total U.S. wholesale 1 2 1 
Negative impact — U.S. 277 282 274 
Non-U.S.:
Consumer, excluding credit card:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms — — — 
Interest that was recognized in income — — — 
Total non-U.S. consumer, excluding credit card — — — 
Credit card:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms — — — 
Interest that was recognized in income — — — 
Total non-U.S. credit card — — — 
Total non-U.S. consumer — — — 
Wholesale:
Gross amount of interest that would have been recorded at the original terms — — — 
Interest that was recognized in income — — — 
Total non-U.S. wholesale — — — 
Negative impact — non-U.S. — — — 
Total negative impact on interest income $ 277 $ 282 $ 274 
317
Cross-border outstandings
Cross-border disclosure is based on the FFIEC
guidelines governing the determination of cross-border
risk.
The reporting of country exposure under the FFIEC
bank regulatory requirements provides information on
the distribution, by country and sector, of claims on, and
liabilities to, U.S. and foreign residents held by U.S.
banks and bank holding companies and is used by the
regulatory agencies to determine the presence of credit
and relatedrisks, including transfer and country risk. Country
location under the FFIEC bank regulatory reporting is
based on where the entity or counterparty is legally
established.
JPMorgan Chase’s total cross-border exposures may
fluctuate from period to period due to client activity and
market flows. Refer to Country Risk Management on
pages 143-144 for a further discussion of JPMorgan
Chase’s country risk exposure.
The following table lists all countries in which JPMorgan Chase’s cross-border outstandings exceed 0.75% of
consolidated assets as of the dates specified.
Cross-border outstandings exceeding 0.75% of total assets
(Unaudited)
(in millions) December 31, Governments Banks OtherNet local 
 country 
 assetsTotal
cross-border
outstandings Commitments Total exposure
Germany 2020 $ 6,165  $ 842 $ 23,614  $ 55,882  $ 86,503  $ 73,712  $ 160,215  
2019 9,757 4,175 8,709 12,143 34,784 54,817 89,601 
2018 12,793 7,769 15,393 30,054 66,009 67,973 133,982 
Cayman Islands 2020 $ 22 $ 329 $ 123,644  $ 32 $ 124,027  $ 85,830  $ 209,857  
2019 15 367 89,124 — 89,506 114,398 203,904 
2018 1 308 105,857 20 106,186 45,073 151,259 
Japan 2020 $ 61 $ 11,263  $ 3,739  $ 55,200  $ 70,263  $ 31,360  $ 101,623  
2019 191 4,863 3,495 45,654 54,203 42,049 96,252 
2018 282 9,803 4,167 41,948 56,200 51,901 108,101 
France 2020 $ 10,580  $ 7,019  $ 19,686  $ 2,476  $ 39,761  $ 114,307  $ 154,068  
2019 9,445 5,294 12,746 2,697 30,182 107,178 137,360 
2018 12,556 3,499 21,571 2,771 40,397 105,845 146,242 
Italy 2020 $ 10,645  $ 4,169  $ 5,174  $ 1,052  $ 21,040  $ 49,832  $ 70,872  
2019 10,567 2,192 6,095 881 19,735 49,456 69,191 
2018 9,401 4,098 5,145 1,375 20,019 61,326 81,345 
Ireland 2020 $ 125 $ 301 $ 15,679  $ — $ 16,105  $ 6,460  $ 22,565  
2019 381 319 18,061 — 18,761 9,520 28,281 
2018 185 45 19,439 — 19,669 5,585 25,254 
China: Mainland 2020 $ 2,295  $ 8,439  $ 14,924  $ 2,633  $ 28,291  $ 8,827  $ 37,118  
2019 179 5,168 7,207 1,382 13,936 11,111 25,047 
2018 980 6,728 5,318 1,617 14,643 14,435 29,078 
(a)Consists primarily of non-banking financial institutions.
(b)Outstandings include loans and accrued interest receivable, interest-bearing deposits with banks, acceptances, resale agreements, other
monetary assets, cross-border trading debt and equity instruments, fair value of foreign exchange and derivative contracts, and local country
assets, net of local country liabilities. The amounts associated with foreign exchange and derivative contracts are presented after taking into
account the impact of legally enforceable master netting agreements.
(c)Commitments include outstanding letters of credit, undrawn commitments to extend credit, and the gross notional value of credit derivatives
where JPMorgan Chase is a protection seller.(a) (b) (c)
318
The adoption of the CECL accounting guidance resulted in a change in the accounting for PCI loans, which are
considered PCD loans. In conjunction with the adoption of CECL, the Firm reclassified risk-rated loans and lending-
related commitments from the consumer, excluding credit card portfolio segment to the wholesale portfolio segment, to
align with the methodology applied when determining the allowance. Prior-period amounts have been revised to
conform with the current presentation. Refer to Note 1 for further information.
The following tables summarize the changes in the allowance for loan losses and the allowance for lending-related
commitments, as well as loan loss analysis during the periods indicated. Refer to Allowance for credit losses on pages
132-133, and Note 13 for a further discussion.
Allowance for loan losses
(Unaudited)
 Year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Balance at beginning of year $ 13,123 $ 13,445 $ 13,604 $ 13,776 $ 13,555 
Cumulative effect of a change in accounting principle 4,172 NA NA NA NA
U.S. charge-offs
U.S. consumer, excluding credit card 805 902 977 1,727 1,434 
U.S. credit card 5,077 5,436 5,011 4,521 3,799 
Total U.S. consumer charge-offs 5,882 6,338 5,988 6,248 5,233 
U.S. wholesale:
Secured by real estate 16 53 28 36 43 
Commercial and Industrial 530 282 160 102 267 
Other 72 27 121 28 16 
Total U.S. wholesale charge-offs 618 362 309 166 326 
Total U.S. charge-offs 6,500 6,700 6,297 6,414 5,559 
Non-U.S. charge-offs
Non-U.S. consumer, excluding credit card — — — — — 
Non-U.S. credit card — — — — — 
Total non-U.S. consumer charge-offs — — — — — 
Non-U.S. wholesale:
Secured by real estate — 1 1 2 — 
Commercial and Industrial 315 78 51 90 135 
Other 21 31 — 6 3 
Total non-U.S. wholesale charge-offs 336 110 52 98 138 
Total non-U.S. charge-offs 336 110 52 98 138 
Total charge-offs 6,836 6,810 6,349 6,512 5,697 
U.S. recoveries
U.S. consumer, excluding credit card (631) (536) (827) (612) (570)
U.S. credit card (791) (588) (493) (398) (357)
Total U.S. consumer recoveries (1,422) (1,124) (1,320) (1,010) (927)
U.S. wholesale:
Secured by real estate (5) (10) (11) (16) (29)
Commercial and Industrial (97) (21) (78) (65) (15)
Other (22) (18) (38) (17) (9)
Total U.S. wholesale recoveries (124) (49) (127) (98) (53)
Total U.S. recoveries (1,546) (1,173) (1,447) (1,108) (980)
Non-U.S. recoveries
Non-U.S. consumer, excluding credit card — — — — — 
Non-U.S. credit card — — — — — 
Total non-U.S. consumer recoveries — — — — — 
Non-U.S. wholesale:
Secured by real estate — — — (1) — 
Commercial and Industrial (12) (4) (45) (2) (9)
Other (19) (4) (1) (14) (16)
Total non-U.S. wholesale recoveries (31) (8) (46) (17) (25)
Total non-U.S. recoveries (31) (8) (46) (17) (25)
Total recoveries (1,577) (1,181) (1,493) (1,125) (1,005)
Net charge-offs 5,259 5,629 4,856 5,387 4,692 
Write-offs of PCI loans NA 151 187 86 156 
Provision for loan losses 16,291 5,449 4,885 5,300 5,080 
Other 1 9 (1) 1 (11)
Balance at year-end $ 28,328 $ 13,123 $ 13,445 $ 13,604 $ 13,776 
(a)Prior to the adoption of CECL, write-offs of PCI loans were recorded against the allowance for loan losses when actual losses for a pool
exceeded estimated losses that were recorded as purchase accounting adjustments at the time of acquisition. A write-off of a PCI loan was
recognized when the underlying loan was removed from a pool.(a)
319
Summary of loan and lending-related commitments loss experience
Allowance for lending-related commitments
(Unaudited)
Year ended December 31, (in millions) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Balance at beginning of year $ 1,191 $ 1,055 $ 1,068 $ 1,078 $ 786 
Cumulative effect of a change in accounting principles 98 NA NA NA NA
Provision for lending-related commitments 1,121 136 (14) (10) 281 
Other (1) — 1 — 11 
Balance at year-end $ 2,409 $ 1,191 $ 1,055 $ 1,068 $ 1,078 
Loan loss analysis
(Unaudited)
As of or for the year ended December 31, 
 (in millions, except ratios) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Balances
Loans – average $ 1,004,597 $ 989,943 $ 977,406 $ 936,618 $ 892,954 
Loans – year-end 1,012,853 997,620 1,015,760 959,429 922,831 
Net charge-offs 5,259 5,629 4,856 5,387 4,692 
Allowance for loan losses:
U.S. $ 27,343 $ 12,303 $ 12,692 $ 12,552 $ 12,738 
Non-U.S. 985 820 753 1,052 1,038 
Total allowance for loan losses $ 28,328 $ 13,123 $ 13,445 $ 13,604 $ 13,776 
Nonaccrual loans $ 10,573 $ 4,637 $ 5,542 $ 6,636 $ 7,102 
Ratios
Net charge-offs to:
Loans retained – average 0.55 % 0.60 % 0.52 % 0.60 % 0.54 %
Allowance for loan losses 18.56 42.89 36.12 39.60 34.06 
Allowance for loan losses to:
Loans retained – year-end 2.95 1.39 1.39 1.47 1.55 
Nonaccrual loans retained 323 329 292 229 205 
(a)In the third quarter of 2020, the Firm reclassified certain fair value option elected lending-related positions from trading assets to loans. Prior-
period amounts have been revised to conform with the current presentation.
(b)For factors which influenced management's judgment in determining the amount of the additions to the allowance, refer to Critical Accounting
Estimates Used by the Firm on pages 152-155 and Note 13. Refer to Provision for credit losses on page 55 for a more detailed discussion of the
2019 through 2020 provision for credit losses.(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
320
Deposits
The following table provides a summary of the average balances and average interest rates of JPMorgan Chase’s
various deposits for the years indicated.
(Unaudited)
Year ended December 31, Average balances Average interest rates
(in millions, except interest
rates) 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
U.S. offices
Noninterest-bearing $ 495,722 $ 386,116 $ 391,325 NA NA NA
Interest-bearing
Demand 269,888 195,350 177,403 0.25 % 1.42 % 1.09 %
Savings 739,916 602,728 585,885 0.13 0.46 0.32 
Time 59,053 52,415 39,498 1.10 2.56 1.94 
Total interest-bearing
deposits 1,068,857 850,493 802,786 0.21 0.81 0.57 
Total deposits in U.S.
offices 1,564,579 1,236,609 1,194,111 0.15 0.56 0.38 
Non-U.S. offices
Noninterest-bearing 21,805 21,103 20,099 NA NA NA
Interest-bearing
Demand 267,545 217,979 210,978 — 0.59 0.45 
Savings — — — NM NM NM
Time 52,822 47,376 31,273 0.13 1.64 1.48 
Total interest-bearing
deposits 320,367 265,355 242,251 0.02 0.78 0.58 
Total deposits in non-U.S.
offices 342,172 286,458 262,350 0.02 0.72 0.54 
Total deposits $1,906,751 $1,523,067 $1,456,461 0.12 % 0.59 % 0.41 %
(a)Includes Negotiable Order of Withdrawal (“NOW”) accounts, and certain trust accounts.
(b)Includes Money Market Deposit Accounts (“MMDAs”).
At December 31, 2020, other U.S. time deposits in denominations of $100,000 or more totaled $21.8 billion,
substantially all of which mature in three months or less. In addition, the table below presents the maturities for U.S.
time certificates of deposit in denominations of $100,000 or more.
(Unaudited)
By remaining maturity at
 December 31, 2020 
 (in millions)Three months
 or lessOver three
months
 but within six
monthsOver six
months
 but within 12
monthsOver 12
months Total
U.S. time certificates of deposit ($100,000 or more) $ 9,551 $ 5,080 $ 2,108 $ 800 $ 17,539 (a)
(b)
321
Short-term and other borrowed funds
The following table provides a summary of JPMorgan Chase’s short-term and other borrowed funds for the years
indicated.
(Unaudited)
As of or for the year ended December 31, (in millions, except rates) 2020 2019 2018
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under repurchase
agreements:
Balance at year-end $ 215,209 $ 183,675 $ 182,320 
Average daily balance during the year 255,421 227,994 189,282 
Maximum month-end balance 298,464 251,829 201,340 
Weighted-average rate at December 31 0.04 % 1.77 % 2.18 %
Weighted-average rate during the year 0.41 2.03 1.62 
Commercial paper:
Balance at year-end $ 12,031 $ 14,754 $ 30,059 
Average daily balance during the year 12,129 22,977 27,834 
Maximum month-end balance 14,582 30,007 30,470 
Weighted-average rate at December 31 0.26 % 2.16 % 2.71 %
Weighted-average rate during the year 1.12 2.66 2.27 
Other borrowed funds:
Balance at year-end $ 97,393 $ 73,312 $ 101,513 
Average daily balance during the year 106,887 106,348 108,436 
Maximum month-end balance 122,860 128,488 125,544 
Weighted-average rate at December 31 1.00 % 1.85 % 2.23 %
Weighted-average rate during the year 1.29 2.05 2.06 
Short-term beneficial interests:
Commercial paper and other borrowed funds:
Balance at year-end $ 12,425 $ 11,103 $ 6,527 
Average daily balance during the year 13,441 12,511 4,756 
Maximum month-end balance 14,793 16,016 6,527 
Weighted-average rate at December 31 0.21 % 1.92 % 2.53 %
Weighted-average rate during the year 0.71 2.39 2.10 
(a)Includes interest-bearing securities sold but not yet purchased of $64.2 billion, $47.1 billion and $62.3 billion at December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively.
(b)Included on the Consolidated balance sheets in beneficial interests issued by consolidated VIEs.
Federal funds purchased represent overnight funds. Securities loaned or sold under repurchase agreements generally
mature between one and ninety days. Commercial paper generally is issued in amounts not less than $100,000, and
with maturities of 270 days or less. Other borrowed funds consist of demand notes, term federal funds purchased, and
various other borrowings that generally have maturities of one year or less.(a)
(b)
322
Signatures
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly
caused this report to be signed on behalf of the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 JPMorgan Chase & Co.
         (Registrant)
 By: /s/ JAMES DIMON
 
 (James Dimon 
 Chairman and Chief Executive Officer)
February 23, 2021
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacity and on the date indicated. JPMorgan Chase & Co.
does not exercise the power of attorney to sign on behalf of any Director.
 Capacity Date
/s/ JAMES DIMONDirector, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
 (Principal Executive Officer) 
(James Dimon)  
/s/ LINDA B. BAMMANN Director
(Linda B. Bammann)
/s/ STEPHEN B. BURKE Director 
(Stephen B. Burke)
/s/ TODD A. COMBS Director  
(Todd A. Combs)   
/s/ JAMES S. CROWN Director February 23, 2021
(James S. Crown)
/s/ TIMOTHY P. FLYNN Director 
(Timothy P. Flynn)  
/s/ MELLODY HOBSON Director 
(Mellody Hobson)  
/s/ MICHAEL A. NEAL Director
(Michael A. Neal)
/s/ PHEBE N. NOVAKOVIC Director
(Phebe N. Novakovic)
/s/ VIRGINIA M. ROMETTY Director
(Virginia M. Rometty)
/s/ JENNIFER PIEPSZAK Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Jennifer Piepszak) (Principal Financial Officer)
/s/ NICOLE GILES Managing Director and Firmwide Controller
(Nicole Giles) (Principal Accounting Officer)
323
